Mariem Smaoui, Lotfi Krichen, Control, energy management and performance evaluation of desalination unit based renewable energies using a graphical user interface, Energy, Volume 114, 1 November 2016, Pages 1187-1206, ISSN 0360-5442, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.energy.2016.08.051.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0360544216311641)
Abstract: Abstract
Renewable energy sources coupled to desalination unit offers a promising prospect for covering the fundamental needs of power and water in isolated regions. In this context, this study aims to control a reverse osmosis desalination unit powered by renewable energy sources and hydrogen storage situated in the Kerkennah islands (Tunisia). The hybrid system is made up of two wind turbines, a photovoltaic generator, a fuel cell and an electrolyzer. In order to ensure an optimum exploitation of the produced energy, a novel power management algorithm is developed to control the different energy flows exchanged among the system components. This algorithm determines the reference powers of the fuel cell, the electrolyzer and the desalination unit in seven operation modes, and supervises the fill levels of fresh water and hydrogen tanks. The daily simulation of the desalination system with the proposed algorithm for any month of the year and the annual simulation of the energy supervision algorithm are carried out by new graphical interfaces. These interfaces facilitate the simulation and display the different curves describing the hybrid system behavior. The simulation results show that the proposed control strategies provide good installation autonomy and improve the system stability under varying load power demand.
Keywords: Desalination; Renewable energy sources; Hydrogen storage; Control; Power management algorithm; Graphical interface

Kevin I. Kauweloa, Alonso N. Gutierrez, Sotirios Stathakis, Niko Papanikolaou, Panayiotis Mavroidis, A graphical user interface (GUI) toolkit for the calculation of three-dimensional (3D) multi-phase biological effective dose (BED) distributions including statistical analyses, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 131, July 2016, Pages 1-12, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cmpb.2016.03.028.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169260715302224)
Abstract: Abstract
A toolkit has been developed for calculating the 3-dimensional biological effective dose (BED) distributions in multi-phase, external beam radiotherapy treatments such as those applied in liver stereotactic body radiation therapy (SBRT) and in multi-prescription treatments. This toolkit also provides a wide range of statistical results related to dose and BED distributions. MATLAB 2010a, version 7.10 was used to create this GUI toolkit. The input data consist of the dose distribution matrices, organ contour coordinates, and treatment planning parameters from the treatment planning system (TPS). The toolkit has the capability of calculating the multi-phase BED distributions using different formulas (denoted as true and approximate). Following the calculations of the BED distributions, the dose and BED distributions can be viewed in different projections (e.g. coronal, sagittal and transverse). The different elements of this toolkit are presented and the important steps for the execution of its calculations are illustrated. The toolkit is applied on brain, head &amp; neck and prostate cancer patients, who received primary and boost phases in order to demonstrate its capability in calculating BED distributions, as well as measuring the inaccuracy and imprecision of the approximate BED distributions. Finally, the clinical situations in which the use of the present toolkit would have a significant clinical impact are indicated.
Keywords: Biological effective dose; BED; Graphical user interface; GUI; Radiotherapy

I. Kocar, J. Mahseredjian, R.E. Uosef, B. Cetindag, Simulation of transients in very large scale distribution networks by combining input text files with graphical user interface, Electric Power Systems Research, Volume 138, September 2016, Pages 146-154, ISSN 0378-7796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.epsr.2016.03.023.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378779616300700)
Abstract: Abstract
A large scale distribution network with secondary grid network details can easily have ten thousands of nodes and become very complex to study using an Electromagnetic Transients Type (EMT-type) tool. This paper promotes a mixed design tool that connects “visually built” parts with the rest of the network maintained with text files. This approach allows quickly modifying the distribution network built with full details in a transient simulation environment while improving the simulation experience in many ways. Having full circuit details allows the initialization of transient analysis with correct multiphase load flow solution. Once the full circuit simulations are available it is possible to tune equivalent circuits and evaluate the order of approximation errors. A real North American urban distribution network is studied as an example in this paper. Both steady state and transient analysis are performed. Capacitor switching at the substation level is the transient phenomenon studied. A discussion on available guides and technical documents related to switching of shunt capacitors is provided in conjunction with the simulation results.
Keywords: Electromagnetic transient analysis; Distribution systems; Capacitor switching; Simulation tools; Graphic user interface

Óscar Sánchez Ramón, Jesús Sánchez Cuadrado, Jesús García Molina, Jean Vanderdonckt, A layout inference algorithm for Graphical User Interfaces, Information and Software Technology, Volume 70, February 2016, Pages 155-175, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2015.10.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950584915001718)
Abstract: Abstract
Context: Graphical User Interface (GUI) toolkits currently provide layout managers which lay out widgets in views according to certain constraints that characterise each type of layout manager. In some scenarios such as GUI migration and the automated generation of GUIs from wireframes, the layout of views is implicitly expressed through the use of coordinates. In these cases, it is desirable to represent the layout explicitly in terms of layout managers.

Objective: To represent a coordinate-based GUI in terms of a set of layout managers, in order to provide different alternative solutions for a given view and select the best alternative.

Method: The layout inference process consists of two phases. Firstly, the coordinate-based positioning system is changed to a relative positioning system based on directed graphs and Allen relations. Secondly, an exploratory algorithm based on pattern matching and graph rewriting is applied in order to obtain different layout solutions. The algorithm has been evaluated through a case study related to the automatic generation of fluid web interfaces from wireframes, involving 20 IT professionals.

Results: The case study showed that the layout obtained is faithful to the original views in 97% of cases, and maintains its proportions when resized in 84% of views. The majority of the participants were satisfied with the results and found the approach useful.

Conclusions: The layout manager representation obtained from the coordinate-based GUIs can be used to generate fluid layouts. The algorithm has two main features that overcome the limitations of the existing approaches: independence of specific layout managers and ability to generate several alternative solutions.
Keywords: Graphical User Interfaces; Layout inference; Wireframes; Model-driven engineering; Reverse engineering; Fluid layout

Jakub Chęciński, Marek Frankowski, MAGE (M-file/Mif Automatic GEnerator): A graphical interface tool for automatic generation of Object Oriented Micromagnetic Framework configuration files and Matlab scripts for results analysis, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 207, October 2016, Pages 487-498, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2016.06.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465516302016)
Abstract: Abstract
We present a tool for fully-automated generation of both simulations configuration files (Mif) and Matlab scripts for automated data analysis, dedicated for Object Oriented Micromagnetic Framework (OOMMF). We introduce extended graphical user interface (GUI) that allows for fast, error-proof and easy creation of Mifs, without any programming skills usually required for manual Mif writing necessary. With MAGE we provide OOMMF extensions for complementing it by mangetoresistance and spin-transfer-torque calculations, as well as local magnetization data selection for output. Our software allows for creation of advanced simulations conditions like simultaneous parameters sweeps and synchronic excitation application. Furthermore, since output of such simulation could be long and complicated we provide another GUI allowing for automated creation of Matlab scripts suitable for analysis of such data with Fourier and wavelet transforms as well as user-defined operations.
Program summary
Program title: MAGE (Mif/M-file Automatic GEnerator)

Catalogue identifier: AFAZ_v1_0

Program summary URL:http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AFAZ_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen’s University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: GNU GPL v3

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 104926

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 13228229

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: MATLAB.

Computer: Any computer with MATLAB installed.

Operating system: Any system with MATLAB installed.

Classification: 4.14, 7.7.

Nature of problem:

Numerous problems of ferromagnetic nanoelements can be investigated with micromagnetic simulations using The Object Oriented MicroMagnetic Framework (OOMMF). Often, research requires continuous parameters and condition changes while running a large number of simulations with time-varying parameters, which means that the user has to be experienced with programming and that a lot of time has to be spent on creating numerous expanded Mifs. What is more, after the simulations are finished, the analysis of a large number of resultant files often turns out to be a rigorous and relatively time-consuming process. Additionally, even though OOMMF is being continuously extended, gaining possibilities of simulating new phenomena, such extensions tend to suffer from drawbacks of open source paradigm, i.e. lack of documentation and highly specific interfaces.

Solution method:

MAGE provides an easy-to-use graphical user interface (GUI) that overcomes all programming barriers for fast and error-free development of highly complicated systems and external time-varying conditions. The program contains tools allowing for modelling of the most recent phenomena such as spin-transfer-torque, voltage-induced anisotropy changes and magnetoresistance calculations as well as a possibility of registering local magnetization changes. We provide a convenient GUI for fast, efficient and automated data analysis, including both classical Fourier analysis as well as more advanced wavelet approach.

Running time:

Negligible for configuration and data-process files creation. For evaluation of generated scripts strongly depends on sample size and time span being investigated, but should not exceed several minutes in a typical case.
Keywords: OOMMF; Micromagnetic simulation; Mif; Matlab; STT; VCMA

Eric Barboni, Célia Martinie, David Navarre, Philippe Palanque, Marco Winckler, Bridging the gap between a behavioural formal description technique and a user interface description language: Enhancing ICO with a graphical user interface markup language, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 86, 15 June 2014, Pages 3-29, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2013.04.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642313000993)
Abstract: Abstract
In the last years, User Interface Description Languages (UIDLs) appeared as a suitable solution for developing interactive systems. In order to implement reliable and efficient applications, we propose to employ a formal description technique called ICO (Interactive Cooperative Object) that has been developed to cope with complex behaviours of interactive systems including event-based and multimodal interactions. So far, ICO is able to describe most of the parts of an interactive system, from functional core concerns to fine grain interaction techniques, but, even if it addresses parts of the rendering, it still not has means to describe the effective rendering of such interactive system. This paper presents a solution to overcome this gap using markup languages. A first technique is based on the Java technology called JavaFX and a second technique is based on the emergent UsiXML language for describing user interface components for multi-target platforms. The proposed approach offers a bridge between markup language based descriptions of the user interface components and a robust technique for describing behaviour using ICO modelling. Furthermore, this paper highlights how it is possible to take advantage from both behavioural and markup language description techniques to propose a new model-based approach for prototyping interactive systems. The proposed approach is fully illustrated by a case study using an interactive application embedded into interactive aircraft cockpits.
Keywords: Model-based approaches; User interface description language; Formal description techniques; Behavioural modelling; Graphical user interface markup language

Gerhard Leitner, Alexander Felfernig, Paul Blazek, Florian Reinfrank and Gerald Ninaus, Chapter 8 - User Interfaces for Configuration Environments, In Knowledge-Based Configuration, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 89-106, ISBN 9780124158177, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-415817-7.00008-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124158177000086)
Abstract: Abstract
Configuration technologies are successfully applied in different domains such as telecommunication, financial services, and automotive. User interfaces of configuration environments play a key role with regard to two major aspects. First, users of a configurator application need interfaces that allow for efficient and intuitive configuration processes. Second, knowledge engineers and domain experts (developers of configurator applications) need interfaces that provide intelligent support of development and maintenance operations. In this chapter we discuss aspects that should be taken into account when developing user interfaces for configurator end users and application developers.
Keywords: Knowledge-based Configuration; User Interfaces; End Users; Application Developers; Knowledge Engineering; Guidelines

Ana I. Molina, William J. Giraldo, Jesús Gallardo, Miguel A. Redondo, Manuel Ortega, Guillermo García, CIAT-GUI: A MDE-compliant environment for developing Graphical User Interfaces of information systems, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 52, October 2012, Pages 10-29, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2012.06.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997812000841)
Abstract: The development and specification of interactive systems is a complex process. The use of notations, methods and their respective technological support is necessary for obtaining user interfaces in a purely engineering manner and not in a manner of craftsmanship, as has been the case thus far. In the field of Software Engineering, an interest is currently being taken in the Model-Driven Development (MDD) paradigm. MDD permits simplification and automation in the process of software development by defining models and transformations of those models. This paradigm can be successfully applied to the problem of obtaining Graphical User Interfaces (GUIs) from declarative models (Model-Based User Interface Development; MBUID). With the aim of solving the issue of obtaining a GUI by following a model-driven process, we propose a method, and a tool that implements that method called CIAT-GUI. In developing this tool we have made use of relevant technologies in the field of MDD such as EMF, GMF, ATL and MofScript. This proposed method, in contrast to other proposals existing in the literature, allows the visualization and modification of intermediate prototypes of the GUI and permits an executable GUI (in XAML language) to be obtained. Finally, an initial study was conducted with the aim of verifying the suitability of this approach and of the implemented tool, as well as assessing the perception of software engineers regarding its usefulness.
Keywords: Model-Based User Interface Development (MBUID); Model-Driven Engineering; Human-centered software engineering; Automatic generation of user interfaces; Mapping problem; Graphical User Interfaces

Henrique Mohallem Paiva, Sófacles Figueredo Carreiro Soares, Roberto Kawakami Harrop Galvão, Mário César Ugulino Araújo, A graphical user interface for variable selection employing the Successive Projections Algorithm, Chemometrics and Intelligent Laboratory Systems, Volume 118, 15 August 2012, Pages 260-266, ISSN 0169-7439, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chemolab.2012.05.014.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169743912001347)
Abstract: The present work describes a MATLAB graphical user interface for the Successive Projections Algorithm (SPA), which is a variable selection technique aimed at reducing collinearity problems in Multiple Linear Regression (MLR) modelling. The interface also offers the possibility of pre-processing the data using Savitzky–Golay smoothing/differentiation and/or wavelet denoising. Sample selection routines for dividing the samples into calibration and validation sets are also implemented. At the end, prediction statistics (PRESS, RMSEP, SDV, BIAS and correlation coefficient) are calculated to evaluate the performance of the resulting MLR model. All these operations can be carried out by the user without the need for MATLAB programming skills. For illustration, an example involving near-infrared spectrometric determination of moisture in corn samples is presented. The software is freely available at www.ele.ita.br/~kawakami/spa
Keywords: Multivariate calibration; Variable selection; Successive Projections Algorithm; Graphical user interface; MATLAB

Nabih Jaber, Kemal E. Tepe, Esam Abdel-Raheem, Reconfigurable simulator using graphical user interface (GUI) and object-oriented design for OFDM systems, Simulation Modelling Practice and Theory, Volume 19, Issue 5, May 2011, Pages 1294-1317, ISSN 1569-190X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.simpat.2011.02.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1569190X11000207)
Abstract: In this paper, a design of a new object-oriented simulation environment and graphical user interface (GUI) for versatile orthogonal frequency division multiplexing (OFDM) systems is presented. This is achieved using high-level design, parallelism and usability for the simulation environment. GUI interface can serve as a learning/research tool for students or practiced professionals to investigate particular designs. It is evident that OFDM systems intended to be used in dynamic environments must be tested under various conditions in order to be designed for optimality. Hence, a simulation design is proposed coupling the GUI, parallelism, and high-level object-oriented design techniques to be beneficial to the researcher. A high-level design and GUI layouts of the proposed simulator is shown in details. Important OFDM parameters needed for reconfiguration of transmitter components, channel condition parameters, and receiver components are discussed. In addition, this paper provides a simple technique to implement simulation partitioning for increased parallel performance of reconfigurable object-oriented OFDM simulators. This simple technique applies to scenarios where there is disproportionate simulation duration between different OFDM configurations. It is shown to decrease total simulation time considerably.
Keywords: Modelling; OFDM physical layer (PHY); Simulation environments; High-level design; Graphical user interface (GUI); Reconfigurable; Object-oriented simulation

T. Fromm, PRay — A graphical user interface for interactive visualization and modification of rayinvr models, Journal of Applied Geophysics, Volume 124, January 2016, Pages 1-3, ISSN 0926-9851, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jappgeo.2015.11.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0926985115300562)
Abstract: Abstract
PRay is a graphical user interface for interactive displaying and editing of velocity models for seismic refraction. It is optimized for editing rayinvr models but can also be used as a dynamic viewer for ray tracing results from other software. The main features are the graphical editing of nodes and fast adjusting of the display (stations and phases). It can be extended by user-defined shell scripts and links to phase picking software. PRay is open source software written in the scripting language Perl, runs on Unix-like operating systems including Mac OS X and provides a version controlled source code repository for community development (https://sourceforge.net/projects/pray-plot-rayinvr/).
Keywords: Refractions seismic; Modelling; Software; Seismic inversion; Rayinvr

Ercan Avşar, Kerem Ün, Automatic 3D modeling and simulation of bone-fixator system in a novel graphical user interface, Informatics in Medicine Unlocked, Volume 2, 2016, Pages 78-91, ISSN 2352-9148, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.imu.2016.04.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2352914816300041)
Abstract: Abstract
External ring fixators are widely used in orthopaedics for the purposes of fracture fixation, bone lengthening and deformity correction. In these fixators, the clinician typically brings the bone fragments to an anatomically desired position by changing the lengths of the rods connecting the fixator rings. This task is accomplished by the clinician based on experience and expertise. As an alternative, commercial systems exist where the same task is automatized with the help of an accompanying software that implements a mathematical model of the fixator. In this work, we have developed a graphical user interface (GUI) implementing a mathematical theory introduced previously. The GUI also allows visualization and simulation of the patient specific bone-fixator system, something that lacks in the available software systems. The information gathered from the bone X-ray images is used to convert a canonical bone model to the patient-specific bone model. This conversion algorithm has been tested on eight different bone models and found to be effective. The visualization tool has been used in the simulation of two orthopaedic procedures, one involving a tibia and the other a femur. In both examples, the visualization tool has provided a realistic depiction of the treatment procedure. We believe that the developed GUI equipped with the visualization module could be a useful clinical tool where the clinician can visualize the applied treatment or evaluate different treatment scenarios a priori per patient.
Keywords: External fixation; 3D Simulation; Bone model generation; Patient-specific model

N. Vila Blanco, L. Rodríguez-Liñares, P. Cuesta, M.J. Lado, A.J. Méndez, X.A. Vila, gVARVI: A graphical software tool for the acquisition of the heart rate in response to external stimuli, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 132, August 2016, Pages 197-205, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cmpb.2016.05.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169260715302601)
Abstract: AbstractBackground and objective
At present, tools capable of acquiring heart rate data can be found both in commercial and research fields. However, these tools do not allow users to manage experiments comprising sequences of activities or to store the information needed to perform heart rate variability analysis across different activities. One exception is VARVI, a simple software tool developed previously in our research group that does not have a graphical user interface and it works only with visual stimuli. In this paper, we present gVARVI, a software tool aimed at obtaining heart rate data signals while the user is either receiving a sequence of external stimuli or performing a sequence of actions (an activity).
Methods
gVARVI is an open source application developed in Python programming language. It can acquire heart rate data by means of a wireless chest strap using either Bluetooth or ANT+ protocols. Users can define activities of different types (video, sounds, pictures or keyboard controlled actions) which will associate contextual information to the heart rate data. gVARVI allows users to preview this data or to store it to be used for heart rate variability studies. Our tool was validated by 15 researchers, who worked with the application and filled in a usability questionnaire.
Results
The outcome of the usability test was satisfactory, giving a mean score of 4.75 in a 1–5 scale (1 – strongly disagree, 5 – strongly agree). Participants also contributed with valuable comments, which we used to include new features in the last version of our tool.
Conclusions
gVARVI is an open source tool that offers new possibilities to both physicians and clinicians to perform heart rate variability studies. It allows users to acquire heart rate data including information on the activity performed by subjects while recording. In this paper, we describe all the functionalities included in gVARVI, and a complete example of use is provided.
Keywords: Heart rate variability; External stimuli; Graphical user interface; Software tool

O.K. Mahabadi, G. Grasselli, A. Munjiza, Y-GUI: A graphical user interface and pre-processor for the combined finite-discrete element code, Y2D, incorporating material heterogeneity, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 36, Issue 2, February 2010, Pages 241-252, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cageo.2009.05.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098300409003124)
Abstract: Numerical modelling of a discontinuous medium has gained much popularity in recent decades. The combined finite-discrete element method (FEM/DEM) is a state-of-the-art numerical modelling technique pioneered in the mid-1990s. Y2D is a robust two-dimensional FEM/DEM research code developed by Munjiza in 2004. The major limitations of this code are (1) the lack of a graphical user interface (GUI) meaning that all pre-processing has to be made directly on an ASCII input file and (2) the inability of dealing with heterogeneous media. This contribution presents the first GUI and pre-processor, known as Y-GUI, developed for Y2D and the implementation of a new algorithm that allows for the use of heterogeneous materials. In the text all major FEM/DEM concepts are described, together with the main features available in the Y-GUI. The use of Y-GUI is presented in detail and some of its functionalities, including the heterogeneity module to be used to randomly assign materials to a mesh, are introduced. At the end of the manuscript, four case studies, including Brazilian tests of a homogeneous and a layered rock sample and a rock avalanche, are presented.
Keywords: Y-GUI; Graphical user interface (GUI); Combined finite-discrete element method (FEM/DEM); Heterogeneity; Brazilian test; Rock avalanche

David Roldán-Álvarez, Estefanía Martín, Manuel García-Herranz, Pablo A. Haya, Mind the gap: Impact on learnability of user interface design of authoring tools for teachers, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 94, October 2016, Pages 18-34, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2016.04.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581916300453)
Abstract: Abstract
Few teachers include information and communication technology in the classroom, despite their potential for increasing attention and motivation for students. Educational authoring tools are intended to turn teachers into designers and deliverers of technology-enhanced educational content, and increasing the adoption of these tools is a key element for speeding up this transformation. This paper emphasizes the importance of learnability for preventing rejection or abandonment by of such an authoring tool, and how acceptance is deeply affected by the interaction paradigm and the creation metaphor used in the tool. We present an analysis comparing two design paradigms: the widespread menu-based and choice-guided interaction paradigm versus a consistent metaphor with direct manipulation. The latter was implemented in DEDOS-Editor, a novel authoring tool that allows the creation of diverse educational activities that can be performed on different devices, such as PCs, digital blackboards, tablets, and multitouch surfaces. An experimental study shows the tremendous impact that interface choices have on the tool's learning curve. The results provide the first mapping of the choice of a direct-manipulation interface and its effect on the learning curve's entry point, as well as a consistent interaction metaphor with smoother and fast-growing learning curves. This allows users to complete more tasks and gain more knowledge through experience, in contrast to menu-based interfaces. The initial use of the tool is thus made easier for users with no experience or information about the tool, and the advantages of experience and expertize in facing new challenges are facilitating. This work also highlights the appropriateness of learning curves as a tool for measuring learnability.
Keywords: Authoring tools and methods; Human-computer interface; Evaluation of CAL systems

A. Salvadori, D. Licari, G. Mancini, A. Brogni, N. De Mitri and V. Barone, Graphical Interfaces and Virtual Reality for Molecular Sciences, In Reference Module in Chemistry, Molecular Sciences and Chemical Engineering, Elsevier, 2014, ISBN 9780124095472, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-409547-2.11045-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124095472110455)
Abstract: Abstract
The graphical description of molecular systems has always been a fundamental topic of chemistry. The introduction of interactive computer graphics led to the development of a new research field known as computer molecular graphics. The aim of this article is to provide a survey on the vast field of molecular graphics, describing the techniques and the algorithms used to create computer-generated representations of molecular systems. The emerging role of immersive virtual reality and natural user interfaces is also examined. Finally, some applications are presented as examples about the role of graphical user interfaces in modern chemical research.
Keywords: Graphical user interfaces; Interactive 3-D graphics; Molecular graphics; Molecular representations; Molecular shape enhancement; Scientific visualization; Virtual microscopy; Virtual reality; Virtual spectrometer

Selem Charfi, Abdelwaheb Trabelsi, Houcine Ezzedine, Christophe Kolski, A User-Oriented Test environment based on User-Interface evaluation graphical controls, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 46, Issue 15, 2013, Pages 497-504, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20130811-5-US-2037.00060.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016331093)
Abstract: Abstract
Several user-oriented techniques have been proposed for Graphical User Interface evaluation. In this paper, we focus on User-Oriented Test concepts, advantages and related problems. Among the User-Oriented Test techniques, the electronic informer is a powerful technique for interactive system testing. Thus, this research paper contributes in the improvement of existing tools for interactive system evaluation. This environment is achieved using (1) an electronic informer dedicated to the interactive system evaluation and (2) evaluation based graphical controls. The proposed evaluation environment is structured following client-server architecture. It aims to automate the interactive system evaluation process. Besides it takes the evaluation process into account since early interactive system design phases. This environment is validated by an experimental test.
Keywords: User-Oriented Test (UOT); usability test; electronic informer; HCI evaluation

Christina Ohm, Stefan Bienk, Markus Kattenbeck, Bernd Ludwig, Manuel Müller, Towards interfaces of mobile pedestrian navigation systems adapted to the user’s orientation skills, Pervasive and Mobile Computing, Volume 26, February 2016, Pages 121-134, ISSN 1574-1192, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pmcj.2015.10.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S157411921500190X)
Abstract: Abstract
It is an open question, whether differently developed orientation skills require alternate pedestrian navigation interface designs for optimal self-localization during wayfinding. To address this issue we conducted two user studies in order to analyze different presentations of mobile maps.

Evaluations were conducted in an outdoor ( N = 112 ) and indoor ( N = 64 ) environment. We recorded the time it took participants to localize themselves with the help of salient objects. Significant results were found for both studies. Abstract interfaces support well-oriented users, whereas worse oriented ones profited from standard designs. Consequently, we make the case for user-adaptive pedestrian navigation interfaces.
Keywords: Pedestrian navigation; Indoor user interface; Map presentation; Adaptive interfaces

Luigi Troiano, Cosimo Birtolo, Genetic algorithms supporting generative design of user interfaces: Examples, Information Sciences, Volume 259, 20 February 2014, Pages 433-451, ISSN 0020-0255, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ins.2012.01.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0020025512000242)
Abstract: Abstract
Designing User Interfaces (UIs) is considered a creative and human-intensive task, and this prevents from adopting computer-aided tools to explore alternative solutions. A number of decisions are to be taken, such as optimizing the displacement of UI items on the available screen space or selecting an adequate palette of colors. Therefore, the UI design process is iterative in nature, time consuming, and costly.

Generative design, while keeping the centrality of human creativity, introduces a novel approach to assist humans in finding effective and esthetically convincing solutions. Meta-heuristics are a means to apply generative design in practice. We advocate the use of meta-heuristics to supporting different aspects of the UI design process. In this paper we discuss the application of genetic algorithms to solve two different problems: building hierarchical menu layouts and selecting color palettes based on a set of constraints. The paper discusses the results of two experimental applications developed in Poste Italiane, namely the money ordering by Automated Teller Machine (ATM) interfaces and the provision of financial information by kiosks.
Keywords: Genetic algorithms; Generative design; Human computer interaction; Graphical User Interfaces; Search based software engineering

Lukas Smirek, Gottfried Zimmermann, Michael Beigl, Just a Smart Home or Your Smart Home – A Framework for Personalized User Interfaces Based on Eclipse Smart Home and Universal Remote Console, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 98, 2016, Pages 107-116, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2016.09.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050916321391)
Abstract: Abstract
In the last few years substantial progress has been made in smart home technologies, and promises to support and assist us in our daily life are higher than ever. This holds not only for regular users but also for people with special needs such as the elderly and people with disabilities. The appropriate design of smart homes can enable a more independent life for these users and can give them the chance to stay in their familiar environment for a longer period of time. Hence, the smart home concept can play an important role when addressing the demographic change that is present in most industrial countries. However, although technologies seem to be advanced and the expected benefits are high, a wide-spread adoption has not yet taken place. There are various reasons for this situation. Among them, the lack of appropriate user interfaces for the heterogeneous user group of future smart homes and the problem of low interoperability between different smart home systems can be mentioned. Two platforms addressing these problems are the Eclipse Smart Home (ESH) project and the Universal Remote Console (URC). ESH focuses on the integration of different device and back-end technologies; URC provides a personalized, pluggable user interface. This paper analyzes the similarities and differences between the two systems. As a result of the analysis, a concept for integrating the ideas of URC into the ESH project is proposed. This concept is a first step towards a platform for personalized user interfaces in the Smart Home and Ambient Assisted Living domain.
Keywords: Smart Home; AAL; Personalisation; User Interface; Eclipse Smart Home; Universal Remote Console

C.T. Asque, A.M. Day, S.D. Laycock, Augmenting graphical user interfaces with haptic assistance for motion-impaired operators, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 72, Issues 10–11, October–November 2014, Pages 689-703, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2014.05.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581914000743)
Abstract: Abstract
Haptic assistance is an emerging field of research that is designed to improve human–computer interaction (HCI) by reducing error rates and targeting times through the use of force feedback. Haptic feedback has previously been investigated to assist motion-impaired computer users, however, limitations such as target distracters have hampered its integration with graphical user interfaces (GUIs). In this paper two new haptic assistive techniques are presented that utilise the 3DOF capabilities of the Phantom Omni. These are referred to as deformable haptic cones and deformable virtual switches. The assistance is designed specifically to enable motion-impaired operators to use existing GUIs more effectively. Experiment 1 investigates the performance benefits of the new haptic techniques when used in conjunction with the densely populated Windows on-screen keyboard (OSK). Experiment 2 utilises the ISO 9241-9 point-and-click task to investigate the effects of target size and shape. The results of the study prove that the newly proposed techniques improve interaction rates and can be integrated with existing software without many of the drawbacks of traditional haptic assistance. Deformable haptic cones and deformable virtual switches were shown to reduce the mean number of missed-clicks by at least 75% and reduce targeting times by at least 25%.
Keywords: Haptic assistance; Haptics; Computer accessibility; Human–computer interaction

Joaquim Jaumot, Raimundo Gargallo, Anna de Juan, Romà Tauler, A graphical user-friendly interface for MCR-ALS: a new tool for multivariate curve resolution in MATLAB, Chemometrics and Intelligent Laboratory Systems, Volume 76, Issue 1, 28 March 2005, Pages 101-110, ISSN 0169-7439, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chemolab.2004.12.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169743904002874)
Abstract: A new graphical user-friendly interface for Multivariate Curve Resolution using Alternating Least Squares has been developed as a freely available MATLAB toolbox. Through the use of this new easy-to-use graphical interface, the selection of the type of data analysis (either individual experiments giving a single data matrix or the more powerful simultaneous analysis of several experiments using one or more techniques) and the selection of the appropriate constraints can be performed in an intuitive and easy way, with the help of the options in the graphical interface. Different examples of use of this interface are given.
Keywords: MCR-ALS; Curve resolution; Chemometrics; Graphical user interface; MATLAB

A. Delgado, A. Estepa, J.A. Troyano, R. Estepa, Reusing UI elements with Model-Based User Interface Development, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 86, February 2016, Pages 48-62, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2015.09.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581915001470)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper introduces the potential for reusing UI elements in the context of Model-Based UI Development (MBUID) and provides guidance for future MBUID systems with enhanced reutilization capabilities. Our study is based upon the development of six inter-related projects with a specific MBUID environment which supports standard techniques for reuse such as parametrization and sub-specification, inclusion or shared repositories.

We analyze our experience and discuss the benefits and limitations of each technique supported by our MBUID environment. The system architecture, the structure and composition of UI elements and the models specification languages have a decisive impact on reusability. In our case, more than 40% of the elements defined in the UI specifications were reused, resulting in a reduction of 55% of the specification size. Inclusion, parametrization and sub-specification have facilitated modularity and internal reuse of UI specifications at development time, whereas the reuse of UI elements between applications has greatly benefited from sharing repositories of UI elements at run time.
Keywords: MBUID; Reuse; Software engineering; User Interface

Elias Kyriakides, Gerald T. Heydt, Estimation of synchronous generator parameters using an observer for damper currents and a graphical user interface, Electric Power Systems Research, Volume 69, Issue 1, April 2004, Pages 7-16, ISSN 0378-7796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.epsr.2003.07.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378779603001822)
Abstract: This paper presents a method to identify synchronous generator parameters from on-line data. An observer for estimation of synchronous machine damper currents is designed. The observer-estimator is used in a graphical user interface (GUI) application. Possible internal machine fault conditions can be detected and remedial action can be undertaken. It is desired that an algorithm be developed such that it will enable bad measurement detection and rejection so as to increase the reliability of the results. Secondary objectives include calculation of the error characteristics of the estimation; development of an index of confidence; study of which machine parameters can be estimated, and which cannot; and evaluation of alternative GUI features.
Keywords: Adaptive observers; Damper currents; Graphical user interface; Modeling; Observer; On-line measurements; Parameter estimation; Pseudoinverse; State estimation; Synchronous generator

Eigil Samset, Eirik Gjesteland, Murad Sæter, 3D graphical user interface for computer-assisted surgery, International Congress Series, Volume 1256, June 2003, Pages 414-418, ISSN 0531-5131, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0531-5131(03)00259-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0531513103002590)
Abstract: We have examined what contributions the combination of augmented reality (AR) and hand input can make to a 3D graphical user interface (GUI) for computer-assisted surgery. We have developed an early prototype of a GUI that can be operated in augmented space. The user interacts with the GUI by pointing with his hands. Future work will include improving the prototype and integrating it with systems used at The Interventional Centre at Rikshospitalet University Hospital, Oslo.
Keywords: 3D graphical user interface; Augmented reality; ARToolKit

V. Giménez-Alventosa, F. Ballester, J. Vijande, VoxelMages: a general-purpose graphical interface for designing geometries and processing DICOM images for PENELOPE, Applied Radiation and Isotopes, Available online 21 September 2016, ISSN 0969-8043, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apradiso.2016.09.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0969804316307540)
Abstract: Abstract
The design and construction of geometries for Monte Carlo calculations is an error-prone, time-consuming, and complex step in simulations describing particle interactions and transport in the field of medical physics. The software VoxelMages has been developed to help the user in this task. It allows to design complex geometries and to process DICOM image files for simulations with the general-purpose Monte Carlo code PENELOPE in an easy and straightforward way. VoxelMages also allows to import DICOM-RT structure contour information as delivered by a treatment planning system. Its main characteristics, usage and performance benchmarking are described in detail.
Keywords: 87.53.Bn; 87.53.Jw; 87.55.Qr; 87.55.km; 87.55.K

Ignacio E. Zaldívar-Huerta, Alejandro García-Juárez, Jorge Rodríguez-Asomoza, Gustavo Aguayo-Rodríguez, A software tool to evaluate the frequency response of a microwave photonic filter in MATLAB based on a Graphical User Interface, Optik - International Journal for Light and Electron Optics, Volume 125, Issue 1, January 2014, Pages 318-323, ISSN 0030-4026, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijleo.2013.06.060.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0030402613009297)
Abstract: Abstract
The aim of this paper is to describe the development and application of a software tool in MATLAB based on a Graphical User Interface that allows evaluation of the frequency response of a microwave photonic filter. Microwave photonic filters have potential applications in optical communication systems. The main characteristic of this software tool is the friendly way to edit the parameters involved to determine the frequency response. In order to validate the results obtained by the use of this software tool, a series of experiments were carried out in our laboratory and the results were compared qualitatively showing a good agreement. The developed software has a potential application as a didactic tool in a course of microwave electro-optical systems.
Keywords: Microwave photonic filter; Fourier transform; MATLAB; CAD; Optical communication systems

Bruno Dumas, Beat Signer, Denis Lalanne, A graphical editor for the SMUIML multimodal user interaction description language, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 86, 15 June 2014, Pages 30-42, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2013.04.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642313001019)
Abstract: Abstract
We present the results of an investigation on software support for the SMUIML multimodal user interaction description language (UIDL). In particular, we introduce a graphical UIDL editor for the creation of SMUIML scripts. The data management as well as the dialogue modelling in our graphical editor is based on the SMUIML language. Due to the event-centred nature of SMUIML, the multimodal dialogue modelling is represented by a state machine in the graphical SMUIML dialogue editor. Our editor further offers a real-time graphical debugging tool. Compared to existing multimodal dialogue editing solutions, the SMUIML graphical editor offers synchronised dual editing in graphical and textual forms as well as a number of operators for the temporal combination of modalities. The presented graphical editor represents the third component of a triad of tools for the development of multimodal user interfaces, consisting of an XML-based modelling language, a framework for the authoring of multimodal interfaces and a graphical editor.
Keywords: Multimodal interaction; UIDL; Graphical editor; SMUIML; HephaisTK

Christian Moeseneder, Leo Dutra, Olivier Thebaud, Nick Ellis, Fabio Boschetti, Sharon Tickell, Cathy Dichmont, William de la Mare, Ricardo Pascual, Toni Cannard, A simulation interface designed for improved user interaction and learning in water quality modelling software, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 70, August 2015, Pages 86-96, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2015.04.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815215001152)
Abstract: Abstract
Traditional simulation software that supports management decisions is configured and run by experienced scientists. However, it is often criticised for its lack of interactivity, not only in the application of decisions but also in the display of results. This paper presents the simulation interface of software with management strategy evaluation capabilities and its capacity to enable resource managers to learn about water quality management as evaluated in a workshop setting. The software ‘MSE Tool’ is not intended to produce definitive real-world advice but provides a test-bed for managers to interactively design strategies and explore the complexities inherent to water quality management using a simple, yet effective, user interface. MSE Tool has been used in a pilot application that simulated the effects of management strategies applied in catchments and their effects on riverine, estuarine and marine water quality in South East Queensland, Australia. The approach and the software are suitable for reuse in other management strategy evaluation projects.
Keywords: Management strategy evaluation; Simulation interface; User interactivity; Interaction; Learning; Decision support system; DSS; EDSS; Water quality; South East Queensland

Nadine Utzel, Bernard Guillerminet, Mireille Leluyer, Danièle Moulin, Java graphical user interface for the supervision of Tore Supra, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 60, Issue 3, June 2002, Pages 415-420, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0920-3796(02)00041-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379602000418)
Abstract: The graphical user interface (GUI) for the supervision of Tore Supra is intended to supervise the start-up and the shut-down of the installation, to control general state (state of all diagnostics, state of the system and network) and to follow the pulse sequence. Implementation of a new multi-platform, modular GUI for Tore Supra is in progress. This provides not only a simpler, more structured view for the non-specialist user, but also is open-ended and adaptable to a wide variety of uses. The actual implementation of a GUI is a question of user-ergonomics. Hence, a user-directed study in 2000 produced a specification for the interface. The information is treated with a hierarchical order. At the top level, only the global state of the supervised elements appears, i.e. the general state of every diagnostics, the pulse sequence, the safety systems. If a problem occurs, the operator has access to the lower level detailed state of the concerned element, simply with a double-click. An event log also helps the operator to analyse the chronology of the alarms arising during the pulse. Although the GUI is mainly used in the control room on X terminals under Unix, it should also be accessible via a portable PC for the purpose of maintenance, or directly from any office to see how the physics program is progressing. The choice of Java, multi-platform object programming language was thus adopted with access via any web browser. The modularity of the GUI is made possible by a distributed architecture (remote method invocation) between the graphic client and different servers: one for the diagnostics and the sequence, one for the system and the network and one for the configuration database. All the components interact with each other in a very simple and standard way. This distributed architecture allows the progressive set up of the new interface. The first step, being produced for mid-2001 is the GUI for the supervision of diagnostics. This prototype will help us to validate all the concepts. The second step in mid-2002 will be the complete GUI to supervise and execute pulse sequences and maintenance operations.
Keywords: Graphical user interface; Supervision of data acquisition; Java; Distributed architecture

Fan Zhang, Michael D. Murphy, Laurence Shalloo, Elodie Ruelle, John Upton, An automatic model configuration and optimization system for milk production forecasting, Computers and Electronics in Agriculture, Volume 128, October 2016, Pages 100-111, ISSN 0168-1699, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compag.2016.08.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168169916306561)
Abstract: Abstract
The objective of this study was to develop and implement the Milk Production Forecast Optimization System (MPFOS) for the purpose of comparing the effectiveness of multiple herd milk yield prediction models for an Irish pasture-based dairy herd. The MPFOS was populated by nine milk production models that were categorized into three types: curve fitting, regression and auto-regressive models. The Adaptive Stratified Sampling Approach (ASSA) was introduced for data filtering, processing and for randomly selecting each member of the 100 cow sample herd. The MPFOS calculated optimal model parameters, statistical analysis and milk production forecasts for each chosen model using input data combinations based on animal, herd and milk production records. The model evaluations were based on historical milk production data between the years 2004 and 2009 from dairy farms in the south of Ireland situated in close proximity. Milk yield records from 2004 to 2008 were used for model training, whereas the milk production records for 2009 were set for model evaluation and validation. The ASSA randomly selected the representative herd population based on the required criteria. The MPFOS automatically generated the optimal configuration for each of the nine milk production forecast models and benchmarked their performance over a short, medium and long term prediction horizon. The Root Mean Square Error (RMSE) value of the nine prediction models varied substantially (from 68.5 kg to 210.4 kg per day). The surface fitting model performed better (10% in RPE and R2) than the dynamic NARX model for the same prediction horizon (365-day and 30-day). However, the NARX model provided more accurate results for shorter (10-day) prediction horizons. The MPFOS found the most accurate model based on prediction horizon length and on number of input parameters. The results of this study demonstrate the effectiveness of the MPFOS as a model configuration and comparison tool. The MPFOS may also be employed for selecting the optimal milk production forecast model for a specific application.
Keywords: Dairy production; Milk production forecasting; Dairy modelling

Ghasan Bhatti, Roland Brémond, Jean-Pierre Jessel, Nguyen-Thong Dang, Fabrice Vienne, Guillaume Millet, Design and evaluation of a user-centered interface to model scenarios on driving simulators, Transportation Research Part C: Emerging Technologies, Volume 50, January 2015, Pages 3-12, ISSN 0968-090X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.trc.2014.09.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0968090X14002587)
Abstract: Abstract
Modeling scenarios on driving simulators is a complex and difficult task for end-users because they do not have the skills necessary to program the scenarios. In this paper, we present a user-centered architecture in which we have split the scenario modeling interface into 3 sub-interfaces (Template Builder, Experiment Builder, Experiment Interface) based on the user skill. The concept is tested with a panel of end-users, with fair results in terms of performance and subjective judgment.
Keywords: Driving simulators; Scenario modeling; User-Centered Design; User interface

Jordan B. Pasternack, Roger W. Howell, RadNuc: A graphical user interface to deliver dose rate patterns encountered in nuclear medicine with a 137Cs irradiator, Nuclear Medicine and Biology, Volume 40, Issue 2, February 2013, Pages 304-311, ISSN 0969-8051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nucmedbio.2012.11.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0969805112002946)
Abstract: Abstract
The temporal variations in absorbed dose rates to organs and tissues in the body are very large in diagnostic and therapeutic nuclear medicine. The response of biological endpoints of relevance to radiation safety and therapeutic efficacy is generally modulated by dose rate. Therefore, it is important to understand how the complex dose rate patterns encountered in nuclear medicine impact relevant biological responses. Accordingly, a graphical user interface (GUI) was created to control a cesium-137 irradiator to deliver such dose rate patterns.
Methods
Visual Basic 6.0 was used to create a user-friendly GUI to control the dose rate by varying the thickness of a mercury attenuator. The GUI facilitates the delivery of a number of dose rate patterns including constant, exponential increase or decrease, and multi-component exponential. Extensive visual feedback is provided by the GUI during both the planning and delivery stages.
Results
The GUI controlled irradiator can achieve a maximum dose rate of 40 cGy/h and a minimum dose rate of 0.01 cGy/h. Addition of machined lead blocks can be used to further reduce the minimum dose rate to 0.0001 cGy/h. Measured dose rate patterns differed from programmed dose rate patterns in total dose by 3.2% to 8.4%.
Conclusion
The GUI controlled irradiator is able to accurately create dose rate patterns encountered in nuclear medicine and other related fields. This makes it an invaluable tool for studying the effects of chronic constant and variable low dose rates on biological tissues in the contexts of both radiation protection and clinical administration of internal radionuclides.
Keywords: Variable dose rate irradiator; Chronic low dose rate irradiation; Mercury attenuator; Cesium-137; Software development

R. Baraglia, R. Ferrini, D. Laforenza, WAMM in the framework of graphical user interfaces for metacomputing management, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 15, Issues 5–6, October 1999, Pages 687-698, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-739X(99)00019-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X99000199)
Abstract: Current environments for metacomputing generally have tools for managing the resources of a metacomputer but often lack adequate tools for designing, writing, and executing programs. Building an application for a metacomputer typically involves writing source codes on a local node, transferring and compiling codes on every node, and starting their execution. Without such tools, the application development phases can come up against considerable difficulties. In order to alleviate these problems, some graphical user interfaces (GUIs) based on PVM, such as XPVM, Parallel Application Development Environment (PADE) and Wide Area Metacomputing Manager (WAMM) have been implemented. These GUIs integrate a programming environment which facilitates the user in performing the application development phases and the application execution.

This paper outlines the general requirements for designing GUIs for metacomputing management, and compares WAMM, a graphical user interface, with some related works.
Keywords: Metacomputing; Graphical user interface; XPVM; PADE; WAMM

Yasufumi Takama, Tomohiro Ito, Hiroshi Ishikawa, NFC-based Tangible User Interface for Information Curation and Its Application to Analogy Game, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 60, 2015, Pages 1263-1270, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2015.08.192.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050915023194)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper applies a Tangible User Interface (TUI) for information curation using Near Field Communication (NFC) to an analogy game. The increase in text data is more remarkable in current IT society. Although those are usually accessed with using Graphical User Interface (GUI), users except experienced computer users have difficulty in reading and organizing data with GUI. In particular, information curation such as grouping related data / information and finding relationship among them is difficult. In order to solve this problem, an interface that can access text data intuitively is expected. We are developing a TUI based on NFC, by which a user can move and group text data in a similar manner when handling paper documents. As one of the promising applications of the proposed TUI, this paper focuses on creative thinking support, for which touching externalized thought by hand is expected to be effective. An experiment is conducted, in which test participants did an analogy game with using the proposed TUI. The experimental result shows experience of using the TUI affects the participants’ self-evaluation about idea creation.
Keywords: Tangible user interface (TUI); Near field communication (NFC); Smartphone; Information curation; Analogy game

Jiachen Yang, Ryota Horie, An Improved Computer Interface Comprising a Recurrent Neural Network and a Natural User Interface, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 60, 2015, Pages 1386-1395, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2015.08.213.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050915023406)
Abstract: Abstract
We developed an interface system by which a user can operate a computer with hand and finger movements. To implement the interface, we used a gesture sensor to acquire the movement-based data. A recurrent neural network (RNN) was included to discriminate types of gestures. Using the proposed interface, high recognition rates were obtained for simple gestures, while the recognition rates of complicated gestures were low. To improve the rate of accuracy in recognizing complicated gestures, we investigated the dependency of factors on the rate of recognition in the RNN learning process and identified settings to refine these factors.
Keywords: computer interface; recurrent neural network; natural user interface; leap motion; back propagation through time

Sangwon Lee, Jin Yan, The impact of 3D CAD interfaces on user ideation: A comparative analysis using SketchUp and Silhouette Modeler, Design Studies, Volume 44, May 2016, Pages 52-73, ISSN 0142-694X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.destud.2016.02.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0142694X16000053)
Abstract: It has been known for decades that CAD is unsuitable in conceptual design and many studies on CAD for ideation have focused on comparing design outcomes against those of manual sketching. Based on the notion that different CAD interfaces can have distinctive effects on ideation, novice designers performed sketch-3D modeling-resketch tasks using SketchUp and Silhouette Modeler. We found that the characteristics of 3D shapes are attributable to the geometric operations afforded by mathematical representations, and that participants not only adapted the visual appearance, but also annotated process-related information. To minimize the contraction of creativity, we recommend that CAD use multiple but compatible mathematical representations and be introduced in stages after users understand the relationship between visual forms and design values.
Keywords: design tools; computer-aided design; conceptual design; 3D modeling interface

M. Tharaud, S. Gardoll, O. Khelifi, M.F. Benedetti, Y. Sivry, uFREASI: user-FRiendly Elemental dAta procesSIng. A free and easy-to-use tool for elemental data treatment, Microchemical Journal, Volume 121, July 2015, Pages 32-40, ISSN 0026-265X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.microc.2015.01.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0026265X15000132)
Abstract: Abstract
Inductively Coupled Plasma-Mass Spectrometry (ICP-MS) allows the quantification of trace and ultra-trace elements (mg/kg to pg/kg) by separating elements as a function of their mass-to-charge ratios (m/z) after ionisation into an argon plasma. In spite of being rigorous and accurate, the “Results” modules provided by many manufacturers are often uneasy to use and operators have little control on the calculation. Moreover, the large amount of raw data generated makes the manual treatment very long and not reliable using a “home-made” spreadsheet. The user-FRiendly Elemental dAta procesSIng (uFREASI) software presented in this paper follows a configurable step-by-step procedure allowing a quick and reliable data treatment plus an automatic uncertainty propagation. The concentration calculation is performed using the ordinary least square method after an external calibration. The software proposes many options to correct and to monitor the signal, to warrant both quality and understanding of data treatment. uFREASI is supported by Windows, Mac OS X and Linux operating systems, is open and extensible, and is freely downloadable at http://www.ipgp.fr/~tharaud/uFREASI.
Keywords: Inductively Coupled plasma-Mass Spectrometry; Multi-elementary analysis; Automated calculation of concentrations; Uncertainty propagation

Kun-Hur Chen, Shi-Jie (Gary) Chen, Li Lin, S.Wesley Changchien, An integrated graphical user interface (GUI) for concurrent engineering design of mechanical parts, Computer Integrated Manufacturing Systems, Volume 11, Issues 1–2, February–May 1998, Pages 91-112, ISSN 0951-5240, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0951-5240(98)00016-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0951524098000160)
Abstract: Due to increasing competition in the manufacturing industry, the search for shorter product development and production cycles and lower cost has led to the emergence of concurrent engineering. Concurrent engineering is the practice whereby the design needs to simultaneously consider various downstream activities throughout the entire product life cycle, in addition to meeting the products' functions. This calls for an integrated design environment that will enable the engineers to evaluate multiple constraints from manufacturing, assembly, services, etc. at the design stage. This research develops a prototype for such an integrated graphical user interface (GUI), the Integrated Concurrent Engineering Design for Mechanical Parts (ICEDMP), in concurrent engineering. Using ICEDMP, the user can access product data from different domains of computerized tools in one software system and evaluate the design of mechanical products based on criteria of Design for Manufacturing (DFM) and Design for Assembly (DFA). Modules of ICEDMP include (1) a web-based on-line user's guide, (2) a part library, (3) a design guidelines checklist, (4) a part modeler linked to CAD (Pro/Engineer), (5) a part feature converter using Practical Extraction and Report Language (PERL), and (6) a knowledge-based design critique system. Parts created by Pro/Engineering CAD system are represented by features using the PERL feature converter. The design's consequential impact on manufacture and assembly is then evaluated by the knowledge-based design critique system implemented by CLIPS. Two design examples are presented to demonstrate the effectiveness of the ICEDMP system. Using ICEDMP, the user is able to evaluate the designs using DFM and DFA criteria and obtain suggestions to improve the design in one integrated software environment. This will result in fewer costly design changes and thus reduce product development time and production cost.
Keywords: concurrent engineering; graphical user interface (GUI); feature-based design; design for manufacturing (DFM); design for assembly (DFA); knowledge-based systems

Josefina Guerrero-García, Evolutionary design of user interfaces for workflow information systems, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 86, 15 June 2014, Pages 89-102, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2013.07.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642313001603)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper we argue that user interface design should evolve from iterative to evolutionary in order to support the user interface development life cycle in a more flexible way. Evolutionary design consists of taking any input that informs to the lifecycle at any level of abstraction and its propagation through inferior and superior levels (vertical engineering) as well as the same level (horizontal engineering). This lifecycle is particularly appropriate when requirements are incomplete, partially unknown or to be discovered progressively. We exemplify this lifecycle by a methodology for developing user interfaces of workflow information systems. The methodology involves several models (i.e., task, process, workflow, domain, context of use) and steps. The methodology applies model-driven engineering to derive concrete user interfaces from a workflow model imported into a workflow management system in order to run the workflow. Instead of completing each model step by step, any model element is either derived from early requirements or collected in the appropriate model before being propagated in the subsequent steps. When more requirements are elicited, any new element is added at the appropriate level, consolidated with the already existing elements, and propagated to the subsequent levels. A workflow editor has been developed to support the methodology.
Keywords: User interfaces; UsiXML; Workflow; Information systems; Model driven engineering

M. Rochefort, N. De Guise, L. Gingras, Development of a graphical user interface for a real-time power system simulator, Electric Power Systems Research, Volume 36, Issue 3, March 1996, Pages 203-210, ISSN 0378-7796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0378-7796(95)01033-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0378779695010335)
Abstract: The project presented in this paper began in 1993. It consists primarily in a graphical user interface for the real-time simulator at IREQ. It is based on a single-line schematic display and it uses the paradigm of model-view-controller objects. The first phase of the project includes a schematic editor with all the functionality of a generic editor (color, zoom, connectivity, etc.) combined with the effective control of elements of the real-time simulator. The next phase will include support for three-phase representation and integration to the network database of the real-time simulator at IREQ. This work has permitted us to explore and master object concepts that will improve the development and evolution of graphical user interfaces at IREQ.
Keywords: Digital simulation; Graphical user interface

Francesca Gullà, Lorenzo Cavalieri, Silvia Ceccacci, Michele Germani, A BBN-based Method to Manage Adaptive Behavior of a Smart User Interface, Procedia CIRP, Volume 50, 2016, Pages 535-540, ISSN 2212-8271, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procir.2016.04.162.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2212827116304024)
Abstract: Abstract
The present study proposes a new method to manage adaptation behaviour of adaptive system according to the output information provide by a user model based on Bayesian Belief Network (BBN). Such method has been applied in the development of smart interfaces for cooking and kitchen management, such as meal preparation and interaction with the major kitchen appliances, pandering the user's skills, expertise and disabilities. Nevertheless, this method is flexible and suitable enough to be used in other application contexts. The validity of the decision making algorithm has been tested through simulation of real user case scenarios.
Keywords: Adaptive Interface; Bayesian Network; Smart Home; Decision making algorithm

Adam Mechtley and Ryan Trowbridge, Chapter 8 - Advanced Graphical User Interfaces with Qt, In Maya Python for Games and Film, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2012, Pages 233-258, ISBN 9780123785787, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-378578-7.00008-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123785787000089)
Abstract: This chapter describes what Qt is and how it is integrated into modern versions of Maya. It shows how to dock built-in and custom windows in the Maya GUI, and locate, download, and install Qt libraries and tools. Widgets, signals, and slots are also defined.

Keywords

Qt, Qt Designer, Qt Creator, PyQt, widgets, signals, slots, pyuic4, wrappers

Alistair Sutcliffe, George Papamargaritis, End-user development by application-domain configuration, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 91, May 2014, Pages 85-99, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jss.2013.11.1121.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0164121213002872)
Abstract: Abstract
An application generator/tailoring tool aimed at end users is described. It employs conceptual models of problem domains to drive configuration of an application generator suitable for a related set of applications, such as reservation and resource allocation. The tool supports a two-phase approach of configuring the general architecture for a domain, such as reservation-booking problems, then customisation and generation of specific applications. The tool also provides customisable natural language-style queries for spatial and temporal terms. Development and use of the tool to generate two applications, service engineer call allocation, and airline seat reservation, are reported with a specification exercise to configure the generic architecture to a new problem domain for monitoring-sensing applications. The application generator/tailoring tool is evaluated with novice end users and experts to demonstrate its effectiveness.
Keywords: End-user development; Application generation; Domain-oriented design

Célia Martinie, David Navarre, Philippe Palanque, A multi-formalism approach for model-based dynamic distribution of user interfaces of critical interactive systems, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 72, Issue 1, January 2014, Pages 77-99, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2013.08.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581913001110)
Abstract: Abstract
Evolution in the context of use requires evolutions in the user interfaces even when they are currently used by operators. User Centered Development promotes reactive answers to this kind of evolutions either by software evolutions through iterative development approaches or at runtime by providing additional information to the operators such as contextual help for instance. This paper proposes a model-based approach to support proactive management of context of use evolutions. By proactive management we mean mechanisms in place to plan and implement evolutions and adaptations of the entire user interface (including behaviour) in a generic way. The approach proposed handles both concentration and distribution of user interfaces requiring both fusion of information into a single UI or fission of information into several ones. This generic model-based approach is exemplified on a safety critical system from space domain. It presents how the new user interfaces can be generated at runtime to provide a new user interface gathering in a single place all the information required to perform the task. These user interfaces have to be generated at runtime as new procedures (i.e. sequences of operations to be executed in a semi-autonomous way) can be defined by operators at any time in order to react to adverse events and to keep the space system in operation. Such contextual, activity-related user interfaces complement the original user interfaces designed for operating the command and control system. The resulting user interface thus corresponds to a distribution of user interfaces in a focus+context way improving usability by increasing both efficiency and effectiveness.
Keywords: Model-based approaches; Formal description techniques; Interactive software engineering; Automation; Distributed user interfaces; Dynamic reconfiguration of user interfaces

Yi Zhang, Complex adaptive filtering user profile using graphical models, Information Processing & Management, Volume 44, Issue 6, November 2008, Pages 1886-1900, ISSN 0306-4573, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ipm.2008.08.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0306457308000848)
Abstract: This article explores how to develop complex data driven user models that go beyond the bag of words model and topical relevance. We propose to learn from rich user specific information and to satisfy complex user criteria under the graphical modelling framework. We carried out a user study with a web based personal news filtering system, and collected extensive user information, including explicit user feedback, implicit user feedback and some contextual information. Experimental results on the data set collected demonstrate that the graphical modelling approach helps us to better understand the complex domain. The results also show that the complex data driven user modelling approach can improve the adaptive information filtering performance. We also discuss some practical issues while learning complex user models, including how to handle data noise and the missing data problem.
Keywords: Information filtering; Adaptive user modelling; Graphical models

Hidetoshi Nishiyama, Mitsuru Koizumi, Koji Ogawa, Shinich Kitamura, Yuji Konyuba, Yoshiyuki Watanabe, Norihiko Ohbayashi, Mitsunori Fukuda, Mitsuo Suga, Chikara Sato, Atmospheric scanning electron microscope system with an open sample chamber: Configuration and applications, Ultramicroscopy, Volume 147, December 2014, Pages 86-97, ISSN 0304-3991, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ultramic.2014.06.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0304399114001119)
Abstract: Abstract
An atmospheric scanning electron microscope (ASEM) with an open sample chamber and optical microscope (OM) is described and recent developments are reported. In this ClairScope system, the base of the open sample dish is sealed to the top of the inverted SEM column, allowing the liquid-immersed sample to be observed by OM from above and by SEM from below. The optical axes of the two microscopes are aligned, ensuring that the same sample areas are imaged to realize quasi-simultaneous correlative microscopy in solution. For example, the cathodoluminescence of ZnO particles was directly demonstrated. The improved system has (i) a fully motorized sample stage, (ii) a column protection system in the case of accidental window breakage, and (iii) an OM/SEM operation system controlled by a graphical user interface. The open sample chamber allows the external administration of reagents during sample observation. We monitored the influence of added NaCl on the random motion of silica particles in liquid. Further, using fluorescence as a transfection marker, the effect of small interfering RNA-mediated knockdown of endogenous Varp on Tyrp1 trafficking in melanocytes was examined. A temperature-regulated titanium ASEM dish allowed the dynamic observation of colloidal silver nanoparticles as they were heated to 240 °C and sintered.
Keywords: Correlative microscopy; Environmental cell; Sintering; Random movement; Silver paste; ASEM

Ricardo Tesoriero, Pedro G. Villanueva, Habib M. Fardoun, Gabriel Sebastián Rivera, Distributed user interfaces in public spaces using RFID-based panels, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 72, Issue 1, January 2014, Pages 111-125, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2013.08.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581913001080)
Abstract: Abstract
The combination and integration of services between mobile computing and context-aware applications responds to the use of mobile devices defining a wide range of distributed user interfaces to support social activities. In this paper, we propose a novel solution that combines social software with context awareness to improve users' interaction in public spaces. This approach is based on the concept of collaborative interactive panels where users share their opinions and ideas about environmental issues by performing natural gestures. And so, taking advantage of physical resources already available in public spaces combined with the use of well-known technologies, such as mobile devices and RFID, we extend the concept of social software from the Web to physical public scenarios, such as bus stations, squares, etc. As an example, we present a case of study that encourage citizens' participation in decisions related to the community environmental issues reducing the gap between the social software and users.
Keywords: Distributed user interfaces; RFID technology; Mobile devices

Bernard Robin, Supporting geoscience with graphical-user-interface Internet tools for the Macintosh, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 21, Issue 6, July 1995, Pages 737-751, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0098-3004(95)00004-R.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/009830049500004R)
Abstract: This paper describes a suite of Macintosh graphical-user-interface (GUI) software programs that can be used in conjunction with the Internet to support geoscience education. These software programs allow science educators to access and retrieve a large body of resources from an increasing number of network sites, taking advantage of the intuitive, simple-to-use Macintosh operating system. With these tools, educators easily can locate, download, and exchange not only text files but also sound resources, video movie clips, and software application files from their desktop computers. Another major advantage of these software tools is that they are available at no cost and may be distributed freely. The following GUI software tools are described including examples of how they can be used in an educational setting: 1.
∗ Eudora—an e-mail program
2.
∗ NewsWatcher—a newsreader
3.
∗ TurboGopher—a Gopher program
4.
∗ Fetch—a software application for easy File Transfer Protocol (FTP)
5.
∗ NCSA Mosaic—a worldwide hypertext browsing program.

 An explosive growth of online archives currently is underway as new electronic sites are being added continuously to the Internet. Many of these resources may be of interest to science educators who learn they can share not only ASCII text files, but also graphic image files, sound resources, QuickTime movie clips, and hypermedia projects with colleagues from locations around the world. These powerful, yet simple to learn GUI software tools are providing a revolution in how knowledge can be accessed, retrieved, and shared.
Keywords: Internet; Graphical-user-interface (gui); Macintosh; Eudora; E-mail; Newswatcher; Newgroups; Turbogopher; Gopher; Fetch; File Transfer Protocol (FTP); NCSA Mosaic; World Wide Web (WWW); Hypertext

Sergio Firmenich, Gustavo Rossi, Marco Winckler, Philippe Palanque, An approach for supporting distributed user interface orchestration over the Web, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 72, Issue 1, January 2014, Pages 53-76, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2013.08.014.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581913001122)
Abstract: Abstract
Currently, a lot of the tasks engaged by users over the Web involve dealing with multiple Web sites. Moreover, whilst Web navigation was considered as a lonely activity in the past, a large proportion of users are nowadays engaged in collaborative activities over the Web. In this paper we argue that these two aspects of collaboration and tasks spanning over multiple Web sites call for a level of coordination that require Distributed User Interfaces (DUI). In this context, DUIs would play a major role by helping multiple users to coordinate their activities whilst working collaboratively to complete tasks at different Web sites. For that, we propose in this paper an approach to create distributed user interfaces featuring procedures that are aimed to orchestrate user tasks over multiple Web sites. Our approach supports flexible process modeling by allowing users to combine manual tasks and automated tasks from a repertoire of patterns of tasks performed over the Web. In our approach, whilst manual tasks can be regarded as simple instructions that tell users how to perform a task over a Web site, automated tasks correspond to tools built under the concept of Web augmentation (as it augments the repertoire of tasks users can perform over the Web) called Web augmenters. Both manual and automated tasks are usually supported by specific DOM elements available in different Web sites. Thus, by combining tasks and DOM elements distributed in diverse Web sites our approach supports the creation of procedures that allows seamless users interaction with diverse Web site. Moreover, such an approach is aimed at supporting the collaboration between users sharing procedures. The approach is duly illustrated by a case study describing a collaborative trip planning over the Web.
Keywords: Distributed user interfaces; Task and process modeling; Web application; Web augmentation; Collaborative Web tasks

Germano Kienbaum, Ray J. Paul, H-ACDNET: An object-oriented graphical user interface for simulation modelling of manufacturing systems, Simulation Practice and Theory, Volume 2, Issue 3, 23 December 1994, Pages 141-157, ISSN 0928-4869, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0928-4869(94)90009-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0928486994900094)
Abstract: This paper describes the development of an object-oriented GUI for the rapid model-building and simulation of discrete event systems, with particular emphasis given to the manufacturing systems application area. The fundamental tools used in the project are: an extended Hierarchical form of Activity Cycle Diagrams (H-ACD) for graphical representation, SIMOBJECT, a graphical simulation environment, and MODSIM II, an object oriented programming language, as the implementation platforms. Relevant aspects of the project design and implementation are discussed and the progress made so far is presented. The directions for further implementation are then pointed out.
Keywords: Simulation modelling; Activity Cycle Diagrams (ACDs); Object Oriented Programming; Graphical User Interface; discrete-event systems

Young-Seok Lee, Seok-Heun Yoon, Jung-Hoon Han, A development of user-friendly graphical interface for a blanket simulator, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 85, Issues 10–12, December 2010, Pages 1957-1965, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2010.07.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379610003157)
Abstract: A web-based user-friendly graphical interface (GUI) system, named GUMBIS (Graphical User-friendly Monte-Carlo-Application Blanket-Design Interface System), was developed to cut down the efforts of the researchers and practitioners who study tokamak blanket designs with the Monte Carlo MCNP/MCNPX codes. GUMBIS was also aimed at supporting them to use the codes for their study without having through understanding on the complex menus and commands of the codes. Developed on the web-based environment, GUMBIS provides task sharing capability on a network. GUMBIS, applicable for both blanket design and neutronics analysis, could facilitate not only advanced blanket R&amp;D but also the education and training of the researchers in the R&amp;D.
Keywords: GUMBIS; GUI; Web-based 3D simulator; MCNP/MCNPX codes; Blanket design; Neutronics

Rafał Michalski, Examining users’ preferences towards vertical graphical toolbars in simple search and point tasks, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 27, Issue 6, November 2011, Pages 2308-2321, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2011.07.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563211001488)
Abstract: The main purpose of this study was to investigate the nature of preferences and their relation to the objective measures in simple direct manipulation tasks involving both the cognitive process as well as the visually guided pointing activities. The conducted experiment was concerned with the graphical structures resembling toolbars widely used in graphical interfaces. The influence of the graphical panel location, panel configuration as well as the target size on the user task efficiency and subjects’ preferences were examined. The participants were requested to express their attitudes towards the tested panels before and after the efficiency examination. This subjective evaluation was carried out within the framework of Analytic Hierarchy Process (AHP; Saaty, 1977, 1980). The subjective results that were obtained showed significant differences in the subjects’ preferences towards examined panels before and after completing the tasks. It seems that the users are able to comparatively quickly change their minds after gaining some experience with the investigated stimuli. Additionally, the applied cluster analysis revealed that the subjects were not homogenous in their opinions, and they formed groups having similar preference structures.
Keywords: Human–computer interaction; Change in preferences; Subjective evaluation; Graphical toolbars; Analytic hierarchy process

Robert Leeb, Serafeim Perdikis, Luca Tonin, Andrea Biasiucci, Michele Tavella, Marco Creatura, Alberto Molina, Abdul Al-Khodairy, Tom Carlson, José d.R. Millán, Transferring brain–computer interfaces beyond the laboratory: Successful application control for motor-disabled users, Artificial Intelligence in Medicine, Volume 59, Issue 2, October 2013, Pages 121-132, ISSN 0933-3657, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.artmed.2013.08.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0933365713001218)
Abstract: AbstractObjectives
Brain–computer interfaces (BCIs) are no longer only used by healthy participants under controlled conditions in laboratory environments, but also by patients and end-users, controlling applications in their homes or clinics, without the BCI experts around. But are the technology and the field mature enough for this? Especially the successful operation of applications – like text entry systems or assistive mobility devices such as tele-presence robots – requires a good level of BCI control. How much training is needed to achieve such a level? Is it possible to train naïve end-users in 10 days to successfully control such applications?
Materials and methods
In this work, we report our experiences of training 24 motor-disabled participants at rehabilitation clinics or at the end-users’ homes, without BCI experts present. We also share the lessons that we have learned through transferring BCI technologies from the lab to the user's home or clinics.
Results
The most important outcome is that 50% of the participants achieved good BCI performance and could successfully control the applications (tele-presence robot and text-entry system). In the case of the tele-presence robot the participants achieved an average performance ratio of 0.87 (max. 0.97) and for the text entry application a mean of 0.93 (max. 1.0). The lessons learned and the gathered user feedback range from pure BCI problems (technical and handling), to common communication issues among the different people involved, and issues encountered while controlling the applications.
Conclusion
The points raised in this paper are very widely applicable and we anticipate that they might be faced similarly by other groups, if they move on to bringing the BCI technology to the end-user, to home environments and towards application prototype control.
Keywords: Brain–computer interface (BCI); Electroencephalogram (EEG); Motor imagery; Application control; End-user; Technology transfer

Noah Stupak, Nicholas DiFonzo, Andrew J. Younge, Christopher Homan, SOCIALSENSE: Graphical user interface design considerations for social network experiment software, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 26, Issue 3, May 2010, Pages 365-370, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2009.11.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563209001782)
Abstract: Using networked computers in laboratory experiments to investigate group dynamics currently requires the creation of special program application software. Design considerations for a useable graphical user interface (GUI) in such software are discussed in this paper. We describe SOCIALSENSE communication software created to experimentally test the effect of different social network configurations, group membership, and group integration on patterns of rumor self-organization. The software connected 16 participants using several different network configurations via a web-accessible Java applet, tasked them with making sense of rumors presented to them, enabled “neighbors” to synchronously or asynchronously communicate, and recorded their selections and beliefs. Four principles of design were followed: employ reading gravity, minimize cognitive load, use pre-existing mental models, and select color to direct attention. A description of each principle is presented, how it was applied to the GUI, and how it could be applied to other social network experiment program interfaces.
Keywords: Apparatus; Computer-mediated communication; Gossip; Group structure; Groupware; Social networks

Nicholas C. Hensel, Ryan M. Dunn, Michael G. Schrlau, Computerized control system and interface for flexible micromanipulator control, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 86, August 2015, Pages 107-114, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2015.04.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S096599781500068X)
Abstract: Abstract
Micro- and nanomanipulators are essential for a broad range of applications requiring precise micro- and nanoscopic spatial control such as those in micromanufacturing and single cell analysis. These manipulators are often manually controlled using an attached joystick and can be difficult for operators to use efficiently. This paper describes a system developed in MATLAB to control a well-known, commercial micromanipulator in a user friendly and versatile manner through a graphical user interface (GUI). The control system and interface allows several types of flexible movement controls in three-axis, Cartesian space, including single movements, multiple queued movements, and mouse-following continuous movements. The system uses image processing for closed loop feedback to ensure precise and accurate control over the movement of the manipulator’s end effector. The system can be used on any electronic device capable of running the free MATLAB Runtime Environment (MRE) and the system is extensible to simultaneously control other instruments capable of serial communication.
Keywords: Automation; Computer interface; Graphical user interfaces; Image processing; Micromanipulators; Microactuators

Igor Gómez, María José Estrela, Design and development of a Java-based graphical user interface to monitor/control a meteorological real-time forecasting system, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 36, Issue 10, October 2010, Pages 1345-1354, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cageo.2010.05.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098300410001950)
Abstract: A regional forecasting system based on the Regional Atmospheric Modeling System (RAMS) is being run at the CEAM Foundation. The operational model involves several processes running in the background at specified times and executing a set of systematic steps. This system is being used as a support for a heat-wave warning system, a wind forecasting system for fire warning and prevention, and for general forecasting tasks. However, it is relatively difficult to use by researchers and forecasters without sophisticated information technology (IT) skill. In this paper, we report an effort to develop a tool to facilitate the monitoring of the system. This tool is based on the client–server architecture and enables those with little IT skill to monitor/control the state of the different processes involved in the real-time simulation. This tool has been successfully used in controlling the RAMS-based applications developed at CEAM since 2006. The design and the functionality and utilities of the tool reviewed in this paper could be exported and customized to be used by other research centres and institutions who offer services based on operational atmospheric models as routine jobs (MM5, WRF, etc.), as e.g. air pollution forecasting systems, other prevention and emergency response systems, etc.
Keywords: Mesoscale modeling; Operational forecasting; Remote control; Client–server architecture

Evan A. Suma, David M. Krum, Belinda Lange, Sebastian Koenig, Albert Rizzo, Mark Bolas, Adapting user interfaces for gestural interaction with the flexible action and articulated skeleton toolkit, Computers & Graphics, Volume 37, Issue 3, May 2013, Pages 193-201, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2012.11.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849312001756)
Abstract: We present the Flexible Action and Articulated Skeleton Toolkit (FAAST), a middleware software framework for integrating full-body interaction with virtual environments, video games, and other user interfaces. This toolkit provides a complete end-to-end solution that includes a graphical user interface for custom gesture creation, sensor configuration, skeletal tracking, action recognition, and a variety of output mechanisms to control third party applications, allowing virtually any PC application to be repurposed for gestural control even if it does not explicit support input from motion sensors. To facilitate intuitive and transparent gesture design, we define a syntax for representing human gestures using rule sets that correspond to the basic spatial and temporal components of an action. These individual rules form primitives that, although conceptually simple on their own, can be combined both simultaneously and in sequence to form sophisticated gestural interactions. In addition to presenting the system architecture and our approach for representing and designing gestural interactions, we also describe two case studies that evaluated the use of FAAST for controlling first-person video games and improving the accessibility of computing interfaces for individuals with motor impairments. Thus, this work represents an important step toward making gestural interaction more accessible for practitioners, researchers, and hobbyists alike.
Keywords: Natural interaction; Gesture; User interfaces; Video games; Middleware

Jun Tao, Xiaoke Huang, Feng Qiu, Chaoli Wang, Jingfeng Jiang, Ching-Kuang Shene, Ye Zhao, Daphne Yu, VesselMap: A web interface to explore multivariate vascular data, Computers & Graphics, Volume 59, October 2016, Pages 79-92, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2016.05.024.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S009784931630067X)
Abstract: Abstract
Hemodynamics plays a key role in the pathological evolution of vascular diseases such as vascular stenosis, plaques and aneurysms. Augmented visualization of relevant hemodynamic and geometric data accelerates engineering designs of diagnostic and therapeutic methods for those vascular diseases. However, four dimensional (4D) hemodynamic data are intrinsically complex. Consequently, exploration of this information has not been streamlined, despite its importance. In this paper, we propose a web interface to explore multivariate hemodynamic data, thereby facilitating the visualization of spatial and temporal relationships among those hemodynamic parameters of interest. The main thrust of this web system is the proposed VesselMap methodology, a 2D representation of vessel structures that provides an overview of all query results without any visual occlusions. Furthermore, in this framework, quantile–quantile plot was also used to compare spatial variations in parameter distributions, thereby greatly aiding in extracting local characteristics of hemodynamic parameters.

Using “patient-specific” computational fluid dynamics (CFD) simulations, realistic flow velocity fields were obtained. Based on those CFD-simulated velocity fields, we performed an empirical evaluation to confirm the usefulness of our approach for biomedical engineering applications. We concluded that the proposed VesselMap methodology allowed users to rapidly interact with hemodynamic data of interest, enhancing efficacy of information retrieval.
Keywords: Visualization; User interface; Optimization; Vascular data visualization; Biological data visualization; Multivariate data exploration

Robert Oshana, Chapter 14 - Human Factors and User Interface Design for Embedded Systems, In Software Engineering for Embedded Systems, Newnes, Oxford, 2013, Pages 417-440, ISBN 9780124159174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-415917-4.00014-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124159174000141)
Abstract: When designing an embedded system, special care must be taken when you design the user interface. For simple devices, simple text, command buttons, and LEDs are adequate. For more complex systems, full graphical user interfaces and touch panels are required. User interface design focuses on the following key areas: (a) the design of interfaces between different software components, (b) the design of interfaces between the software and other nonhuman producers and consumers of information, and (c) the design of the interface between a human and the computer. This chapter will focus on the process, guidelines, human factors and techniques required to design an effective user interface.
Keywords: human factors; user interface design; prototyping; Model View Controller (MVC) architecture; entity relationship diagrams (ERD); safety-critical user interfaces

Nazmus Saquib, Md. Sabbir Rahman Sakib, Al-Sakib Khan Pathan, ViSim: A user-friendly graphical simulation tool for performance analysis of MANET routing protocols, Mathematical and Computer Modelling, Volume 53, Issues 11–12, June 2011, Pages 2204-2218, ISSN 0895-7177, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.mcm.2010.08.026.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0895717710004267)
Abstract: The task of simulation is often complicated, and naive users often look for relatively easier solutions. In many cases, simulations are done with no visual output which makes them non-attractive. In this paper, we present ViSim; a new simulation tool that has a user-friendly graphical interface. ViSim could be useful for researchers, students, teachers in their work, and for the demonstration of various wireless network scenarios on computer screens. It could make the task of simulation more exciting and enhance the interest of the users by avoiding the need to use a complex command-only text interface. ViSim is not a simulation engine, rather it calls ns-2 simulations in the background and makes the task easy for the users to visualize the simulation in a Windows environment. Though ViSim is mainly a simulation demonstration tool, any user with knowledge of ns-2 and Tcl scripting also has the provision to make the necessary modifications and rapid configuration for any other MANET routing scenario. Using our simulation tool, we measured the performances of several Mobile Ad-hoc Network (MANET) routing protocols. In this paper, we present the performance analysis of three prominent MANET routing protocols (DSDV, DSR and AODV) using our tool. Details of the various features of ViSim, brief descriptions of the selected routing protocols and their comparisons, and details about the experiments performed and the results obtained are presented in this work.
Keywords: Comparison; Graphical; ns-2; Performance; Routing; Simulation

J.F. DeSoi, W.M. Lively, Survey and analysis of nonprogramming approaches to design and development of graphical user interfaces, Information and Software Technology, Volume 33, Issue 6, July–August 1991, Pages 413-424, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(91)90077-O.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095058499190077O)
Abstract: There is a growing body of literature that describes methodologies for user-interface design and construction without programming in the traditional spirit of third-generation languages such as C, Pascal, and Lisp. Some of these methodologies include example-based programming, graphical constraint specification, behaviour abstraction, diagrammatic systems, and high-level object environments. The paper identifies and describes these approaches and systems that implement them, analyses their strengths and weaknesses, and proposes possible directions for further research.
Keywords: methodologies; user interfaces; user-interface design; graphical specification

D. Binosi, J. Collins, C. Kaufhold, L. Theussl, JaxoDraw: A graphical user interface for drawing Feynman diagrams. Version 2.0 release notes, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 180, Issue 9, September 2009, Pages 1709-1715, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2009.02.020.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465509000757)
Abstract: A new version of the Feynman graph plotting tool JaxoDraw is presented. Version 2.0 is a fundamental re-write of most of the JaxoDraw core and some functionalities, in particular importing graphs, are not backward-compatible with the 1.x branch. The most prominent new features include: drawing of Bézier curves for all particle modes, on-the-fly update of edited objects, multiple undo/redo functionality, the addition of a plugin infrastructure, and a general improved memory performance. A new LaTeX style file is presented that has been written specifically on top of the original axodraw.sty to meet the needs of this new version.
New version program summary
Program title: JaxoDraw

Catalogue identifier: ADUA_v2_0

Program summary URL: http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/ADUA_v2_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen's University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: GPL

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 103 544

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 3 745 814

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: Java

Computer: Any Java-enabled platform

Operating system: Any Java-enabled platform, tested on Linux, Windows XP, Mac OS X

Classification: 14

Catalogue identifier of previous version: ADUA_v1_0

Journal reference of previous version: Comput. Phys. Comm. 161 (2004) 76

Does the new version supersede the previous version?: Yes

Nature of problem: Existing methods for drawing Feynman diagrams usually require some hard-coding in one or the other programming or scripting language. It is not very convenient and often time consuming, to generate relatively simple diagrams.

Solution method: A program is provided that allows for the interactive drawing of Feynman diagrams with a graphical user interface. The program is easy to learn and use, produces high quality output in several formats and runs on any operating system where a Java Runtime Environment is available.

Reasons for new version: A variety of new features and bug fixes.

Summary of revisions: Major revisions since the last published user guide were versions 1.1, 1.2 and 1.3 with several minor bug-fix releases in between.

Restrictions: To make use of the latex export/preview functionality, a latex style file has to be installed separately. Certain operations (like internal latex compilation, Postscript preview) require the execution of external commands that might not work on untested operating systems.

Running time: As an interactive program, the running time depends on the complexity of the diagram to be drawn.
Keywords: Feynman diagrams; LaTeX; Java; GUI

Vaibhav Gandhi, Chapter 2 - Interfacing Brain and Machine, In Brain-Computer Interfacing for Assistive Robotics, Academic Press, San Diego, 2015, Pages 7-63, ISBN 9780128015438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-801543-8.00002-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128015438000028)
Abstract: This chapter is a critical review of the contemporary techniques implemented by various interdisciplinary research groups towards the development of a brain–computer interface (BCI). It begins with a discussion of the fundamental biological aspects of BCI, various operational modes of BCI, positioning of the electrodes on the skull for physiological data acquisition, and different brain activation patterns. The chapter then critically reviews various components of BCI viz., signal pre-processing, feature extraction, classification, post-processing, optimization techniques and necessities/expectations from graphical user interfaces. The chapter ends with a discussion of various strategies in BCI applications, as well as performance measures in evaluating BCI systems.
Keywords: Brain–computer interface; classification; EEG data acquisition; EEG signal processing; evaluating BCI; feature extraction; graphical user interface; post-processing; synchronous/asynchronous BCI

B. Weyers, W. Luther, Formal Modelling and Identification of Operating Errors for Formal User Interface Reconfiguration, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 45, Issue 2, 2012, Pages 487-492, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20120215-3-AT-3016.00085.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016307182)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper introduces a new approach to the adaption of user interfaces by identifying input errors from a given user interface through modeled error automata. These error automata will also be used to generate reconfiguration rules for formal reconfiguration of a user interface on its logical layer paired with reconfiguration patterns derived from psychological guidelines. These guidelines seek to describe concepts, such as enhancing situation awareness through physical rearrangement in certain control situations, or by increasing or decreasing the level of automation. The whole process, starting with the generation of error automata and ending with reconfiguration of the user interface, is implemented based on a formal approach to user interface modeling and reconfiguration, as well as on formal description of deterministic finite automata.
Keywords: Human-machine interface; interface configuration; interaction; human factors Petri nets; human error

M. Öhman, J. Kalmari, A. Visala, XML Based Graphical User Interface Editor and Runtime Parser for ISO 11783 Machine Automation Systems, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 41, Issue 2, 2008, Pages 1578-1583, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20080706-5-KR-1001.00269.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016391777)
Abstract: Abstract
Graphical user interface design is a very visual process which requires graphical tools. Modern integrated development environments have text editors for writing code and graphical user interface editors for designing the user interface. In ISO 11783 systems this distinction between the program logic and the user interface elements is even more pronounced as the program is executed by the electronic control unit on the agricultural implement while the user interface is being loaded to the virtual terminal in the tractor cabin. The ISO 11783 standard defines a binary format for loading user interfaces to the virtual terminal. However, using XML format for manipulating and storing user interfaces has many advantages. XML files can be validated and parsed by standard tools and libraries. They are human readable which makes debugging relatively easy. XML files can also be extended to contain new information without breaking existing implementations. Most importantly, describing user interfaces as structured documents allows efficient reuse of composite user interface objects such as entire displays.

Fredrik Karlsson, Pär J. Ågerfalk, MC Sandbox: Devising a tool for method-user-centered method configuration, Information and Software Technology, Volume 54, Issue 5, May 2012, Pages 501-516, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2011.12.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950584912000031)
Abstract: Context
Method engineering approaches are often based on the assumption that method users are able to explicitly express their situational method requirements. Similar to systems requirements, method requirements are often vague and hard to explicate. In this paper we address the issue of involving method users early in method configuration. This is done through borrowing ideas from user-centered design and prototyping, and implementing them on the method engineering layer.
Objective
We design a computerized tool, MC Sandbox, to capture method requirements through the use of method-user-centered method configuration, hence bridging the gap between systems developers’ and method engineers’ understanding of and expectations on a situational method.
Method
The research method adopted can be characterized as multi-grounded action research. Our implementation of multi-grounded action research follows the traditional ‘canonical’ action research method, which has cycles of diagnosing, action planning, action taking, evaluating, and specifying learning. The research project comprised three such action research cycles where 10 action cases were performed.
Results
MC Sandbox has proven useful in eliciting and negotiating method requirements in a continuously ongoing dialog between the method users and the method engineers during configuration workshops. The results also show that the method engineer role rotated among the systems developers and that they were indeed committed to the negotiated methods during the systems development projects.
Conclusion
It is possible for method users to actively participate and construct suitable situational methods if they are provided with appropriate high-level modelling concepts, such as method components, configuration packages and configuration templates. This way, the project members’ understanding of the current development practice develops incrementally, both in terms of understanding the needs and available method support. In addition, both method requirements and commitments are made explicit, which are important aspects when working with method configuration from a collaboration point of view.
Keywords: Situational method; Method adaptation; Method configuration; Method tailoring; Methods; Method engineering

Y. Batu Salman, Hong-In Cheng, Patrick E. Patterson, Icon and user interface design for emergency medical information systems: A case study, International Journal of Medical Informatics, Volume 81, Issue 1, January 2012, Pages 29-35, ISSN 1386-5056, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijmedinf.2011.08.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1386505611001699)
Abstract: A usable medical information system should allow for reliable and accurate interaction between users and the system in emergencies. A participatory design approach was used to develop a medical information system in two Turkish hospitals. The process consisted of task and user analysis, an icon design survey, initial icon design, final icon design and evaluation, and installation of the iconic medical information system with the icons. We observed work sites to note working processes and tasks related to the information system and interviewed medical personnel. Emergency personnel then participated in the design process to develop a usable graphical user interface, by drawing icon sketches for 23 selected tasks. Similar sketches were requested for specific tasks such as family medical history, contact information, translation, addiction, required inspections, requests and applications, and nurse observations. The sketches were analyzed and redesigned into computer icons by professional designers and the research team. A second group of physicians and nurses then tested the understandability of the icons. The user interface layout was examined and evaluated by system users, followed by the system's installation. Medical personnel reported the participatory design process was interesting and believed the resulting designs would be more familiar and friendlier.
Keywords: Medical information system; Participatory design; User interface design; Icon

Ole Andreas Alsos, Anita Das, Dag Svanæs, Mobile health IT: The effect of user interface and form factor on doctor–patient communication, International Journal of Medical Informatics, Volume 81, Issue 1, January 2012, Pages 12-28, ISSN 1386-5056, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijmedinf.2011.09.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S138650561100195X)
Abstract: Background
Introducing computers into primary care can have negative effects on the doctor–patient dialogue. Little is known about such effects of mobile health IT in point-of-care situations.
Aim
To assess how different mobile information devices used by physicians in point-of-care situations support or hinder aspects of doctor–patient communication, such as face-to-face dialogue, nonverbal communication, and action transparency.
Method
The study draws on two different experimental simulation studies where 22 doctors, in 80 simulated ward rounds, accessed patient-related information from a paper chart, a PDA, and a laptop mounted on a trolley. Video recordings from the simulations were analyzed qualitatively. Interviews with clinicians and patients were used to triangulate the findings and to verify the realism and results of the simulations.
Result
The paper chart afforded smooth re-establishment of eye contact, better verbal and non-verbal contact, more gesturing, good visibility of actions, and quick information retrieval. The digital information devices lacked many of these affordances; physicians’ actions were not visible for the patients, the user interfaces required much attention, gesturing was harder, and re-establishment of eye contact took more time. Physicians used the devices to display their actions to the patients. The analysis revealed that the findings were related to the user interface and form factor of the information devices, as well as the personal characteristics of the physician.
Conclusion
When information is needed and has to be located at the point-of-care, the user interface and the physical form factor of the mobile information device are influential elements for successful collaboration between doctors and patients. Both elements need to be carefully designed so that physicians can use the devices to support face-to-face dialogue, nonverbal communication, and action visibility. The ability to facilitate and support the doctor–patient collaboration is a noteworthy usability factor in the design of mobile EPR systems. The paper also presents possible design guidelines for mobile point-of-care systems for improved doctor–patient communication.
Keywords: Mobile health IT; Collaboration; Doctor–patient communication; Awareness; PDA; Affordances; Paper chart; EPR; User interface; Form factor

Fotis Liarokapis, Kurt Debattista, Athanasios Vourvopoulos, Panagiotis Petridis, Alina Ene, Comparing interaction techniques for serious games through brain–computer interfaces: A user perception evaluation study, Entertainment Computing, Volume 5, Issue 4, December 2014, Pages 391-399, ISSN 1875-9521, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.entcom.2014.10.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1875952114000391)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper examines the application of commercial and non-invasive electroencephalography (EEG)-based brain–computer (BCIs) interfaces with serious games. Two different EEG-based BCI devices were used to fully control the same serious game. The first device (NeuroSky MindSet) uses only a single dry electrode and requires no calibration. The second device (Emotiv EPOC) uses 14 wet sensors requiring additional training of a classifier. User testing was performed on both devices with sixty-two participants measuring the player experience as well as key aspects of serious games, primarily learnability, satisfaction, performance and effort. Recorded feedback indicates that the current state of BCIs can be used in the future as alternative game interfaces after familiarisation and in some cases calibration. Comparative analysis showed significant differences between the two devices. The first device provides more satisfaction to the players whereas the second device is more effective in terms of adaptation and interaction with the serious game.
Keywords: Serious games; Brain–computer interfaces; Virtual environments; Human–machine interaction

Javier Fernández-Rodríguez, Brian Toby, Michel van Veenendaal, Xclaim: A graphical interface for the calculation of core-hole spectroscopies, Journal of Electron Spectroscopy and Related Phenomena, Volume 202, July 2015, Pages 81-88, ISSN 0368-2048, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.elspec.2015.03.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0368204815000675)
Abstract: Abstract
Xclaim (X-ray core level atomic multiplets) is a graphical interface for the calculation of core-hole spectroscopy and ground state properties within a charge-transfer multiplet model taking into account a many-body Hamiltonian with Coulomb, spin–orbit, crystal-field, and hybridization interactions. Using Coulomb and spin–orbit parameters calculated in the Hartree–Fock limit and ligand field parameters (crystal-field, hybridization and charge-transfer energy) the program calculates X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS), X-ray photoemission spectroscopy (XPS), photoemission spectroscopy (PES) and inverse photoemission (IPES). The program runs on Linux, Windows and MacOS platforms.
Keywords: X-ray absorption spectroscopy; X-ray photoemission; Crystal field; Strongly correlated materials

Ramón Hervás, José Bravo, Towards the ubiquitous visualization: Adaptive user-interfaces based on the Semantic Web, Interacting with Computers, Volume 23, Issue 1, January 2011, Pages 40-56, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2010.08.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543810000676)
Abstract: This manuscript presents an infrastructure that contributes to ubiquitous information. Advances in Ambient Intelligence may help to provide us with the right information at the right time, in an appropriate manner and through the most suitable device for each situation. It is therefore crucial for such devices to have contextual information; that is, to know the person or persons in need of information, the environment, and the available devices and services. All of this information, in appropriate models, can provide a simplified view of the real world and let the system act more like a human and, consequently, more intelligently. A suitable context model is not enough; proactive user interface adaptation is necessary to offer personalized information to the user. In this paper, we present mechanisms for the management of contextual information, reasoning techniques and adaptable user interfaces to support visualization services, providing functionality to make decisions about what and how available information can be offered. Additionally, we present the ViMos framework, an infrastructure to generate context-powered information visualization services dynamically.
Keywords: Ambient Intelligence; Information visualization; Information retrieval; Context-awareness; Ontology; Intelligent user interfaces

Ning Gu, Mi Jeong Kim, Mary Lou Maher, Technological advancements in synchronous collaboration: The effect of 3D virtual worlds and tangible user interfaces on architectural design, Automation in Construction, Volume 20, Issue 3, May 2011, Pages 270-278, ISSN 0926-5805, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.autcon.2010.10.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0926580510001688)
Abstract: This paper presents and evaluates two current advancements of collaborative technologies for architectural design. The paper focuses on technologies that support synchronous design collaboration, in particular, 3D virtual worlds for supporting remote design collaboration, and tangible user interfaces (TUIs) for enhancing co-located design collaboration. Both technologies enable designers to collaborate by interacting with 3D models as the design representations. The paper analyzes the effect of these technologies on design collaboration and cognition through a comprehensive interpretation of the results from two independent studies. These two studies, using protocol analysis and each focusing on a different mode of design collaboration, provide the foundation for characterizing the designers' cognition, communication and interaction when using the new technologies. The 3D virtual worlds study investigates remote design collaboration in a 3D virtual world in order to understand the changes of design behavior when designers are physically remote but virtually co-located as avatars within their design representation in the form of a 3D model. The TUI study measures the effect of a tabletop system that integrates TUIs together with augmented reality (AR) on designers' cognitive activities and design process in co-located design collaboration. Finally, the analysis and comparison of the results converge in a set of recommendations for the future development of collaborative design technologies.
Keywords: Synchronous design collaboration; Remote design collaboration; Co-located design collaboration; 3D virtual worlds; Tangible user interfaces; Design cognition; Protocol analysis

X.J. Li, T. Schlegel, M. Rotard and T. Ertl, A Model-Based Graphical User-Interface for Process Control Systems in Manufacturing, In Intelligent Production Machines and Systems, Elsevier Science Ltd, Oxford, 2006, Pages 89-94, ISBN 9780080451572, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-008045157-2/50022-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780080451572500225)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The communication of humans with manufacturing processes, respectively their representation in software, is an integrated cooperation. It includes information acquisition via sensors, information processing by control systems, and feedback information. This supports control personnel in supervising and operating the processes using information captured in real time. This chapter presents an approach of building an innovative graphical user-interface for intelligent process control systems based on the analysis of various requirements for process control of today's manufacturing. Information and presentation models are used for transforming real-time production data into a dynamic and easy-to-use graphical user interface using extensible markup language (XML) technology. In order to better model and manage the user interface for information exchange, the functions of data exchange through user interface are separated into data acquisition and data representation. Both parts can be modeled individually and connected by interactive elements. The separation of functions benefits code separation and code reuse. Presentation models rely on the previous built information models, according to specific task only limited presentation objects are required. The data types in the metamodel allow an early perception of which presentation objects may be possibly used.

Krzysztof Z. Gajos, Daniel S. Weld, Jacob O. Wobbrock, Automatically generating personalized user interfaces with Supple, Artificial Intelligence, Volume 174, Issues 12–13, August 2010, Pages 910-950, ISSN 0004-3702, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.artint.2010.05.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0004370210000822)
Abstract: Today's computer–human interfaces are typically designed with the assumption that they are going to be used by an able-bodied person, who is using a typical set of input and output devices, who has typical perceptual and cognitive abilities, and who is sitting in a stable, warm environment. Any deviation from these assumptions may drastically hamper the person's effectiveness—not because of any inherent barrier to interaction, but because of a mismatch between the person's effective abilities and the assumptions underlying the interface design.

We argue that automatic personalized interface generation is a feasible and scalable solution to this challenge. We present our Supple system, which can automatically generate interfaces adapted to a person's devices, tasks, preferences, and abilities. In this paper we formally define interface generation as an optimization problem and demonstrate that, despite a large solution space (of up to 1017 possible interfaces), the problem is computationally feasible. In fact, for a particular class of cost functions, Supple produces exact solutions in under a second for most cases, and in a little over a minute in the worst case encountered, thus enabling run-time generation of user interfaces. We further show how several different design criteria can be expressed in the cost function, enabling different kinds of personalization. We also demonstrate how this approach enables extensive user- and system-initiated run-time adaptations to the interfaces after they have been generated.

Supple is not intended to replace human user interface designers—instead, it offers alternative user interfaces for those people whose devices, tasks, preferences, and abilities are not sufficiently addressed by the hand-crafted designs. Indeed, the results of our study show that, compared to manufacturers' defaults, interfaces automatically generated by Supple significantly improve speed, accuracy and satisfaction of people with motor impairments.
Keywords: Automatic user interface generation; Optimization; Adaptation; Personalized user interfaces; Ability-based user interfaces; Supple

Wiard Jorritsma, Fokie Cnossen, Rudi A. Dierckx, Matthijs Oudkerk, Peter M.A. van Ooijen, Pattern mining of user interaction logs for a post-deployment usability evaluation of a radiology PACS client, International Journal of Medical Informatics, Volume 85, Issue 1, January 2016, Pages 36-42, ISSN 1386-5056, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijmedinf.2015.10.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1386505615300502)
Abstract: AbstractObjectives
To perform a post-deployment usability evaluation of a radiology Picture Archiving and Communication System (PACS) client based on pattern mining of user interaction log data, and to assess the usefulness of this approach compared to a field study.
Methods
All user actions performed on the PACS client were logged for four months. A data mining technique called closed sequential pattern mining was used to automatically extract frequently occurring interaction patterns from the log data. These patterns were used to identify usability issues with the PACS. The results of this evaluation were compared to the results of a field study based usability evaluation of the same PACS client.
Results
The interaction patterns revealed four usability issues: (1) the display protocols do not function properly, (2) the line measurement tool stays active until another tool is selected, rather than being deactivated after one use, (3) the PACS's built-in 3D functionality does not allow users to effectively perform certain 3D-related tasks, (4) users underuse the PACS’s customization possibilities. All usability issues identified based on the log data were also found in the field study, which identified 48 issues in total.
Conclusions
Post-deployment usability evaluation based on pattern mining of user interaction log data provides useful insights into the way users interact with the radiology PACS client. However, it reveals few usability issues compared to a field study and should therefore not be used as the sole method of usability evaluation.
Keywords: Usability; User-computer interface; User interaction log data; Data mining; Picture archiving and communication system

R. Michalski, J. Grobelny, W. Karwowski, The effects of graphical interface design characteristics on human–computer interaction task efficiency, International Journal of Industrial Ergonomics, Volume 36, Issue 11, November 2006, Pages 959-977, ISSN 0169-8141, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ergon.2006.06.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169814106001521)
Abstract: The main objective of this paper was to investigate the effects of a computer screen interface design and its related geometrical characteristics of 36 graphical objects on a user's task efficiency. A total of 490 subjects took part in laboratory experiments that focused on the direct manipulation of a visual dialogue between a user and a computer. The subjects were asked to select an object from among a group of items randomly placed on the computer screen that were visible exclusively during the visual search process. A model expressing the mean object acquisition time as a function of graphical object size and the configuration was developed and statistically validated. The model showed an influence of geometrical design characteristics of the graphical objects (icons) and their groupings (icon structures) on the observed task efficiency. The reported results can be used at those stages of a software lifecycle that concentrate on prototyping, designing, and implementing graphical solutions for the efficient graphical user–computer interface.
Keywords: Human–computer interface design; Graphical icons; Toolbars; Dialog windows; Search task efficiency

Antti Hölttä, Jari Saarinen, Antti Maula, Aarne Halme, A User Interface Framework for the Control of Component-Based Multi-Robot Systems*, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 43, Issue 23, 2010, Pages 133-138, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20101005-4-RO-2018.00042.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015343366)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents a user interface study for highly distributed system. The user interface is developed to control a multi-robot system, which is based on “component-based„ architecture using hardware abstraction. This paper present the general principles of the user interface and provides an example of Graphical User Interface for controlling a generic fleet of machines.
Keywords: Distributed systems; Mobile robots; User Interfaces

David Bainbridge, The registration as designs of computer icons, graphical user interfaces and webpages, Computer Law & Security Review, Volume 22, Issue 3, 2006, Pages 218-221, ISSN 0267-3649, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.clsr.2006.03.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0267364906000380)
Abstract: Changes to national registered design laws in Europe and the introduction of the Community design have brought inexpensive means of obtaining monopoly protection for images produced by computer software such as computer icons, screen displays and webpage designs. Graphical user interfaces (‘GUIs’) are also potentially protectable, even down to little symbols displayed on mobile phones, indeed any image displayed on equipment with a visual display. Of course, not every such image can be registered as a design and there are a number of requirements for registration, such as novelty and individual character but any new and striking design for icons, etc. should be relatively easy to register. This article explores the issues involved.

Jignesh Bhatt, H.K. Verma, Design and Development of Wired Building Automation Systems, Energy and Buildings, Volume 103, 15 September 2015, Pages 396-413, ISSN 0378-7788, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.enbuild.2015.02.054.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378778815001784)
Abstract: Abstract
The legacy stand-alone security systems are transforming into intelligent-computerized-network based building automation systems. This paper presents the outcomes of a Post-Graduate Level Project, that aims to develop working pilot models for security as well as for complete automation of a residential building and complex respectively, based on wired networking technology. The paper describes design and implementation of wired security system and wired building automation system along with necessary theoretical background. Development of web-based virtual instrument to run-time couple local/remote monitoring and control of the building has been major outcome. The presented designs have been re-usable with need based customization, simple, user-friendly and validated through implementation.
Keywords: Building Automation System; EIA-485; Home Automation; MODBUS; Virtual Instrumentation

A. Cabeza, F. Sobrón, J. García-Serna, M.J. Cocero, Simulation of the supercritical CO2 extraction from natural matrices in packed bed columns: User-friendly simulator tool using Excel, The Journal of Supercritical Fluids, Volume 116, October 2016, Pages 198-208, ISSN 0896-8446, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.supflu.2016.05.020.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0896844616301334)
Abstract: Abstract
The aim of this work was to develop a user-friendly Excel interface to adjust the yields of an extraction column for SCF extraction. Moreover, this program could simulate the dynamic concentration profiles inside the column, being a useful teaching tool. The model comprises non-stationary mass balances for recovered compounds in both phases (solid and supercritical CO2). The model was tested by reproducing the extraction of two samples: sesame seeds and coffee beans (average deviations of 7.41% and 10.35%, respectively). These samples were selected to demonstrate the feasibility of reproducing processes whose mass transfer limitation is different. Thus, for the sesame seeds, the extraction process was controlled by both the external mass transfer and oil solubility, since the seeds were grinded. On the contrary, for coffee grains, the internal diffusion controls the extraction as the whole grain is required. Regarding solubility, a Henry’s relation between solid and CO2 concentration was assumed.
Keywords: Supercritical CO2; Excel interface; Oil extraction; Decaffeination; Modelling; Natural matrices

Lei Ren, Feng Tian, Xiaolong (Luke) Zhang, Lin Zhang, DaisyViz: A model-based user interface toolkit for interactive information visualization systems, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 21, Issue 4, August 2010, Pages 209-229, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jvlc.2010.05.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X10000297)
Abstract: While information visualization technologies have transformed our life and work, designing information visualization systems still faces challenges. Non-expert users or end-users need toolkits that allow for rapid design and prototyping, along with supporting unified data structures suitable for different data types (e.g., tree, network, temporal, and multi-dimensional data), various visualization, interaction tasks. To address these issues, we designed DaisyViz, a model-based user interface toolkit, which enables end-users to rapidly develop domain-specific information visualization applications without traditional programming. DaisyViz is based on a user interface model for information (UIMI), which includes three declarative models: data model, visualization model, and control model. In the development process, a user first constructs a UIMI with interactive visual tools. The results of the UIMI are then parsed to generate a prototype system automatically. In this paper, we discuss the concept of UIMI, describe the architecture of DaisyViz, and show how to use DaisyViz to build an information visualization system. We also present a usability study of DaisyViz we conducted. Our findings indicate DaisyViz is an effective toolkit to help end-users build interactive information visualization systems.
Keywords: User interface; Information visualization; Toolkit; Multiple coordinated views; Model-based interface development

Bruce H. Thomas, Paul Calder, Supporting cartoon animation techniques in direct manipulation graphical user interfaces, Information and Software Technology, Volume 47, Issue 5, 31 March 2005, Pages 339-355, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2004.09.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950584904001326)
Abstract: If judiciously applied, the techniques of cartoon animation can enhance the illusion of direct manipulation that many human computer interfaces strive to present. In particular, animation can convey a feeling of substance in the objects that a user manipulates, strengthening the sense that real work is being done. This paper describes algorithms and implementation issues to support cartoon style graphical object distortion effects for direct manipulation user interfaces. Our approach is based on suggesting a range of animation effects by distorting the view of the manipulated object. To explore the idea, we added a warping transformation capability to the InterViews user interface toolkit.
Keywords: Animation; Direct manipulation; Graphics; Toolkits; Warp transformation

Sokratis Kartakis, Constantine Stephanidis, A design-and-play approach to accessible user interface development in Ambient Intelligence environments, Computers in Industry, Volume 61, Issue 4, May 2010, Pages 318-328, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2009.12.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361509002103)
Abstract: User interface development in Ambient Intelligence (AmI) environments is anticipated to be a particularly complex and programming intensive endeavor. Additionally, AmI environments should ensure accessibility and usability of interactive technologies by users with different characteristics and requirements in a mainstream fashion. Therefore, appropriate user interface development methods and tools are required, capable of both reducing development efforts and ‘injecting’ accessibility issues into AmI applications from the early design stages. This paper introduces two tools, named AmIDesigner and AmIPlayer, which have been specifically developed to address the above challenges through automatic generation of accessible Graphical User Interfaces in AmI environments. The combination of these two tools offers a simple and rapid design-and-play approach, and the running user interfaces produced integrate non-visual feedback and a scanning mechanism to support accessibility. AmIDesigner and AmIPlayer have been evaluated to assess their usability by designers, and have been put to practice in the redevelopment of a light control application in a smart environment as a case study demonstrating the viability of the design-and-play approach. The results confirm the usefulness and usability of the tools themselves. Overall, the proposed approach has the potential to contribute significantly to the development, up-take and user acceptance of AmI technologies in the home environment.
Keywords: Ambient Intelligence (AmI); Smart home; User interface development; User interface generation; Accessibility

Jaime Muñoz-Arteaga, Ricardo Mendoza González, Miguel Vargas Martin, Jean Vanderdonckt, Francisco Álvarez-Rodríguez, A methodology for designing information security feedback based on User Interface Patterns, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 40, Issue 12, December 2009, Pages 1231-1241, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2009.01.024.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997809000519)
Abstract: A methodology is provided here to assist in the design of secure interactive applications. In particular, this methodology helps design an adequate security information feedback based on User Interface Patterns, the resulting feedback is then evaluated against a set of design/evaluation criteria called Human–Computer Interaction for Security (HCI-S). In case of a security issue the security information feedback is generally presented using the visual and auditory channels required to achieve an effective notifications, and it is explicitly specified in the design of user interfaces for secure web system.
Keywords: Design patterns; Heuristic evaluation; Security information feedback; Trust; Usability; User-centered design; User Interface Patterns

Luiz Cláudio Demes da Mata Sousa, Herton Luiz Alves Sales Filho, Cristina de Queiroz Carrascosa Von Glehn, Adalberto Socorro da Silva, Pedro de Alcântara dos Santos Neto, José Adail Fonseca de Castro, Semíramis Jamil Hadad do Monte, EpHLA: An innovative and user-friendly software automating the HLAMatchmaker algorithm for antibody analysis, Transplant Immunology, Volume 25, Issue 4, December 2011, Pages 210-216, ISSN 0966-3274, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.trim.2011.08.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0966327411001031)
Abstract: The global challenge for solid organ transplantation programs is to distribute organs to the highly sensitized recipients. The purpose of this work is to describe and test the functionality of the EpHLA software, a program that automates the analysis of acceptable and unacceptable HLA epitopes on the basis of the HLAMatchmaker algorithm. HLAMatchmaker considers small configurations of polymorphic residues referred to as eplets as essential components of HLA-epitopes. Currently, the analyses require the creation of temporary files and the manual cut and paste of laboratory tests results between electronic spreadsheets, which is time-consuming and prone to administrative errors.
Results
The EpHLA software was developed in Object Pascal programming language and uses the HLAMatchmaker algorithm to generate histocompatibility reports. The automated generation of reports requires the integration of files containing the results of laboratory tests (HLA typing, anti-HLA antibody signature) and public data banks (NMDP, IMGT). The integration and the access to this data were accomplished by means of the framework called eDAFramework. The eDAFramework was developed in Object Pascal and PHP and it provides data access functionalities for software developed in these languages. The tool functionality was successfully tested in comparison to actual, manually derived reports of patients from a renal transplantation program with related donors.
Conclusions
We successfully developed software, which enables the automated definition of the epitope specificities of HLA antibodies. This new tool will benefit the management of recipient/donor pairs selection for highly sensitized patients.
Keywords: Software; HLA; Antibody; Epitope

David Aspinall, Christoph Lüth, Proof General meets IsaWin: Combining Text-Based And Graphical User Interfaces, Electronic Notes in Theoretical Computer Science, Volume 103, 3 November 2004, Pages 3-26, ISSN 1571-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.entcs.2004.09.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1571066104051242)

Gabriel P. Fonseca, Brigitte Reniers, Guillaume Landry, Shane White, Murillo Bellezzo, Paula C.G. Antunes, Camila P. de Sales, Eduardo Welteman, Hélio Yoriyaz, Frank Verhaegen, A medical image-based graphical platform—Features, applications and relevance for brachytherapy, Brachytherapy, Volume 13, Issue 6, November–December 2014, Pages 632-639, ISSN 1538-4721, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.brachy.2014.07.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1538472114005765)
Abstract: AbstractPurpose
Brachytherapy dose calculation is commonly performed using the Task Group-No 43 Report-Updated protocol (TG-43U1) formalism. Recently, a more accurate approach has been proposed that can handle tissue composition, tissue density, body shape, applicator geometry, and dose reporting either in media or water. Some model-based dose calculation algorithms are based on Monte Carlo (MC) simulations. This work presents a software platform capable of processing medical images and treatment plans, and preparing the required input data for MC simulations.
Methods and Materials
The A Medical Image-based Graphical platfOrm—Brachytherapy module (AMIGOBrachy) is a user interface, coupled to the MCNP6 MC code, for absorbed dose calculations. The AMIGOBrachy was first validated in water for a high-dose-rate 192Ir source. Next, dose distributions were validated in uniform phantoms consisting of different materials. Finally, dose distributions were obtained in patient geometries. Results were compared against a treatment planning system including a linear Boltzmann transport equation (LBTE) solver capable of handling nonwater heterogeneities.
Results
The TG-43U1 source parameters are in good agreement with literature with more than 90% of anisotropy values within 1%. No significant dependence on the tissue composition was observed comparing MC results against an LBTE solver. Clinical cases showed differences up to 25%, when comparing MC results against TG-43U1. About 92% of the voxels exhibited dose differences lower than 2% when comparing MC results against an LBTE solver.
Conclusion
The AMIGOBrachy can improve the accuracy of the TG-43U1 dose calculation by using a more accurate MC dose calculation algorithm. The AMIGOBrachy can be incorporated in clinical practice via a user-friendly graphical interface.
Keywords: Brachytherapy; Monte Carlo; Model-based dose calculation algorithms; User interface

Thomas J. Hagedorn, Sundar Krishnamurty, Ian R. Grosse, An information model to support user-centered design of medical devices, Journal of Biomedical Informatics, Volume 62, August 2016, Pages 181-194, ISSN 1532-0464, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jbi.2016.07.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1532046416300648)
Abstract: Abstract
The process of engineering design requires the product development team to balance the needs and limitations of many stakeholders, including those of the user, regulatory organizations, and the designing institution. This is particularly true in medical device design, where additional consideration must be given for a much more complex user-base that can only be accessed on a limited basis. Given this inherent challenge, few projects exist that consider design domain concepts, such as aspects of a detailed design, a detailed view of various stakeholders and their capabilities, along with the user-needs simultaneously. In this paper, we present a novel information model approach that combines a detailed model of design elements with a model of the design itself, customer requirements, and of the capabilities of the customer themselves. The information model is used to facilitate knowledge capture and automated reasoning across domains with a minimal set of rules by adopting a terminology that treats customer and design specific factors identically, thus enabling straightforward assessments. A uniqueness of this approach is that it systematically provides an integrated perspective on the key usability information that drive design decisions towards more universal or effective outcomes with the very design information impacted by the usability information. This can lead to cost-efficient optimal designs based on a direct inclusion of the needs of customers alongside those of business, marketing, and engineering requirements. Two case studies are presented to show the method’s potential as a more effective knowledge management tool with built-in automated inferences that provide design insight, as well as its overall effectiveness as a platform to develop and execute medical device design from a holistic perspective.
Keywords: User-centered design; Medical device design; Ergonomics; Information model; Engineering design

Piero Zappi, Bojan Milosevic, Elisabetta Farella, Luca Benini, Hidden Markov Model based gesture recognition on low-cost, low-power Tangible User Interfaces, Entertainment Computing, Volume 1, Issue 2, April 2009, Pages 75-84, ISSN 1875-9521, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.entcom.2009.09.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1875952109000081)
Abstract: The development of new human–computer interaction technologies that go beyond traditional mouse and keyboard is gaining momentum as smart interactive spaces and virtual reality are becoming part of our everyday life. Tangible User Interfaces (TUIs) introduce physical objects that people can manipulate to interact with smart spaces. Smart objects used as TUIs can further improve the user experiences by recognizing and coupling natural gesture to command issued to the computing system. Hidden Markov Models (HMM) are a typical approach to recognize gestures. In this paper, we show how the HMM forward algorithm can be adapted for its use on low-power, low-cost microcontrollers without floating point unit that can be embedded into several TUI. The proposed solution is validated on a set of gestures performed with the Smart Micrel Cube (SMCube), a TUI developed within the TANGerINE framework. Through the paper we evaluate the complexity of the algorithm and the performance of the recognition algorithm as a function of the number of bits used to represent data. Furthermore, we explore a multiuser scenario where up to four people share the same cube. Results show that the proposed solution performs comparably to the standard forward algorithm run on a PC with double-precision floating point calculations.
Keywords: Hidden Markov Models; Smart object; Tangible interfaces; Gesture recognition; Fixed point; Multiple users

Chao-Liang Liu, Cheng-Jung Tsai, Ting-Yi Chang, Wang-Jui Tsai, Po-Kai Zhong, Implementing multiple biometric features for a recall-based graphical keystroke dynamics authentication system on a smart phone, Journal of Network and Computer Applications, Volume 53, July 2015, Pages 128-139, ISSN 1084-8045, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jnca.2015.03.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1084804515000612)
Abstract: Abstract
Keystroke Dynamics-based Authentication (KDA) is a type of behavioral biometric method. It verifies user identity via the keystroke features gathered from the keystroke events provided by users on a QWERTY keyboard. With the growing use of smart phones, the traditional keypad on mobile phones has been replaced by touch screen devices. The keypad-based KDA is no longer suitable for smart phones. This paper proposes a KDA system implemented using multiple biometric features applied to the pattern lock layout on a smart phone. Except for the time, pressure and size of the keystroke features presented in previous research, we additionally adopted a novel angle keystroke feature and determined the best combination of these features in a series of experiments. As the results show, with 10 training samples involved, the combination of time, pressure and angle offers the best utility (Equal Error Rate of 3.03%).
Keywords: Authentication; Biometric; Keystroke dynamics; Touch screen; Graphical password; Android pattern lock

Quoc-Thinh Nguyen-Vuong, Nazim Agoulmine, Yacine Ghamri-Doudane, A user-centric and context-aware solution to interface management and access network selection in heterogeneous wireless environments, Computer Networks, Volume 52, Issue 18, 22 December 2008, Pages 3358-3372, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comnet.2008.09.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128608002879)
Abstract: This paper investigates issues related to handover management of mobile terminals in heterogeneous wireless environments. The mobile terminals are equipped with multiple wireless radio interfaces and have a limited lifetime battery. Seamless mobility and power utilization efficiency become two important aspects of the handover management. We propose in this work user-centric network selection, power-saving interface management and adaptive handover initiation solutions at the terminal side to support seamless terminal-initiated and terminal-controlled vertical handover. The proposed access network selection is situation-aware and application-aware to suit different communication contexts. It enables terminals to select the most suitable access network according to various access network characteristics. Multiple wireless interfaces of a terminal device are handled in both idle and active communication modes to optimize the power consumption. We also address an adaptive handover initiation scheme to assist the service continuity. We conduct simulations and analyses of the proposed solutions to show their suitability and their efficiency.
Keywords: Terminal-controlled handover; Network selection; Power efficiency; Interface management; User preferences; Always best connected

Mi Jeong Kim, Mary Lou Maher, The impact of tangible user interfaces on spatial cognition during collaborative design, Design Studies, Volume 29, Issue 3, May 2008, Pages 222-253, ISSN 0142-694X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.destud.2007.12.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0142694X0700107X)
Abstract: The use of tangible user interfaces in new design environments promises to facilitate the designers' interaction with the design model. In order to clarify the impact of tangible user interfaces we compare the design protocols of collaborative design sessions using a tabletop system and tangible user interface (TUI) with a typical keyboard/mouse/display graphical user interface (GUI) to identify changes in designers' spatial cognition. We focussed on design collaboration because many tabletop systems are intended to support designers in communicating and developing a shared model of the design. The results reveal that the use of TUIs changed designers' spatial cognition, and that these changes affected the design process by increasing their ‘problem-finding’ behaviours leading to creative design.
Keywords: tangible user interface; design cognition; collaborative design; protocol analysis; creative design

Davide Mulfari, Antonio Celesti, Massimo Villari, A computer system architecture providing a user-friendly man machine interface for accessing assistive technology in cloud computing, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 100, February 2015, Pages 129-138, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jss.2014.10.035.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0164121214002325)
Abstract: Abstract
Assistive Technology (AT) includes hardware peripherals, software applications and systems that enable a user with a disability to use a PC. Thus, when a disabled user needs to work in a particular environment (e.g., at work, at school, in a government office, etc.) he/she has to properly configure the used PC. However, often, the configuration of AT software interfaces is not trivial at all. This paper presents the software design, implementation, and evaluation of a computer system architecture providing a software user-friendly man machine interface for accessing AT software in cloud computing. The main objective of such an architecture is to provide a new type of software human–computer interaction for accessing AT services over the cloud. Thus, end users can interact with their personalized computer environments using any physical networked PC. The advantage of this approach is that users do not have to install and/or setup any additional software on physical PCs and they can access their own AT virtual environments from everywhere. In particular, the usability of prototype based on the Remote Desktop Protocol (RDP) is evaluated in both private and public cloud scenarios.
Keywords: Cloud computing; Assistive technology; Human–computer interaction

O. Bourrion, B. Boyer, L. Derome, G. Pignol, UCTM2: An updated User friendly Configurable Trigger, scaler and delay Module for nuclear and particle physics, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 821, 11 June 2016, Pages 169-177, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nima.2016.03.068.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168900216300948)
Abstract: Abstract
We developed a highly integrated and versatile electronic module to equip small nuclear physics experiments and lab teaching classes: the User friendly Configurable Trigger, scaler and delay Module for nuclear and particle physics (UCTM). It is configurable through a Graphical User Interface (GUI) and provides a large number of possible trigger conditions without any Hardware Description Language (HDL) required knowledge. This new version significantly enhances the previous capabilities by providing two additional features: signal digitization and time measurements. The design, performances and a typical application are presented.
Keywords: Trigger; User configurable; Lab teaching classes

Christianne Falcao, Ana Catarina Lemos, Marcelo Soares, Evaluation of Natural User Interface: A Usability Study Based on the Leap Motion Device, Procedia Manufacturing, Volume 3, 2015, Pages 5490-5495, ISSN 2351-9789, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.promfg.2015.07.697.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2351978915006988)
Abstract: Abstract
Technologically successful products are identified by their ease of use. Tullis and Albert [9] pointed out that, the more technologically the product is, the less usable it will be perceived. For designers, many devices have been developed in order to improve the human-computer interaction (HCI), such as drawing tablets. Recently, a new device was launched in the market promising a “touch-free” interaction based on the gestural interface called “Leap Motion”. This innovative device waives common inputs such as mouse and keyboard, and represents an innovative graphical user interface and user interaction. The device enables the possibility for an image manipulation and creating artifacts like drawing directly into the air, without the use of a pen and a graphic tablet. This paper presents a survey to assess the interaction concept based on the Leap Motion with interface designer's activity and by using Photoshop CS6 software. The study was carried as a usability evaluation with five Designers who use the software in their work activities, but never used the Leap Motion device before. Users performed three pre-determined tasks and answered a user satisfaction questionnaire. As a result, enhancements were proposed for the Leap Motion user interface. In conclusion, researchers identified the necessity to adjust the device for a better user experience with natural interfaces. Thus, the technology used by the device is still fully effective and could be utilized to replace the mouse and keyboard in the design activities with graphic design software.
Keywords: Heuristic evaluation; Photoshop CS6 software ;

Y. El Basri, M. Bressan, L. Seguier, H. Alawadhi, C. Alonso, A proposed graphical electrical signatures supervision method to study PV module failures, Solar Energy, Volume 116, June 2015, Pages 247-256, ISSN 0038-092X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.solener.2015.02.048.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0038092X15001759)
Abstract: Abstract
The current literature has an important lack of knowledge on the various types of failures in terrestrial PV systems. This works seeks to remedy this issue by proposing a new method to detect failures based on simple electrical measurements. This helps to maximize the PV power production and to improve the knowledge of the environmental impact on premature failures. To validate this approach, this work proposes the analysis of numerous I–V curves under failure conditions. These curves are reproduced experimentally on a PV central, validating the proposed method.
Keywords: I–V curves analysis; Graphical electrical signatures; Shadow; Dust; Failure detection; Monitoring system

Markus Döhring, Hajo A. Reijers, Sergey Smirnov, Configuration vs. adaptation for business process variant maintenance: An empirical study, Information Systems, Volume 39, January 2014, Pages 108-133, ISSN 0306-4379, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.is.2013.06.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0306437913000811)
Abstract: Abstract
Many approaches for process variant management employ a reference model for deriving a target variant either using configuration or adaptation mechanisms. What is missing at this stage is empirical insight into their relative strengths and weaknesses. Our paper addresses this gap. We selected C-YAWL and vBPMN for a comparative, empirical user study. Both approaches center on a reference process, but provide different types of configuration and adaptation mechanisms as well as modularization support. Along with this aspect, we investigate the effect of model complexity and professional level on human process variant modeling performance. Given unlimited processing time, we could not show that complexity or the participant's professional level significantly impacts the task success rate or user contentment. Yet, an effect of model complexity can be noted on the execution speed for typical variant maintenance tasks like the insertion and deletion of process steps. For each of the performance measures of success rate, user contentment and execution speed, vBPMN performs significantly better than C-YAWL. We argue that this is due to vBPMN's advanced modularization support in terms of pattern-based process adaptations to construct process variants. These insights are valuable for advancing existing modeling approaches and selecting between them.
Keywords: Process modeling; Process variants; Process configuration; Process adaptation; User experiment; Model maintainability

Anett Spring, Heike Laqua, Jörg Schacht, User control interface for W7-X plasma operation, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 82, Issues 5–14, October 2007, Pages 1002-1007, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2007.05.052.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379607002694)
Abstract: The configuration of the W7-X control system follows two major design principles. It reflects the strict hierarchy of the machine set-up with a set of subordinated components, which in turn can be run autonomously during commissioning and testing. Secondly, it links the basic machine operation (mainly given by the infrastructure status and the components readiness) and the physics program execution (i.e., plasma operation) on each hierarchy level.

The complexity of the control system implies great demands on appropriate user interfaces: specialized tools for specific control tasks allowing a dedicated view on the subject to be controlled, hiding complexity wherever possible and reasonable, providing similar operation methods on each hierarchy level and both manual interaction possibilities and a high degree of intelligent automation.

Subject of this article is the description of the operation interface for experiment control: ‘Xcontrol’ will be designed both for running plasma discharge experiments at W7-X and for components’ or diagnostics’ operation during autonomous mode or even laboratory experiments.

The necessary background information about the control system is given. The main ‘Xcontrol’ features, such as program composition and validation, manual and automatic control instruments, and process monitoring, will be presented. The implementation principles and the underlying configuration will be discussed.
Keywords: WENDELSTEIN 7-X; Segment control; Plasma discharge control; User interface

Nabil Sabor, Shigenobu Sasaki, Mohammed Abo-Zahhad, Sabah M. Ahmed, A Graphical-based educational simulation tool for Wireless Sensor Networks, Simulation Modelling Practice and Theory, Volume 69, December 2016, Pages 55-79, ISSN 1569-190X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.simpat.2016.09.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1569190X16302271)
Abstract: Abstract
Many routing protocols have been developed to improve the lifetime, bandwidth reusability and scalability of the Wireless Sensor Networks (WSNs). The operation of routing protocols is difficult to understand and some problems may occur while developing these protocols. Simulation is a relatively fast way of estimating these protocols and understating what is happening in the network. Thus, this paper presents an open source Graphical-based educational simulation tool called Gbest-WSN for simulating routing protocols of the static and mobile, homogeneous and heterogeneous WSNs. Gbest-WSN tool has a user-friendly interface that helps the user to select the routing protocol and define the network configuration. It is provided with four routing protocols; namely LEACH, LEACH-Mobile, immune algorithm-based and genetic algorithm-based routing protocols. Also, it allows the user to update the existing routing protocols and add a new routing protocol. Gbest-WSN is provided with radio, coverage and mobility models for modeling the hardware of the sensor node. It shows a detailed 2D and 3D graphical perception for what is happing during the routing process. Also, it has the ability to compare the simulation results of different simulation methods or different network configurations. In addition, it allows the user to save and load simulation scenarios and also exports the graphical results on PDF files and the statistical results on excel or mat files. Moreover, Gbest-WSN is provided with html help documents to help the user how to use it. The illustrative simulation examples clarified that the Gbest-WSN is a helpful tool for the students, teachers and researchers who work in the field of WSNs.
Keywords: Wireless Sensor Networks; Routing protocols; Genetic algorithm; Immune algorithm; Open source software; Command-line; Graphic; Educational software

Gianluca Dini, Fabio Martinelli, Ilaria Matteucci, Marinella Petrocchi, Andrea Saracino, Daniele Sgandurra, Risk analysis of Android applications: A user-centric solution, Future Generation Computer Systems, Available online 8 June 2016, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2016.05.035.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X16301534)
Abstract: Abstract
Android applications (apps) pose many risks to their users, e.g., by including code that may threaten user privacy or system integrity. Most of the current security countermeasures for detecting dangerous apps show some weaknesses, mainly related to users’ understanding and acceptance. Hence, users would benefit from an effective but simple technique that indicates whether an app is safe or risky to be installed. In this paper, we present MAETROID (Multi-criteria App Evaluator of TRust for AndrOID), a framework to evaluate the trustworthiness of Android apps, i.e., the amount of risk they pose to users, e.g., in terms of confidentiality and integrity. MAETROID performs a multi-criteria analysis of an app at deploy-time and returns a single easy-to-understand evaluation of the app’s risk level (i.e., Trusted, Medium Risk, and High Risk), aimed at driving the user decision on whether or not installing a new app. The criteria include the set of requested permissions and a set of metadata retrieved from the marketplace, denoting the app quality and popularity. We have tested MAETROID on a set of 11,000 apps both coming from Google Play and from a database of known malicious apps. The results show a good accuracy in both identifying the malicious apps and in terms of false positive rate.
Keywords: Android security; User experience and expectations; Malware; Usability; Risk analysis; User-centric devices

LIAM E. GUMLEY, 9 - Graphical User Interfaces, In Practical IDL Programming, Morgan Kaufmann, San Francisco, 2002, Pages 391-460, ISBN 9781558607002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155860700-2.50010-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781558607002500100)

Kris Luyten, Jan Van den Bergh, Chris Vandervelpen, Karin Coninx, Designing distributed user interfaces for ambient intelligent environments using models and simulations, Computers & Graphics, Volume 30, Issue 5, October 2006, Pages 702-713, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2006.07.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S009784930600121X)
Abstract: There is a growing demand for design support to create interactive systems that are deployed in ambient intelligent environments. Unlike traditional interactive systems, the wide diversity of situations these type of user interfaces need to work in require tool support that is close to the environment of the end-user on the one hand and provide a smooth integration with the application logic on the other hand. This paper shows how the model-based user interface development methodology can be applied for ambient intelligent environments; we propose a task-centered approach towards the design of interactive systems by means of appropriate visualizations and simulations of different models. Besides the use of these typical user interface models such as the task- and presentation-model to support interface design, we focus on user interfaces supporting situated task distributions and a visualization of context influences on deployed, possibly distributed, user interfaces. To enable this we introduce an environment model describing the device configuration at particular moment in time. To support the user interface designer while creating these complex interfaces for ambient intelligent environments, we discuss tool support using a visualization of the environment together with simulations of the user interface configurations. We also show how the concepts presented in the paper can be integrated within model-driven engineering, hereby narrowing the gap between HCI design and software engineering.
Keywords: Distributed user interfaces; UML; Model-driven engineering; Task migration

William J Weiland, Ben Shneiderman, A graphical query interface based on aggregation/generalization hierarchies, Information Systems, Volume 18, Issue 4, June 1993, Pages 215-232, ISSN 0306-4379, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0306-4379(93)90018-V.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/030643799390018V)
Abstract: In order for automated information systems to be used effectively, they must be made easily accessible to a wide range of users and with short training periods. This work proposes a method of organizing documents based on the concepts of aggregation and generalization hierarchies. We propose a graphical user interface to provide a more intuitive form of Boolean query. This design is based on mapping the nodes of the aggregation hierarchy to Boolean intersection operations, mapping the nodes of the generalization hierarchy to Boolean union operations, and providing a concrete, graphical, manipulable representation of both of these node types. Finally, a working prototype interface was constructed and evaluated experimentally against a classical command-line Boolean query interface. In this formative evaluation with sixteen subjects, the graphical interface produced less than one-tenth the errors of the textual interface, on average. Significant differences in time spent specifying queries were not found. Observations and comments provide guidance for designers.
Keywords: Graphical user interfaces; visual queries; aggregation/generalization hierarchies; empirical test

Emilio J. González-Galván, Elizabeth Rivera-Bravo, Rubén D. González-Lizcano, Oscar A. Garay-Molina and Victor H. Miranda-Gómez, A Graphical User Interface for Industrial Robot Programming in Non-Repetitive Tasks, In Human Friendly Mechatronics, edited by Eiji Arai, Tatsuo Arai and Masaharu Takano, Elsevier Science, Amsterdam, 2001, Pages 67-71, ISBN 9780444506498, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-044450649-8/50013-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444506498500139)

Benjamin Van Ryseghem, Stéphane Ducasse, Johan Fabry, Seamless composition and reuse of customizable user interfaces with Spec, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 96, Part 1, 15 December 2014, Pages 34-51, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2013.11.035.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642313003286)
Abstract: Abstract
Implementing UIs is often a tedious task. To address this, UI Builders have been proposed to support the description of widgets, their location, and their logic. A missing aspect of UI Builders is however the ability to reuse and compose widget logic. In our experience, this leads to a significant amount of duplication in UI code. To address this issue, we built Spec: a UIBuilder for Pharo with a focus on reuse. With Spec, widget properties are defined declaratively and attached to specific classes known as composable classes. A composable class defines its own widget description as well as the model-widget bridge and widget interaction logic. This paper presents Spec, showing how it enables seamless reuse of widgets and how these can be customized. After presenting Spec and its implementation, we discuss how its use in Pharo 2.0 has cut in half the amount of lines of code of six of its tools, mostly through reuse. This shows that Spec meets its goals of allowing reuse and composition of widget logic.
Keywords: Smalltalk; Ui; UIBuilder; Widgets; MVC

G.A. Triantafyllidis, N. Thomos, C. Canero, P. Vieyres, M.G. Strintzis, A user interface for mobile robotized tele-echography, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 569, Issue 2, 20 December 2006, Pages 645-648, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nima.2006.08.062.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168900206014112)
Abstract: Ultrasound imaging allows the evaluation of the degree of emergency of a patient. However, in many situations no experienced sonographer is available to perform such echography. To cope with this issue, the OTELO project “mObile Tele-Echography using an ultra-Light rObot” (OTELO) aims to develop a fully integrated end-to-end mobile tele-echography system using an ultralight, remotely controlled six degree-of-freedom (DOF) robot. In this context, this paper deals with the user interface environment of the OTELO system, composed by the following parts: an ultrasound video transmission system providing real-time images of the scanned area at each moment, an audio/video conference to communicate with the paramedical assistant and the patient, and finally a virtual reality environment, providing visual and haptic feedback to the expert, while capturing the expert's hand movements with a one-DOF hand free input device.
Keywords: Tele-echography; User interface; Virtual reality environment

Runliang Dou, Chao Zong, Minqiang Li, An interactive genetic algorithm with the interval arithmetic based on hesitation and its application to achieve customer collaborative product configuration design, Applied Soft Computing, Volume 38, January 2016, Pages 384-394, ISSN 1568-4946, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.asoc.2015.10.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1568494615006523)
Abstract: Abstract
Complex product configuration design requires rapid and accurate response to customers’ demand. The participation of customers in product design will be a very effective solution to achieve this. The traditional interactive genetic algorithm (IGA) can solve the above problem to some extent by a computer-aided user interface. However, it is difficult to adopt an accurate number to express an individual's fitness because the customers’ cognition of evolutionary population is uncertain, and to solve the users’ fatigue problem in IGA. Thus, an interactive genetic algorithm with interval individual fitness based on hesitancy (IGA-HIIF) is proposed in this paper. In IGA-HIIF, the interval number derived from users’ evaluation time is adopted to express an individual's fitness, and the evolutionary individuals are compared according to the interval probability dominant strategy proposed in this paper. Then, the genetic operations are applied to generate offspring population and the evolutionary process doesn’t stop until it meets the termination conditions of the evolution or user manually terminates the evolution process. The IGA-HIIF is applied into the design system of the car console configuration, and compared to the other two kinds of IGA. The extensive experiment results are provided to demonstrate that our proposed algorithm is correct and efficient.
Keywords: Product configuration; Genetic algorithm; Interval fitness; Customer demand

P. Daponte, L. Nigro, F. Tisato, Integrating the user interface in an object-oriented measurement system, Measurement, Volume 15, Issue 2, May 1995, Pages 91-101, ISSN 0263-2241, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0263-2241(94)00042-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0263224194000426)
Abstract: The aim of this work is to apply the object-oriented (OO) programming technology to the development of computer-based measurement systems. The chosen framework is centred on a concurrent, time-sensitive, OO programming model, which in general is suited to the construction of real-time applications. The paper first highlights basic methodological issues of the proposed model and its usefulness in the construction of the software of an automatic measurement system. Then it concentrates on a possible realization of the user interface which strictly adheres to the OO paradigm and fits naturally into the adopted model. A careful layering of the architecture together with a proper use of the inheritance mechanism allow to reuse pre-defined user interface objects whose external behaviour is specialized for each test method. The use of the graphical interface is exemplified by means of some measurement examples.
Keywords: Measurement system; Object-oriented programming; Graphical user interface; Real time

Allen D. Roberts, The effects of current landscape configuration on streamflow within selected small watersheds of the Atlanta metropolitan region, Journal of Hydrology: Regional Studies, Volume 5, March 2016, Pages 276-292, ISSN 2214-5818, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ejrh.2015.11.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2214581815001172)
Abstract: AbstractStudy region
This study investigated impacts of current landscape configuration on streamflow within selected small watersheds of the Atlanta, Georgia metropolitan region (AMR).
Study focus
To determine effects of current landscape arrangement on watershed-wide Hydrologic Unit Code (HUC)-12 land cover/land use (LC/LU), the configurational metric of contagion was chosen. Contagion-adjusted curve numbers (CNs) were calculated for all 405 HUC-12 watersheds in the AMR. 6 watersheds were chosen for Thornthwaite Water Balance (TWB) model evaluation based upon having a stream gage record of the 5 year (60 month) period most closely associated with contagion and CN values derived from the 2011 National Land Cover Dataset (NLCD). 4 watersheds out-performed their original CN watershed simulations based upon: Nash–Sutcliffe efficiency (NSE); room mean square error (RMSE)-standard deviation ratio (RSR); and Akaike Information Criteria (AIC) analysis.
New hydrological insights
Configurational metrics related to contagion of the aggregation index (AI) and clumpiness index (CI) indicated possible reasoning to explain differences found between the 4-watershed and 2-watershed categories. The AI of agricultural LC/LU within the 2-watershed category suggested greater landscape heterogeneity due to agricultural patch disaggregation, whereas the CI suggested greater overall disaggregation and landscape dispersion for all non-water LC/LU patches within the 2-watershed category and pointed towards greater landscape heterogeneity driven by higher dispersal of non-water patches. Both may lead to complex flow patterns not easily estimated within streamflow simulations.
Keywords: Atlanta; Curve number; Landscape configuration; Streamflow; Thornthwaite water balance

Ric Messier, Chapter 5 - System Configuration, In Operating System Forensics, Syngress, 2016, Pages 129-156, ISBN 9780128019498, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-801949-8.00005-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128019498000052)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter provides an overview of configuration artifacts for Linux, Windows, and Mac OS including the Windows registry, Mac OS plists, and places where Linux has configuration files.
Keywords: operating systems; forensics; operating environments; configuration; windows registry; plists

Darren Edge, Alan Blackwell, Correlates of the cognitive dimensions for tangible user interface, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 17, Issue 4, August 2006, Pages 366-394, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jvlc.2006.04.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X06000292)
Abstract: We describe an application of the cognitive dimensions (CDs) of notations framework to tangible user interfaces (TUIs)—interaction with computers using physical devices other than mice and keyboards. We are particularly interested in situations where the TUI is used to construct some information structure (a manipulable solid diagram) and where that structure is intended to specify computer behaviour other than by direct manipulation (a tangible programming language). We analyse several tangible programming languages that have been described in previous research, considering the ways in which their physical properties influence the manipulability of the diagrammatic structure. This is the contribution that a CDs analysis would provide for any notation, but we find consistent ways in which particular dimensions can be predicted to apply to any solid diagram. We describe these as the tangible correlates of those dimensions. We then demonstrate that the tangible correlates can be used for both generative and analytic purposes in early stages of TUI design, much as CDs are applicable to the design of visual notations, but more immediately recognisable in their physical implications.
Keywords: Cognitive dimensions; Tangible user interfaces; Tangible programming languages

Ruey-Fong Chang, Chen-Wei Chang, Kuo-Hsiung Tseng, Cheng-Lun Chiang, Wen-Shiow Kao, Wen-Jang Chen, Structural planning and implementation of a microprocessor-based human–machine interface in a steam-explosion process application, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 33, Issue 3, March 2011, Pages 232-248, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2010.05.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548910000553)
Abstract: In this paper, small-scale microprocessor-based human–machine interface (HMI) and programmable logic controller (PLC) standard software libraries are applied to plan, design, implement, and construct models for creating the modular application software. The graphical user interface (GUI) functions used in a specific biomass steam-explosion process, intended to be integrated with the PLC device for HMI, thereby providing excellent GUI-based supervision and control functions. Reviewing these specific case study results, we find that the major advantage is maximum system operating performance at minimum cost. Also, the GUI/HMI operation effectively provides user-friendly and reliable interactions. This GUI/HMI approach is a very cost-effective technique.
Keywords: Steam-explosion process; Microprocessor based; Human–machine interface; Supervisory control; Graphical user interface

David L. Weiss, Khan M. Siddiqui, Joe Scopelliti, Radiologist Assessment of PACS User Interface Devices, Journal of the American College of Radiology, Volume 3, Issue 4, April 2006, Pages 265-273, ISSN 1546-1440, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jacr.2005.10.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1546144005003388)
Abstract: Introduction
The process of radiologic interpretation has been revolutionized with the adoption of filmless imaging. Despite the radical change in viewing techniques and a rapidly expanding array of display, navigation, and manipulation tools, the keyboard-and-mouse configuration remains the standard for user interaction during radiologic interpretation.
Method
In this study, 6 readers evaluated 6 alternative user interface devices (UIDs), including 5-button and 8-button mice, a gyroscopic mouse, a multimedia controller, a handheld mouse-and-keyboard combination device, and a gaming joystick. Each participant assessed each device during the real-time daily imaging interpretation of magnetic resonance, computed tomographic, and general x-ray studies over a 2-week period and completed a detailed questionnaire on the ease of use, comparative utility as an alternative device to mouse and QWERTY keyboard, efficiency, workflow, and the ease of customized programming.
Results
No single device was completely able to replace the mouse and keyboard in the estimation of participants, and the 5-button mouse was preferred over the 8-button mouse, although several participants noted that this might be a function of learning curves that exceeded the 2-week study period for each device. Several specific functionalities of the alternative UIDs were praised by users, who also suggested the possibility of combining these alternative devices for 2-handed use.
Conclusion
Consideration should be given to the potential for the increased acceptance of and efficiency with alternative UIDs that can be integrated into picture archiving and communications system (PACS) workstations. Additional studies are planned to use software applications to evaluate different UIDs at PACS workstations.
Key Words: User interface device; picture archiving and communications systems; workstation; interpretation

Magnus Bång, Anders Larsson, Erik Berglund, Henrik Eriksson, Distributed user interfaces for clinical ubiquitous computing applications, International Journal of Medical Informatics, Volume 74, Issues 7–8, August 2005, Pages 545-551, ISSN 1386-5056, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijmedinf.2005.05.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1386505605000754)
Abstract: SummaryObjectives:
Ubiquitous computing with multiple interaction devices requires new interface models that support user-specific modifications to applications and facilitate the fast development of active workspaces.
Methods:
We have developed NOSTOS, a computer-augmented work environment for clinical personnel to explore new user interface paradigms for ubiquitous computing. NOSTOS uses several devices such as digital pens, an active desk, and walk-up displays that allow the system to track documents and activities in the workplace.
Results:
We present the distributed user interface (DUI) model that allows standalone applications to distribute their user interface components to several devices dynamically at run-time. This mechanism permit clinicians to develop their own user interfaces and forms to clinical information systems to match their specific needs. We discuss the underlying technical concepts of DUIs and show how service discovery, component distribution, events and layout management are dealt with in the NOSTOS system.
Conclusion:
Our results suggest that DUIs – and similar network-based user interfaces – will be a prerequisite of future mobile user interfaces and essential to develop clinical multi-device environments.
Keywords: Ubiquitous computing; User interface models; Healthcare environments; Distributed user interfaces; Software engineering

Chet Hosmer, Joshua Bartolomie and Rosanne Pelli, Chapter 3 - Windows Command Line Interface, In Executing Windows Command Line Investigations, Syngress, 2016, Pages 29-93, ISBN 9780128092682, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-809268-2.00003-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128092682000031)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter takes a brief look at the power of the Windows Command Line interface (CLI) that can be leveraged during forensic and incident response investigations. The Windows CLI provides investigators with a plethora of options and capabilities when performing live investigations. This chapter will examine a selection of these commands, demonstrate their use, and discuss the benefits and limitations for Windows CLI.
Keywords: Command Line Interface (CLI); Command line; Breach; Malware; Insider; Leakage; PDD-21; Critical infrastructure; dir; cd; Administrator; User; Echo; Time; Time zone; systeminfo; find; findstr; PowerShell; Help; wmic; sort; Physical; Logical; diskpart; ipconfig; netsh; tasklist; netstat; tree; more; EventLog; eventvwr; pipe

Roy A. Maxion, Robert W. Reeder, Improving user-interface dependability through mitigation of human error, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 63, Issues 1–2, July 2005, Pages 25-50, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2005.04.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581905000601)
Abstract: Security may be compromised when humans make mistakes at the user interface. Cleartext is mistakenly sent to correspondents, sensitive files are left unprotected, and erroneously configured systems are left vulnerable to attackers. Such mistakes may be blamed on human error, but the regularity of human error suggests that mistakes may be preventable through better interface design. Certain user-interface constructs drive users toward error, while others facilitate success.

Two security-sensitive user interfaces were evaluated in a laboratory user study: the Windows XP file-permissions interface and an alternative interface, called Salmon, designed in accordance with an error-avoiding principle to counteract the misleading constructs in the XP interface. The alternative interface was found to be more dependable; it increased successful task completion by up to 300%, reduced commission of a class of errors by up to 94%, and provided a nearly 3 × speed-up in task completion time. Moreover, users spent less time searching for information with the alternative interface, and a greater proportion of time on essential task steps. An explanatory theory in its early stages of development is presented.
Keywords: Computer security; Dependability; External representation; External subgoal support; File permissions; Goal error; Human error; User interfaces

Juha Tiihonen and Andreas Anderson, Chapter 26 - VariSales, In Knowledge-Based Configuration, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 309-318, ISBN 9780124158177, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-415817-7.00026-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124158177000268)
Abstract: Abstract
In this chapter we outline the modeling of the PC configuration knowledge base with VariSales. VariSales is based on object-oriented knowledge representations with a clear underlying semantics. The VariSales environment consists of a semivisual Modeling Tool and a web-based Configuration Tool. It applies an inference engine that follows the logic-based Answer Set Programming (ASP) paradigm.
Keywords: Knowledge-based Configuration; Sales Configurator; Graphical Modeling; Weight Constraint Rule Language; User interface Generation

Michael Chau, Cho Hung Wong, Designing the user interface and functions of a search engine development tool, Decision Support Systems, Volume 48, Issue 2, January 2010, Pages 369-382, ISSN 0167-9236, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.dss.2009.10.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167923609002103)
Abstract: Search engine development tools have been made to allow users to build their own search engines. However, most of these tools have been designed for advanced computer users. Users without a full understanding of topics such as Web spidering would find these tools difficult to use due to different issues in terms of user interface, performance, and reliability. In view of these issues, we presented a tool called SpidersRUs to strike a balance between usability and functionality. On one hand, beginners should be able to operate the tool by using the basic functions needed to build a search engine. On the other, advanced users should be given the options to exert a higher level of customization while working on the tool. To study the interface design of SpidersRUs, we compared its usability and functionality from the users' perspective with two other development tools, namely Alkaline and Greenstone, in an evaluation study. Our study showed that SpidersRUs was preferred over the other two, particularly in areas of screen layout and sequence, terminology and system information, and learning to use the system.
Keywords: Web search; Search engine development tools; User evaluation

Khaled Medini, Xavier Boucher, Configuration of Product-Service Systems value networks – Evidence from an innovative sector for sludge treatment, CIRP Journal of Manufacturing Science and Technology, Volume 12, January 2016, Pages 14-24, ISSN 1755-5817, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cirpj.2015.10.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S175558171500067X)
Abstract: Abstract
Product-Service Systems are increasingly emerging in response to market volatility and more demanding customer requirements. Their development process, however, is not as straightforward as for traditional physical goods. For instance, the configuration of a Product-Service System entails taking several factors into account, such as the points of view of the different actors in the value network. This paper proposes a methodological framework supported by modelling and simulation to evaluate the performance of different configurations of the value network, referred to as scenarios, and the impact of different input parameters within these scenarios. The proposed approach is illustrated by a case study which highlights the main drivers of a new innovative sector for sludge treatment.
Keywords: Product-Service Systems; Value network configuration; Simulation; Performance evaluation; Servitization

F. Carena, W. Carena, S. Chapeland, V. Chibante Barroso, F. Costa, E. Dénes, R. Divià, U. Fuchs, A. Grigore, T. Kiss, G. Simonetti, C. Soós, A. Telesca, P. Vande Vyvre, B. von Haller, The ALICE data acquisition system, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 741, 21 March 2014, Pages 130-162, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nima.2013.12.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168900213016987)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper we describe the design, the construction, the commissioning and the operation of the Data Acquisition (DAQ) and Experiment Control Systems (ECS) of the ALICE experiment at the CERN Large Hadron Collider (LHC).

The DAQ and the ECS are the systems used respectively for the acquisition of all physics data and for the overall control of the experiment. They are two computing systems made of hundreds of PCs and data storage units interconnected via two networks. The collection of experimental data from the detectors is performed by several hundreds of high-speed optical links.

We describe in detail the design considerations for these systems handling the extreme data throughput resulting from central lead ions collisions at LHC energy. The implementation of the resulting requirements into hardware (custom optical links and commercial computing equipment), infrastructure (racks, cooling, power distribution, control room), and software led to many innovative solutions which are described together with a presentation of all the major components of the systems, as currently realized. We also report on the performance achieved during the first period of data taking (from 2009 to 2013) often exceeding those specified in the DAQ Technical Design Report.
Keywords: Data acquisition; LHC; ALICE; CERN

Cristina Manresa-Yee, Pere Ponsa, Javier Varona, Francisco J. Perales, User experience to improve the usability of a vision-based interface, Interacting with Computers, Volume 22, Issue 6, November 2010, Pages 594-605, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2010.06.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543810000597)
Abstract: When we develop an input device for users to communicate with computers, we have to take into account that end-users must consider the utilization of the device to be effective, efficient and satisfactory. Users whose expectations are unmet by the interface will tend to abandon it. In this paper we present a vision-based interface for motor-impaired users; a multidisciplinary group developed this interface. The user’s preferences are a critical issue when selecting an access device; therefore, user requirements should be included in the design. Usability evaluation should be integrated into relevant phases of software development. In order to evaluate the design, we present a process with multiple user studies at different development stages. We describe the combination of a development project and its implementation, with user experience considerations embedded in the process. Finally, we studied the performance of the interface through several tests, paying special attention to satisfaction and fatigue. From our results we observed that although several users found the interface tiring, their satisfaction level was encouraging, suggesting the interface is usable.
Keywords: Human–computer interaction; Usability; Vision-based interfaces; Accessibility

M.A. Broom, S.P. Holmes, T.R. Hopkins, Graphical interface to toolpack/1, Information and Software Technology, Volume 31, Issue 6, July–August 1989, Pages 305-312, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(89)90132-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0950584989901328)
Abstract: Toolpack/1 is a set of tool fragments designed to assist in the development, maintenance, and testing of FORTRAN code. To perform a particular job a user needs to sequence several of these tool fragments and to keep track of an often large number of intermediate files. The implementation of a graphical interface to a subset of the tools available in Toolpack/1 is reported. The tools included are all the source transformation tools, and the authors believe that the interface will allow non-specialist users easy access to this rich but difficult-to-use toolset
Keywords: software tools; user interface; graphical interface; fortran; Toolpack

César Humberto Guzmán-Valdivia, José Luis Carrera-Escobedo, Mario Alberto García-Ruíz, Arquímedes Ortíz-Rivera, Omar Désiga-Orenday, Design, development and control of a portable laboratory for the chili drying process study, Mechatronics, Available online 26 May 2016, ISSN 0957-4158, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.mechatronics.2016.05.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957415816300320)
Abstract: Abstract
Agricultural products such as chilies generally require drying for preservation. Traditionally, the chili drying process has been accomplished by burning fossil fuels in ovens or by open air drying. However, this process leads to severe losses in the quality and quantity of the final product. In this paper, a portable laboratory has been designed, developed and controlled using a mechatronic design philosophy in order to facilitate the chili drying process study. This portable laboratory can simulate different drying conditions under a controlled environment in order to find the best drying parameters for different kinds of chilies. Their computer based intelligence can monitor and control temperature, humidity, air flow, electric current and weight through a graphical user interface (GUI). The modeling and control technique of the system is described in detail. Simulation results using the mathematical model and experimental results under different drying conditions are presented to demonstrate the high performance of the portable laboratory and its great potential.
Keywords: Chili drying process; Control, dryer; Graphical user interface; Modeling and simulation

José Encarnaçao, Jairo Cote-Muñoz, Dieter Eckardt, Joachim Rix, José Teixeira, User interfaces to support the design process, Computers in Industry, Volume 17, Issue 4, December 1991, Pages 317-333, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0166-3615(91)90044-A.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016636159190044A)
Abstract: This paper will give a short overview of developments and methods in the area of graphical user interfaces. As an example a User Interface Management System (UIMS) as a dialogue design tool and an open CAD system with a graphical user interface will be described. These systems result from developments realized in Darmstadt by the Computer Graphics Center (ZGDV) and the Fraunhofer Computer Graphics Research Group (FhG-AGD). Under the perspective of integration of the different aspects, the possibilities to support the design process will be discussed. These aspects are to use methods of artificial intelligence, to unify the presentation of those methods, and to realize those processes in parallel.
Keywords: User interface; Graphical interface; User Interface Management System; Dialogue design; CAD

Vít Rusňák, Lukáš Ručka, Petr Holub, Toward natural multi-user interaction in advanced collaborative display environments, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 54, January 2016, Pages 313-325, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2015.03.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X15000813)
Abstract: Abstract
Large high-resolution displays have become widely spread in research centers, laboratories, and public spaces during the last decade. There have been various research efforts in transformation of these displays from passive screens to interactive environments where multiple users can interact independently with multi-touch surfaces, in-air interaction or pointing devices. Such systems provide basic multi-user interaction, i.e., two or more users can interact concurrently. However, continuous user tracking and association of input events with users, which could considerably improve user experience, is still a largely unexplored topic. In this paper, we present a set of techniques enabling cue-less multi-user interaction in environments where horizontal or vertical high-resolution displays are in the role of central visualization platforms. We define the concept of cue-less multi-user interaction and set of techniques that enable unobtrusive user tracking and their association with input events through combination of a multi-touch surface and a depth sensor. Further, we introduce an open-source framework implementing techniques behind this concept and their evaluation in terms of accuracy of user association and the overall system interactivity when integrated with selected distributed rendering middleware.
Keywords: Group collaborative environments; Multi-user interaction; Scalable resolution displays; Human factors; Distributed systems

Jacek Gwizdka, Mark Chignell, Individual differences and task-based user interface evaluation: a case study of pending tasks in email, Interacting with Computers, Volume 16, Issue 4, August 2004, Pages 769-797, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2004.04.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543804000451)
Abstract: This paper addresses issues raised by the ever-expanding role of email as a multi-faceted application that combines communication, collaboration, and task management. Individual differences analysis was used to contrast two email user interfaces in terms of their demands on users. The results of this analysis were then interpreted in terms of their implications for designing more inclusive interfaces that meet the needs of users with widely ranging abilities.

The specific target of this research is the development of a new type of email message representation that makes pending tasks more visible. We describe a study that compared a new way of representing tasks in an email inbox, with a more standard representation (the Microsoft Outlook inbox). The study consisted of an experiment that examined how people with different levels of three specific cognitive capabilities (flexibility of closure, visual memory, and working memory) perform when using these representations. We then identified combinations of representation and task that are disadvantageous for people with low levels of the measured capabilities.
Keywords: Email interfaces; Task management; Individual differences; External representations; User interface design

Harlan Carvey, 4 - Case Studies: User Hives, In Windows Registry Forensics (Second Edition), Syngress, Boston, 2016, Pages 131-175, ISBN 9780128032916, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-803291-6.00004-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128032916000048)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter discusses a great deal of the data that can be extracted from Registry hives found within a user profile in order to illustrate indicators of patterns of activity. This information can be used by analysts to demonstrate when the user was logged into the system, as well as locate indicators of malware infections, intrusions, and a number of other activities.
Keywords: MuiCache; NTUSER.DAT; RecentDocs; Registry; User; UserAssist; USRCLASS.DAT; WordWheelQuery

David Lizcano, Fernando Alonso, Javier Soriano, Genoveva López, Web-centred end-user component modelling, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 54, January 2016, Pages 16-40, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2015.07.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X15002253)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper formally defines a web component model enabling end-user programmers to build component-based rich internet applications (RIAs) that are tailored to meet their particular needs. It is the product of a series of previously published papers. The formal definition in description logic verifies that the model is consistent and subsumes currently existing models. We demonstrate experimentally that it is more effective than the others.

Current tools propose very disparate web component models, which are based on the appropriate invocation of service backends, overlooking user needs in order to exploit these services and resources in a friendly manner. We have proposed a web model based on a detailed study of existing tools, their pros and cons, limitations and key success factors that have enabled other web end-user development (WEUD) solutions to help end-user programmers to build software to support their needs. In this paper we have verified that the proposed model subsumes and is instantiated by the models of the other existing tools that we analysed, coming a step closer to the standardization of end-user centred RIAs and development environments. We have implemented a development tool, called EzWeb, to produce RIAs that implement the proposed model. This tool enables users to develop their application following the model’s component structure based on end-user programming success factors. We report a statistical experiment in which users develop increasingly complex web software using the EzWeb tool generating RIAs that conform to the proposed component model, and other WEUD tools generating RIAs that conform to other models. This experiment confirms the applicability of the proposed model and demonstrates that more end-user programmers (EUPs) (users concerned with programming primarily for personal rather public use) successfully develop web solutions for complex problems using the EzWeb tool that implements the model, which is more efficient than existing tools that implement other models.
Keywords: End-user programming; Web engineering; Component-based software; Human factors; Visual programming; Component modelling

N. Bu, T. Tsuji and O. Fukuda, Chapter Three - EMG-Controlled Human-Robot Interfaces: A Hybrid Motion and Task Modeling Approach, In Human Modelling for Bio-Inspired Robotics, edited by Jun Ueda and Yuichi Kurita, Academic Press, 2017, Pages 75-109, ISBN 9780128031377, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-803137-7.00004-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128031377000045)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter describes a hybrid motion and task modeling framework for human-robot interfaces based on electromyogram (EMG) signals. The framework incorporates contextual information of an ongoing task, in the form of a task model, into a traditional EMG pattern recognition method. In this chapter, the basic concepts of EMG motion classification and their application in human-robot interfaces are presented first with a brief summary of the techniques that are currently available. Robustness and reliability of motion classification are key features for prosthetic devices and human-assisting manipulators controlled using EMG signals, especially when practical applications are considered. Task modeling is then introduced to improve the motion classification performance since it can provide a prediction or a reference of the user's future behavior. Many studies have been conducted to demonstrate how task models can support classification and prediction in the field of human interfaces. Two methods are briefly presented in this chapter.

A case study of the EMG-controlled human-robot interface using task modeling is introduced in the rest of the chapter. A prosthetic hand is controlled with motion commands classified from forearm EMG signals. Motion classification is achieved based on both a probabilistic neural network and a task model using a Bayesian network for motion prediction. Experimental results of robot manipulation indicate that the hybrid EMG motion classification framework outperforms traditional methods used for comparison.
Keywords: Electromyography; Motion classification; Myoelectric control; Human-robot interface; Contextual information; Motion prediction; Bayesian network; Petri net; Motion decision rule; Prosthetic control; Robot manipulation

Gaëlle Calvary, Joëlle Coutaz, David Thevenin, Quentin Limbourg, Laurent Bouillon, Jean Vanderdonckt, A Unifying Reference Framework for multi-target user interfaces, Interacting with Computers, Volume 15, Issue 3, June 2003, Pages 289-308, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0953-5438(03)00010-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543803000109)
Abstract: This paper describes a framework that serves as a reference for classifying user interfaces supporting multiple targets, or multiple contexts of use in the field of context-aware computing. In this framework, a context of use is decomposed into three facets: the end users of the interactive system, the hardware and software computing platform with which the users have to carry out their interactive tasks and the physical environment where they are working. Therefore, a context-sensitive user interface is a user interface that exhibits some capability to be aware of the context (context awareness) and to react to changes of this context. This paper attempts to provide a unified understanding of context-sensitive user interfaces rather than a prescription of various ways or methods of tackling different steps of development. Rather, the framework structures the development life cycle into four levels of abstraction: task and concepts, abstract user interface, concrete user interface and final user interface. These levels are structured with a relationship of reification going from an abstract level to a concrete one and a relationship of abstraction going from a concrete level to an abstract one. Most methods and tools can be more clearly understood and compared relative to each other against the levels of this framework. In addition, the framework expresses when, where and how a change of context is considered and supported in the context-sensitive user interface thanks to a relationship of translation. In the field of multi-target user interfaces is also introduced, defined, and exemplified the notion of plastic user interfaces. These user interfaces support some adaptation to changes of the context of use while preserving a predefined set of usability properties.
Keywords: Context-aware computing; Context of use; Context-sensitive user interfaces; Model-based approach, Multi-platform user interfaces; Multi-target user interfaces; Plasticity of user interfaces

Markus Sauer, Florian Zeiger, Klaus Schilling, Mixed-Reality User Interface for Mobile Robot Teleoperation in Ad-Hoc Networks, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 43, Issue 23, 2010, Pages 77-82, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20101005-4-RO-2018.00029.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015343275)
Abstract: Abstract
Conventional approaches for the implementation of modern user interfaces for teleoperation of mobile robots in ad-hoc networks target to optimize only the communication link. Thus, remaining effects from network behavior in the user interface are still visible to the human operator. Here an approach is presented which aims to minimize also the perception by the human of these effects. This work shows and compares the behavior of three different user interface implementations which are capable for mobile robot teleoperation via ad-hoc networks. As starting point, a user interface is used which is not reacting on the situations of the communication link. Here, all changes in the network topology and network configuration, as well as the effects of the network load are directly visible for the user. The traditional approach uses an intelligent traffic shaping between the mobile robot and the user interface. Thus, short disruptions of the communication link or small delays are avoided. Nevertheless, a longer communication break down is still influencing the teleoperation capabilities of the user. The “predictive interface„ which is is presented within the frame of this work also allows for teleoperation of the mobile robot while compensating longer communication losses. Finally, this work discusses constraints and requirements for a successful realization of predictive interfaces for mobile robot teleoperation via ad-hoc networks.
Keywords: Robotics; Teleoperation; Human-Machine Interface; Networked Systems; Mixed Reality

Aaron Marcus, A Comparison of Graphical User Interfaces (Excerpt), In Interactive Technologies, edited by RONALD M. BAECKER, JONATHAN GRUDIN, WILLIAM A.S. BUXTON and SAUL GREENBERG, Morgan Kaufmann, 1995, Pages 457-468, Readings in Human–Computer Interaction (Second Edition), ISBN 9780080515748, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-08-051574-8.50048-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780080515748500480)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter presents a comparison of some graphical user interfaces. The classic Macintosh is a single-tasking system with a high level of responsiveness and a very simple user model. Apple has succeeded in creating widespread acceptance among third-party software developers for their standard human-interface components. As a result, knowledge about familiar Macintosh applications can ease the task of learning new applications. The NextStep user interface provides a windowing system and graphical desktop environment for the NeXT Computer. The four component modules of the NextStep user interface are the Window Server, the Workspace Manager, the Application Kit, and the Interface Builder. The Application Kit provides a standard set of object-oriented components that can be customized by application developers. The Interface Builder is an end user oriented tool that allows users to link these objects to system- and application-level functions with no additional programming. With this tool, standard OPEN LOOK human-interface components can be used to automate the user's tasks.

S. Maddali, S. Ta’asan, R.M. Suter, Topology-faithful nonparametric estimation and tracking of bulk interface networks, Computational Materials Science, Volume 125, December 2016, Pages 328-340, ISSN 0927-0256, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.commatsci.2016.08.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0927025616303913)
Abstract: Abstract
The main focus of this paper is a nonparametric filtering technique for the estimation of interface geometry in bulk materials obtainable from modern imaging measurements. The filtering methodology relies on an assumed hierarchy of topological features present in a typical interface network, such as foam interfaces and grain boundary networks in polycrystalline materials. Each type of topological feature is treated in order of rank in the hierarchy, with the lower-level feature being filtered subject to the positional constraints imposed by the higher-level features. Such a scheme is an alternative to existing surface smoothing/estimation techniques in microstructural materials science, in which the explicit treatment of different elements of the network topology is absent, or at best arbitrarily parameterized. We describe the ramifications of this technique in the usual microstructural applications in which the computation of important physical quantities is predicated on the precise estimation of the interface features. As an additional application, we describe a novel front-tracking algorithm for quantifying the transport of such interfaces.
Keywords: Hierarchical smoothing; Grain boundary; Interface estimation; Front tracking; Mathematical optimization

Munehiro Nakazato, Ljubomir Manola, Thomas S Huang, ImageGrouper: a group-oriented user interface for content-based image retrieval and digital image arrangement, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 14, Issue 4, August 2003, Pages 363-386, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1045-926X(03)00034-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X0300034X)
Abstract: In content-based image retrieval (CBIR), experimental (trial-and-error) query with relevance feedback is essential for successful retrieval. Unfortunately, the traditional user interfaces are not suitable for trying different combinations of query examples. This is because first, these systems assume query examples are always added incrementally. Second, the query and the result display are done on the same workspace. Once the user removes an image from the query examples, the image may disappear from the user interface. In addition, it is difficult to combine the result of different queries.

In this paper, we propose a new interface for Content-based image retrieval named ImageGrouper. ImageGrouper is a Group-Oriented user interface in that all operations are done by creating groups of images. This approach has several advantages. First, the users can interactively compare different combinations of the query examples by dragging and grouping the images on the workspace (Query-by-Group). Because the query results are displayed on another pane, the user can quickly review the results and modify the query. Combining different queries is also easy. Furthermore, the concept of “Image Groups” is also applied for annotating and organizing many images. The Annotation-by-Groups method relieves the user of tedious task of annotating textual information on a large number of images. This method realizes a hierarchical annotation of the images as well as Bulk Annotation. The Organize-by-Group method lets the users manipulate the image groups as “Photo Albums” to organize the images. Finally, the usability of the system is compared with the traditional user interfaces. By incorporating the lessons from the experiments, the usability of ImageGrouper is further improved.
Keywords: Content-based image retrieval; Digital photography; User interface; Information retrieval; Image database

P.E. Antonelli, K.M. Bryden, R. LeSar, A model-to-model interface for concurrent multiscale simulations, Computational Materials Science, Volume 123, October 2016, Pages 244-251, ISSN 0927-0256, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.commatsci.2016.06.031.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0927025616303184)
Abstract: Abstract
We present a low-level model-to-model interface that will enable independent models to be linked into an integrated system of models. The interface is based on a standard set of functions that contain appropriate export and import schemas that enable models to be linked with no changes to the models themselves. These ideas are presented in the context of a specific multiscale materials problem that couples atomistic-based molecular dynamics calculations to continuum calculations of fluid flow to examine the influence of interactions of the fluid with an adjacent solid on the fluid flow.
Keywords: Multiscale modeling; Model-to-model interface; Lattice Boltzmann; Molecular dynamics

Nicolas Foloppe, I-Jen Chen, Towards understanding the unbound state of drug compounds: Implications for the intramolecular reorganization energy upon binding, Bioorganic & Medicinal Chemistry, Volume 24, Issue 10, 15 May 2016, Pages 2159-2189, ISSN 0968-0896, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.bmc.2016.03.022.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0968089616301729)
Abstract: Abstract
There has been an explosion of structural information for pharmaceutical compounds bound to biological targets, but the conformations and dynamics of compounds free in solution are poorly characterized, if at all. Yet, knowledge of the unbound state is essential to understand the fundamentals of molecular recognition, including the much debated conformational intramolecular reorganization energy of a compound upon binding (ΔEReorg). Also, dependable observation of the unbound compounds is important for ligand-based drug discovery, e.g. with pharmacophore modelling. Here, these questions are addressed with long (⩾0.5 μs) state-of-the-art molecular dynamics (MD) simulations of 26 compounds (including 7 approved drugs) unbound in explicit solvent. These compounds were selected to be chemically diverse, with a range of flexibility, and good quality bioactive X-ray structures. The MD-simulated free compounds are compared to their bioactive structure and conformers generated with ad hoc sampling in vacuo or with implicit generalized Born (GB) aqueous solvation models. The GB conformational models clearly depart from those obtained in explicit solvent, and suffer from conformational collapse almost as severe as in vacuo. Thus, the global energy minima in vacuo or with GB are not suitable representations of the unbound state, which can instead be extensively sampled by MD simulations. Many, but not all, MD-simulated compounds displayed some structural similarity to their bioactive structure, supporting the notion of conformational pre-organization for binding. The ligand–protein complexes were also simulated in explicit solvent, to estimate ΔEReorg as an enthalpic difference ΔHReorg between the intramolecular energies in the bound and unbound states. This fresh approach yielded ΔHReorg values ⩽ 6 kcal/mol for 18 out of 26 compounds. For three particularly polar compounds 15 ⩽ ΔHReorg ⩽ 20 kcal/mol, supporting the notion that ΔHReorg can be substantial. Those large ΔHReorg values correspond to a redistribution of electrostatic interactions upon binding. Overall, the study illustrates how MD simulations offer a promising avenue to characterize the unbound state of medicinal compounds.
Keywords: Conformational dynamics; Drug discovery; Intramolecular energy; Molecular modelling; Molecular recognition; Reorganization energy; Simulation

Stefan Bergdoll, Uwe T. Koch, BIOSIM — A biological neural network simulator for research and teaching, featuring interactive graphical user interface and learning capabilities, Neurocomputing, Volume 8, Issue 1, May 1995, Pages 93-112, ISSN 0925-2312, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0925-2312(95)00015-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0925231295000151)
Abstract: BIOSIM is a biologically oriented neural network simulator, which is available as public domain software. BIOSIM was designed for research and teaching. Hence, the ease of handling was of prime importance. This task was achieved by implementing a graphical user interface and presenting it as a turnkey system which avoids the necessity to learn complex programming languages. In BIOSIM, four neuron models are implemented: a simple model only switching ion channels on and off, the original Hodgkin-Huxley model, the SWIM model (a modified HH model) and the Golowasch-Buchholz model as the most enhanced model. Dendrites consist of a chain of segments without bifurcation. Three synaptic types are predefined (excitatory, inhibitory and electrical). Additional synaptic types can be created interactively. Biologically oriented learning and forgetting processes are modeled, e.g. sensitization, habituation, conditioning, hebbian learning and competition learning. A neural network can be created by using the interactive network editor which is part of BIOSIM. Parameters can be changed via context sensitive menus and the results of the simulation can be visualized in observation windows for neurons and synapses. Stochastic processes such as noise can be included. A demonstration shell script, which controls the simulator, is included showing a wide range of possibilities with BIOSIM. A hypertext based online-help system is embedded. BIOSIM was designed as a bilingual (English and German) system, which can easily be augmented by other languages.
Keywords: Biological neurons; Neural nets; Learning; Biological neural networks; Simulation; Ionic channels; Voltage clamp; Noise

K.M. Abdel Ghany and M.M. Farag, Building a graphical user interface for the expert system of fiber reinforced plastics liquid containers, In Current Advances in Mechanical Design and Production VI, edited by Mohamed E. Elarabi, Abdalla S. Wifi and A.S. Wifi, Pergamon, Oxford, 1995, Pages 349-357, ISBN 9780080421407, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-008042140-7/50032-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780080421407500329)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter illustrates the concept of the intelligent expert system interface. This is the ability of the system to expand its own knowledge, algorithm and problem handling capabilities, without asking the human users, by communicating with the surrounding computer environment and share the knowledge of the other systems. The chapter also presents the remodeling of the expert system of the design, selection of materials and manufacturing processes of the fiber reinforced plastics liquid containers to satisfy the requirements of the intelligent expert system interface. This enables the expert system to expand its problem handling capabilities and to collect the knowledge required to handle “unfamiliar” domains. The system is able to share knowledge with other systems or even send a complete problem object to be evaluated through a neighboring expert system. The remodeled system was developed under MS WINDOWS environment and benefits from most of its collaborative features and its Arabic language support. It uses SQL commands to access remote database systems and has a direct link to use the graphical facilities of AUTOCAD.

Alexander G. Barszap, Ida-Maria Skavhaug, Sanjay S. Joshi, Effects of muscle fatigue on the usability of a myoelectric human-computer interface, Human Movement Science, Volume 49, October 2016, Pages 225-238, ISSN 0167-9457, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.humov.2016.06.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167945716300859)
Abstract: Abstract
Electromyography-based human-computer interface development is an active field of research. However, knowledge on the effects of muscle fatigue for specific devices is limited. We have developed a novel myoelectric human-computer interface in which subjects continuously navigate a cursor to targets by manipulating a single surface electromyography (sEMG) signal. Two-dimensional control is achieved through simultaneous adjustments of power in two frequency bands through a series of dynamic low-level muscle contractions. Here, we investigate the potential effects of muscle fatigue during the use of our interface. In the first session, eight subjects completed 300 cursor-to-target trials without breaks; four using a wrist muscle and four using a head muscle. The wrist subjects returned for a second session in which a static fatiguing exercise took place at regular intervals in-between cursor-to-target trials. In the first session we observed no declines in performance as a function of use, even after the long period of use. In the second session, we observed clear changes in cursor trajectories, paired with a target-specific decrease in hit rates.
Keywords: Surface electromyography; sEMG; Myoelectric interface; Cursor control; Median frequency shift; Muscle fatigue; Human-computer interface

Qi Gao, Jair Lizarazo-Adarme, Brian K. Paul, Karl R. Haapala, An economic and environmental assessment model for microchannel device manufacturing: part 1 – Methodology, Journal of Cleaner Production, Volume 120, 1 May 2016, Pages 135-145, ISSN 0959-6526, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jclepro.2015.04.142.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0959652615006290)
Abstract: Abstract
To manage the effects of manufacturing industries on the economy and environment, design tools are needed that will aid engineers to assess manufacturing costs and environmental impacts early in design. The development of cost analyses and environmental assessments can be burdensome, but much of the data used in these analyses can be shared. Little work has been done to integrate environmental assessments with cost analyses for the purposes of evaluating manufacturing plans for both environmental impact and cost. A spreadsheet-based cost and environmental impact assessment model is developed for simultaneously analyzing the effects of manufacturing process plans on both product cost and the environment. A bottom-up process-based cost calculation method is used to estimate microchannel device manufacturing costs over a range of production volumes, while process-based cradle-to-gate life cycle assessment is utilized to evaluate environmental impacts. Both models draw data from a common database for describing the device geometry and the production environment. The method is used to evaluate the manufacturing plan for a microchannel heat exchanger, providing insight into the likely drivers of cost and environmental impact. For this case study, the analysis shows that both cost and environmental impact are dominated by the same process step – diffusion bonding.
Keywords: Bottom-up cost modeling; Environmental impact assessment; Decision making; Microchannel process technology; Graphical user interface

Qi Gao, Jair Lizarazo-Adarme, Brian K. Paul, Karl R. Haapala, An economic and environmental assessment model for microchannel device manufacturing: part 2 – Application, Journal of Cleaner Production, Volume 120, 1 May 2016, Pages 146-156, ISSN 0959-6526, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jclepro.2015.04.141.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0959652615006289)
Abstract: Abstract
Microchannel heat exchangers provide large surface area to volume ratios and accelerated heat transfer, leading to compact form factors for application in portable and distributed thermal management and waste heat recovery. The application of microchannel heat exchangers in industry has been slowed by high manufacturing costs. Therefore, efforts are being made to find new ways to manufacture these components. This research investigates the application of a process-based cost and environmental impact assessment model to the evaluation of manufacturing alternatives to produce microchannel heat exchangers. A bottom-up process-based cost modeling method is used to estimate the cost of manufacturing a microchannel heat recovery unit (HRU). Cradle-to-gate life cycle assessment is simultaneously applied to evaluate environmental impact. Both sets of calculations extend from a single common set of data consisting of production and device geometry parameters. An analysis is demonstrated for different manufacturing alternatives for producing the HRU. Among the six manufacturing plans evaluated, the combination of laser cutting and diffusion brazing was found to have the lowest cost but the highest environmental impact, while the combination of photochemical machining and laser welding was found to have the lowest environmental impact with a comparatively high cost. Among the cost categories defined, consumables, capital tooling, and utilities were found to be the primary drivers for cost and environmental impact suggesting these as areas to concentrate in future process capability assessments and technology development.
Keywords: Bottom-up cost modeling; Environmental impact assessment; Decision making; Microchannel process technology; Graphical user interface

Alexander Reinefeld, Hinnerk Stüben, Florian Schintke, George Din, GuiGen: a toolset for creating customized interfaces for grid user communities, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 18, Issue 8, October 2002, Pages 1075-1084, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-739X(02)00086-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X02000869)
Abstract: GuiGen is a comprehensive set of tools for creating customized graphical user interfaces (GUIs). It draws from the concept of computing portals, which are here seen as interfaces to application-specific computing services for user communities. While GuiGen was originally designed for the use in computational grids, it can be used in client/server environments as well.

Compared to other GUI generators, GuiGen is more versatile and more portable. It can be employed in many different application domains and on different target platforms. With GuiGen, application experts (rather than computer scientists) are able to create their own individually tailored GUIs.
Keywords: Grid computing; Customized user interfaces; Grid user communities; Web portals; XML

Chirine Ghédira, Pierre Maret, Jocelyne Fayn, Paul Rubel, Adaptive user interface customization through browsing knowledge capitalization, International Journal of Medical Informatics, Volume 68, Issues 1–3, 18 December 2002, Pages 219-228, ISSN 1386-5056, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1386-5056(02)00078-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1386505602000783)
Abstract: Hypermedia data browsing is a mean for improving information access. However, the overload and the heterogeneity of medical information, as well as the multitude of possible navigational paths, turn the consultation of data into a difficult task. We present in this paper a solution for the development of adaptive user interfaces in a hypermedia data browsing environment. It is based on the capitalization of the users knowledge in the decision-making process, expressed in terms of navigational paths and of data presentation modes that are customized to the user's preferences and practice. This capitalization offers the user a way to automatically store and reuse the experience accumulated in browsing through patient records. We illustrate our approach with the implementation of HEMA, a clinical workstation prototype that we have specialized for the cardiology domain.
Keywords: Knowledge representation; Adaptivity; User/computer interface; eXtended markup language (xml) standards; Clinical workstation

Gabriele Martinelli, Jo Eidsvik, Ragnar Hauge, Dynamic decision making for graphical models applied to oil exploration, European Journal of Operational Research, Volume 230, Issue 3, 1 November 2013, Pages 688-702, ISSN 0377-2217, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ejor.2013.04.057.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0377221713003834)
Abstract: Abstract
We present a framework for sequential decision making in problems described by graphical models. The setting is given by dependent discrete random variables with associated costs or revenues. In our examples, the dependent variables are the potential outcomes (oil, gas or dry) when drilling a petroleum well. The goal is to develop an optimal selection strategy of wells that incorporates a chosen utility function within an approximated dynamic programming scheme. We propose and compare different approximations, from naive and myopic heuristics to more complex look-ahead schemes, and we discuss their computational properties. We apply these strategies to oil exploration over multiple prospects modeled by a directed acyclic graph, and to a reservoir drilling decision problem modeled by a Markov random field. The results show that the suggested strategies clearly improve the naive or myopic constructions used in petroleum industry today. This is useful for decision makers planning petroleum exploration policies.
Keywords: Bayesian Networks; Dynamic programming; Graphical model; Heuristics; Petroleum exploration

Lance Good and Benjamin B. Bederson, Zoomable user interfaces as a medium for slide show presentations, In Interactive Technologies, Morgan Kaufmann, San Francisco, 2003, Pages 105-119, The Craft of Information Visualization, ISBN 9781558609150, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155860915-0/50017-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781558609150500172)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper, the authors propose Zoomable User Interfaces as an alternative presentation medium to address several common presentation problems. Zoomable User Interfaces offer new techniques for managing multiple versions of a presentation, providing interactive presentation navigation, and distinguishing levels of detail. These zoomable presentations may also offer several cognitive benefits over their commercial slide show counterparts. The authors also introduce CounterPoint, a tool to simplify the creation and delivery of zoomable presentations, discuss the techniques they have used to make authoring and navigation manageable in the multidimensional space. Lastly, some of the visualization principles compiled by the authors for designing these types of presentations are presented.
Keywords: Presentations; Jazz; PowerPoint; spatial hypertext; Zoomable User Interfaces (ZUIs)

Bodo Peters, USER INTERFACES FOR DISTRIBUTED CONTROL SYSTEMS IN CHEMICAL PLANTS - REQUIREMENTS AND SOFTWARE SOLUTIONS, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 35, Issue 1, 2002, Pages 345-349, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20020721-6-ES-1901.01611.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015400321)
Abstract: Abstract
Distributed control systems, process logical controllers with Supervisory and Data Acquisition Systems are used to control the production process. They uses graphic user interfaces to visualise piping and instrumentation of the plant. They are supported by other systems like simulators, quality management systems and expert systems. These systems give additional information, which help supervising the production process and configuring the automation systems. But it is very difficult to integrate this information into the user interfaces of the automation systems. To overpower this restraints a new interface is needed. For building up this interface the implementation of a common functionbase is required. On one hand this must conform with the information duty of the user and on the other hand it must adduce all system tasks. Modern information techniques like object modelling are used to specify the postulated functionbase. Described in this way, a functionbase must be implemented in common computer systems.
Keywords: User Interface System; Human Machine Interface; Distributed Control Systems; Process Industry

P. de las Cuevas, A.M. Mora, J.J. Merelo, P.A. Castillo, P. García-Sánchez, A. Fernández-Ares, Corporate security solutions for BYOD: A novel user-centric and self-adaptive system, Computer Communications, Volume 68, 1 September 2015, Pages 83-95, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comcom.2015.07.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366415002571)
Abstract: Abstract
Companies and particularly their Chief Security Officers (CSOs) want to ensure that their Security Policies are followed, but this becomes a difficult goal to achieve at the point employees are able to use, or bring, their personal devices at work, in a practice that has been named “Bring Your Own Device” (BYOD). Since this BYOD philosophy is being adopted by many companies everyday, a number of solutions have appeared in the market so that it can be implemented in a secure way and comply with the Security Policies mentioned above. In this paper we propose a taxonomy to classify the features of BYOD systems. This taxonomy is used to present an overview of BYOD security solutions.

Also, we describe a novel, adaptive and free software system named MUSES (Multi-platform Usable Endpoint Security), able to securely manage BYOD environments. MUSES has been developed to cope with security issues with regard to enterprise security policies, but as a user-centric tool. It considers users’ behavior in order to adapt, improve, and even increase the defined set of security rules. To do this, the system applies Machine Learning and Computational Intelligence techniques, being also able to predict future security incidences produced by these users. The MUSES framework, which has released its first prototype in early 2015, is compared with the most relevant solutions offered by other companies to deal with the same issues, remarking the advantages that our system offers with respect to them.
Keywords: Corporate mobile security; User-centric systems; Self-adaptation; Multi-platform; BYOD

Robins Mathew, Somashekhar S. Hiremath, Trajectory Tracking and Control of Differential Drive Robot for Predefined Regular Geometrical Path, Procedia Technology, Volume 25, 2016, Pages 1273-1280, ISSN 2212-0173, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.protcy.2016.08.221.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2212017316305758)
Abstract: Abstract
Trajectories made by concatenating straight motion and in place turning primitive are one that can be easily followed by a differential drive robot. This paper presents trajectory tracking and control of differential drive robots along a predefined regular geometrical path made up of these primitives. A control algorithm was developed to control the robot along different trajectories. The algorithm takes user input from a user interface through which one can select the type of trajectory, dimensions of the trajectory and tracking velocity. Simulations were carried out to obtain the trajectory tracked by the robot using commercial available software MATLAB, Release 2010. Experiments were conducted for tracking regular trajectories such as Triangular, Rectangular and Square and these experimental results were found to be in good agreement with the simulation results.
Keywords: mobile robot; differential drive; motion primitive; graphical user interface; simulation; trajectory

Ramesh Hun, Anshul Tiwari, Nandan Kumar Sinha, Design and Simulation of Autopilot Control System for Stratospheric Airship, IFAC-PapersOnLine, Volume 49, Issue 1, 2016, Pages 712-717, ISSN 2405-8963, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ifacol.2016.03.140.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2405896316301409)
Abstract: Abstract
Design of an effective autopilot control system for Lighter-Than-Air (LTAs) vehicles, especially for stratospheric airship is crucial. A Stratospheric Airship Platform (SAP) is required to perform various autopilot control actions to satisfy the mission requirements. The main control actions are holding altitude, velocity, pitch and bank angles at desired operating conditions, which are also important for autonomous navigation and guidance purposes. Proportional-Integral-Derivative (PID) is one of the traditional control algorithms and plays key role in the achievement of given requirements. In this paper, a successive loop closure design method has been implemented and compared with respect to the autopilot control actions mentioned above. Successive loop of PI controller is used to emphasize more on steady state behavior rather than transient behavior of the autopilots. Graphical User Interface (GUI) is developed in SISO architecture tool in MATLAB® for the simulation of different autopilots. Simulation results show that designed autopilots are optimal in terms of transient and steady state specifications.
Keywords: Autopilot; Stratospheric Airship Platform; Successive Loop Closure; Graphical User Interface

Markus Sauer, Martin Hess, Klaus Schilling, Towards a Predictive Mixed Reality User Interface for Mobile Robot Teleoperation, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 42, Issue 22, 2009, Pages 91-96, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20091006-3-US-4006.00016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015340246)
Abstract: Abstract
Lack of situation awareness significantly decreases the performance in missions where a mobile robot is operated by a human from remote. The user interface is a key influencing element for situation awareness of the human operator. The information from the remote site is limited to what the robot's sensors can provide. In addition, this information is in general only delivered with a certain - maybe varying - communication delay. Predictive displays provide a promising approach to cope with these problems. In order to increase the situation awareness for the human operator in teleoperation scenarios predictive user interfaces can be used to achieve an artificial excoentric view.

This work presents an approach how a predictive mixed reality user interface can be realized with the help of motion control theory. The human operator commands a virtual robot projected into the camera image delivered to the human operator from the physical robot. Hereby a trajectory for the real physical robot is generated, which is executed by the physical robot after a certain time. Combined with mixed reality technologies an artificial, exocentric view of the mobile robot is achieved which leads to a short time predictive user interface for mobile-robot teleoperation.
Keywords: teleoperation; human-machine interface; mobile robots; telematics; control

Sandra Vergara-Perez, Marcelo Marucho, MPBEC, a Matlab Program for Biomolecular Electrostatic Calculations, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 198, January 2016, Pages 179-194, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2015.08.029.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465515003288)
Abstract: Abstract
One of the most used and efficient approaches to compute electrostatic properties of biological systems is to numerically solve the Poisson–Boltzmann (PB) equation. There are several software packages available that solve the PB equation for molecules in aqueous electrolyte solutions. Most of these software packages are useful for scientists with specialized training and expertise in computational biophysics. However, the user is usually required to manually take several important choices, depending on the complexity of the biological system, to successfully obtain the numerical solution of the PB equation. This may become an obstacle for researchers, experimentalists, even students with no special training in computational methodologies. Aiming to overcome this limitation, in this article we present MPBEC, a free, cross-platform, open-source software that provides non-experts in the field an easy and efficient way to perform biomolecular electrostatic calculations on single processor computers. MPBEC is a Matlab script based on the Adaptative Poisson–Boltzmann Solver, one of the most popular approaches used to solve the PB equation. MPBEC does not require any user programming, text editing or extensive statistical skills, and comes with detailed user-guide documentation. As a unique feature, MPBEC includes a useful graphical user interface (GUI) application which helps and guides users to configure and setup the optimal parameters and approximations to successfully perform the required biomolecular electrostatic calculations. The GUI also incorporates visualization tools to facilitate users pre- and post-analysis of structural and electrical properties of biomolecules.
Program summary
Program title: MPBEC

Catalogue identifier: AEXW_v1_0

Program summary URL:http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AEXW_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen’s University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: UTSA license

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 1505214

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 115585507

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: Matlab R2010a and higher versions.

Computer: Any computer at least with 2.5 GHz speed.

Operating system: Windows, Linux Fedora, and Mac OSX.

RAM: At least 2 GB of free memory.

Classification: 3, 10.

External routines: Java, Jmol, pdb2pqr, Propka.

Nature of problem: Numerical solution of the linearized PB equation.

Solution method: MPBEC uses sparse matrix calculations and iterative linear solvers (gmres, minres, and bicgstab) to solve the discretized (box method) linear PB equation. The stability and the convergence of these iterative solvers are improved by using the incomplete LU factorization which generates pre-conditioner matrices L (lower triangular matrix) and U (upper triangular matrix) at low computational cost.

Unusual features: MPBEC incorporates a GUI to provide non-experts in computational biophysics a user-friendly and intuitive tool to obtain biomolecular electrostatic calculations. The GUI provides helpful information about how to fill out the input data by moving the mouse pointer over the corresponding text or blank box. The GUI tests all the input data before running MPBEC to make sure that the solver is properly configured and facilitates the user with the pre- and post-analysis of the biomolecular calculations.

Additional comments: MPBEC checks available and required RAM memory before allocation to alert users when the available RAM memory is insufficient to perform the required calculations depending basically on the number of grid points and the size and number of atoms of the biomolecule(s). Therefore, MPBEC might be used with lower RAM memory and processor speed conditions than those mentioned above. The distribution file for this program is over 115 Mbytes and therefore is not delivered directly when download or Email is requested. Instead a html file giving details of how the program can be obtained is sent.

Running time: The software runs on single processor computers at low-to-moderate computational cost depending on the computer performance, the biomolecule size, the grid resolution, and required calculations.
Keywords: Poisson–Boltzmann equation; Biomolecular electrostatic calculations; Mean electrostatic potential; Matlab software; Graphical user interface

Gritta Wolf, Andreas Pfitzmann, Properties of protection goals and their integration into a user interface, Computer Networks, Volume 32, Issue 6, 30 May 2000, Pages 685-700, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1389-1286(00)00029-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128600000293)
Abstract: Based on an analysis of protection goals and their properties, we discuss how to design user interfaces for multilateral security. Firstly, we discuss fundamentals such as attackers, user perspectives, monotonicity, synergies, interference, and plausible combinations of protection goals. Secondly, we apply these properties to multilateral security and illustrate the consequences for configuration and negotiation. In particular, we sketch a user interface based on the insight gained and describe the results of a usability test, which has been performed.
Keywords: Multilateral security; Distributed communication; Protection goals; User interface; Usability test

Protogeros Nicolaos, Tzafilkou Katerina, Simple-talking database development: Let the end-user design a relational schema by using simple words, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 48, July 2015, Pages 273-289, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2015.02.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563215000813)
Abstract: Abstract
Since every-day users are not aware of database concepts, it is almost impossible for them to design even the basic structure of their self-developed applications with existing low level database-developing prototype applications. Most of the existing prototype applications demand at least some basic knowledge of SQL syntax and/or database logic. Hence, the end-users have either to be trained to use such prototype applications or the prototype applications have to be designed in such a way as to support untrained end-users. In this paper we present an approach based on ‘simple-talking’ to abstract database terminology and logic from the application development process. In this approach we assist untrained users to progressively design the whole database structure of their applications. The idea behind ‘simple-talking’ approach is to let the user choose a verb that describes the relationship between entities, and use this verb to form questions for the various database items. Our approach follows the relational paradigm since it is the dominant database type and the most complicated for the end-user to understand. Based on a prototype application we have conducted experiments to evaluate the effectiveness of ‘simple-talking’ approach and reveal its usefulness for end-user development.
Keywords: Relational database schema design; Database-driven application development; User abstraction; End-user development; End-user behavior

Florian Daniel, Stefano Soi, Stefano Tranquillini, Fabio Casati, Chang Heng, Li Yan, Distributed orchestration of user interfaces, Information Systems, Volume 37, Issue 6, September 2012, Pages 539-556, ISSN 0306-4379, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.is.2011.08.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0306437911001050)
Abstract: Workflow management systems focus on the coordination of people and work items, service composition approaches on the coordination of service invocations, and, recently, web mashups have started focusing on the integration and coordination of pieces of user interfaces (UIs), e.g., a Google map, inside simple web pages. While these three approaches have evolved in a rather isolated fashion – although they can be seen as evolution of the componentization and coordination idea from people to services to UIs – in this paper we describe a component-based development paradigm that conciliates the core strengths of these three approaches inside a single model and language. We call this new paradigm distributed UI orchestration, so as to reflect the mashup-like and process-based nature of our target applications. In order to aid developers in implementing UI orchestrations, we equip the described model and language with suitable design, deployment, and runtime instruments, covering the whole life cycle of distributed UI orchestrations.
Keywords: UI orchestration; Distributed UIs; UI orchestration patterns; BPEL4UI; Mashups; UI components; MarcoFlow

Filip Górski, Paweł Buń, Radosław Wichniarek, Przemysław Zawadzki, Adam Hamrol, Immersive City Bus Configuration System for Marketing and Sales Education, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 75, 2015, Pages 137-146, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2015.12.230.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050915036911)
Abstract: Abstract
The paper presents a Virtual Reality system developed as a result of cooperation of the University and an industrial company – a major city bus manufacturer. Main objective of work presented in the paper was to obtain a tool suitable for daily work with the clients on configuration of visual features of customized city buses. A city bus can have more than 100 visible features (options), which can be changed to obtain virtually infinite configuration possibilities. Visual representation of many of these features was largely unavailable before the presented work was commenced, resulting in certain problems in process of communication between salesmen and clients. The developed Virtual Reality system allows for visual representation of the bus functions during the configuration process, so it solves many problems in the client-company communication. It is also a knowledge base of all visual options which can be changed in scope of the configuration process – knowledge from many departments of the company was used to develop it, including knowledge unknown to representatives of sales and marketing. As a result, the immersive configurator can be effectively used to train salesmen and marketing representatives in terms of technical knowledge about customization capabilities of the offered product.

The paper presents shortly the overview and functions of the whole system. The system is a large, multi-modal solution built of many software and hardware components and is also integrated with other, existing systems. It allows to display high-quality images of a configured bus in real-time in stereoscopic 3D on a large screen, as well as using professional Head-Mounted Display or low-cost systems (e.g. Oculus Rift) for a virtual walk inside the configured bus, with full integration between all the visualization instances. Interaction with the system is divided into several groups of functions – configuration, navigation, animation and extra functions. Different devices are used for interaction: joystick, gyroscopic mouse and gesture recognition systems like Kinect can be used for navigation and animation, while most of the configuration and extra functions are launched using a graphical user interface, operated using a touch screen or a tablet.

Efficiency of the system in the visual configuration process was confirmed by representatives of the company. Capabilities of the system for education was tested using a sample of non-technical users from the sales and marketing department, using the system and then leaving their impressions in a survey study. It confirmed high effectiveness of the system in terms of presenting variability of the product features in a clear visual way. Immersive aspect of the system was also valued very high – usage of the stereoscopic 3D and Head-Mounted Device allowed to present the bus in a more realistic way than it was possible earlier. In the near future, the system will be fully developed and implemented to use in the sales process.
Keywords: Virtual Reality; variant product configuration; immersion; mass customization

J. Jean Rossario Raj, S.M.K. Rahman, Sneh Anand, 8051 microcontroller to FPGA and ADC interface design for high speed parallel processing systems – Application in ultrasound scanners, Engineering Science and Technology, an International Journal, Volume 19, Issue 3, September 2016, Pages 1416-1423, ISSN 2215-0986, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jestch.2016.04.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2215098616300532)
Abstract: Abstract
Microcontrollers perform the hardware control in many instruments. Instruments requiring huge data throughput and parallel computing use FPGA’s for data processing. The microcontroller in turn configures the application hardware devices such as FPGA’s, ADC’s and Ethernet chips etc. The interfacing of these devices uses address/data bus interface, serial interface or serial peripheral interface. The choice of the interface depends upon the input/output pins available with different devices, programming ease and proprietary interfaces supported by devices such as ADC’s. The novelty of this paper is to describe the programming logic used for various types of interface scenarios from microcontroller to different programmable devices. The study presented describes the methods and logic flowcharts for different interfaces. The implementation of the interface logics were in prototype hardware for ultrasound scanner. The internal devices were controlled from the graphical user interface in a laptop and the scan results are taken. It is seen that the optimum solution of the hardware design can be achieved by using a common serial interface towards all the devices.
Keywords: ADC; FPGA; Microcontroller; Serial peripheral interface; Ultrasound scanner

Janis Kapenieks, User-friendly e-learning Environment for Educational Action Research, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 26, 2013, Pages 121-142, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2013.12.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050913012842)
Abstract: Abstract
The study aims to bridge the newest information and communication technologies and action research which has come to be known as a modern inquiry driven learning method and a learning strategy. To this end, the paper presents research into the effectiveness of action research as an e-learning method, notably, identifies the basic principles of the e-learning environment, explores the importance of constructive supportive dialogue and discusses the creation of a model of interface for educational action research (EAR) in an e-learning environment.

The paper analyses experience from a Business course implemented in an e-learning environment at Riga Technical University over a two-year period.

Thus, the study: (1) discusses the advantages and disadvantages of EAR in an e-learning environment in the context of sustainable education and (2) evaluates the adequacy of the developed interface model to the user's cognitive needs. The proposed methodology suggests new possibilities for creative cooperation in an e-learning environment for sustainable ubiquitous education.

Partially article was presented at the 10th International JTEFS/BBCC Conference “Sustainable Development. Culture. Education” University of Eastern Finland, Savonlinna, Finland.
Keywords: Action research; e-learning; learning environment; ICT; user's interface

Rabia Jafri, Asmaa Mohammed Aljuhani, Syed Abid Ali, A Tangible Interface-based Application for Teaching Tactual Shape Perception and Spatial Awareness Sub-Concepts to Visually Impaired Children, Procedia Manufacturing, Volume 3, 2015, Pages 5562-5569, ISSN 2351-9789, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.promfg.2015.07.734.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2351978915007350)
Abstract: Abstract
A tangible user interface based software solution for teaching tactual shape perception and spatial awareness sub-concepts in small-scale space to visually impaired (VI) children is presented. The solution provides three-dimensional Computer-Aided Design (CAD) models of various objects conveying planar as well as three-dimensional representations of some basic shapes customized for different learning levels. The objects would be 3D printed and tagged on multiple sides. A computer vision-based system is utilized for recognizing and tracking these tagged objects on a transparent surface. Children can then feel these objects, place them on the surface and receive audio feedback regarding shape and spatial relationships in the context of various learning activities. The aim is to provide an engaging, low-cost, do-it-yourself solution which would alleviate the demands on the time, effort and financial resources of teachers and caregivers by allowing a VI child to review and reinforce the above-mentioned concepts autonomously at her own pace. A prototype version of this system is currently being implemented. The system would be extended in the future to allow instructors to create custom shapes and to teach other essential concepts such as object sequencing and texture recognition.
Keywords: Visually impaired; blind; tangible user interfaces; spatial awareness; shape perception; children; assistive technologies; education

Sungyong Ahn, Becoming a network beyond boundaries: Brain-Machine Interfaces (BMIs) as the actor-networks after the internet of things, Technology in Society, Available online 14 September 2016, ISSN 0160-791X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.techsoc.2016.08.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0160791X16300926)
Abstract: Abstract
For the last few decades, actor-network theory has been usually criticized for its focus on Machiavellian human actors controlling the overall networking between other actors or blamed for its dissipation of human agencies within the global status of a network. However, at the moment of its development, the freshness of actor-network theory was more relevant to its focus on the meaning of what the hyphen signifies; not so much just a simple connection between two independent variables, but an ontological event itself, from which certain entities juxtaposed together become involved by exchanging stable influences each other thus settled down as the actors participating in a network being associated as the summing up of these settled influences. The aim of this paper is to refresh this bygone freshness of ANT from the recent development of the Internet of Things (IoT); which vividly exemplifies how a network and its actors are generated from a manifold technologically augmented entities—such as smart appliances in a house, migratory animals with RFID tags, and ensembles of neurons signaling beyond one's brain through a bundle of microwires—each of which is physiologically or algorithmically adaptable to the environmental signals from other entities thus able to be settled down together into “new sensor/processor/actuator affiliations.” Brain-Machine Interface (BMI), developed by Nicolelis Lab at Duke University as a prototype of the future neuroprosthetics, shows a specific example of these networks of things; in which mutual adaptations of the technologically augmented entities—namely neurons and robot limbs—associate artificial sensory-motor circuits, programming its human/animal users' possible motor behaviors as well as their motor intentions.
Keywords: Brain-Machine Interface; Actor-network; Neuroprosthetics; Internet of things; Nicolelis

Adam Mechtley and Ryan Trowbridge, Chapter 1 - Maya Command Engine and User Interface, In Maya Python for Games and Film, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2012, Pages 3-27, ISBN 9780123785787, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-378578-7.00001-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123785787000016)
Abstract: This chapter introduces Maya and Python and compares and contrasts the four Maya programming interfaces. It also shows how to use the Command Line and the Script Editor to execute Python commands and how Python interacts with Maya commands. Maya's command architecture is also explained.

Keywords

application programming interface (API), Maya, Python, graphical user interface (GUI), marking menus, Maya Embedded Language (MEL), Dependency Graph, Directed Acyclic Graph, Command Line, Command Engine, Script Editor

Joris Fellinger, Konstantin Egorov, Victor Bykov, Felix Schauer, Preparation for commissioning of structural sensors of Wendelstein 7-X magnet system, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volumes 98–99, October 2015, Pages 1048-1052, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2015.06.041.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379615300533)
Abstract: Abstract
The modular stellarator Wendelstein 7-X (W7-X) in Greifswald, Germany is currently under commissioning. The magnet system (MS) consists of five symmetric modules, each one containing two flip-symmetric half modules of five non-planar and two planar superconducting coils operated in the cryostat system (CS) at 4 K. In order to validate the FE models that formed the basis of the design and the operational limits, the MS and CS were instrumented with more than 3000 sensors.

The paper gives an overview of the numerical tools developed to enable safe operation of the MS based on comparisons between measured sensor signals and their FE model predictions. Output extraction from the FE models was standardized for all potentially critical components and all sensor locations. A graphical user interface (GUI) was programmed to compare critical results of different simulations and models.

The GUI shows the design limit for each component. With local models, the safe design of each component was demonstrated against these design limits. The GUI also gives the degree of utilization of each component as the ratio between the calculated loads relative to the design limit. The highest degree of utilization over all components was used to define safe modes of operation and to set limits on allowed deviations of the measured signals relative to the projection before operation has to be interrupted.
Keywords: Wendelstein 7-X; Magnet system; Instrumentation; FE modeling; Model validation; Operational limits

Botond Szilágyi, Zoltán K. Nagy, Graphical processing unit (GPU) acceleration for numerical solution of population balance models using high resolution finite volume algorithm, Computers & Chemical Engineering, Volume 91, 4 August 2016, Pages 167-181, ISSN 0098-1354, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compchemeng.2016.03.023.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098135416300850)
Abstract: Abstract
Population balance modeling is a widely used approach to describe crystallization processes. It can be extended to multivariate cases where more internal coordinates i.e., particle properties such as multiple characteristic sizes, composition, purity, etc. can be used. The current study presents highly efficient fully discretized parallel implementation of the high resolution finite volume technique implemented on graphical processing units (GPUs) for the solution of single- and multi-dimensional population balance models (PBMs). The proposed GPU-PBM is implemented using CUDA C++ code for GPU calculations and provides a generic Matlab interface for easy application for scientific computing. The case studies demonstrate that the code running on the GPU is between 2–40 times faster than the compiled C++ code and 50–250 times faster than the standard MatLab implementation. This significant improvement in computational time enables the application of model-based control approaches in real time even in case of multidimensional population balance models.
Keywords: Population balance modelling; Finite volume algorithm; GPU; Crystallization modelling

Eugene Fiume, Active objects in the construction of graphical user interfaces, Computers & Graphics, Volume 13, Issue 3, 1989, Pages 321-327, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(89)90080-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0097849389900800)
Abstract: In recent years, several mechanisms to facilitate the construction of graphical user interfaces have been proposed. However, the most interesting classes of graphical user interfaces, namely those that involve concurrency, distribution, real-time control, or direct manipulation, remain difficult to construct. This is due to the absence of suitable programming language constructs for organising input-driven graphical systems. We suggest that one such construct lies in the use of active objects. We present a programming notation that unifies the notions of passive objects and classes (or data abstraction) with active objects. After reviewing the basic concepts of object-oriented programming, we describe our proposed notation and demonstrate that it is sufficient to express many interesting and nontrivial interactive dialogues, involving concurrency, distribution, and direct manipulation.

Anthony Savidis, Constantine Stephanidis, The HOMER UIMS for dual user interface development: Fusing visual and non-visual interactions, Interacting with Computers, Volume 11, Issue 2, 15 December 1998, Pages 173-209, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0953-5438(98)00025-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543898000253)
Abstract: Existing systems which enable accessibility to graphical user interfaces (GUIs) by blind people follow an `adaptation strategy'; each system adopts its own hard-coded policy for reproducing visual dialogues in a non-visual form, without knowledge about the application domain or the particular dialogue characteristics. It is argued that non-visual user interfaces should be more than automatically generated adaptations of visual dialogues. Tools are required to facilitate purposeful non-visual interface construction, allowing iterative design and implementation. Such tools should cater for the construction of `integrated' user interfaces, which are concurrently accessible by sighted and blind users. Thus, the concept of dual user interfaces is introduced, arguably as the most appropriate basis to address this important issue of concurrent accessibility, in order to prevent segregation of blind people in computer-based working environments. A user interface management system (UIMS) has been developed, called HOMER, which facilitates the development of dual user interfaces. HOMER supports the integration of visual and non-visual toolkits of interaction elements; a non-visual toolkit, called COMONKIT, has been also implemented for building non-visual user interfaces, and has been incorporated in HOMER.
Keywords: Dual interface; Non-visual interaction; Abstract interaction objects; User interface specification; User interface management systems

Christian Sifaqui, Structuring user interfaces with a meta-model of mental models, Computers & Graphics, Volume 23, Issue 3, 1 June 1999, Pages 323-330, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0097-8493(99)00041-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849399000412)
Abstract: This article presents a meta-model of user interfaces, based on the idea of mental models. This meta-model provides its utility in single-user environments as well as those for multiusers. A prototype is presented that implements the meta-model and two trial areas are chosen for discussing its operation. The most innovative aspect is unifying different use schemes in one interface, like temporary, spatial, networked or structured data organizations.
Keywords: User interfaces; Mental models

C.A. Miller, M.D. Hannen, The Rotorcraft Pilot's Associate: design and evaluation of an intelligent user interface for cockpit information management, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 12, Issue 8, December 1999, Pages 443-456, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0950-7051(99)00035-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950705199000350)
Abstract: The US Army's Rotorcraft Pilot's Associate (RPA) program is developing an advanced, intelligent “associate” system for flight demonstration in a future attack/scout helicopter. A significant RPA component is the intelligent user interface known as the Cockpit Information Manager (CIM). This paper describes the high-level architecture of the CIM, with emphasis on its pilot-perceptible behaviors: Crew Intent Estimation, Page Selection, Symbol Selection/Declutter, Intelligent Window Location, Automated Pan and Zoom, and Task Allocation. We then present the subjective results of recent full mission simulation studies using the CIM to illustrate pilots' attitudes toward these behaviors and their perceived effectiveness.
Keywords: Cockpit information management; Rotorcraft Pilot's Associate; Associate systems; Page selection; Symbol selection/declutter; Automated task allocation; Pan and zoom; Window location; Intent estimation; Intelligent User Interfaces

Gerhard Mayer, Christian Stephan, Helmut E. Meyer, Michael Kohl, Katrin Marcus, Martin Eisenacher, ProCon — PROteomics CONversion tool, Journal of Proteomics, Volume 129, 3 November 2015, Pages 56-62, ISSN 1874-3919, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jprot.2015.06.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1874391915300531)
Abstract: Abstract
With the growing amount of experimental data produced in proteomics experiments and the requirements/recommendations of journals in the proteomics field to publicly make available data described in papers, a need for long-term storage of proteomics data in public repositories arises. For such an upload one needs proteomics data in a standardized format. Therefore, it is desirable, that the proprietary vendor's software will integrate in the future such an export functionality using the standard formats for proteomics results defined by the HUPO-PSI group. Currently not all search engines and analysis tools support these standard formats. In the meantime there is a need to provide user-friendly free-to-use conversion tools that can convert the data into such standard formats in order to support wet-lab scientists in creating proteomics data files ready for upload into the public repositories. ProCon is such a conversion tool written in Java for conversion of proteomics identification data into standard formats mzIdentML and Pride XML. It allows the conversion of Sequest™/Comet .out files, of search results from the popular and often used ProteomeDiscoverer® 1.x (x = versions 1.1 to1.4) software and search results stored in the LIMS systems ProteinScape® 1.3 and 2.1 into mzIdentML and PRIDE XML.

This article is part of a Special Issue entitled: Computational Proteomics.
Keywords: Proteomics; Conversion tool; ProCon; mzIdentML; PRIDE; ProteomeXchange

Wolfgang Appelt, Elke Hinrichs, Gerd Woetzel, Effectiveness and efficiency: the need for tailorable user interfaces on the Web, Computer Networks and ISDN Systems, Volume 30, Issues 1–7, April 1998, Pages 499-508, ISSN 0169-7552, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0169-7552(98)00016-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169755298000166)
Abstract: This paper discusses the need for tailorable user interfaces, in particular for Web-based systems. We argue that user interfaces need to be configurable by the end users to match their skills and work requirements. We then describe what configurability has been induced by user feedback and how tailorability for various degrees of user skills was integrated and implemented in the BSCW shared Workspace System, a Web-based groupware tool.
Keywords: User interface; Tailorability; Groupware; Multilinguality

S. Busch, P. Bangert, S. Dombrovski, K. Schilling, UWE-3, in-orbit performance and lessons learned of a modular and flexible satellite bus for future pico-satellite formations, Acta Astronautica, Volume 117, December 2015, Pages 73-89, ISSN 0094-5765, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.actaastro.2015.08.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0094576515003185)
Abstract: Abstract
Formations of small satellites offer promising perspectives due to improved temporal and spatial coverage and resolution at reasonable costs. The UWE-program addresses in-orbit demonstrations of key technologies to enable formations of cooperating distributed spacecraft at pico-satellite level. In this context, the CubeSat UWE-3 addresses experiments for evaluation of real-time attitude determination and control.

UWE-3 introduces also a modular and flexible pico-satellite bus as a robust and extensible base for future missions. Technical objective was a very low power consumption of the COTS-based system, nevertheless providing a robust performance of this miniature satellite by advanced microprocessor redundancy and fault detection, identification and recovery software. This contribution addresses the UWE-3 design and mission results with emphasis on the operational experiences of the attitude determination and control system.
Keywords: Pico-satellite; In-orbit operations; Attitude determination and control; Autonomous groundstation operation

Tamer Kamel, Yevgen Biletskiy, Liuchen Chang, Fault diagnosis and on-line monitoring for grid-connected single-phase inverters, Electric Power Systems Research, Volume 126, September 2015, Pages 68-77, ISSN 0378-7796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.epsr.2015.05.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378779615001285)
Abstract: Abstract
The functionality of power electronic converter systems (PECS) is a cornerstone in various industrial applications. One of the key requirements to ensure reliable functions of PECS is the analysis of their behavior during fault conditions. Characterizing the behavior of PECS during the fault conditions can provide a standpoint for enhancing their control and protection algorithms. Moreover, effective solutions for on-line monitoring for PECS are significant in order to improve the system supervision and management. Consequently, this paper presents fault diagnosis and on-line monitoring schemes for grid-connected single-phase inverters in typical commercial PECS utilized for renewable energy distributed generation. The paper provides fault detection, classification and location of the open circuit (O-C) faults which do not trigger the standard protection systems in the single-phase inverters. The proposed fault diagnostic algorithm is implemented by adaptive neuro fuzzy inference system (ANFIS) algorithm and it is based solely on the inverter output current measurements. Therefore, the proposed algorithm requires much fewer inputs compared to the previous research works. Furthermore, the paper implements an on-line monitoring by using a communication interface board which is connected to graphical user interface (GUI) software through transmission control and internet protocols (TCP/IP). The GUI software integrates the on-line monitoring for the electrical signals of the single-phase inverter, as well as incorporates a real time database for these signals.
Keywords: Single-phase inverters; Fault diagnosis; On-line monitoring; Adaptive neuro fuzzy inference system; Communication interface board; Graphical user interface

Yalini Senathirajah, Suzanne Bakken, David Kaufman, The clinician in the Driver’s Seat: Part 1 – A drag/drop user-composable electronic health record platform, Journal of Biomedical Informatics, Volume 52, December 2014, Pages 165-176, ISSN 1532-0464, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jbi.2014.09.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1532046414001993)
Abstract: Abstract
Creating electronic health records that support the uniquely complex and varied needs of healthcare presents formidable challenges. To address some of these challenges we created a new model for healthcare information systems, embodied in MedWISE,2
Medical widget-based information sharing environment.
2 a widget-based highly configurable electronic health record (EHR) platform. Founded on the idea that providing clinician users with greater control of the EHR may result in greater fit to user needs and preferences, MedWISE allows drag/drop user configurations and the sharing of user-created elements such as custom laboratory result panels and user-created interface tabs.

After reviewing the current state of EHR configurability, we describe the philosophical, theoretical and practical rationales for our model, and the specific functionality of MedWISE. The alternative approach may have several advantages for human–computer interaction, efficiency, cognition, and fit of EHR tools to different contexts and tasks. We discuss potential issues raised by this approach.
Keywords: User-configurable EHR; Human–computer interaction; Electronic health record; Composable EHR; Electronic medical record; MedWISE

Sangjae Lee, Byung Gon Kim, Users' preferential factors in Web-based e-learning systems for ease of workplace learning in Korea, Learning and Individual Differences, Volume 39, April 2015, Pages 96-104, ISSN 1041-6080, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.lindif.2015.03.027.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1041608015000850)
Abstract: Abstract
While a number of studies investigated informal learning in Web-based environments and usability, the users' preferential factors affecting workplace learning in Web-based e-learning systems (WLS) have not been examined in detail in Korea. In this regard, the major purpose of this study is to investigate the users' preferential factors of ease of workplace learning in Korean WLS business organizations.

A total of 517 employees from five major conglomerate groups in Korea participated in a Web-based training course and answered the survey questionnaire. Four feedback and service related factors are important, which can be explained by high-context culture of Korea. With the understandings of conservative cultural effect of high-context in Korea, instructors can start to find the required special designs considering feedback and service-related factors as well as contents for successful Web-based learning systems.
Keywords: Web-based; Web-based e-learning systems (WLS); Ease of workplace learning; Users' preferential factors

Alexander Felfernig, Lothar Hotz, Claire Bagley and Juha Tiihonen, Chapter 15 - Configuration-Related Research Challenges, In Knowledge-Based Configuration, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 191-195, ISBN 9780124158177, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-415817-7.00015-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124158177000153)
Abstract: Abstract
In this part on advanced topics in configuration, we took a look at the issues of configuration knowledge engineering (testing and debugging and redundancy detection) and intelligent configurator user interfaces (personalized configuration and consumer decision-making). To stimulate further configuration-related research, we conclude this part with a discussion of issues for future research.
Keywords: Knowledge-based Configuration; Research Challenges

P. Reed, K. Holdaway, S. Isensee, E. Buie, J. Fox, J. Williams, A. Lund, User interface guidelines and standards: progress, issues, and prospects, Interacting with Computers, Volume 12, Issue 2, November 1999, Pages 119-142, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0953-5438(99)00008-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543899000089)
Abstract: This article reviews progress in the development of standards and guidelines for human–computer interaction, including those developed within international and US standards bodies. Guidance for incorporating software ergonomics standards and guidelines into software design and development processes is discussed. Several different techniques that have been defined for assessing the conformance of a product to guidelines are reviewed. In addition, the strategies employed by formally approved standards developed in ISO and ANSI for determining conformance are discussed. Finally, we discuss the prospects and challenges for software ergonomics standards and guidelines that must be addressed as the pace of technological change continues to accelerate.
Keywords: Software ergonomics standards; User interface design; User interface guidelines; Software usability standards; Software ergonomics in design and development; Usability conformance assessment; Tools for working with guidelines

Juan-José Rodrı́guez-Molina, Reinaldo Garcı́a-Martı́nez, Hydrotrack: a graphical software system for the simulation of pollutant discharges in water, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 13, Issue 2, April 1998, Pages 211-223, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1364-8152(98)00012-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815298000127)
Abstract: HydroTrack is a software system to simulate coastal and river hydrodynamics and pollutant transport. HydroTrack is composed of six subsystems: Geography Subsystem, Grid Subsystem, Models Subsystem, Graphical Subsystem, Data Management Subsystem and Help Subsystem. The Graphical User Interface (GUI) is written in Microsoft® Visual BasicTM to run under the WindowsTM operating system while the models are coded in Fortran 77. One of the main objectives of the design of HydroTrack was to have a friendly graphical interface to allow the user easy definition of modelling regions such as coasts, estuaries and rivers, lenient communication with the models, and powerful graphical capabilities. This article describes HydroTrack functionality, its main internal software information structures, together with an example simulation of pollutant discharges in the Maracaibo estuary in Venezuela.
Keywords: Graphical user interface, GUI; Pollutant transport modelling; Water current modelling; Particle tracking technique

Swamy D. Ponpandi, Akhilesh Tyagi, User satisfaction aware routing and energy modeling of polymorphic network on chip architecture, Computers & Electrical Engineering, Volume 40, Issue 8, November 2014, Pages 260-275, ISSN 0045-7906, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compeleceng.2014.08.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0045790614002250)
Abstract: Abstract
In mobile devices, multiple applications contend for limited resources in the underlying embedded system framework. Application resource requirements in mobile systems vary by computation needs, energy consumption and user interaction frequency. Quality of service (QoS) is the predominant metric of choice to manage resources among contending applications. Resource allocation policies to support static QoS for applications do not reflect the changing demands of the user in contemporary network on chip (NoC) based embedded architectures. User satisfaction with the user interactions and user interface design ought to be the primary design driver. Some recent research has integrated a saturating, non-linear user satisfaction function in the application thread scheduler. The application and operating system level user satisfaction research assumes that the throughput of inter-thread edges is limited only by the computational constraints of the nodes. With NoC, however, NoC resource allocation policies play an important role in determining the inter-thread communication flow’s throughput and the resulting application level user satisfaction. In this paper, we filter down the user satisfaction from an application layer attribute to a router level attribute to improve the resource and energy utilization for routing in order to leverage the user satisfaction at the application and system level. We demonstrate that this technique improves the user satisfaction of audio (MP3) application by 10% while maintaining the user satisfaction of video (MPEG-2) application. Experiments also show that a fixed energy source can be extended for an average of 18% of the time using the NoC user satisfaction based energy optimization proposed in this research.
Keywords: User satisfaction; Sigmoid function; Virtual channels; Energy model; Communication flow; Routing

D. Akoumianakis, C. Stephanidis, Supporting user-adapted interface design: The USE-IT system, Interacting with Computers, Volume 9, Issue 1, August 1997, Pages 73-104, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0953-5438(97)00007-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543897000076)
Abstract: This paper describes USE-IT, a knowledge-based tool for automating the design of interactions at the physical level, so as to ensure accessibility of the target user interface by different user groups, including people with disabilities. To achieve this, USE-IT elicits, manipulates and interprets representations of design knowledge in order to reason about, select and decide upon lexical adaptation constituents of a user interface. Adaptation constituents are attributes of abstract interaction object classes. USE-IT generates a collection of adaptation rules (i.e. a lexical specification scenario), based on design constraints generated from three basic knowledge sources: (a) the user model, (b) the task schema, and (c) a set of platform constraints (i.e. interaction objects, attributes, device availability, etc.). A data structure called the adaptability model tree has been designed to (i) facilitate the development of plausible semantics of adaptation at the lexical level of interaction, (ii) allow unification of design constraints, and (iii) enable selection of maximally preferred design options. The output of USE-IT can be subsequently interpreted by the run-time libraries of a high-level user interface development toolkit, which provides the required implementation support for realizing the user-adapted interface on a target platform.
Keywords: User interface adaptation; Design representation; Design assistance

Munira Jessa, Catherine M. Burns, Visual sensitivities of dynamic graphical displays, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 65, Issue 3, March 2007, Pages 206-222, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2006.10.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581906001650)
Abstract: Advanced display design, such as Ecological Interface Design (EID), makes extensive use of complex graphical objects. Research has shown that by following EID methodologies, supervisory operators have better performance with the EID displays than with non-EID displays. However, the effect of particular dynamic graphical objects seen in EID displays has never been studied. In this study, we examined how different visual features of graphical objects affect the performance of the objects. We used a modified dynamic just noticeable difference task to investigate the graphical objects that show changes most sensitively. We also investigated the sensitivities of graphical objects in determining target levels, directional changes, and proportions. A commercial EID design company generated the graphical objects examined. We had subjects perform four tasks with graphical objects that varied in their visual features but were still representative of objects currently being used in ecological design. It was found that for simple dynamic objects such as bars and polygon objects, a line changing in angle was the most noticeable emergent feature to show a departure from “normal” state. For complex graphical objects, those target-indicator displays that mimic a “bull's eye” when at the target value should be used for displays that show observers when a target value has been reached. Abrupt changes in shape should be used in trend meters to show when variables or processes have changed direction. Finally, “solid objects” that make use of vertical lines and shading should be used for comparison meters that compare two values and keep them in a particular ratio. The findings provide guidance for designers of dynamic advanced graphical displays by encouraging the consideration of visual aspects of graphical objects, as well as prescribing graphical objects that should be used in the types of tasks investigated.
Keywords: Ecological interface design; Graphical displays

Parvaneh Ebrahimi, Frans van den Berg, Stina D. Aunsbjerg, Anders Honoré, Connie Benfeldt, Henrik M. Jensen, Søren B. Engelsen, Quantitative determination of mold growth and inhibition by multispectral imaging, Food Control, Volume 55, September 2015, Pages 82-89, ISSN 0956-7135, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.foodcont.2015.01.050.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0956713515000948)
Abstract: Abstract
Quantifying mold growth is of great relevance and interest in microbiology. However, predictive modeling of filamentous fungal growth has been hampered by the lack of an appropriate and accurate method for quantification. An adequate, rapid and objective method will allow studying the effect of many different parameters and conditions on mold growth patterns and can thus provide valuable insight and knowledge. This study outlines a new approach for quantifying mold growth by providing an accurate tool for measuring different segments of mold colonies. The method is based on clustering multispectral images by k-means, an unsupervised and simple clustering algorithm. In order to demonstrate the efficiency of the new approach, three different sample sets were analyzed by the developed method, with the objective of quantifying mold growth and size of the colony segments of Penicillium mold. The results verify the ability of the proposed method to quantify mold growth and colony composition (relative size of the white and green segments) accurately. This provides a robust measure for interpreting inhibition activity against mold in different samples and makes a quantitative comparison possible. Among the virtues of the method are: 1) the ability to quantify very small differences in the size of colonies which cannot be easily discriminated by visual inspection, 2) the ability to quantify mold growth on transparent as well as on opaque media (e.g. milk), and 3) no prior assumptions for the shape and multiplicity of colonies. The accuracy and non-destructive characteristic of the method allow dynamic quantification of mold growth which can be very valuable in predictive microbiology and in studies related to biopreservation of food products.
Keywords: Quantification; Inhibition; Biopreservation; Mold growth; Mold colony size; Multispectral imaging

Petter Kyösti, Sean Reed, Sven Sjödin, A Decision Support Tool for Optimising Support Site Configuration of Functional Products, Procedia CIRP, Volume 22, 2014, Pages 175-180, ISSN 2212-8271, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procir.2014.06.155.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2212827114008105)
Abstract: Abstract
The customization of the support site configuration (including the number, locations and capabilities of sites where maintenance staff are based) is of critical importance to functional product providers, who must provide maintenance support services for products operated by their customers at different locations and ensure that contractual guarantees for functional availability are met whilst keeping support costs under control. Since contract fulfilment costs are performance based and long term, they are difficult to predict without modelling. This paper discusses a decision support tool designed for use by management and engineering personnel at Functional Product providers to analyse and optimize the performance of their support base configuration. It features a graphical user interface for configuration customization, simulation modelling to predict performance and outputs a wide range of analytics that can be used to compare and optimize configurations. The tool is demonstrated via application to an industrial test case.
Keywords: functional product; location evaluation; discrete event simulation; support system configuration; decision support system

Raul Fernandez, Rosalind Picard, Recognizing affect from speech prosody using hierarchical graphical models, Speech Communication, Volume 53, Issues 9–10, November–December 2011, Pages 1088-1103, ISSN 0167-6393, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.specom.2011.05.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167639311000689)
Abstract: In this work we develop and apply a class of hierarchical directed graphical models on the task of recognizing affective categories from prosody in both acted and natural speech. A strength of this new approach is the integration and summarization of information using both local (e.g., syllable level) and global prosodic phenomena (e.g., utterance level). In this framework speech is structurally modeled as a dynamically evolving hierarchical model in which levels of the hierarchy are determined by prosodic constituency and contain parameters that evolve according to dynamical systems. The acoustic parameters have been chosen to reflect four main components of speech thought to reflect paralinguistic and affect-specific information: intonation, loudness, rhythm and voice quality. The work is first evaluated on a database of acted emotions and compared to human perceptual recognition of five affective categories where it achieves rates within nearly 10% of human recognition accuracy despite only focusing on prosody. The model is then evaluated on two different corpora of fully spontaneous, affectively-colored, naturally occurring speech between people: Call Home English and BT Call Center. Here the ground truth labels are obtained from examining the agreement of 29 human coders labeling arousal and valence. The best discrimination performance on the natural spontaneous speech, using only the prosody features, obtains a 70% detection rate with 30% false alarms when detecting high arousal negative valence speech in call centers.
Keywords: Affective speech; Prosodic modeling; Graphical models; Paralinguistics

Wolfgang Birk, Miguel Castaño, Andreas Johansson, An application software for visualization and control configuration selection of interconnected processes, Control Engineering Practice, Volume 26, May 2014, Pages 188-200, ISSN 0967-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.conengprac.2013.12.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0967066113002517)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents a new application software for control configuration selection of interconnected industrial processes, called ProMoVis. Moreover, ProMoVis is able to visualize process models and process layout at the physical level together with the control system dynamics. The software consists of a builder part where the visual representation of the interconnected process is created and an analyzer part where the process is analyzed using different control configuration selection tools.

The conceptual idea of the software is presented and the subsequent design and implementation of ProMoVis are discussed. The implemented analysis methods are briefly described including their usage and implementation aspects. The use of ProMoVis is demonstrated by an application study on the stock preparation process at SCA Obbola AB, Sweden. The results of this study are compared with the currently used control strategy.

The study indicates that ProMoVis introduces a systematic and comprehensive way to perform control configuration selection. ProMoVis has been released under the Apache Open Source license.
Keywords: Visualization; Interaction measures; Control configuration; Process control; Interconnected systems; Pulp and paper industry

Mark Mine, Arun Yoganandan, Dane Coffey, Principles, interactions and devices for real-world immersive modeling, Computers & Graphics, Volume 48, May 2015, Pages 84-98, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2015.02.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849315000126)
Abstract: Abstract
Building a real-world immersive 3D modeling application is hard. In spite of the many supposed advantages of working in the virtual world, users quickly tire of waving their arms about and the resulting models remain simplistic at best. The dream of creation at the speed of thought has largely remained unfulfilled due to numerous factors such as the lack of suitable menu and system controls, inability to perform precise manipulations, lack of numeric input, challenges with ergonomics, and difficulties with maintaining user focus and preserving immersion. The focus of our research is on the building of virtual world applications that can go beyond the demo and can be used to do real-world work. The goal is to develop interaction techniques that support the richness and complexity required to build complex 3D models, yet minimize expenditure of user energy and maximize user comfort. We present an approach that combines the natural and intuitive power of virtual reality (VR) interaction, the precision and control of 2D touch surfaces, and the richness of a commercial modeling package. We discuss the benefits of collocating 2D touch with 3D bimanual spatial input, the challenges in designing a custom controller targeted at achieving the same, and the new avenues that this collocation creates. We describe our Touch Where You Can technique that adapts the user interface to support a wide array of hand sizes, minimizing the ergonomic impact on the user. Finally, we demonstrate new interface designs that are better suited for the thumbs-only touch interactions favored by our system.
Keywords: Virtual reality; 3D user interaction; Graphical user interfaces; Controller design; Immersive 3D modeling

Jaka Sodnik, Grega Jakus, Sašo Tomažič, Multiple spatial sounds in hierarchical menu navigation for visually impaired computer users, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 69, Issues 1–2, January–February 2011, Pages 100-112, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2010.10.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581910001266)
Abstract: This paper describes a user study on the benefits and drawbacks of simultaneous spatial sounds in auditory interfaces for visually impaired and blind computer users. Two different auditory interfaces in spatial and non-spatial condition were proposed to represent the hierarchical menu structure of a simple word processing application. In the horizontal interface, the sound sources or the menu items were located in the horizontal plane on a virtual ring surrounding the user’s head, while the sound sources in the vertical interface were aligned one above the other in front of the user. In the vertical interface, the central pitch of the sound sources at different elevations was changed in order to improve the otherwise relatively low localization performance in the vertical dimension. The interaction with the interfaces was based on a standard computer keyboard for input and a pair of studio headphones for output. Twelve blind or visually impaired test subjects were asked to perform ten different word processing tasks within four experiment conditions. Task completion times, navigation performance, overall satisfaction and cognitive workload were evaluated. The initial hypothesis, i.e. that the spatial auditory interfaces with multiple simultaneous sounds should prove to be faster and more efficient than non-spatial ones, was not confirmed. On the contrary—spatial auditory interfaces proved to be significantly slower due to the high cognitive workload and temporal demand. The majority of users did in fact finish tasks with less navigation and key pressing; however, they required much more time. They reported the spatial auditory interfaces to be hard to use for a longer period of time due to the high temporal and mental demand, especially with regards to the comprehension of multiple simultaneous sounds. The comparison between the horizontal and vertical interface showed no significant differences between the two. It is important to point out that all participants were novice users of the system; therefore it is possible that the overall performance could change with a more extensive use of the interfaces and an increased number of trials or experiments sets. Our interviews with visually impaired and blind computer users showed that they are used to sharing their auditory channel in order to perform multiple simultaneous tasks such as listening to the radio, talking to somebody, using the computer, etc. As the perception of multiple simultaneous sounds requires the entire capacity of the auditory channel and total concentration of the listener, it does therefore not enable such multitasking.
Keywords: Auditory interface; Simultaneous spatial sounds; Visually impaired user; Human–computer interaction; Cognitive workload

Björn Höfling, Chapter 18 - encoway: From ERP-Based to Sales-Oriented Configuration, In Knowledge-Based Configuration, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 219-227, ISBN 9780124158177, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-415817-7.00018-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124158177000189)
Abstract: Abstract
ERP-based product configuration is often used for supporting business execution processes in companies. Reusing the underlying product configuration models in sales-oriented scenarios leads to additional challenges. In this chapter we describe a sales application called sellAIR, which is the outcome of joint project work of encoway and the German company Boge. With this application, Boge has succeeded in closing the gap between ERP-based product configuration and sales-oriented configuration.
Keywords: Knowledge-based Configuration; ERP; Sales-Oriented Configuration; Sales Process; ERP Business Excecution; SAP; Boge; encoway

Roberto Tonini, Laura Sandri, Mary Anne Thompson, PyBetVH: A Python tool for probabilistic volcanic hazard assessment and for generation of Bayesian hazard curves and maps, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 79, June 2015, Pages 38-46, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cageo.2015.02.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098300415000515)
Abstract: Abstract
PyBetVH is a completely new, free, open-source and cross-platform software implementation of the Bayesian Event Tree for Volcanic Hazard (BET_VH), a tool for estimating the probability of any magmatic hazardous phenomenon occurring in a selected time frame, accounting for all the uncertainties. New capabilities of this implementation include the ability to calculate hazard curves which describe the distribution of the exceedance probability as a function of intensity (e.g., tephra load) on a grid of points covering the target area. The computed hazard curves are (i) absolute (accounting for the probability of eruption in a given time frame, and for all the possible vent locations and eruptive sizes) and (ii) Bayesian (computed at different percentiles, in order to quantify the epistemic uncertainty). Such curves allow representation of the full information contained in the probabilistic volcanic hazard assessment (PVHA) and are well suited to become a main input to quantitative risk analyses.

PyBetVH allows for interactive visualization of both the computed hazard curves, and the corresponding Bayesian hazard/probability maps. PyBetVH is designed to minimize the efforts of end users, making PVHA results accessible to people who may be less experienced in probabilistic methodologies, e.g. decision makers. The broad compatibility of Python language has also allowed PyBetVH to be installed on the VHub cyber-infrastructure, where it can be run online or downloaded at no cost. PyBetVH can be used to assess any type of magmatic hazard from any volcano. Here we illustrate how to perform a PVHA through PyBetVH using the example of analyzing tephra fallout from the Okataina Volcanic Centre (OVC), New Zealand, and highlight the range of outputs that the tool can generate.
Keywords: Probabilistic volcanic hazard assessment; Interactive visualization; Bayesian Event Tree; Hazard curves; Graphical User Interface

James Fletcher, Weeratunge Malalasekera, Development of a user-friendly, low-cost home energy monitoring and recording system, Energy, Volume 111, 15 September 2016, Pages 32-46, ISSN 0360-5442, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.energy.2016.05.027.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0360544216305795)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper reports research undertaken to develop a user-friendly home energy monitoring system which is capable of collecting, processing and displaying detailed usage data. The system allows users to monitor power usage and switch their electronic appliances remotely, using any web enabled device, including computers, phones and tablets. The system aims to raise awareness of consumer energy use by gathering data about usage habits, and displaying this information to support consumers when selecting energy tariffs or new appliances.

To achieve these aims, bespoke electrical hardware, or ‘nodes’, have been designed and built to monitor power usage, switch devices on and off, and communicate via a Wi-Fi connection, with bespoke software, the ‘server’. The server hosts a webpage which allows users to see a real-time overview of how power is being used in the home as well as allowing scheduled tasks and triggered tasks (which respond to events) to be programmed. The system takes advantage of well standardised networking specifications, such as Wi-Fi and TCP, allowing access from within the home, or remotely through the internet. The server runs under Debian Linux on a Raspberry Pi computer and is written in Python, HTML and JavaScript. The server includes advanced functionality, such as device recognition which allows users to individually monitor several devices that share a single node. The openPicus Flyport is used to provide Wi-Fi connectivity and programmable logic control to nodes. The Flyport is programmed with code compiled from C.
Keywords: Smart meters; Energy monitoring; Energy; Domestic energy

Lothar Hotz and Katharina Wolter, Chapter 10 - Smarthome Configuration Model, In Knowledge-Based Configuration, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 121-135, ISBN 9780124158177, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-415817-7.00010-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124158177000104)
Abstract: Abstract
In this chapter, we present a configuration model taken from a building automation domain. It provides complex aspects of configuration models such as separation of features of a system from realizing system components and domain-dependent workflows for the configuration process.
Keywords: Knowledge-based Configuration; Smarthomes; Building Automation systems; Feature Models; System Models; Configuration Workflow; Constraints

Runliang Dou, Yubo Zhang, Guofang Nan, Customer-oriented product collaborative customization based on design iteration for tablet personal computer configuration, Computers & Industrial Engineering, Volume 99, September 2016, Pages 474-486, ISSN 0360-8352, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cie.2015.11.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0360835215004532)
Abstract: Abstract
Customers limited knowledge and technique restrains manufacturer from making them directly participate in practical product design to quickly respond to their complex and personalized demand. Based on design iteration, an approach to customer-oriented product collaborative customization is proposed for manufacturer to improve the design process. This approach uses the existing product and continuously increasing product design scheme as valuable product configuration knowledge. Meanwhile, the concept of product family is extended to design family, where the product individual and design scheme are respectively distributed into different knowledge bases. With the benefit of iterative genetic algorithm (IGA), design iteration is applied to make the existing product and design process bi-directionally evolve in the customized process to seek the optimal design, accordingly customers’ operational fatigue will be lessened and their customized efficiency will be improved. Finally, the customized design of tablet PC is taken for instance to testify the maneuverability and effectiveness of the proposed approach. The experimental results demonstrate that the approach could effectively identify customers’ preference and obviously improve their customization efficiency, with lessening their operational fatigue to the large extent.
Keywords: Design iteration; Collaborative customization; Interactive genetic algorithm; Customer preference

Daniel J. O'Shea, Eric Trautmann, Chandramouli Chandrasekaran, Sergey Stavisky, Jonathan C. Kao, Maneesh Sahani, Stephen Ryu, Karl Deisseroth, Krishna V. Shenoy, The need for calcium imaging in nonhuman primates: New motor neuroscience and brain-machine interfaces, Experimental Neurology, Available online 7 August 2016, ISSN 0014-4886, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.expneurol.2016.08.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0014488616302333)
Abstract: Abstract
A central goal of neuroscience is to understand how populations of neurons coordinate and cooperate in order to give rise to perception, cognition, and action. Nonhuman primates (NHPs) are an attractive model with which to understand these mechanisms in humans, primarily due to the strong homology of their brains and the cognitively sophisticated behaviors they can be trained to perform. Using electrode recordings, the activity of one to a few hundred individual neurons may be measured electrically, which has enabled many scientific findings and the development of brain-machine interfaces. Despite these successes, electrophysiology samples sparsely from neural populations and provides little information about the genetic identity and spatial micro-organization of recorded neurons. These limitations have spurred the development of all-optical methods for neural circuit interrogation. Fluorescent calcium signals serve as a reporter of neuronal responses, and when combined with post-mortem optical clearing techniques such as CLARITY, provide dense recordings of neuronal populations, spatially organized and annotated with genetic and anatomical information. Here, we advocate that this methodology, which has been of tremendous utility in smaller animal models, can and should be developed for use with NHPs. We review here several of the key opportunities and challenges for calcium-based optical imaging in NHPs. We focus on motor neuroscience and brain-machine interface design as representative domains of opportunity within the larger field of NHP neuroscience.
Keywords: Calcium imaging; Nonhuman primates; Macaque; Motor system; Motor cortex; Neural circuits; Population dynamics; Neural computation; Brain-machine interfaces; Prosthetics

Jules White, José A. Galindo, Tripti Saxena, Brian Dougherty, David Benavides, Douglas C. Schmidt, Evolving feature model configurations in software product lines, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 87, January 2014, Pages 119-136, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jss.2013.10.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0164121213002434)
Abstract: Abstract
The increasing complexity and cost of software-intensive systems has led developers to seek ways of reusing software components across development projects. One approach to increasing software reusability is to develop a software product-line (SPL), which is a software architecture that can be reconfigured and reused across projects. Rather than developing software from scratch for a new project, a new configuration of the SPL is produced. It is hard, however, to find a configuration of an SPL that meets an arbitrary requirement set and does not violate any configuration constraints in the SPL.

Existing research has focused on techniques that produce a configuration of an SPL in a single step. Budgetary constraints or other restrictions, however, may require multi-step configuration processes. For example, an aircraft manufacturer may want to produce a series of configurations of a plane over a span of years without exceeding a yearly budget to add features.

This paper provides three contributions to the study of multi-step configuration for SPLs. First, we present a formal model of multi-step SPL configuration and map this model to constraint satisfaction problems (CSPs). Second, we show how solutions to these SPL configuration problems can be automatically derived with a constraint solver by mapping them to CSPs. Moreover, we show how feature model changes can be mapped to our approach in a multi-step scenario by using feature model drift. Third, we present empirical results demonstrating that our CSP-based reasoning technique can scale to SPL models with hundreds of features and multiple configuration steps.
Keywords: Software product line; Feature model; Multi-step configuration

Gábor Erdős, Csaba Kardos, Zsolt Kemény, András Kovács, József Váncza, Workstation Configuration and Process Planning for RLW Operations, Procedia CIRP, Volume 17, 2014, Pages 783-788, ISSN 2212-8271, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procir.2014.01.123.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2212827114003953)
Abstract: Abstract
The application of Remote Laser Welding (RLW) has become an attractive assembly technology in various branches of industry, as it offers higher efficiency at lower costs compared to traditional Resistance Spot Welding (RSW) when high volumes of sheet metal assemblies are to be produced. However, the introduction of RLW technology raises multiple new issues in designing the configuration, the layout, and the behavior of the assembly system. Since configuring an RLW workstation and planning the welding process are closely interrelated problems, a hierarchical decision process must be applied where configuration and planning go hand in hand. The paper presents a hierarchical workflow for workstation configuration and process planning for RLW operations, and proposes methods for solving the decision problems related to each step of this workflow. A software toolbox is introduced that has been developed to facilitate a semi-automatic, mixed-initiative workstation design and to guide the expert user throughout the configuration, planning, programming, evaluation, and simulation of the RLW workstation. A case study from the automotive industry is presented, where the software tools developed are applied to configuring and planning the behavior of an RLW workstation that replaces RSW technology in assembling a car door.
Keywords: remote laser welding; workstation configuration; task sequencing

Marko Palviainen, Jarkko Kuusijärvi, Eila Ovaska, A semi-automatic end-user programming approach for smart space application development, Pervasive and Mobile Computing, Volume 12, June 2014, Pages 17-36, ISSN 1574-1192, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pmcj.2013.04.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S157411921300062X)
Abstract: Abstract
This article describes a semi-automatic end-user programming approach that: (i) assists in the creation of easy-to-apply Semantic End-User Application Programming Interfaces(S-APIs) for the APIs of legacy software components; and (ii) enables the usage of S-APIs in command-oriented and goal-oriented end-user application programming. Furthermore, a reference implementation is presented for the approach that provides visual programming tools and an agent-based execution environment for smart space applications. The use of the approach is exemplified and tested in a case study in which S-APIs are created for a home automation system and for a personal assistant application, and then utilized in end-user programming performed in desktop and mobile environments.
Keywords: Command-oriented end-user programming; Goal-oriented end-user programming; Smart Modeler; Smart space application; Ontology

William Speier, Aniket Deshpande, Nader Pouratian, A method for optimizing EEG electrode number and configuration for signal acquisition in P300 speller systems, Clinical Neurophysiology, Volume 126, Issue 6, June 2015, Pages 1171-1177, ISSN 1388-2457, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.clinph.2014.09.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1388245714005069)
Abstract: AbstractObjective
The P300 speller is intended to restore communication to patients with advanced neuromuscular disorders, but clinical implementation may be hindered by several factors, including system setup, burden, and cost. Our goal was to develop a method that can overcome these barriers by optimizing EEG electrode number and placement for P300 studies within a population of subjects.
Methods
A Gibbs sampling method was developed to find the optimal electrode configuration given a set of P300 speller data. The method was tested on a set of data from 15 healthy subjects using an established 32-electrode pattern. Resulting electrode configurations were then validated using online prospective testing with a naïve Bayes classifier in 15 additional healthy subjects.
Results
The method yielded a set of four posterior electrodes (PO8, PO7, POZ, CPZ), which produced results that are likely sufficient to be clinically effective. In online prospective validation testing, no significant difference was found between subjects’ performances using the reduced and the full electrode configurations.
Conclusions
The proposed method can find reduced sets of electrodes within a subject population without reducing performance.
Significance
Reducing the number of channels may reduce costs, set-up time, signal bandwidth, and computation requirements for practical online P300 speller implementation.
Keywords: Brain–computer interface; Event-related potential; P300; Speller; Electrode placement; Natural language processing

Andrei V. Smirnov, Hanzhou Zhang, B. Sowers, A. Burt, I. Celik, Fuel-cell simulator interface, Journal of Power Sources, Volume 138, Issues 1–2, 15 November 2004, Pages 187-193, ISSN 0378-7753, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jpowsour.2004.05.057.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378775304006639)
Abstract: A 3D drawing methodology based on voxel-graphics was applied to the design of multi-component engineering systems, such as fuel-cells. Using this methodology and Java-technology a graphics user interface (GUI) for a fuel-cell simulator program was developed and used in simulations of large fuel-cell stacks. The GUI is capable to setup, run and monitor simulations remotely from a web-browser. The geometric design module was implemented using 3D voxel sculpting methodology and data visualization, which is prototyped after 2D pixel graphics systems. The developed approach was primarily aimed at the design of complex multi-component engineering systems. However, the flexibility of voxel-based geometry representation enables one to use this technique for both 3D geometric design and visualization of unstructured volume data. Examples of both applications are presented, with the focus on fuel-cell stack simulations.
Keywords: Fuel-cells; Geometric design; Graphical user interface; Voxel-based sculpturing

Andreas Falkner and Herwig Schreiner, Chapter 16 - SIEMENS: Configuration and Reconfiguration in Industry, In Knowledge-Based Configuration, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 199-210, ISBN 9780124158177, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-415817-7.00016-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124158177000165)
Abstract: Abstract
Whereas the configuration of consumer products such as PCs, cars, insurances, and such is well understood and supported by commercial tools, large-scale industrial systems still raise considerable challenges concerning modeling, solving, and performance. After a short explanation of the importance of this topic to Siemens, this chapter presents the domain of railway interlocking systems as an example of such complex industrial systems and discusses detailed requirements for their configuration. It then reports on techniques used for solving those requirements at Siemens as well as on results of their application.
Keywords: Knowledge-based Configuration; Reconfiguration; Knowledge Base; Knowledge Evolution; Large-scale Systems; Industrial Systems; Complex Systems; Siemens; Railway Interlocking Systems; Variability

Chung-Kuen Lee, Junhwan Kim, Kwang Soo Kim, Development and application of a weather data service client for preparation of weather input files to a crop model, Computers and Electronics in Agriculture, Volume 114, June 2015, Pages 237-246, ISSN 0168-1699, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compag.2015.03.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168169915001076)
Abstract: Abstract
Crop yield prediction has been made using a crop growth model that relies on four categories of input data including soil, crop, management, and weather. Most crop models are single column models, which require individual weather inputs for each site of interest. The objectives of this study were to develop a weather data service client that prepares weather input files for a crop growth model and to examine its application to yield prediction at a national scale. The weather data service client downloads daily weather data from the web-based weather data service portal operated by the Korea Meteorological Administration (KMA). The client also prepares weather input files for the ORYZA 2000 model at minimum effort. In total, 4950 input files were prepared to predict rice yield in 2011 and 2012 using the weather data service client. To prepare nearly 5000 weather input files, it would take more than a month for a skilled person to download weather data from the KMA database and to reorganize those data to the input data format for the ORYZA 2000 model manually. Using the weather data service client, several hours were enough to prepare all the input files without error associated with manual preparation as well as with minimum effort and labor.
Keywords: Weather database; Data client; Weather input data; UML

Olga C. Santos, Jesus G. Boticario, Diana Pérez-Marín, Extending web-based educational systems with personalised support through User Centred Designed recommendations along the e-learning life cycle, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 88, 1 August 2014, Pages 92-109, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2013.12.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642313003407)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper we address an open key issue during the development of web-based educational systems. In particular, we provide an educational-oriented approach for building personalised e-learning environments that focuses on putting the learners' needs in the centre of the development process. Our approach proposes user centred design methodologies involving interdisciplinary teams of software developers and domain experts. It is illustrated in an adaptive e-learning system, where a MOOC (Massive Open Online Course) was taken by nearly 400 learners. In particular, we report where user centred design methods can be applied along the e-learning life cycle to designing and evaluating personalisation support through recommendations in learning management systems.
Keywords: e-learning life cycle; Personalisation; Adaptive educational systems; Educational recommender systems; User centred design

Barbara Kordy, Marc Pouly, Patrick Schweitzer, Probabilistic reasoning with graphical security models, Information Sciences, Volume 342, 10 May 2016, Pages 111-131, ISSN 0020-0255, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ins.2016.01.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0020025516000128)
Abstract: Abstract
This work provides a computational framework for meaningful probabilistic evaluation of attack–defense scenarios involving dependent actions. We combine the graphical security modeling technique of attack–defense trees with probabilistic information expressed in terms of Bayesian networks. In order to improve the efficiency of probability computations on attack–defense trees, we make use of inference algorithms and encoding techniques from constraint reasoning. The proposed approach is illustrated on a running example and the computations are automated with the help of suitable software tools. We show that the computational routines developed in this paper form a conservative generalization of the attack–defense tree formalism defined previously. We discuss the algebraic theory underlying our framework and point out several generalizations which are possible thanks to the use of semiring theory. Finally, our results apply directly to the analysis of the industrially recognized model of attack trees.
Keywords: Attack–defense trees; Attack trees; Bayesian networks; Dependent actions; Probabilistic analysis of security; Semiring theory

Paul C. Tang, Vimla L. Patel, Major issues in user interface design for health professional workstations: summary and recommendations, International Journal of Bio-Medical Computing, Volume 34, Issues 1–4, January 1994, Pages 139-148, ISSN 0020-7101, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0020-7101(94)90017-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0020710194900175)
Abstract: Lack of good user interfaces has been a major impediment to the acceptance and routine use of health-care professional workstations. Health-care providers, and the environment in which they practice, place strenuous demands on the interface. User interfaces must be designed with greater consideration of the requirements, cognitive capabilities, and limitations of the end-user. The challenge of gaining better acceptance and achieving widespread use of clinical information systems will be accentuated as the variety and complexity of multi-media presentation increases. Better understanding of issues related to cognitive processes involved in human-computer interactions is needed in order to design interfaces that are more intuitive and more acceptable to health-care professionals. Critical areas which deserve immediate attention include: improvement of pen-based technology, development of knowledge-based techniques that support contextual presentation, and development of new strategies and metrics to evaluate user interfaces. Only with deliberate attention to the user interface, can we improve the ways in which information technology contributes to the efficiency and effectiveness of health-care providers.
Keywords: User-computer interface; Medical records systems, computerized; Hospital information systems; Information systems; Physician workstations; Cognitive science

Cesare Rocchi, Section 5 - Customizing the User Interface, In Visualizing the Web, Focal Press, Boston, 2011, Pages 248-282, Data Visualization with Flash Builder, ISBN 9780240815039, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-240-81503-9.00012-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780240815039000124)

Matthias Meier, Mark Breddemann, Olaf Spinczyk, Interfacing the hardware API with a feature-based operating system family, Journal of Systems Architecture, Volume 61, Issue 10, November 2015, Pages 531-538, ISSN 1383-7621, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.sysarc.2015.07.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1383762115000806)
Abstract: Abstract
Multiprocessor systems on a chip (MPSoCs) are a popular class of course-grained parallel computer architectures, which are very useful, because they support re-use of legacy software components and application-specific tailoring of hardware structures at the same time. Furthermore, model-driven design frameworks for MPSoCs such as Xilinx’ EDK or our own LavA-framework facilitate very fast system development. However, in this paper we argue that these design frameworks are not ideal from the development process perspective. Instead, we propose a software-centric approach that is based on the hardware API concept. The API is a representation of hardware components on the software level, which is generated from a hardware meta-model. It allows us to automatically derive a hardware structure based on access patterns in software, revealed by a static code analysis. This trick reduces the number of hardware details the developer needs to deal with and avoids configuration inconsistencies between the hardware and software levels by design. Furthermore, we present how the development process can benefit from the hardware API, when the API is interfaced with a configurable operating system.
Keywords: HW/SW co-design; Software-centric configuration; Operating system; MPSoC; Hardware representation; FPGA

Jasna Kuljis, User interfaces and discrete event simulation models, Simulation Practice and Theory, Volume 1, Issue 5, 16 May 1994, Pages 207-221, ISSN 0928-4869, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0928-4869(94)90011-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0928486994900116)
Abstract: This paper examines features of user interfaces present in current discrete event simulation systems. A particular emphasis is placed on their data input capabilities and the presentation of simulation statistics. There has been a lot of work on developing visual simulation and animation. Little effort appears to have been invested in data input facilities. There has been considerable effort invested in the presentation of simulation results. This paper shows that this distribution of effort into the various interfaces lacks proper insight into the particular needs of simulation systems. A list of features to improve data input and model specification for existing simulation systems is derived. A list of issues that need to be tackled to make the presentation of simulation statistics more appropriate for the specifics of the simulation is given. The paper concludes with general comments concerning future research issues to be addressed.
Keywords: Simulation; User interface; Simulation results; HCI (Human-computer interaction); MMI (Man-machine interface)

Thomas H. Scheuermann, Chad A. Brautigam, High-precision, automated integration of multiple isothermal titration calorimetric thermograms: New features of NITPIC, Methods, Volume 76, 1 April 2015, Pages 87-98, ISSN 1046-2023, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ymeth.2014.11.024.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1046202314004125)
Abstract: Abstract
Isothermal titration calorimetry (ITC) has become a standard and widely available tool to measure the thermodynamic parameters of macromolecular associations. Modern applications of the method, including global analysis and drug screening, require the acquisition of multiple sets of data; sometimes these data sets number in the hundreds. Therefore, there is a need for quick, precise, and automated means to process the data, particularly at the first step of data analysis, which is commonly the integration of the raw data to yield an interpretable isotherm. Herein, we describe enhancements to an algorithm that previously has been shown to provide an automated, unbiased, and high-precision means to integrate ITC data. These improvements allow for the speedy and precise serial integration of an unlimited number of ITC data sets, and they have been implemented in the freeware program NITPIC, version 1.1.0. We present a comprehensive comparison of the performance of this software against an older version of NITPIC and a current version of Origin, which is commonly used for integration. The new methods recapitulate the excellent performance of the previous versions of NITPIC while speeding it up substantially, and their precision is significantly better than that of Origin. This new version of NITPIC is therefore well suited to the serial integration of many ITC data sets.
Keywords: Isothermal titration calorimetry; Serial integration; Automated processing; Singular value decomposition

R.V. Kochanov, I.E. Gordon, L.S. Rothman, P. Wcisło, C. Hill, J.S. Wilzewski, HITRAN Application Programming Interface (HAPI): A comprehensive approach to working with spectroscopic data, Journal of Quantitative Spectroscopy and Radiative Transfer, Volume 177, July 2016, Pages 15-30, ISSN 0022-4073, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jqsrt.2016.03.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0022407315302466)
Abstract: Abstract
The HITRAN Application Programming Interface (HAPI) is presented. HAPI is a free Python library, which extends the capabilities of the HITRANonline interface (www.hitran.org) and can be used to filter and process the structured spectroscopic data. HAPI incorporates a set of tools for spectra simulation accounting for the temperature, pressure, optical path length, and instrument properties. HAPI is aimed to facilitate the spectroscopic data analysis and the spectra simulation based on the line-by-line data, such as from the HITRAN database [JQSRT (2013) 130, 4–50], allowing the usage of the non-Voigt line profile parameters, custom temperature and pressure dependences, and partition sums. The HAPI functions allow the user to control the spectra simulation and data filtering process via a set of the function parameters. HAPI can be obtained at its homepage www.hitran.org/hapi.
Keywords: HITRAN; Application Programming Interface; API; Spectra simulation; HITRANonline

JoAnn Kuchera-Morin, Matthew Wright, Graham Wakefield, Charles Roberts, Dennis Adderton, Behzad Sajadi, Tobias Höllerer, Aditi Majumder, Immersive full-surround multi-user system design, Computers & Graphics, Volume 40, May 2014, Pages 10-21, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2013.12.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849314000090)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper describes our research in full-surround, multimodal, multi-user, immersive instrument design in a large VR instrument. The three-story instrument, designed for large-scale, multimodal representation of complex and potentially high-dimensional information, specifically focuses on multi-user participation by facilitating interdisciplinary teams of co-located researchers in exploring complex information through interactive visual and aural displays in a full-surround, immersive environment. We recently achieved several milestones in the instrument's design that improves multi-user participation when exploring complex data representations and scientific simulations. These milestones include affordances for “ensemble-style” interaction allowing groups of participants to see, hear, and explore data as a team using our multi-user tracking and interaction systems; separate visual display modes for rectangular legacy content and for seamless surround-view stereoscopic projection using 4 high-resolution, high-lumen projectors with hardware warping and blending integrated with 22 small-footprint projectors placed above and below the instrument's walkway; and a 3D spatial audio system enabling a variety of sound spatialization techniques. These facilities can be accessed and controlled by a multimodal framework for authoring applications integrating visual, audio, and interactive elements. We report on the achieved instrument design.
Keywords: VR systems; Display technology; Multi-user; Multimodal interaction; Immersion

Seungjun Kim, Anind K. Dey, AR interfacing with prototype 3D applications based on user-centered interactivity, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 42, Issue 5, May 2010, Pages 373-386, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cad.2008.10.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S001044850800198X)
Abstract: Augmented Reality (AR) has been acclaimed as one of the promising technologies for advancing future UbiComp (Ubiquitous Computing) environments. Despite a myriad of AR applications and its influence on the human–computer interaction field, end products that integrate AR are less commonplace than expected. This is due to a lack of being able to forecast in which direction mainstream standardization of AR-oriented platform components will be framed. It is mainly due to a focus on technology issues in implementing reasonable AR solutions, which also results in difficulty in initiating AR research and creating prototype test-beds. Thus, this paper provides a comprehensive review of AR prototyping trends and AR research activities. Through the technical review of a de facto AR prototyping method, we remark upon the key elements of AR techniques, and then present an alternative view of the AR environment centered on end-user advantages in interaction, which is characterized by three features: intuitive observation, informative visualization, and immersive interaction. In addition, we believe that these features can be used to motivate the integration of AR technology into custom-built 3D applications. In this paper, we propose a conceptual schema and an architectural framework for generic AR prototyping. On the basis of these, a video see-through AR interface is integrated into three prototype 3D applications in 3 different domains: engineering systems, geospace, and multimedia. As the case studies for validating our integration, we present three sample AR applications; (a) an AR-interfaced 3D CAE (Computer-Aided Engineering) simulation test-bed, (b) a two-stage distributed Traveler Guidance Service (TGS) test-bed based on a GIS database and AR, and (c) a haptically-enhanced broadcasting test-bed for AR-based 3D media production. For each application, a description of the test-bed implementation, demonstration of the feasibility and usefulness and AR-specific technical challenges are included in this paper.
Keywords: Augmented reality; 3D application prototyping; Human–computer interaction; Ubiquitous computing

J. Coutaz, D. Salber, S. Balbo, Towards automatic evaluation of multimodal user interfaces, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 6, Issue 4, December 1993, Pages 267-274, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-7051(93)90018-O.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095070519390018O)
Abstract: The evaluation of the usability and the learnability of a computer system may be performed with predictive models during the design phase. It may be done on the executable code as well as by observing the user in action. In the latter case, data collected in vivo must be processed. The goal is to provide software supports for performing this difficult and time consuming task.

The paper presents an early analysis of, and experience relating to, the automatic evaluation of multimodal user interfaces. With this end in view, a generic Wizard of Oz platform has been designed to allow the observation and automatic recording of subjects' behavior while they interact with a multimodal interface. It is then shown how recorded data can be analyzed to detect behavioral patterns, and how deviations of such patterns from a data-flow-oriented task model can be exploited by a software usability critic.
Keywords: behavioral data capture; multimodal user interfaces; Wizard of Oz methods; user interface evaluation techniques

George J. Pangalos, Designing the user interface, Computers in Industry, Volume 22, Issue 2, August 1993, Pages 193-200, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0166-3615(93)90066-A.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016636159390066A)
Abstract: The development of user interfaces (UI) for software has always been a difficult task. It is therefore important to enrich the user interface development methodology with methods, techniques and tools capable of using the latest software technology and hardware advances. The main concepts and structural characteristics of the UI management and development systems are examined briefly and a number of major general UI design principles and methods are presented. A discussion is also attempted on the current standardization efforts in the UI area. Based on the above, a number of conclusions and recommendations are made which reflect the experience gained and the information collected from a European study among users on the UIs.
Keywords: User interface; Human-computer interface; User interface design; User interface standards

Alistair Sutcliffe, Steve Fickas, McKay Moore Sohlberg,Laurie A Ehlhardt, Investigating the usability of assistive user interfaces, Interacting with Computers, Volume 15, Issue 4, 1 August 2003, Pages 577-602, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0953-5438(03)00051-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543803000511)
Abstract: A prototype e-mail system was developed for cognitively disabled users, with four different interfaces (free format, idea prompt, form fill and menu driven). The interfaces differed in the level of support provided for the user and complexity of facilities for composing e-mail messages. Usability evaluation demonstrated that no one interface was superior because of individual differences in usability problems, although the majority of users preferred interfaces which did not restrict their freedom of expression (free format). In contrast to traditional evaluation studies, no common pattern of usability errors emerged, demonstrating the need for customisation of interfaces for individual cognitively disabled users. A framework for customising user interfaces to individual users is proposed, and usability principles derived from the study are expressed as claims following the task artefact cycle.
Keywords: Usability evaluation; Cognitive impairment; Assistive technology; Customised interfaces; Claims

Filippo Maria Bianchi, Antonello Rizzi, Alireza Sadeghian, Corrado Moiso, Identifying user habits through data mining on call data records, Engineering Applications of Artificial Intelligence, Volume 54, September 2016, Pages 49-61, ISSN 0952-1976, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.engappai.2016.05.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0952197616300975)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper we propose a frameworks for identifying patterns and regularities in the pseudo-anonymized Call Data Records (CDR) pertaining a generic subscriber of a mobile operator. We face the challenging task of automatically deriving meaningful information from the available data, by using an unsupervised procedure of cluster analysis and without including in the model any a priori knowledge on the applicative context. Clusters mining results are employed for understanding users' habits and to draw their characterizing profiles. We propose two implementations of the data mining procedure; the first is based on a novel system for clusters and knowledge discovery called LD-ABCD, capable of retrieving clusters and, at the same time, to automatically discover for each returned cluster the most appropriate dissimilarity measure (local metric). The second approach instead is based on PROCLUS, the well-know subclustering algorithm. The dataset under analysis contains records characterized only by few features and, consequently, we show how to generate additional fields which describe implicit information hidden in data. Finally, we propose an effective graphical representation of the results of the data-mining procedure, which can be easily understood and employed by analysts for practical applications.
Keywords: Call data records; Clustering; Data mining; Knowledge discovery; Automatic semantic interpretation; Frequent substructures miner; Subspace clustering

Guy Parmentier, Vincent Mangematin, Orchestrating innovation with user communities in the creative industries, Technological Forecasting and Social Change, Volume 83, March 2014, Pages 40-53, ISSN 0040-1625, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.techfore.2013.03.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0040162513000565)
Abstract: Abstract
The digital creative industries exemplify innovation processes in which user communities are highly involved in product and service development, bringing new ideas, and developing tools for new product uses and environments. We explore the role of user communities in such co-innovation processes via four case studies of interrelations between firms and their communities. The digitization and virtualization of firm/community interactions are changing how boundaries are defined and how co-innovation is managed. The transformation of innovation management is characterized by three elements: opening and redefining firm boundaries; opening of products and services to community input and reducing property rights; and reshaping organization and product identities. Innovation in collaboration with user communities requires firms to orchestrate their communities and their inter-relationships to encourage the creativity and motivation of users, and develop the community's innovatory capacity.
Keywords: Online communities; User; Innovation; Video game; Community management; Co-innovation

F Neelamkavil, S O'Shea, Using PCTE with X-based user interface development tools, Information and Software Technology, Volume 35, Issue 1, January 1993, Pages 17-22, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(93)90025-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095058499390025X)
Abstract: PCTE is now recognized as a good basis for the construction of software engineering environments. Recent studies in the development of PCTE-based graphical user interfaces have shown that the built-in PCTE User Interface is inadequate for many applications, particularly in the context of the X Window System, which is becoming a de facto standard. The paper gives the results of a study of PCTE and of experiments carried out in getting an implementation of PCTE to work with the X Window System. These experiments have been performed as part of work done in assessing the feasibility of using PCTE with X-based user interface development tools. The results are encouraging.
Keywords: user interfaces; windowing system; object management system; co-operation

Dhruv Patel, Jignesh Bhatt, Sanjay Trivedi, Programmable logic controller performance enhancement by field programmable gate array based design, ISA Transactions, Volume 54, January 2015, Pages 156-168, ISSN 0019-0578, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.isatra.2014.08.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0019057814002249)
Abstract: Abstract
PLC, the core element of modern automation systems, due to serial execution, exhibits limitations like slow speed and poor scan time. Improved PLC design using FPGA has been proposed based on parallel execution mechanism for enhancement of performance and flexibility. Modelsim as simulation platform and VHDL used to translate, integrate and implement the logic circuit in FPGA. Xilinx’s Spartan kit for implementation-testing and VB has been used for GUI development. Salient merits of the design include cost-effectiveness, miniaturization, user-friendliness, simplicity, along with lower power consumption, smaller scan time and higher speed. Various functionalities and applications like typical PLC and industrial alarm annunciator have been developed and successfully tested. Results of simulation, design and implementation have been reported.
Keywords: Automation; Embedded System; FPGA; GUI development; Instrumentation; PLC

YaJun Du, YuFeng Hai, ChunZhi Xie, XiaoMing Wang, An approach for selecting seed URLs of focused crawler based on user-interest ontology, Applied Soft Computing, Volume 14, Part C, January 2014, Pages 663-676, ISSN 1568-4946, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.asoc.2013.09.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1568494613002974)
Abstract: Abstract
Seed URLs selection for focused Web crawler intends to guide related and valuable information that meets a user's personal information requirement and provide more effective information retrieval. In this paper, we propose a seed URLs selection approach based on user-interest ontology. In order to enrich semantic query, we first intend to apply Formal Concept Analysis to construct user-interest concept lattice with user log profile. By using concept lattice merger, we construct the user-interest ontology which can describe the implicit concepts and relationships between them more appropriately for semantic representation and query match. On the other hand, we make full use of the user-interest ontology for extracting the user interest topic area and expanding user queries to receive the most related pages as seed URLs, which is an entrance of the focused crawler. In particular, we focus on how to refine the user topic area using the bipartite directed graph. The experiment proves that the user-interest ontology can be achieved effectively by merging concept lattices and that our proposed approach can select high quality seed URLs collection and improve the average precision of focused Web crawler.
Keywords: Seed URLs; Formal concept analysis; User-interest ontology; Bipartite graph; Web crawler

Richard A. Bödi, Theodor W. Kaulich, Intuitive user interfaces (IUI): a CASE starting point for design and programming, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 37, Issue 2, March 1992, Pages 69-74, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-2607(92)90087-N.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016926079290087N)
Abstract: The acceptance of a software product depends to a considerable extent on the user interface. The class of graphic-oriented user interfaces that are called Intuitive User Interfaces (IUI) is described. These interfaces allow the user to learn to operate software programs quickly. In the following the graphical layout put to use in an IUI is elaborated. All images the layout consists of are created with the aid of a paint program. Using these images, a procedure for creating, programming and linking an IUI to software applications is discussed and recommendations are made concerning software and hardware demands for easily creating IUIs. Practical experience of the authors with this procedure, mainly in the medical area, is described.
Keywords: Intuitive user interfaces; Programming techniques; Source code generators; Software developing; CASE

Žarko Mijailović, Dragan Milićev, Empirical analysis of GUI programming concerns, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 72, Issues 10–11, October–November 2014, Pages 757-771, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2014.04.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581914000664)
Abstract: Abstract
The focus of this paper is on identification of typical graphical user interface (GUI) programming concerns. As opposed to some other proposals available in the literature that indicate GUI programming concerns by simple intuition, we have conducted a systematic empirical analysis to derive our proposal. It included an analysis of an existing application programming interface (API), its use in industrial projects, and an analysis of the requirements and issues reported during software maintenance. In addition, we have evaluated more than 50 GUI frameworks and APIs and proved usefulness and generality of our classification of concerns. As an additional proof of applicability of the proposed classification, we have refactored the inheritance hierarchy of the selected GUI API using concern-oriented interfaces. We have implemented a supporting tool that complements the developed API and supports its concern-oriented use. The evaluation of the refactored API showed positive effects on API usability.
Keywords: Graphical user interfaces (GUI); GUI programming; GUI application programming interface (API); GUI concerns; Separation of concerns

Stella Pachidi, Marco Spruit, Inge van de Weerd, Understanding users’ behavior with software operation data mining, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 30, January 2014, Pages 583-594, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2013.07.049.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563213002884)
Abstract: Abstract
Software usage concerns knowledge about how end-users use the software in the field, and how the software itself responds to their actions. In this paper, we present the Usage Mining Method to guide the analysis of data collected during software operation, in order to extract knowledge about how a software product is used by the end-users. Our method suggests three analysis tasks which employ data mining techniques for extracting usage knowledge from software operation data: users profiling, clickstream analysis and classification analysis. The Usage Mining Method was evaluated through a prototype that was executed in the case of Exact Online, the main online financial management application in the Netherlands. The evaluation confirmed the supportive role of the Usage Mining Method in software product management and development processes, as well as the applicability of the suggested data mining algorithms to carry out the usage analysis tasks.
Keywords: Software usage; User behavior; Software operation knowledge; Software analytics; Log data; Data mining

Rajani Chulyadyo, Philippe Leray, A Personalized Recommender System from Probabilistic Relational Model and Users’ Preferences, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 35, 2014, Pages 1063-1072, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2014.08.193.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050914011582)
Abstract: Abstract
Recommender systems are applications to retrieve useful information from large amount of online data to assist users in discovering interesting items/products in the system. Collaborative filtering, content-based filtering, demographics-based filtering and hybrid approach are main approaches to realize recommendation systems. Most of the existing algorithms use a single approach to deal with recommendation problems. Besides, traditional recommendation approaches mainly deal with single dyadic relationships between users and items whereas data in real world are generally conceptualized in terms of objects and relations between them. Recommender systems based on Probabilistic Relational Model (PRM)1,2, a framework for learning probabilistic models from relational data, have tried to address this issue. However, existing PRM-based recommendation algorithms do not fit into our context where we are struggling with the contradictory situation of a real-world application that requires building a personalized recommender when no user profile exists. Therefore, we propose a novel approach to build a personalized PRM-based recommendation model with the help of users’ preferences on decision making criteria. Using our approach, content-based, collaborative filtering as well as hybrid models can be achieved from the same PRM. Applying the model on a real-world data from a cold system, we show that our model is actually capable of personalizing recommendations in coldstart situation.
Keywords: Personalized Recommender Systems; Probabilistic Relational Model (PRM); Users’ Preferences; Cold start problem; Hybrid recommender system

Marcel Joly, Roger Rocha, Luiz Carlos F. Sousa, Marcia T. Takahashi, Pierre N. Mendonça, Leonardo A.M. Moraes, André D. Quelhas, The strategic importance of teaching Operations Research for achieving high performance in the petroleum refining business, Education for Chemical Engineers, Volume 10, January 2015, Pages 1-19, ISSN 1749-7728, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ece.2014.11.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1749772814000116)
Abstract: Abstract
Introducing a good educational program in the industrial environment may importantly differ from implementing a well-taught course in academic settings in a number of aspects. Potential troublesome aspects should be identified in advance such that the learning environment can properly tackle those issues through specialized or innovative ways. In this paper, we highlight the key role of Operations Research (OR) for the modern, high-performing oil industry and describe the in-house implementation of a pioneer, corporate-wide strategic learning program on OR techniques at PETROBRAS, a semi-public Brazilian multinational energy company. The learners were chemical engineers working at the planning/scheduling department of oil refineries, which has a high profile in the organization. Under tutoring, they acquired theoretical knowledge and practical skills concerning the development of optimization models, solution techniques and finished OR-based tools in a community of OR experts, thereby enabling them to rehearse their reflective and computational skills related to day-to-day activities. Most importantly, since aimed to foster the development of self-regulated, reflective learners, this course technically enabled and motivated planners and schedulers to develop further specialization, to rethink inefficient work processes, to change the attitudes and culture in the refinery, to question previous assumptions and operational paradigms.
Keywords: Oil industry; Refinery scheduling; Mathematical programming; Optimization

Manuela Ölmez, Udo Lindemann, Managing Attribute Complexity for User-centered Decision Support Systems, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 28, 2014, Pages 130-137, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2014.03.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050914000805)
Abstract: Abstract
Decision making in engineering represents a highly complex and therefore challenging process for the involved stakeholders. The high complexity emerges from the combination of a multitude of factors that have to be considered simultaneously within a decision situation. Hereby the factors examined represent decision situation and human (decision-maker) attributes. To help decision-makers in dealing with highly complex decisions several decision support tools, methods and systems (DSS) have been developed. One main disadvantage of DSS is the little adaptation to and integration of user needs and attributes. This paper aims in providing a multilevel stepwise approach for the management of human and decision situation attribute complexity in order to enable a more effective decision support. The decision support is tailored to adapt to decision makers individually and therefore a higher acceptance and use-rate of DSS can be achieved. The approach was developed using findings from literature research and results from several research projects performed in cooperation with industry partners. The presented procedure represents a main design element of the user-centered DSS currently being developed at the Institute of Product Development.
Keywords: decision-making; decision support systems; complexity management; cognitive engineering; user-centered design; human attributes; decision attributes; decision description

Augusto Ciuffoletti, Application level interface for a cloud monitoring service, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 46, May 2016, Pages 15-22, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2016.01.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548916000027)
Abstract: Abstract
We introduce a new paradigm, based on an extension of the Open Cloud Computing Interface (OCCI), for the on-demand monitoring of the cloud resources provided to a user. We have extended the OCCI with two new sub-types of core entities: one to collect the measurements and the other to process them. The user can request instances of such entities to implement a monitoring infrastructure.

The paradigm does not target a specific cloud model, and is therefore applicable to any kind of resource provided as a service. The specifications include only the minimum needed to describe a monitoring infrastructure, thus making this standard extension simple and easily adoptable. Despite its simplicity, the model is able to describe complex solutions, including private/public clouds, and covers both infrastructure and application monitoring.

To highlight the impact of our proposal in practice, we have designed an engine that deploys a monitoring infrastructure using its OCCI-compliant descriptions. The design is implemented in a prototype that is available as open source.
Keywords: Monitoring of cloud resources; Monitoring-as-a-Service; Open Cloud Computing Interface (OCCI); RESTful service; Cloud interoperability

Eduardo Navarra Satuf, Eugenius Kaszkurewicz, Roberto Schirru, Mario Cesar Mello Massa de Campos, Situation awareness measurement of an ecological interface designed to operator support during alarm floods, International Journal of Industrial Ergonomics, Volume 53, May 2016, Pages 179-192, ISSN 0169-8141, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ergon.2016.01.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169814116300026)
Abstract: Abstract
Alarm summary interfaces are lists of chronologically sorted alarms used in oil producing supervision programs for decades. When a great number of alarms are activated in a small interval of time – that is, an alarm flood – alarm summary ceases to be as useful to understand the process situation. New alarm systems and interfaces are necessary to support operators' decision when dealing with such alarm floods. Situational awareness is an important concept for process operators when making decisions. The application of Ecological Interface Design concepts can lead to better interface designs, especially in unanticipated situations. The aim of this work is to verify the usefulness of a new ecological alarm interface, called Advanced System of Intelligent Alarms (SAAI, the Portuguese acronym). SAAI displays alarms prioritised in real-time with relevant graphical information on process conditions. Professional operators' situational awareness is measured when using either the SAAI interface, or the alarm summary interface, connected to a dynamic simulator running a model of an oil production process. Measurement techniques used include objective and subjective rating approaches, and a proposed technique. Operators' situation awareness for SAAI interface has shown greater values under all techniques used, compared to alarm summary interface. Although the new interface implied that operators would have to look also at an extra monitor, results show that their situation awareness improved on average, and that situation awareness might be less impaired under alarm floods.
Relevance to industry
Situation awareness plays an important role in operators' decision-making process. Alarm systems are critical in complex process operation, and alarm floods may impair operators' decisions. A new alarm ecological interface designed to maintain operators' situational awareness under alarm floods may mean an improvement in operation safety and efficiency.
Keywords: Alarm flood; Alarm interface; Situation awareness; Ecological interface design

José Carlos Miranda, Xenxo Alvarez, João Orvalho, Diego Gutierrez, A. Augusto Sousa, Verónica Orvalho, Sketch express: A sketching interface for facial animation, Computers & Graphics, Volume 36, Issue 6, October 2012, Pages 585-595, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2012.03.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849312000416)
Abstract: One of the most challenging tasks for an animator is to quickly create convincing facial expressions. Finding an effective control interface to manipulate facial geometry has traditionally required experienced users (usually technical directors), who create and place the necessary animation controls. Here we present our sketching interface control system, designed to reduce the time and effort necessary to create facial animations. Inspired in the way artists draw, where simple strokes define the shape of an object, our approach allows the user to sketch such strokes either directly on the 3D mesh or on two different types of canvas: a 2D fixed canvas or more flexible 2.5D dynamic screen-aligned billboards. In all cases, the strokes do not control the geometry of the face, but the underlying animation rig instead, allowing direct manipulation of the rig elements. Additionally, we show how the strokes can be easily reused in different characters, allowing retargeting of poses on several models. We illustrate our interactive approach using varied facial models of different styles showing that first time users typically create appealing 3D poses and animations in just a few minutes. We also present in this article the results of a user study. We deploy our method in an application for an artistic purpose. Our system has also been used in a pioneer serious game context, where the goal was to teach people with Autism Spectrum Disorders (ASD) to recognize facial emotions, using real time synthesis and automatic facial expression analysis.
Keywords: Sketching; Facial expression; Deformation; 3D mesh; Canvas; Billboard; Rig; User interface; Animation interface; Facial animation

Abbas Sheikh Mohammad Zadeh, Mohammad Ali Rajabi, Analyzing the effect of the street network configuration on the efficiency of an urban transportation system, Cities, Volume 31, April 2013, Pages 285-297, ISSN 0264-2751, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cities.2012.08.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0264275112001540)
Abstract: This paper proposes a new specialized centrality measure to quantify the importance and the contribution amount of each street in an urban transportation network. Contrary to the previous general centrality measures (e.g., degree, betweenness, and closeness), this measure considers three important vehicular traffic characteristics: street capacity restrictions, the dominant pattern of travel demands, and the traffic-flow equilibrium. Applying the developed centrality measure to simulated networks shows that traffic flows more efficiently in urban networks with “small-world” configurations, where a certain number of shortcut links and locally clustered streets are allowed. However, with regular grid networks, the application of the proposed measure shows little efficiency. This outcome suggests that the regular grid is not suitable as a base structure in urban planning.
Keywords: Urban transportation network; Spatial configuration; Centrality measure; Traffic equilibrium

N.T. Kochev, M.I. Rogojerov, G.N. Andreev, A new graphical approach for improved user control of Fourier self-deconvolution of infrared spectra, Vibrational Spectroscopy, Volume 25, Issue 2, 4 May 2001, Pages 177-183, ISSN 0924-2031, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0924-2031(00)00115-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0924203100001156)
Abstract: A new graphical approach for reliable control of Fourier self-deconvolution of infrared spectra is proposed. The program for spectra deconvolution (PSD) has been developed. PSD applies an interactive visual adjustment of the apodization and deconvolution functions. A graphical interface for simultaneous variation of adjusting parameters of both these functions in the Fourier domain is implemented. The program application is discussed in detail.
Keywords: Fourier self-deconvolution; Reference deconvolution; Infrared spectrometry

Giuseppe Ghiani, Barbara Leporini, Fabio Paternò, Vibrotactile feedback to aid blind users of mobile guides, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 20, Issue 5, October 2009, Pages 305-317, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jvlc.2009.07.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X0900055X)
Abstract: In this work, we report on a solution for providing support to the blind using mobile museum guides by exploiting the haptic channel as a complement to the audio/vocal one. The overall goal is to improve the autonomy and social integration of blind visitors. We followed an iterative approach in which the proposed system went through various user evaluations and further refinements. The final solution includes vibrotactile feedback enhancement for orientation and obstacle avoidance obtained through the use of unobtrusive actuators applied to two of the user's fingers combined with an electronic compass and obstacle detector sensors connected wirelessly to the mobile guide. Our study indicates that vibrotactile feedback is particularly useful to provide frequent unobtrusive indications of useful dynamic information, such as the level of proximity of an obstacle or the distance from the right orientation.
Keywords: Mobile guide; Accessibility; Blind users; Vibrotactile feedback; Multi-modal user interfaces

David Lizcano, Fernando Alonso, Javier Soriano, Genoveva López, Automated end user-centred adaptation of web components through automated description logic-based reasoning, Information and Software Technology, Volume 57, January 2015, Pages 446-462, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2014.05.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950584914001384)
Abstract: AbstractContext
This paper addresses one of the major end-user development (EUD) challenges, namely, how to pack today’s EUD support tools with composable elements. This would give end users better access to more components which they can use to build a solution tailored to their own needs. The success of later end-user software engineering (EUSE) activities largely depends on how many components each tool has and how adaptable components are to multiple problem domains.
Objective
A system for automatically adapting heterogeneous components to a common development environment would offer a sizeable saving of time and resources within the EUD support tool construction process. This paper presents an automated adaptation system for transforming EUD components to a standard format.
Method
This system is based on the use of description logic. Based on a generic UML2 data model, this description logic is able to check whether an end-user component can be transformed to this modelling language through subsumption or as an instance of the UML2 model. Besides it automatically finds a consistent, non-ambiguous and finite set of XSLT mappings to automatically prepare data in order to leverage the component as part of a tool that conforms to the target UML2 component model.
Results
The proposed system has been successfully applied to components from four prominent EUD tools. These components were automatically converted to a standard format. In order to validate the proposed system, rich internet applications (RIA) used as an operational support system for operators at a large services company were developed using automatically adapted standard format components. These RIAs would be impossible to develop using each EUD tool separately.
Conclusion
The positive results of applying our system for automatically adapting components from current tool catalogues are indicative of the system’s effectiveness. Use of this system could foster the growth of web EUD component catalogues, leveraging a vast ecosystem of user-centred SaaS to further current EUSE trends.
Keywords: D.2 [Software engineering]; D.3 [Programming languages]; H.5 [Information interfaces and presentation]; K.4 [Computers and society]; J.4 [Social and behavioural sciences]

K.V. Subbaiah, R. Sarangapani, GUI2QAD-3D: A graphical interface program for QAD-CGPIC program, Annals of Nuclear Energy, Volume 33, Issue 1, January 2006, Pages 22-29, ISSN 0306-4549, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.anucene.2005.07.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0306454905001805)
Abstract: GUI2QAD-3D is graphical user interface developed in Visual Basic (VB) version 6.0 to prepare input for the QAD-CGPIC program. QAD-CGPIC is a FORTRAN code that combines QAD-CGGP (RSICC-CCC-493, USA) and PICTURE [Irving, D.C., Morrison, G.W., 1970. PICTURE—an aid in debugging GEOM input data, ORNL-TM-2892] for neutron and gamma-ray shielding calculations by the point kernel method in a consistent fashion to utilize the capabilities of two independent codes. The FORTRAN code calculates fast neutron and gamma-ray penetration through various shield configurations defined by combinatorial geometry specifications. It has provision to estimate buildup factor either from Geometric Progression (GP) coefficients (ANS-6.4.3, 1990) or from Capos’. Capabilities of the FORTRAN code is extended by modifying it to handle off-centred multiple identical sources. Several standard tests of inputs are carried out to validate the modified code. The FORTRAN code executable is created with a Lahey compiler. The user interface facilitates interactive viewing of the geometry of the system with online context sensitive help. Inputs for several practical problems relating to nuclear fuel reprocessing labs are provided. The software runs on Pentium III computers under windows environment and is transmitted in one CD. The software can be obtained from Radiation Safety Information and Computational Centre (RSICC), ORNL, USA with code package identification number CCC-697.

Laura Giustarini, Olivier Parisot, Mohammad Ghoniem, Renaud Hostache, Ivonne Trebs, Benoît Otjacques, A user-driven case-based reasoning tool for infilling missing values in daily mean river flow records, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 82, August 2016, Pages 308-320, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2016.04.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815216301050)
Abstract: Abstract
Missing data in river flow records represent a loss of information and a serious drawback in water management. In this work, we introduce gapIt, a user-driven case-based reasoning tool for infilling gaps in daily mean river flow records. Given a set of flow time series, gapIt builds a database of artificial gaps for which it computes several flow estimates, to find the best combinations of infilling algorithm and automatically selected donor station(s), according to state-of-the-art performance indicators. We obtained satisfactory results with Nash-Sutcliffe &gt;0.7 for more than half of the ∼5000 synthetic gaps of various lengths and positions, randomly created along the available records. gapIt was evaluated on 24 daily river discharge time series recorded in Luxembourg over seven years from 01/01/2007 to 31/12/2013. We also discuss the benefits of coupling this approach with user-expertise for an improved infilling of real data gaps.
Keywords: Gap filling; Hydrological time series; Case-based reasoning; Knowledge database; Human in the loop

K.A. de Graaf, P. Liang, A. Tang, W.R. van Hage, H. van Vliet, An exploratory study on ontology engineering for software architecture documentation, Computers in Industry, Volume 65, Issue 7, September 2014, Pages 1053-1064, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2014.04.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361514000840)
Abstract: Abstract
The usefulness of Software Architecture (SA) documentation depends on how well its Architectural Knowledge (AK) can be retrieved by the stakeholders in a software project. Recent findings show that the use of ontology-based SA documentation is promising. However, different roles in software development have different needs for AK, and building an ontology to suit these needs is challenging. In this paper we describe an approach to build an ontology for SA documentation. This approach involves the use of typical questions for eliciting and constructing an ontology. We outline eight contextual factors, which influence the successful construction of an ontology, especially in complex software projects with diverse AK users. We tested our ‘typical question’ approach in a case study and report how it can be used for acquiring and modeling AK needs.
Keywords: Ontology engineering; Software architecture; Software ontology; Ontology-based documentation; Knowledge acquisition; Knowledge management

Johannes Radinger, Jochem Kail, Christian Wolter, FIDIMO — A free and open source GIS based dispersal model for riverine fish, Ecological Informatics, Volume 24, November 2014, Pages 238-247, ISSN 1574-9541, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ecoinf.2013.06.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574954113000563)
Abstract: Abstract
Dispersal is a key process in community ecology and dynamics that comprise not only various movement processes, but also behavioural components and large-scale spatio-temporal patterns. Modelling fish dispersal further has to consider the species-specific dispersal abilities and the branching, dendritic nature of river networks.

With FIDIMO (fish dispersal model) a tool is provided for predicting and simulating spatio-temporal patterns of fish dispersal in river networks with a real integration of GIS for the first time. The model has been written in Python programming language as open source add-on for GRASS GIS. The model has been developed to apply the characteristics of heterogeneous, species and size class specific fish movement on a rasterized river network including migration barriers. Fish dispersal is modelled as a leptokurtic diffusion process spreading from spatially predefined source populations consisting of stationary and mobile components each. The fish dispersal model FIDIMO links conceptual considerations on dispersal modelling with empirically observed fish movement patterns and the strengths of geographically explicit modelling in FOSS GIS. It can be used for different species and any river network meeting the input requirements.

As main results FIDIMO yields probabilities of occurrence of fish species in river raster cells based on empirically derived dispersal kernels after the time step of interest modelled.

The model output serves to understand and predict time lags and spatio-temporal patterns of recolonization events, the related success of river rehabilitation and also the spread of invasive species. The consequent use of open source programmes allows free access to the code and facilitates easy modifications, adoptions and improvements of the model.
Keywords: GRASS GIS; Fish dispersal; Dispersal modelling; Raster GIS; Leptokurtic dispersal; Dispersal time lags

H.V. Hansen, V. Goebel, T. Plagemann, DevCom: Device communities for user-friendly and trustworthy communication, sharing, and collaboration, Computer Communications, Volume 85, 1 July 2016, Pages 14-27, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comcom.2016.02.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366416300202)
Abstract: Abstract
We present the design, implementation and evaluation of DevCom, a network system that provides users with a trustworthy and user-friendly way to communicate, share and collaborate among distinct groups of devices simultaneously, e.g., home devices, work devices and friends’ devices. DevCom is trustworthy, because reliability, security and privacy issues are automatically taken care of with state-of-the-art cryptography. User-friendliness is ensured through self-configuration, persistent connections in advent of mobility, and by automatically solving problems that network address translation (NAT) and firewalls introduce. An experimental evaluation shows that (1) off-the-shelf applications such as games perform in the same way as they do without DevCom, (2) latency, throughput and processing overhead is low and unnoticeable to users, and (3) persistent connections are automatically supported on devices with changing addresses. A critical analysis from three user perspectives, i.e., a novice, an intermediate user, and an application developer, highlight the user-friendliness of DevCom for a broad range of users.
Keywords: Mobile applications; Peer-to-peer; Trustworthy communication; Virtual Private Networks

M.T. Munir, W. Yu, B.R. Young, Plant-wide control: Eco-efficiency and control loop configuration, ISA Transactions, Volume 52, Issue 1, January 2013, Pages 162-169, ISSN 0019-0578, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.isatra.2012.09.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0019057812001589)
Abstract: Since the eco-efficiency of all industrial processes/plants has become increasingly important, engineers need to find a way to integrate the control loop configuration and the measurements of eco-efficiency. A new measure of eco-efficiency, the exergy eco-efficiency factor, for control loop configuration, is proposed in this paper. The exergy eco-efficiency factor is based on the thermodynamic concept of exergy which can be used to analyse a process in terms of its efficiency associated with the control configuration. The combination of control pairing configuration techniques (such as the relative gain array, RGA and Niederlinski index, NI) and the proposed exergy eco-efficiency factor will guide the process designer to reach the optimal control design with low operational cost (i.e., energy consumption). The exergy eco-efficiency factor is implemented in the process simulation case study and the reliability of the proposed method is demonstrated by dynamic simulation results.
Keywords: Control loop configuration; Eco-efficiency; Dynamic exergy efficiency

Max J. Hoffmann, Sebastian Matera, Karsten Reuter, kmos: A lattice kinetic Monte Carlo framework, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 185, Issue 7, July 2014, Pages 2138-2150, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2014.04.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S001046551400126X)
Abstract: Abstract
Kinetic Monte Carlo (kMC) simulations have emerged as a key tool for microkinetic modeling in heterogeneous catalysis and other materials applications. Systems, where site-specificity of all elementary reactions allows a mapping onto a lattice of discrete active sites, can be addressed within the particularly efficient lattice kMC approach. To this end we describe the versatile kmos software package, which offers a most user-friendly implementation, execution, and evaluation of lattice kMC models of arbitrary complexity in one- to three-dimensional lattice systems, involving multiple active sites in periodic or aperiodic arrangements, as well as site-resolved pairwise and higher-order lateral interactions. Conceptually, kmos achieves a maximum runtime performance which is essentially independent of lattice size by generating code for the efficiency-determining local update of available events that is optimized for a defined kMC model. For this model definition and the control of all runtime and evaluation aspects kmos offers a high-level application programming interface. Usage proceeds interactively, via scripts, or a graphical user interface, which visualizes the model geometry, the lattice occupations and rates of selected elementary reactions, while allowing on-the-fly changes of simulation parameters. We demonstrate the performance and scaling of kmos with the application to kMC models for surface catalytic processes, where for given operation conditions (temperature and partial pressures of all reactants) central simulation outcomes are catalytic activity and selectivities, surface composition, and mechanistic insight into the occurrence of individual elementary processes in the reaction network.
Program summary
Program title: kmos

Catalogue identifier: AESU_v1_0

Program summary URL:http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AESU_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen’s University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: GNU General Public License, version 3

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 27 450

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 2 777 387

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: Python 16.4%, fortran90: 83.6%.

Computer: PC, Mac.

Operating system: Linux, Mac, Windows.

RAM: 100 MB+

Classification: 7.8.

External routines: ASE, Numpy, f2py, python-lxml

Nature of problem:

Microkinetic simulations of complex reaction networks with all elementary processes occurring at active sites of a static lattice.

Solution method:

Efficient lattice kinetic Monte Carlo solution of the Markovian master equation underlying the reaction network.

Unusual features:

The framework implements a Fortran90 code generator

Running time:

From 10 s to 10 h
Keywords: Lattice kinetic Monte Carlo; Microkinetic modeling; First-principles multi-scale modeling; Heterogeneous catalysis; Graphical user interface; Python; Fortran90; Open source

Thomas Buchmann, Alexander Dotor, Bernhard Westfechtel, MOD2-SCM: A model-driven product line for software configuration management systems, Information and Software Technology, Volume 55, Issue 3, March 2013, Pages 630-650, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2012.07.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S095058491200136X)
Abstract: Context
Software Configuration Management (SCM) is the discipline of controlling the evolution of large and complex software systems. Over the years many different SCM systems sharing similar concepts have been implemented from scratch. Since these concepts usually are hard-wired into the respective program code, reuse is hardly possible.
Objective
Our objective is to create a model-driven product line for SCM systems. By explicitly describing the different concepts using models, reuse can be performed on the modeling level. Since models are executable, the need for manual programming is eliminated. Furthermore, by providing a library of loosely coupled modules, we intend to support flexible composition of SCM systems.
Method
We developed a method and a tool set for model-driven software product line engineering which we applied to the SCM domain. For domain analysis, we applied the FORM method, resulting in a layered feature model for SCM systems. Furthermore, we developed an executable object-oriented domain model which was annotated with features from the feature model. A specific SCM system is configured by selecting features from the feature model and elements of the domain model realizing these features.
Results
Due to the orthogonality of both feature model and domain model, a very large number of SCM systems may be configured. We tested our approach by creating instances of the product line which mimic wide-spread systems such as CVS, GIT, Mercurial, and Subversion.
Conclusion
The experiences gained from this project demonstrate the feasibility of our approach to model-driven software product line engineering. Furthermore, our work advances the state of the art in the domain of SCM systems since it support the modular composition of SCM systems at the model rather than the code level.
Keywords: Model-driven software engineering; Software product line engineering; Software configuration management; Feature models; Executable models; Model transformation; Code generation

Tipu Sultan, Numerical study of the effects of lamp configuration and reactor wall roughness in an open channel water disinfection UV reactor, Chemosphere, Volume 155, July 2016, Pages 170-179, ISSN 0045-6535, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chemosphere.2016.04.050.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0045653516305240)
Abstract: Abstract
This article describes the assessment of a numerical procedure used to determine the UV lamp configuration and surface roughness effects on an open channel water disinfection UV reactor. The performance of the open channel water disinfection UV reactor was numerically analyzed on the basis of the performance indictor reduction equivalent dose (RED). The RED values were calculated as a function of the Reynolds number to monitor the performance. The flow through the open channel UV reactor was modelled using a k-ε model with scalable wall function, a discrete ordinate (DO) model for fluence rate calculation, a volume of fluid (VOF) model to locate the unknown free surface, a discrete phase model (DPM) to track the pathogen transport, and a modified law of the wall to incorporate the reactor wall roughness effects. The performance analysis was carried out using commercial CFD software (ANSYS Fluent 15.0). Four case studies were analyzed based on open channel UV reactor type (horizontal and vertical) and lamp configuration (parallel and staggered). The results show that lamp configuration can play an important role in the performance of an open channel water disinfection UV reactor. The effects of the reactor wall roughness were Reynolds number dependent. The proposed methodology is useful for performance optimization of an open channel water disinfection UV reactor.
Keywords: Water disinfection; UV reactor; Fluence rate; Open channel; Relative roughness; Reynolds number

Bojan Blažica, Daniel Vladušič, Dunja Mladenić, MTi: A method for user identification for multitouch displays, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 71, Issue 6, June 2013, Pages 691-702, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2013.03.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581913000372)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper describes MTi, a biometric method for user identification on multitouch displays. The method is based on features obtained only from the coordinates of the 5 touchpoints of one of the user's hands. This makes MTi applicable to all multitouch displays large enough to accommodate a human hand and detect 5 or more touchpoints without requiring additional hardware and regardless of the display's underlying sensing technology. MTi only requests that the user places his hand on the display with the fingers comfortably stretched apart. A dataset of 34 users was created on which our method reported 94.69% identification accuracy. The method's scalability was tested on a subset of the Bosphorus hand database (100 users, 94.33% identification accuracy) and a usability study was performed.
Keywords: Multitouch; User identification; Biometrics; Identity-enabled surfaces

Sandra Arias, Eladio Cardiel, Laura Garay, Hiromi Sanada, Taketoshi Mori, Hiroshi Noguchi, Gojiro Nakagami, Pablo Rogeli, Effects on interface pressure and tissue oxygenation under ischial tuberosities during the application of an alternating cushion, Journal of Tissue Viability, Volume 24, Issue 3, August 2015, Pages 91-101, ISSN 0965-206X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jtv.2015.05.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965206X15000522)
Abstract: Abstract
Pressure ulcers are hazardous to people with diminished sensory and motor functions who remain in the same position for a long time. An important reason for the occurrence of pressure ulcers is the inability of wheelchair users to make postural changes by themselves with no appropriate method of pressure release. In this study, we researched the effects of applying an air cell inflate-deflate alternating sequence cushion prototype to relieve pressure from tissue loaded areas. Moreover, the hypothesis that the alternating sequence could stimulate blood reperfusion in loaded tissues and redistribute interface pressure on support area was also tested. Ten healthy volunteers were recruited to try the prototype cushion for 65 min of continuous loading; 5 min on static mode and 60 min on alternating mode. This study was conducted on healthy people because their sensitivity allowed them to state clearly and in detail, in a feedback questionnaire, any discomfort experienced with the use of our cushion. In order to address our hypothesis, interface pressure, and bilateral ischial oxygenated and deoxygenated hemoglobin were measured. After applying the alternating cushion, the interface pressure was redistributed over a larger contact area. Besides, blood perfusion was improved according to increments in oxygenated hemoglobin and decrements in deoxygenated hemoglobin of ischial regions during loaded condition. Feedback questionnaire showed that the participants did not feel pain or discomfort using the alternating cushion. The overall results showed positive effects on healthy tissue which has encouraged us to design a study involving subjects who use wheelchairs for mobility.
Keywords: Perfusion; Dynamic cushion; Pressure ulcer; Wheelchair user; Stimulation

, 96/05030 Development of a graphical user interface for a real-time power system simulator, Fuel and Energy Abstracts, Volume 37, Issue 5, September 1996, Page 354, ISSN 0140-6701, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0140-6701(96)89745-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0140670196897451)

Ilaria Gaudiello, Elisabetta Zibetti, Sébastien Lefort, Mohamed Chetouani, Serena Ivaldi, Trust as indicator of robot functional and social acceptance. An experimental study on user conformation to iCub answers, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 61, August 2016, Pages 633-655, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2016.03.057.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S074756321630228X)
Abstract: Abstract
To investigate the dynamics of human-robot acceptance, we carried out an experimental study with 56 adult participants and the iCub robot. Trust in the robot has been considered as a main indicator of acceptance and measured by the participants' conformation to the iCub's answers to questions on functional and social tasks characterized by perceptual and socio cognitive uncertainty. In particular, we were interested in understanding whether (i) trust in functional savvy is a prerequisite for trust in social savvy, and (ii) to what extent factors such as participants' desire for control, attitude towards social influence of robots, and imagined collaborative vs. competitive scenario, may influence their trust in the iCub. We found that participants conformed more to the iCub's answers in the functional than in the social tasks. Moreover, the few participants conforming to the iCub's answers in the social task also conformed less in the functional issues. Trust in the robot's functional savvy does not thus seem to be a pre-requisite for trust in its social savvy. Finally, the examined factors did not influence the trust in iCub. Results are discussed with relation to methodology of human-robot interaction (HRI) research.
Keywords: iCub humanoid robot; Functional acceptance; Social acceptance; Trust; Conformation

Gun A. Lee, Gerard J. Kim, Immersive authoring of Tangible Augmented Reality content: A user study, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 20, Issue 2, April 2009, Pages 61-79, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jvlc.2008.07.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X08000402)
Abstract: Immersive authoring refers to the style of programming or developing content from within the targetexecutable environment. Immersive authoring is important for fields such as augmented reality (AR) in which interaction usability and user perception of the target content must be checked first hand, in situ. In addition, the interaction efficiency and usability of the authoring tools itself is equally important forease of authoring. In this paper, we propose design principles and describe an implementation of animmersive authoring system for AR. More importantly, we present a formal user study demonstrating its benefits and weaknesses. In particular, our results demonstrate that, compared to using the traditional 2D desktop development method, immersive authoring gained significant efficiency in specifying spatial arrangements and behavior tasks, a major component of AR content authoring. However, it was not so successful for abstract tasks such as logical programming. Based on this result, we suggest that a comprehensive AR authoring tool should include such immersive authoring functionality to help, particularly non-technical media artists, create effective contents based on the characteristics of the underlying media and interaction style.
Keywords: Immersive authoring; Augmented reality; Tangible interface; User study; Interaction design

Zoe Kosmadoudi, Theodore Lim, James Ritchie, Sandy Louchart, Ying Liu, Raymond Sung, Engineering design using game-enhanced CAD: The potential to augment the user experience with game elements, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 45, Issue 3, March 2013, Pages 777-795, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cad.2012.08.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010448512001698)
Abstract: Since the coining of the term ‘serious games’ by Clark Abt, practitioners in fields such as education, the military, and medical science, as well as researchers from other disciplines, have investigated with interest game mechanics and the dynamics of games in non-gaming applications. Gaming has extended beyond what was initially its natural boundary of entertainment and is now associated with the process of problem solving while providing analytical questioning of scientific viewpoints through active gameplay. The rules of game interaction or game mechanics include the concepts of usability and playability which are focused in a less complex environment which provides a more intuitive user experience (UX). In the process of CAD development and applications the effective use and support of the user’s perception and their UX have been compromised by the engineering design system’s functionality and step-by-step evolution. This article reviews gaming techniques and mechanisms that may potentially be beneficial to the future development of CAD systems in engineering, in particular to maintain cognitive engagement. In light of this, the article focuses on the fundamental activity of engineering using CAD systems with particular attention on CAD graphical user interfaces (GUIs) and how they can be potentially enhanced using game mechanics to provide more engaging and intuitive environments.
Keywords: CAD; Engineering design; Games; User experience; Engagement

Jonathan Henckel, Paul Hospers, Data processing system graphical user interface which emulates printed material, Laboratory Automation & Information Management, Volume 32, Issue 1, May 1996, Pages 46-47, ISSN 1381-141X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/1381-141X(96)80615-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/1381141X96806150)

Jitesh Joshi, Sumiti Saharan, Pravat K. Mandal, BOLDSync: A MATLAB-based toolbox for synchronized stimulus presentation in functional MRI, Journal of Neuroscience Methods, Volume 223, 15 February 2014, Pages 123-132, ISSN 0165-0270, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jneumeth.2013.12.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0165027013004196)
Abstract: AbstractBackground
Precise and synchronized presentation of paradigm stimuli in functional magnetic resonance imaging (fMRI) is central to obtaining accurate information about brain regions involved in a specific task.
New method
In this manuscript, we present a new MATLAB-based toolbox, BOLDSync, for synchronized stimulus presentation in fMRI.
Results
BOLDSync provides a user friendly platform for design and presentation of visual, audio, as well as multimodal audio-visual (AV) stimuli in functional imaging experiments. We present simulation experiments that demonstrate the millisecond synchronization accuracy of BOLDSync, and also illustrate the functionalities of BOLDSync through application to an AV fMRI study.
Comparison with existing methods
BOLDSync gains an advantage over other available proprietary and open-source toolboxes by offering a user friendly and accessible interface that affords both precision in stimulus presentation and versatility across various types of stimulus designs and system setups.
Conclusions
BOLDSync is a reliable, efficient, and versatile solution for synchronized stimulus presentation in fMRI study.
Keywords: BOLDSync; Functional MRI; Stimulus presentation; MATLAB; Toolbox; Synchronization; Accuracy

Sebastian Scherer, Julia Kowal, Mohamed Chami, Venkata Dandey, Marcel Arheit, Philippe Ringler, Henning Stahlberg, 2dx_automator: Implementation of a semiautomatic high-throughput high-resolution cryo-electron crystallography pipeline, Journal of Structural Biology, Volume 186, Issue 2, May 2014, Pages 302-307, ISSN 1047-8477, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jsb.2014.03.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1047847714000690)
Abstract: Abstract
The introduction of direct electron detectors (DED) to cryo-electron microscopy has tremendously increased the signal-to-noise ratio (SNR) and quality of the recorded images. We discuss the optimal use of DEDs for cryo-electron crystallography, introduce a new automatic image processing pipeline, and demonstrate the vast improvement in the resolution achieved by the use of both together, especially for highly tilted samples. The new processing pipeline (now included in the software package 2dx) exploits the high SNR and frame readout frequency of DEDs to automatically correct for beam-induced sample movement, and reliably processes individual crystal images without human interaction as data are being acquired. A new graphical user interface (GUI) condenses all information required for quality assessment in one window, allowing the imaging conditions to be verified and adjusted during the data collection session. With this new pipeline an automatically generated unit cell projection map of each recorded 2D crystal is available less than 5 min after the image was recorded. The entire processing procedure yielded a three-dimensional reconstruction of the 2D-crystallized ion-channel membrane protein MloK1 with a much-improved resolution of 5 Å in-plane and 7 Å in the z-direction, within 2 days of data acquisition and simultaneous processing. The results obtained are superior to those delivered by conventional photographic film-based methodology of the same sample, and demonstrate the importance of drift-correction.
Keywords: 2dx; Image processing automation; Cryo-EM; Direct electron detector; High-throughput electron microscopy; Membrane proteins

Chet Hosmer, Chapter 8 - Network Forensics: Part I, In Python Forensics, Syngress, Boston, 2014, Pages 205-235, ISBN 9780124186767, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-418676-7.00008-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124186767000086)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter provides an introduction to networking investigation methods in Python with examples, including both ping sweep and port scanning operations. In addition, the chapter introduces wxPython, a cross-platform graphical user interface library for Python. wxPython is used in both ping sweep and port scanning sample applications.
Keywords: Network forensics; Network investigation; Graphical user interface (GUI); Port; Ping; Ping sweep; Port scan; wxPython; Socket

A. Benevolenskiy, K. Roos, P. Katranuschkov, R.J. Scherer, Construction processes configuration using process patterns, Advanced Engineering Informatics, Volume 26, Issue 4, October 2012, Pages 727-736, ISSN 1474-0346, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.aei.2012.04.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474034612000420)
Abstract: Process modeling is used in construction to support various simulation tasks. A major problem is that due to the one-of-a-kind character of construction projects a lot of work is needed each time to manually develop a project overall process schedule. However, the total individual process is typically structured in multiple stages containing a number of recurring similar but not equal subprocesses that can be standardized if appropriately generalized to generic reusable process patterns. Moreover not only process patterns, but also many general construction methods and strategies can be standardized and stored in form of configuration rules, which will improve the consistency of modeling and have the potential to improve modeling time too.

The paper addresses these issues and presents a new approach that combines the ontology-based process modeling with the rule-based process configuration. The proposed system supports the generation of process schedules for construction projects that could be later used in discrete-event simulation software or workflow programs.

The development of a formal high-level model for construction processes and a methodology for using process patterns in the configuration of complex construction tasks are described. The main idea of the proposed approach is the development and use of two separate but interrelated ontologies, one for process patterns and the other for process instances, and their integration with a general-purpose rule-engine. With the help of the configuration strategies, realized by means of hierarchical rule sets, an intelligent solution for quick process configuration can be found.
Keywords: Ontology; Process modeling; Process configuration; Process pattern; Rules

Allison B. Zhang and Don Gourley, 7 - Designing a user interface for digital collections, In Chandos Information Professional Series, Chandos Publishing, 2009, Pages 89-111, Creating Digital Collections, ISBN 9781843343967, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-84334-396-7.50007-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781843343967500079)

Xiaming Chen, Siwei Qiang, Jianwen Wei, Kaida Jiang, Yaohui Jin, Passive profiling of mobile engaging behaviours via user-end application performance assessment, Pervasive and Mobile Computing, Volume 29, July 2016, Pages 95-112, ISSN 1574-1192, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pmcj.2015.12.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574119215002175)
Abstract: Abstract
Benefiting from the booming mobile industry, our daily connections have become instant and ubiquitous. In the meanwhile, user experience in mobile services becomes an important consideration for service providers to cultivate customers’ loyalty, or for network operators to seek profit chances from existing infrastructure. To meet these requirements, we specify engaging behaviours to characterize the dynamics of user participation in mobile applications in real contexts. Leveraging a five-month collection of backbone traffic in an operational WiFi mesh network, we make comprehensive insights on the variation of engaging behaviours, as well as their non-linear and counter-intuitive interactions with user-perceived application performance. With the Hidden Markov Modelling of individual’s engaging trajectory, two distinctive behavioural clusters are identified and investigated. These achievements will be contributed to the development of multiple pioneer R&amp;D areas, such as mobile network simulation and user experience optimization.
Keywords: Mobile measurement; Engaging behaviour; Quality of experience; Application performance; Structured correlation analysis

Autodesk, Lesson 1 - User Interface, In Learning Autodesk 3ds Max Design 2010: Essentials, Focal Press, Boston, 2009, Pages 12-45, ISBN 9780240811932, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-024081193-2.50006-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780240811932500062)

Stephan Bartke, Stanislav Martinát, Petr Klusáček, Lisa Pizzol, Filip Alexandrescu, Bohumil Frantál, Andrea Critto, Alex Zabeo, Targeted selection of brownfields from portfolios for sustainable regeneration: User experiences from five cases testing the Timbre Brownfield Prioritization Tool, Journal of Environmental Management, Available online 21 July 2016, ISSN 0301-4797, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jenvman.2016.07.037.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0301479716304741)
Abstract: Abstract
Prioritizing brownfields for redevelopment in real estate portfolios can contribute to more sustainable regeneration and land management. Owners of large real estate and brownfield portfolios are challenged to allocate their limited resources to the development of the most critical or promising sites, in terms of time and cost efficiency. Authorities worried about the negative impacts of brownfields – in particular in the case of potential contamination – on the environment and society also need to prioritize their resources to those brownfields that most urgently deserve attention and intervention. Yet, numerous factors have to be considered for prioritizing actions, in particular when adhering to sustainability principles. Several multiple-criteria decision analysis (MCDA) approaches and tools have been suggested in order to support these actors in managing their brownfield portfolios. Based on lessons learned from the literature on success factors, sustainability assessment and MCDA approaches, researchers from a recent EU project have developed the web-based Timbre Brownfield Prioritization Tool (TBPT). It facilitates assessment and prioritization of a portfolio of sites on the basis of the probability of successful and sustainable regeneration or according to individually specified objectives. This paper introduces the challenges of brownfield portfolio management in general and reports about the application of the TBPT in five cases: practical test-uses by two large institutional land owners from Germany, a local and a regional administrative body from the Czech Republic, and an expert from a national environmental authority from Romania. Based on literature requirements for sustainability assessment tools and on the end-users’ feedbacks from the practical tests, we discuss the TBPT's strengths and weaknesses in order to inform and give recommendations for future development of prioritization tools.
Keywords: Brownfield; Sustainability; Stakeholder; Portfolio; Prioritization; Decision support; Case studies

Xiufeng Pang, Thierry S. Nouidui, Michael Wetter, Daniel Fuller, Anna Liao, Philip Haves, Building energy simulation in real time through an open standard interface, Energy and Buildings, Volume 117, 1 April 2016, Pages 282-289, ISSN 0378-7788, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.enbuild.2015.10.025.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378778815303431)
Abstract: Abstract
Building energy models (BEMs) are typically used for design and code compliance for new buildings and in the renovation of existing buildings to predict energy use. The increasing adoption of BEM as standard practice in the building industry presents an opportunity to extend the use of BEMs into construction, commissioning and operation. In 2009, the authors developed a real-time simulation framework to execute an EnergyPlus model in real time to improve building operation. This paper reports an enhancement of that real-time energy simulation framework. The previous version only works with software tools that implement the custom co-simulation interface of the Building Controls Virtual Test Bed (BCVTB), such as EnergyPlus, Dymola and TRNSYS. The new version uses an open standard interface, the Functional Mockup Interface (FMI), to provide a generic interface to any application that supports the FMI protocol. In addition, the new version utilizes the Simple Measurement and Actuation Profile (sMAP) tool as the data acquisition system to acquire, store and present data. This paper introduces the updated architecture of the real-time simulation framework using FMI and presents proof-of-concept demonstration results which validate the new framework.
Keywords: Building energy simulation; Real-time; Functional Mockup Interface; BCVTB; EnergyPlus

Richard H.C. Seabrook, Ben Shneiderman, The user interface in a hypertext, multiwindow program browser, Interacting with Computers, Volume 1, Issue 3, December 1989, Pages 301-337, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0953-5438(89)90018-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0953543889900180)
Abstract: The program browsing problem is discussed, with particular emphasis on a multiple-window user interface and its implications for recording acquired knowledge, navigation, and attention-tracking. Hypertext systems are considered as an implementation of browsing techniques for nonprogram text. A classification scheme for text-viewing systems is offered, and then browsing is discussed as a nonintrusive, static technique for program study.

Multiple techniques are synthesised into a coherent plan for a multiwindow program study tool, based on theories of program browsing and the use of hypertext. A test system, HYBROW, emerged from the plan for studying the application of several hypertext multiple-window techniques to program browsing, especially window replacement. HYBROW is a hypertext, multiple-window program browser. This generic tool is applicable to any source language, although certain aspects of the preprocessing and the hierarchical browser presentation are specific to the C language. The tool permits opening an arbitrary number of text windows into an arbitrary number of files, rapid window switching, multiple-window search, placemarking, automatic screen organisation, and services for the creation, maintenance and production of study notes. An informal usability study was conducted.
Keywords: user interfaces; windowing systems; hypertext; browsing systems

Fernando A. Cordisco, Pablo D. Zavattieri, Louis G. Hector Jr., Blair E. Carlson, Mode I fracture along adhesively bonded sinusoidal interfaces, International Journal of Solids and Structures, Volume 83, April 2016, Pages 45-64, ISSN 0020-7683, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijsolstr.2015.12.028.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0020768315005284)
Abstract: Abstract
Fracture along sinusoidally-patterned and flat interfaces in AA7075-T6 double cantilever beam (DCB) adhesive joints was investigated with an experimental/theoretical approach. Sinusoidal profiles of A/λ = 1/4, 1/3 and 1/2 (A = amplitude, λ = wavelength) were prepared with wire EDM followed by application of a 0.3 mm adhesive layer. Crack propagation from remote mode I loading occurred as the DCBs were separated under displacement control. All tests exhibited crack propagation within the adhesive. Experimental analysis, analytical and finite element models of crack propagation along a cohesive patterned interface provided fundamental insights into the differences between the sinusoidally-patterned and flat DCBs observed in the experiments. For the sinusoidal DCBs, crack propagation is delayed relative to the flat DCBs and the peak load increases with A/λ. The sinusoidal DCBs induce intermittent crack extension that resembles “stick–slip” conditions with slow (stable) crack propagation and fast (unstable) crack propagation. The intermittent crack propagation is facilitated by the release of strain energy though the viscous response of the adhesive in a non-equilibrium “snapback” mechanism which enhances energy dissipation through the crack propagation process. Such release is also associated with a drop in the applied load leading to a serrated load–displacement behavior. The size of the fracture process zone also plays an important when it is comparable with the sinusoidal characteristic length scale. These results demonstrate that patterned adhesive joints can be substantially tougher than joints with no pattern.
Keywords: Sinusoidal interfaces; Double cantilever beam; Adhesive joint; Cohesive zone model; Crack propagation; Toughening

Yalew Zelalem Jembre, Young-June Choi, Beacon-based channel assignment and jammer mitigation for MANETs with multiple interfaces and multiple channels, Computer Communications, Volume 78, 15 March 2016, Pages 74-85, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comcom.2015.09.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366415003230)
Abstract: Abstract
The capability of accessing multiple channels through multiple interfaces improve network capacity and is desirable for future Mobile Ad-Hoc Networks (MANETs). However, due to the presence of jammers as well as mobility and ad-hoc features, MANETs require distributed and efficient resource management for channel assignment. To address the channel assignment problem, which is a non-deterministic polynomial-time hard (NP-hard) problem, we propose a heuristic algorithm called Channel Assignment and JAmmer Mitigation (CA-JAM). The CA-JAM algorithm assigns a distinct channel for every interface of one station, and then all stations exchange the assignment information through beacon frames on every individual interface. When one station receives a beacon, the station organizes the information into tables. Therefore, each station, distributively, uses the table to reduce the number of neighboring stations using the same channel to avoid interference which in turn improves the throughput. The tables are also used to learn the disconnected neighbors due to jamming so as to mitigate the effect of jamming and maintain connectivity. CA-JAM is fully distributed with no use of control channel or central entity; thus, it improves connectivity and reduces interference by balancing stations over the available channels while mitigating jamming effects from multi channel multi interface MANETs. We confirm that CA-JAM outperforms existing protocols using the OPNET simulator.
Keywords: Ad-hoc networks; Channel assignment; Multiple interfaces; Jamming

Jan Hess, David Randall, Volkmar Pipek, Volker Wulf, Involving users in the wild—Participatory product development in and with online communities, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 71, Issue 5, May 2013, Pages 570-589, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2013.01.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581913000074)
Abstract: In its traditional stance, participatory design (PD) is centred on certain work/application settings and is concerned with the involvement of representative users from these contexts. Nevertheless, current web technologies enable new forms of distributed participation which might allow PD processes to be implemented in a broader and flexible way, but may at the same time raise new issues in relation to participation. In this paper, we report on a Participatory Product Development project, using social technologies, where new issues were raised—a large population of heterogeneous and globally distributed users; a range of personal and institutional purposes, and the use of these technologies in a largely untested environment. We will reflect on insights that we gathered by through observation of and participation in a software development process driven and influenced by members of an existing online community. By means of participatory observation, analysis of the use of online tools and through semi- structured interviews we identified issues around different notions of timeliness and of process structures that are related to different roles, responsibilities and levels of experience. Our results indicate that the involvement of heterogeneous users in such a context needs to be handled carefully, for the reasons we set out. The role of user representatives acting for a broader online community can become crucial when managing heterogeneity, formulating acceptable compromises and- perhaps most crucially- dealing with different professional and ‘hobbyist’ worldviews. Additionally, we found that the use of standard web technologies only partly support online participation processes. PD ‘in the wild’ needs to be better embedded in use situations and environments (e.g., by linking discussion and design space, using feedback tools, continuous reflection of the current state of development) rather than refining participatory design as a meta-process separate from use.
Keywords: Participatory design; User-driven software development; End user development

Thiago do Nascimento Ferreira, Allysson Allex Araújo, Altino Dantas Basílio Neto, Jerffeson Teixeira de Souza, Incorporating user preferences in ant colony optimization for the next release problem, Applied Soft Computing, Available online 23 June 2016, ISSN 1568-4946, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.asoc.2016.06.027.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1568494616303076)
Abstract: Abstract
The selection of which requirements should be implemented in the next software release is an important and complex task in the software development process, considering the presence of budget constraints and other conflicting aspects. In this context, search based software engineering, has the main objective of applying automatic search methods to solve complex software engineering problems. However, most of these methods do not consider human expertise during the search, especially due to the difficulty in mathematically modeling the user's preferences. Consequently, the user can present some resistance or place little confidence in the final results, given that his/her knowledge and domain expertise was not properly considered in the solution construction. This paper aims at proposing an interactive model for the next release problem using ant colony optimization, where the user can define which requirements he/she would like to include or not in the next release. Employing humans and a simulator, an empirical study was performed that considers real-world and artificial instances. The achieved results demonstrate that the loss of score was, on average, 12% when it was compared with a solution with no human intervention. On the other hand, the algorithm generates solutions that have more than 80% of the met preferences, as defined by the users. Furthermore, the results showed that ACO can be an interesting choice as an interactive search engine, given the low quantity of interactions that are required to reach good solutions.
Keywords: Ant colony optimization; Interactive optimization; Next release problem; Search based software engineering

Kevin B. Bennett, Ecological interface design and system safety: One facet of Rasmussen's legacy, Applied Ergonomics, Available online 17 February 2016, ISSN 0003-6870, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apergo.2015.08.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0003687015300594)
Abstract: Abstract
The focus of this manuscript is on cognitive systems engineering/ecological interface design (CSE/EID) and the role that this framework may play in improving system safety. First, the decision making and problem solving literatures are reviewed with an eye towards informational needs that are required to support these activities. The utility of two of Rasmussen's analytical tools (i.e., the abstraction and aggregation hierarchies) in conducting work domain analyses to identify associated information (i.e., categories and relationships) is discussed. The importance of designing ecological displays and interfaces that span the informational categories in the abstraction hierarchy is described and concrete examples are provided. The potential role that ecological interfaces can play in providing effective decision making (i.e., preventing accidents) and problem solving (i.e., dealing with accidents) support, thereby improving the safety of our socio-technical systems, is explored.
Keywords: Safety; Ecological interface design; Work domain analysis

Wolfgang Treutterer, Richard Cole, Alexander Gräter, Klaus Lüddecke, Gregor Neu, Christopher Rapson, Gerhard Raupp, Thomas Zehetbauer, Configuration-defined control algorithms with the ASDEX Upgrade DCS, Fusion Engineering and Design, Available online 10 May 2016, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2016.04.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379616302885)
Abstract: Abstract
The ASDEX Upgrade Discharge Control System (DCS) is a distributed real-time control system executing complex control and monitoring tasks. Up to now, DCS control algorithms have been implemented by coding dedicated application processes with the C++ programming language. Algorithm changes required code modification, compilation and commissioning which only experienced programmers could perform. This was a significant constraint of flexibility for both control system operation and design.

The new approach extends DCS with the capability of configuration-defined control algorithms. These are composed of chains of small, configurable standard function blocks providing general purpose functions like algebraic operations, filters, feedback controllers, output limiters and decision logic. In a later phase a graphical editor could help to compose and modify such configuration in a Simulink-like fashion.

Building algorithms from standard functions can result in a high number of elements. In order to achieve a similar performance as with C++ coding, it is essential to avoid administrative bottlenecks by design. As a consequence, DCS executes a function block chain in the context of a single real-time thread of an application process. No concurrency issues as in a multi-threaded context need to be considered resulting in strongly simplified signal handling and zero performance overhead for inter-block communication. Instead of signal-driven synchronization, a block scheduler derives the execution sequence automatically from the block dependencies as defined in the configuration. All blocks and connecting signals are instantiated dynamically, based on definitions in a configuration file. Algorithms thus are not defined in the code but only in the configuration.

The concept has been developed in view of Simulink block libraries and MARTe General Application Modules (GAM) but extends these with the DCS virtues of distributed computing and multi-threading.

With growing diversity of general-purpose blocks the DCS framework will reach an unprecedented degree of universality and flexibility. Configuration-defined algorithms will gradually replace many existing DCS applications. Finally, the concept might also become of interest for the upcoming ITER plasma control system.
Keywords: Plasma control system; Function block; Configurable functionality; Multi-threading

Chris Tobkin and Daniel Kligerman, Chapter 3 - Using the Graphical Interface, In Check Point NG / AI, Syngress, Burlington, 2004, Pages 159-215, ISBN 9781932266894, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193226689-4/50025-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781932266894500253)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
After the installation and configuration of virtual private network (VPN)-1/Firewall (FW)-1, one can log into the graphical user interface (GUI) and start composing their objects and rule bases. This chapter discusses the graphical user-interface (GUI) provided for access to virtual private VPN-1/ FW-1. It describes the process to create each of the possible object types available for use within an enterprise security policy, including network objects, servers, and resources. The chapter discusses all of the options available for creating various objects and shows some of the features that can be utilized in theSmartDashboard to manipulate rules. These rules will be the embodiment of the written security policy and are the definitions that FW-1 enforces. The chapter also demonstrates the way FW-1 has included something called an “implied rule,” the way to edit them, and the way to view them. With regards to editing, the chapter also discusses the various methods of editing the rule base, including adding new rules, deleting existing ones, and rearranging the rule base with cut/paste functions.

Imran Rafiq Quadri, Abdoulaye Gamatié, Pierre Boulet, Samy Meftali, Jean-Luc Dekeyser, Expressing embedded systems configurations at high abstraction levels with UML MARTE profile: Advantages, limitations and alternatives, Journal of Systems Architecture, Volume 58, Issue 5, April 2012, Pages 178-194, ISSN 1383-7621, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.sysarc.2012.01.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1383762112000021)
Abstract: Embedded systems have become an essential aspect of our professional and personal lives. From avionics, transport and telecommunication systems to general commercial appliances such as smart phones, high definition TVs and gaming consoles; it is difficult to find a domain where these systems have not made their mark. Moreover, Systems-on-Chips (SoCs) which are considered as an integral solution for designing embedded systems, offer advantages such as run-time reconfiguration that can change system configurations during execution, depending upon Quality-of-Service (QoS) criteria such as performance and energy levels. This article deals with aspects related to modeling of these configurations, useful for describing various states of an embedded system, from both structural and operational viewpoints. Our proposal adapts a high abstraction level approach based on the principles of Model-Driven Engineering (MDE) and takes into account the UML MARTE profile for modeling of real-time and embedded systems. Elevating the design abstraction levels help to increase design productivity and achieve execution platform independence, among other advantages. The article details the current proposition of configurations in MARTE via some examples, and points out the advantages as well as some limitations, mainly concerning the semantic aspects of the defined concepts. Finally, we report our experiences on the modeling of an alternate notion of configurations and execution modes within the MARTE compliant Gaspard2 SoC Co-Design framework that has been successful for the design as well as implementation of FPGA based SoCs.
Keywords: Embedded systems; Systems-on-Chips (SoCs); High abstraction levels; MDE; UML; MARTE; Configurations; QoS

Sandeep R. Kondaveeti, Iman Izadi, Sirish L. Shah, Tim Black, Tongwen Chen, Graphical tools for routine assessment of industrial alarm systems, Computers & Chemical Engineering, Volume 46, 15 November 2012, Pages 39-47, ISSN 0098-1354, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compchemeng.2012.06.042.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098135412002268)
Abstract: Alarms are important for safe and reliable operation in process industries. Periodic alarm assessment is a crucial step in alarm management lifecycle that provides valuable feedback for fine tuning the alarm system. In this perspective tutorial, alarm data is represented using binary sequences and subsequently, two novel alarm data visualization tools are presented: (1) The High Density Alarm Plot (HDAP) charts top alarms over a given time period and (2) Alarm Similarity Color Map (ASCM) highlights related and redundant alarms in a convenient manner. The proposed graphical tools are instrumental in performance assessment of industrial alarm systems in terms of effectively identifying nuisance alarms such as chattering and related alarms based on routinely collected alarm event data. The special features and advantages of the proposed graphical tools are illustrated by successful application to two large scale industrial case studies, each involving over half a million observations for top fifty alarm tags.
Keywords: Alarm systems; Performance monitoring; Data visualization; Pattern recognition; Human–machine interface

Yi Chen, Bei Peng, Multi-objective optimization on multi-layer configuration of cathode electrode for polymer electrolyte fuel cells via computational-intelligence-aided design and engineering framework, Applied Soft Computing, Volume 43, June 2016, Pages 357-371, ISSN 1568-4946, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.asoc.2016.02.045.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1568494616300977)
Abstract: Abstract
Polymer electrolyte fuel cells (PEFCs) have attracted considerable interest within the research community due to the increasing demands for renewable energy. Within the PEFCs’ many components, a cathode electrode plays a primary function in the operation of the cell. Here, a computational-intelligence-aided design and engineering (CIAD/CIAE) framework with potential cross-disciplinary applications is proposed to minimize the over-potential difference η and improve the overall efficiency of PEFCs. A newly developed swarm dolphin algorithm is embedded in a computational-intelligence-integrated solver to optimize a triple-layer cathode electrode model. The simulation results demonstrate the potential application of the proposed CIAD/CIAE framework in the design automation and optimization of PEFCs.
Keywords: Fuel cell; Cathode electrode; CIAD; CIAE; Swarm dolphin algorithm

Andrew Lowe, Richard W. Jones, Michael J. Harrison, The graphical presentation of decision support information in an intelligent anaesthesia monitor, Artificial Intelligence in Medicine, Volume 22, Issue 2, May 2001, Pages 173-191, ISSN 0933-3657, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0933-3657(00)00106-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0933365700001068)
Abstract: This contribution examines the graphical presentation of decision support information generated by an intelligent monitor, named Sentinel, developed for use during anaesthesia. Clinicians make diagnoses in real-time during operations by examining clinically significant trends in multiple signals. Sentinel attempts to mimic this decision process by using a system of fuzzy trend templates. Sentinel’s implementation of fuzzy trend templates is capable of providing the dual fuzzy measures of belief and plausibility, which are derived from the theory of evidence. It is thus capable of generating fairly rich diagnostic decision support information. However, for Sentinel to be effective, the visual presentation of this information must be intuitive to the anaesthetist, who may not be familiar with the theory of evidence.

This paper discusses techniques that are being evaluated to meet the requirements of the Sentinel anaesthesia monitor. Specifically, the paper presents methods for highlighting clinically significant trends in physiological (or derived) signals by superimposing a coloured band on the signal that reflects fuzzy output from the intelligent monitor. This paper also discusses the intuitive graphical presentation of binary diagnostic fuzzy measures, including their further interpretation and presentation as crisp “alarm” and “warning” conditions.
Keywords: Intelligent anaesthesia monitoring; Fuzzy trend template; Graphical interface; Flame plot; Decision support

Fabrizio Memmi, Luca Falconi, Mauro Cappelli, Mario Palomba, Massimo Sepielli, A user-friendly, digital console for the control room parameters supervision in old-generation nuclear plants, Nuclear Engineering and Design, Volume 302, Part A, June 2016, Pages 12-19, ISSN 0029-5493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nucengdes.2016.03.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0029549316001230)
Abstract: Abstract
In this work a user-friendly, digital monitoring system for supervision of process variables coming from a fission nuclear reactor of TRIGA type (1-MW TRIGA reactor RC-1) is presented. The system, developed on the basis of COTS tools, can easily interface the control room instrumentation and display the typical monitoring parameters (e.g. nuclear power, temperatures, flow rates, radiological variables) in an intuitive, user-adjustable way for plant operators. A front panel of a virtual instrument allows for a direct measure while the acquisition system, for signals coming from the reactor, can process the data and generate a detailed representation of the results, whose statistics can be interpreted to optimize the reactor management parameters. This system has been also designed so as to include a simulation tool able to predict specific performances and investigate critical phenomena, and to optimize overall plant performances. In particular, it allows to have a feedback control and to perform several predictive statistical surveys of all main process parameters. The proposed system could help operators in training and continuous learning activities, and serve as a basis for an advanced decision support system and for a remote training tool for students and trainees not authorized to work in a radiation environment.

Tiefeng Wang, Xinyu Yu, Tianwen Chen, Qi Zhang, CFD simulations of quenching process for partial oxidation of methane: Comparison of jet-in-cross-flow and impinging flow configurations, Chinese Journal of Chemical Engineering, Available online 2 May 2016, ISSN 1004-9541, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cjche.2016.04.039.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1004954116300118)
Abstract: Abstract
A new quenching process using the cold pyrolysis gas has been proposed for the partial oxidation (POX) of methane to recover the heat. The mixing of hot product gas and cold pyrolysis gas in milliseconds is critical to this new approach. Two most widely-used rapid mixing configurations, i.e. the jet-in-cross-flow (JICF) and impinging flow configurations, are compared in terms of mixing and quenching performances using computational fluid dynamics (CFD) coupled with detailed reaction mechanism Leeds 1.5. The mixedness, residence time distribution, temperature decreasing rate and loss ratio of acetylene during the quenching are systematically studied. The results show that the impinging flow has a more uniform mixing and narrower residence time distribution than the JICF. However, the temperature decreasing rate of the mainstream is faster in the JICF than in the impinging flow. The loss ratio of acetylene in the quenching process is 2.89% for the JICF and 1.45% for the impinging flow, showing that the impinging flow configuration is better and feasible for the quenching of POX of methane.
Keywords: Jet-in-cross-flow; Impinging flow; CFD simulations; Mixing behavior; Quenching of partial oxidation process

Alexandre Fleury, Jakob Schou Pedersen, Lars Bo Larsen, Evaluating user preferences for video transfer methods from a mobile device to a TV screen, Pervasive and Mobile Computing, Volume 9, Issue 2, April 2013, Pages 228-241, ISSN 1574-1192, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pmcj.2012.05.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574119212000636)
Abstract: This article reports on the evaluation of four methods for transferring video content from a mobile device to a fixed television. The methods have been investigated in a Wizard-of-Oz approach through two consecutive studies. The first experiment aimed at collecting general opinions toward such a feature as well as preferences in terms of usability. In general, participants preferred methods that resemble already known interaction paradigms, and argued against the need of moving physically. From the comments collected in the first study, six potential indicators of preference were generated and investigated in a second experiment. The results indicate that familiarity, convenience and annoyance are strong predictors of the preference level of methods for transferring video content from a mobile- to a fixed device. A discussion and potential design guidelines are finally proposed.
Keywords: Smart phones; Television; Video; Content transfer; User study; Wizard-of-Oz

Hugo A.D. do Nascimento, Peter Eades, User Hints for map labeling, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 19, Issue 1, February 2008, Pages 39-74, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jvlc.2006.03.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X06000176)
Abstract: Cartography is one of the oldest forms of visualization. It has applications not only in geography but in many other science fields. A significant visual problem in cartography is the map-labeling problem, which consists of assigning positions for the labels of graphical features of a map so that these elements can be uniquely identified. Although much research has been done on map labeling, practical labeling processes still demand intensive manual work to produce high-quality solutions. One reasons for this is that the optimization problems associated with map labeling are NP-hard. More importantly, existing automatic labeling methods do not incorporate all kinds of domain knowledge that may be of interest for a cartographer. In the present paper, we describe an interactive framework for assisting cartographers in the map-labeling problem. We treat labeling processes as an optimization task, and support human interaction combined with fully automatic methods in a general framework that we call User Hints. An interactive map-labeling system based on the User Hints framework is presented, and an evaluation of such system with real experts in cartography is described. This evaluation shows that our interactive map-labeling framework is promising.
Keywords: Map labeling; Optimization; User interface; Visualization

Artem S. Bausk, Bruce I. Dvorak, Selecting the column configuration with lowest media replacement cost for small adsorption systems, Water Research, Volume 93, 15 April 2016, Pages 38-47, ISSN 0043-1354, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.watres.2016.01.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S004313541630015X)
Abstract: Abstract
A framework was developed for preliminary evaluation of the relative media replacement costs of three alternative column configurations used for adsorption systems with two vessels, such as those serving small systems. The media replacement cost is the cost of fresh media and the replacement service cost (including transportation, labor, and other non-material costs). Cost normalization methods were developed in part based on the data from US EPA Arsenic Treatment Technology Demonstration Program. Adsorption equilibrium and kinetics were modeled using the PSDM model and breakthrough curves were normalized using the target effluent to influent concentration ratio (C/Co) and the mass transfer zone fraction (%MTZBT). Two factors were found to be important for the relative replacement cost of each configuration – the frequency which at least one column needed replacement of media, and the cycle replacement cost (CRCost) which is a combination of the fresh media cost and the replacement service cost. The lead-lag configuration has the lowest annual replacement cost at low target C/Co, high %MTZBT, and high CRCost ratios. The parallel configuration performs better at high target C/Co, high %MTZBT, and high CRCost ratios. Although the single configuration (two columns operated in tandem and replaced simultaneously) has higher media consumption compared to lead-lag and parallel, it can result in the lowest replacement cost at short %MTZBT and very low CRCost ratios due to savings in the replacement service cost.
Keywords: Adsorption modeling; Operating costs; Small systems; Drinking water

G. Turemen, G. Unel, B. Yasatekin, A graphical approach to radio frequency quadrupole design, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 192, July 2015, Pages 108-113, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2015.03.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465515000879)
Abstract: Abstract
The design of a radio frequency quadrupole, an important section of all ion accelerators, and the calculation of its beam dynamics properties can be achieved using the existing computational tools. These programs, originally designed in 1980s, show effects of aging in their user interfaces and in their output. The authors believe there is room for improvement in both design techniques using a graphical approach and in the amount of analytical calculations before going into CPU burning finite element analysis techniques. Additionally an emphasis on the graphical method of controlling the evolution of the relevant parameters using the drag-to-change paradigm is bound to be beneficial to the designer. A computer code, named DEMIRCI, has been written in C + + to demonstrate these ideas. This tool has been used in the design of Turkish Atomic Energy Authority (TAEK)’s 1.5 MeV proton beamline at Saraykoy Nuclear Research and Training Center (SANAEM). DEMIRCI starts with a simple analytical model, calculates the RFQ behavior and produces 3D design files that can be fed to a milling machine. The paper discusses the experience gained during design process of SANAEM Project Prometheus (SPP) RFQ and underlines some of DEMIRCI’s capabilities.
Keywords: Radio frequency quadrupole; Physics; Particle accelerators; Cavity design; Accelerators and particle beams; Experimental methods and instrumentation for elementary-particle and nuclear physics; Accelerators; Linear accelerators

Surabhi Maheshwari, Michal Brylinski, Template-based identification of protein–protein interfaces using eFindSitePPI, Methods, Volume 93, 15 January 2016, Pages 64-71, ISSN 1046-2023, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ymeth.2015.07.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1046202315300384)
Abstract: Abstract
Protein–protein interactions orchestrate virtually all cellular processes, therefore, their exhaustive exploration is essential for the comprehensive understanding of cellular networks. A reliable identification of interfacial residues is vital not only to infer the function of individual proteins and their assembly into biological complexes, but also to elucidate the molecular and physicochemical basis of interactions between proteins. With the exponential growth of protein sequence data, computational approaches for detecting protein interface sites have drawn an increased interest. In this communication, we discuss the major features of eFindSitePPI, a recently developed template-based method for interface residue prediction available at http://brylinski.cct.lsu.edu/efindsiteppi. We describe the requirements and installation procedures for the stand-alone version, and explain the content and format of output data. Furthermore, the functionality of the eFindSitePPI web application that is designed to provide a simple and convenient access for the scientific community is presented with illustrative examples. Finally, we discuss common problems encountered in predicting protein interfaces and set forth directions for the future development of eFindSitePPI.
Keywords: Protein–protein interactions; Protein interface prediction; Interfacial residues; Protein models; eFindSitePPI

Yu Lu, Mehul Motani, Wai-Choong Wong, When Ambient Intelligence meets the Internet: User Module framework and its applications, Computer Networks, Volume 56, Issue 6, 19 April 2012, Pages 1763-1781, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comnet.2012.01.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128612000436)
Abstract: Advances in Ambient Intelligence (AmI) technologies, when combined with user-centric computing, present major opportunities for building new communication pathways between end-users and traditional computer networks. We propose to explicitly take the end-user into account by defining a new functional module called the User Module across the layers of the Internet protocol stack. This new User Module empowers end-users to improve network performance and enhance the end-user Quality of Experience (QoE) based on their interaction activities. To successfully capture the significant interaction information of end-users, we leverage on the well-established Human Information Processing approach to build the end-user model. Subsequently, we present two exemplary User Module applications addressing the Hypertext Transfer Protocol (HTTP) and the Transmission Control Protocol (TCP), respectively. Both applications illustrate how the User Module operates to effectively improve the underlying network performance and eventually enhance the end-user QoE.
Keywords: User centered design; User modeling; Computer networks; Protocols

Alistair Sutcliffe, Amal Alrayes, Investigating user experience in Second Life for collaborative learning, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 70, Issue 7, July 2012, Pages 508-525, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2012.01.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581912000262)
Abstract: Two studies on collaborative learning in Second Life are reported. The first is an ecological study of Second Life used in an undergraduate class, by observation, interviews, and limit surveys. Use of Second Life motivated students with good user experience, although they viewed it as a games technology. Second Life was used to prepare virtual meetings and presentations but not for online discussion, with Blackboard and especially Facebook providing collaborative support. In the second experimental study, the effectiveness and user experience with Second Life and Blackboard were compared, including a face-to-face control condition. There were no performance differences overall, although face-to-face was quicker and was preferred by users, followed by Blackboard and Second Life. Blackboard was perceived to be more usable, whereas Second Life provided a better user experience. Worst performance was indicated by dislike of avatar interaction in Second Life, and poor user experience in Blackboard, whereas better performance was associated with engagement with avatars, and better usability in Blackboard. The results of both studies are reviewed using Salmon's model for online learning, suggesting that Second Life helped motivation and socialisation stages, although integration with other technologies is necessary for knowledge construction. Preliminary guidelines are proposed for configuration and management of Second Life in collaborative learning. The affordances for collaboration in virtual worlds are discussed, with reflections on user experience and functional support provided by Second Life, as an exemplar of a virtual world for collaborative learning support.
Keywords: Collaborative problem solving and learning; User experience; Affordances

Tuuli Keskinen, Tomi Heimonen, Markku Turunen, Juha-Pekka Rajaniemi, Sami Kauppinen, SymbolChat: A flexible picture-based communication platform for users with intellectual disabilities, Interacting with Computers, Volume 24, Issue 5, September 2012, Pages 374-386, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2012.06.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543812000616)
Abstract: Persons with intellectual disabilities benefit from participating in the modern information society, especially the World Wide Web, social media and Internet-mediated communication services. Although several computer-based prototypes and commercial systems have been introduced for accessible in-person communication, currently few applications and services exist to support synchronous remote communication for this user group. We introduce SymbolChat, a software platform that supports the creation of multimodal communication applications utilizing picture-based instant messaging. End users and their support personnel can customize the input and output features of the application based on their individual needs and abilities. The interaction is based on touchscreen input and speech output using speech synthesis technology. The SymbolChat platform was developed together with the prospective end users and practitioners in the field of special needs care.

We evaluated the prototype application in a field study with nine users with varying degrees of intellectual and other disabilities. The results clearly indicate that the participants were able to express themselves in spontaneous communication using a large-scale picture-based vocabulary (around 2000 symbols) even without prior training in the use of symbols. This finding was supported in the constructive feedback gathered from professionals working in the area. We also successfully applied methodology from other settings, such as child-computer interaction to evaluate interaction in this challenging context.

Overall, the results show that social inclusion for people with intellectual disabilities can be improved with customizable communication tools. The implemented communication platform forms a solid basis for further improvements and new communication services. In addition, we found that users with motor impairments would greatly benefit from alternative input and output methods for symbol browsing and selection.
Keywords: Picture-based communication; Instant messaging; Augmentative and alternative communication; User-centered design

Kathrin Friedrich, Digital ‘faces’ of synthetic biology, Studies in History and Philosophy of Science Part C: Studies in History and Philosophy of Biological and Biomedical Sciences, Volume 44, Issue 2, June 2013, Pages 217-224, ISSN 1369-8486, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.shpsc.2013.03.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1369848613000319)
Abstract: Abstract
In silicio design plays a fundamental role in the endeavour to synthesise biological systems. In particular, computer-aided design software enables users to manage the complexity of biological entities that is connected to their construction and reconfiguration. The software’s graphical user interface bridges the gap between the machine-readable data on the algorithmic subface of the computer and its human-amenable surface represented by standardised diagrammatic elements. Notations like the Systems Biology Graphical Notation (SBGN), together with interactive operations such as drag &amp; drop, allow the user to visually design and simulate synthetic systems as ‘bio-algorithmic signs’. Finally, the digital programming process should be extended to the wet lab to manufacture the designed synthetic biological systems. By exploring the different ‘faces’ of synthetic biology, I argue that in particular computer-aided design (CAD) is pushing the idea to automatically produce de novo objects. Multifaceted software processes serve mutually aesthetic, epistemic and performative purposes by simultaneously black-boxing and bridging different data sources, experimental operations and community-wide standards. So far, synthetic biology is mainly a product of digital media technologies that structurally mimic the epistemological challenge to take both qualitative as well as quantitative aspects of biological systems into account in order to understand and produce new and functional entities.
Keywords: Computer-Aided Design; Software; Diagrams; Graphical User Interface; Visual Programming

Hagen Meckel, Christian Stephan, Christian Bunse, Michael Krafzik, Christopher Reher, Michael Kohl, Helmut Erich Meyer, Martin Eisenacher, The amino acid's backup bone — Storage solutions for proteomics facilities, Biochimica et Biophysica Acta (BBA) - Proteins and Proteomics, Volume 1844, Issue 1, Part A, January 2014, Pages 2-11, ISSN 1570-9639, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.bbapap.2013.05.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1570963913002264)
Abstract: Abstract
Proteomics methods, especially high-throughput mass spectrometry analysis have been continually developed and improved over the years. The analysis of complex biological samples produces large volumes of raw data. Data storage and recovery management pose substantial challenges to biomedical or proteomic facilities regarding backup and archiving concepts as well as hardware requirements. In this article we describe differences between the terms backup and archive with regard to manual and automatic approaches. We also introduce different storage concepts and technologies from transportable media to professional solutions such as redundant array of independent disks (RAID) systems, network attached storages (NAS) and storage area network (SAN). Moreover, we present a software solution, which we developed for the purpose of long-term preservation of large mass spectrometry raw data files on an object storage device (OSD) archiving system. Finally, advantages, disadvantages, and experiences from routine operations of the presented concepts and technologies are evaluated and discussed. This article is part of a Special Issue entitled: Computational Proteomics in the Post-Identification Era. Guest Editors: Martin Eisenacher and Christian Stephan.
Keywords: Bioinformatics infrastructure; Information technology; Data archive; Data backup; Storage attached network; Storage redundancy

N.A. Morley, R. Dost, A.S.V. Lingam, A.J. Barlow, Investigations of the polymer/magnetic interface of organic spin-valves, Applied Surface Science, Volume 359, 30 December 2015, Pages 704-713, ISSN 0169-4332, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apsusc.2015.10.209.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169433215026392)
Abstract: Abstract
This work investigates the top interface of an organic spin-valve, to determine the interactions between the polymer and top magnetic electrode. The polymers studied are regio-regular poly(3-hexylthiophene) (RR-P3HT) and poly(2,5-bis(3-hexadecylthiophen-2-yl)thieno[3,2-b]thiophene (PBTTT) and the magnetic top electrodes are NiFe and Fe. X-ray photoelectron spectroscopy (XPS) is used to determine the bonding at the interface, along with the extent of how oxidised the magnetic layers are, while atomic force microscopy (AFM) is used to determine the surface roughness. A magneto-optic Kerr effect (MOKE) magnetometer is used to study the magnetic properties of the top electrode. It is shown that at the organic–magnetic interface the magnetic atoms interact with the polymer, as metallic–sulphide and metallic-carbide species are present at the interface. It is also shown that the structure of the polymer influences the anisotropy of the magnetic electrode, such that the magnetic electrodes grown on RR-P3HT have uniaxial anisotropy, while those grown on PBTTT are isotropic.
Keywords: Organic spintronics; Interfaces; XPS; Chemical bonding

I-Jen Chen, Nicolas Foloppe, Tackling the conformational sampling of larger flexible compounds and macrocycles in pharmacology and drug discovery, Bioorganic & Medicinal Chemistry, Volume 21, Issue 24, 15 December 2013, Pages 7898-7920, ISSN 0968-0896, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.bmc.2013.10.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0968089613008596)
Abstract: Abstract
Computational conformational sampling underpins much of molecular modeling and design in pharmaceutical work. The sampling of smaller drug-like compounds has been an active area of research. However, few studies have tested in details the sampling of larger more flexible compounds, which are also relevant to drug discovery, including therapeutic peptides, macrocycles, and inhibitors of protein–protein interactions. Here, we investigate extensively mainstream conformational sampling methods on three carefully curated compound sets, namely the ‘Drug-like’, larger ‘Flexible’, and ‘Macrocycle’ compounds. These test molecules are chemically diverse with reliable X-ray protein-bound bioactive structures. The compared sampling methods include Stochastic Search and the recent LowModeMD from MOE, all the low-mode based approaches from MacroModel, and MD/LLMOD recently developed for macrocycles. In addition to default settings, key parameters of the sampling protocols were explored. The performance of the computational protocols was assessed via (i) the reproduction of the X-ray bioactive structures, (ii) the size, coverage and diversity of the output conformational ensembles, (iii) the compactness/extendedness of the conformers, and (iv) the ability to locate the global energy minimum. The influence of the stochastic nature of the searches on the results was also examined. Much better results were obtained by adopting search parameters enhanced over the default settings, while maintaining computational tractability. In MOE, the recent LowModeMD emerged as the method of choice. Mixed torsional/low-mode from MacroModel performed as well as LowModeMD, and MD/LLMOD performed well for macrocycles. The low-mode based approaches yielded very encouraging results with the flexible and macrocycle sets. Thus, one can productively tackle the computational conformational search of larger flexible compounds for drug discovery, including macrocycles.
Keywords: Bioactive structures; Conformational sampling; Computational chemistry; Drug discovery; Flexible compounds; Global energy minimum; Low-mode; Macrocycles

P. Packo, T. Bielak, A.B. Spencer, T. Uhl, W.J. Staszewski, K. Worden, T. Barszcz, P. Russek, K. Wiatr, Numerical simulations of elastic wave propagation using graphical processing units—Comparative study of high-performance computing capabilities, Computer Methods in Applied Mechanics and Engineering, Volume 290, 15 June 2015, Pages 98-126, ISSN 0045-7825, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cma.2015.03.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0045782515000912)
Abstract: Abstract
High-performance computing is important in many areas of engineering. Increasing capabilities of modern workstations open new possibilities in scientific computing. This paper demonstrates how graphical processing units can be used efficiently for large models of elastic wave propagation in complex media. The method is based on the local interaction simulation approach and a parallel algorithm architecture. The focus of the work presented is on numerical implementation and covers aspects related to software modular architecture, computer memory organisation and optimisation. A domain decomposition approach allowing for calculations using multiple-GPU configurations is proposed, implemented and examined. The performance of the proposed simulation framework is tested for numerical models of different sizes, various computing precisions and hardware platforms. The results obtained are discussed in terms of graphical processing unit limitations. Obtained results indicate significant speed-up factors comparing to calculations using central processing units or different modelling approaches.
Keywords: CUDA; Parallel processing; Wave propagation; LISA

P. Aricò, G. Borghini, G. Di Flumeri, A. Colosimo, S. Pozzi, F. Babiloni, Chapter 10 - A passive brain–computer interface application for the mental workload assessment on professional air traffic controllers during realistic air traffic control tasks, In: Damien Coyle, Editor(s), Progress in Brain Research, Elsevier, 2016, Volume 228, Pages 295-328, ISSN 0079-6123, ISBN 9780128042168, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/bs.pbr.2016.04.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0079612316300474)
Abstract: Abstract
In the last decades, it has been a fast-growing concept in the neuroscience field. The passive brain–computer interface (p-BCI) systems allow to improve the human–machine interaction (HMI) in operational environments, by using the covert brain activity (eg, mental workload) of the operator. However, p-BCI technology could suffer from some practical issues when used outside the laboratories. In particular, one of the most important limitations is the necessity to recalibrate the p-BCI system each time before its use, to avoid a significant reduction of its reliability in the detection of the considered mental states. The objective of the proposed study was to provide an example of p-BCIs used to evaluate the users’ mental workload in a real operational environment. For this purpose, through the facilities provided by the École Nationale de l’Aviation Civile of Toulouse (France), the cerebral activity of 12 professional air traffic control officers (ATCOs) has been recorded while performing high realistic air traffic management scenarios. By the analysis of the ATCOs’ brain activity (electroencephalographic signal—EEG) and the subjective workload perception (instantaneous self-assessment) provided by both the examined ATCOs and external air traffic control experts, it has been possible to estimate and evaluate the variation of the mental workload under which the controllers were operating. The results showed (i) a high significant correlation between the neurophysiological and the subjective workload assessment, and (ii) a high reliability over time (up to a month) of the proposed algorithm that was also able to maintain high discrimination accuracies by using a low number of EEG electrodes (~ 3 EEG channels). In conclusion, the proposed methodology demonstrated the suitability of p-BCI systems in operational environments and the advantages of the neurophysiological measures with respect to the subjective ones.
Keywords: Passive brain–computer interface; Augmented cognition; Air traffic management; Electroencephalogram; Mental workload; Automatic-stop stepwise linear discriminant analysis; Stepwise linear discriminant analysis; Instantaneous self-assessment; Human factor; Neuroergonomic

Sreedevi Sampath, Chapter 3 - Advances in User-Session-Based Testing of Web Applications, In: Ali Hurson and Atif Memon, Editor(s), Advances in Computers, Elsevier, 2012, Volume 86, Pages 87-108, ISSN 0065-2458, ISBN 9780123965356, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-396535-6.00003-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978012396535600003X)
Abstract: With the increased use of web applications their reliability is an important concern. Software testing is one mechanism by which the system’s reliability can be assessed. One particular testing method, called user-session-based testing harnesses usage data of web applications to create test cases. User-session-based testing has the advantage of being able to detect faults that end-users encounter with minimal configuration changes to the web application. In this chapter, the different applications of user-session-based testing in the literature are presented. This form of testing is most relevant during regression testing, and thus, the different applications of user-session-based testing focus on regression testing components, such a test suite reduction, test case prioritization, and test case repair. The tools and frameworks available for user-session-based testing are also discussed.
Keywords: Software testing; Web applications; User-session-based testing; Test suite reduction; Test case prioritization; Test case generation; Test suite repair; Tools for testing web applications

Effie Lai-Chong Law, Xu Sun, Evaluating user experience of adaptive digital educational games with Activity Theory, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 70, Issue 7, July 2012, Pages 478-497, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2012.01.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581912000304)
Abstract: Adaptive digital educational games (DEGs) providing players with relevant interventions can enhance gameplay experience. This advance in game design, however, renders the user experience (UX) evaluation of DEGs even more challenging. To tackle this challenge, we developed a four-dimension evaluation framework (i.e., gaming experience, learning experience, adaptivity, and usability) and applied it to an empirical study with a DEG on teaching geography. Mixed-method approaches were adopted to collect data with 16 boys aged 10–11. Specifically, a so-called Dyadic User Experience Tests (DUxT) was employed; participants were paired up to assume different roles during gameplay. Learning efficacy was evaluated with a pre-post intervention measurement using a domain-specific questionnaire. Learning experience, gaming experiences and usability were evaluated with intensive in situ observations and interviews guided by a multidimensional scheme; content analysis of these transcribed audio data was supplemented by video analysis. Effectiveness of adaptivity algorithms was planned to be evaluated with automatic logfiles, which, unfortunately, could not be realised due to some technical problem. Nonetheless, the user-based data could offer some insights into this issue. Furthermore, we attempted to bridge the existing gap in UX research – the lack of theoretical frameworks in understanding user experience – by adopting Engeström's (1987) extended framework of Activity Theory (AT) that provides contextual information essential for understanding contradictions and breakdowns observed in the interactions between the game players. The dyadic gameplay setting allows us to explore the issue of group UX. Implications for further applications of the AT framework in the UX research, especially the interplay between evaluation and redesign (i.e., downstream utility of UX evaluation methods), are discussed.
Keywords: User experience; Digital educational game; Adaptivity; Usability; Activity Theory; Contradictions; Breakdowns; Downstream utility

M.M. Khan, A.D. Rast, J. Navaridas, X. Jin, L.A. Plana, M. Luján, S. Temple, C. Patterson, D. Richards, J.V. Woods, J. Miguel-Alonso, S.B. Furber, Event-driven configuration of a neural network CMP system over an homogeneous interconnect fabric, Parallel Computing, Volume 37, Issue 8, August 2011, Pages 392-409, ISSN 0167-8191, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.parco.2011.02.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167819111000160)
Abstract: Configuring a million-core parallel system at boot time is a difficult process when the system has neither specialised hardware support for the configuration process nor a preconfigured default state that puts it in operating condition. The architecture of SpiNNaker, a parallel chip multiprocessor (CMP) system for neural network simulation, is in this class. To function as a universal neural chip, SpiNNaker uses an event-driven model with complete system virtualisation so that all components are generic and identical. Where most large CMP systems feature a sideband network to complete the boot process, SpiNNaker has a single homogeneous network interconnect for both application inter-processor communications and system control functions. This network improves fault tolerance and makes it easier to support dynamic run-time reconfiguration, however, it requires a boot process compatible with the application’s communications model. Here, we present such a boot loader, capable of bringing a generic, initially unconfigured parallel system into a working configuration. Since SpiNNaker uses event-driven asynchronous communications throughout, the loader operates with purely local control: there is no global synchronisation, state information, or transition sequence. A novel two-stage “unfolding” boot-up process efficiently configures the SpiNNaker hardware and loads the application using a high-speed flood-fill technique with support for run-time reconfiguration. SystemC simulation of a multi-CMP SpiNNaker system indicates an error-free CMP configuration time of ∼1.37 ms, while a high-level simulation of a full-scale system (64 K CMPs) indicates a mean application-loading time of ∼20 ms (for a 100 KB application), which is virtually independent of the size of the system. Further hardware-level Verilog simulation verified the cycle-accurate functionality of CMP configuration. The complete process illustrates a useful method for configuring large-scale event-driven parallel systems without having to provide dedicated hardware boot support or rely on system state assumptions.
Keywords: Chip multiprocessor; Configuration; Asynchronous; Boot; Neural; Network

Stormy Attaway, Chapter 13 - Sights and Sounds, In Matlab (Third Edition), Butterworth-Heinemann, Boston, 2013, Pages 419-460, ISBN 9780124058767, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-405876-7.00013-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124058767000134)
Abstract: Abstract
The MATLAB® product has functions that manipulate audio or sound files, and also images. This chapter will start with a brief introduction to some of the sound processing functions. Image processing functions will be introduced, and the two basic methods for representing color in images will be explained. Finally, this chapter will introduce the topic of graphical user interfaces from a programming standpoint.
Keywords: Sound files; image processing; colormaps; graphical user interfaces; GUIs

Frédéric Jarlier, Angelo Arleo, Géraldine H. Petit, Julie M. Lefort, Céline Fouquet, Eric Burguière, Laure Rondi-Reig, A Navigation Analysis Tool (NAT) to assess spatial behavior in open-field and structured mazes, Journal of Neuroscience Methods, Volume 215, Issue 2, 15 May 2013, Pages 196-209, ISSN 0165-0270, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jneumeth.2013.02.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0165027013000927)
Abstract: Abstract
Spatial navigation calls upon mnemonic capabilities (e.g. remembering the location of a rewarding site) as well as adaptive motor control (e.g. fine tuning of the trajectory according to the ongoing sensory context). To study this complex process by means of behavioral measurements it is necessary to quantify a large set of meaningful parameters on multiple time scales (from milliseconds to several minutes), and to compare them across different paradigms. Moreover, the issue of automating the behavioral analysis is critical to cope with the consequent computational load and the sophistication of the measurements. We developed a general purpose Navigation Analysis Tool (NAT) that provides an integrated architecture consisting of a data management system (implemented in MySQL), a core analysis toolbox (in MATLAB), and a graphical user interface (in JAVA). Its extensive characterization of trajectories over time, from exploratory behavior to goal-oriented navigation with decision points using a wide range of parameters, makes NAT a powerful analysis tool. In particular, NAT supplies a new set of specific measurements assessing performances in multiple intersection mazes and allowing navigation strategies to be discriminated (e.g. in the starmaze). Its user interface enables easy use while its modular organization provides many opportunities of extension and customization. Importantly, the portability of NAT to any type of maze and environment extends its exploitation far beyond the field of spatial navigation.
Keywords: Spatial behavior; Navigation strategies; Goal-oriented behavior; Decision point analysis; Automated statistical analysis; MATLAB analysis toolbox; MySQL relational database; JAVA graphical user interface; Open source software

P. Gonçalves, G.D. Putnik, M. Cunha and R. Sousa, User-interface Architectures for VE Dynamic Reconfiguration: An Initial Analysis, In Intelligent Production Machines and Systems, Elsevier Science Ltd, Oxford, 2006, Pages 150-157, ISBN 9780080451572, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-008045157-2/50032-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780080451572500328)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
In order to achieve and to manage the virtual enterprise (VE) dynamic reconfiguration, it is necessary to minimize the VE reconfiguration time, as one of the dynamic reconfiguration factors. The chapter discusses the concept of the two user interface architectures, based on the BM_Virtual Enterprise Architecture Reference Model (BM-VEARM), and their role in VE operations: the “direct” communication architecture (DCA) and the “virtual” communication architecture (VCA) as well as an implementation. The developed implementation is based on basic available technologies capable of representing the phenomena. The DCA implementation consists of face-to-face communication through the MSN Messenger. The end-user can hear and see an interlocutor on the computer screen. The VCA is based on a MS Agent technology interface. The end-user cannot see or hear the human interlocutor because he is “masked” by one of the chosen software agents. In the application, called e-Mask, the end-user always sees the same software agent/mask and hears the same voice (mask's). It is expected that the set-up time, that is, the end-user adaptation time, will be similar with or without a change in the interlocutor during a conversation when using the VCA. A comparison of the two proposed architectures is presented.

M. Semprini, F. Boi and A. Vato, Chapter 14 - Bidirectional Brain–Machine Interfaces, In Closed Loop Neuroscience, edited by Ahmed El Hady,, Academic Press, San Diego, 2016, Pages 201-212, ISBN 9780128024522, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-802452-2.00014-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128024522000147)
Abstract: Abstract
Brain–machine interface (BMI) systems establish a connection between the brain and artificial devices, such as a computer, a wheelchair, or a robotic arm, with the main goal of restoring lost sensory or motor functions in patients suffering from neurological injuries or diseases. A possible way of improving the performance of BMIs is to establish a two-way artificial bidirectional channel by integrating and exchanging online motor and sensory information in a closed-loop stream between the nervous system and the controlled device. In this chapter we first describe the essential components of a typical BMI providing an overview of the existing systems, and we then report a novel closed-loop bidirectional BMI developed in our laboratory.
Keywords: Brain–machine interface; Closed loop; Decoding; Intracortical microstimulation; Neuroprosthesis

, Chapter 13 - Using the Graphical Interface, In The Best Damn Firewall Book Period, edited by Anne Carasik-Henmi, Thomas W. Shinder, , Cherie Amon, , Robert J. Shimonski, and Debra Littlejohn Shinder, Syngress, Burlington, 2003, Pages 491-527, ISBN 9781931836906, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183690-6/50054-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836906500546)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter provides an explanation to use the graphical interface. The chapter explores the process to create each of the possible object types available for use within enterprise security policy. This includes network objects, as well as servers and resources. The chapter also also explores the policy editor, and reveals how to use these newly created objects to create rules. These rules are the embodiment of one's written security policy, and are the definitions that FW-1 enforces. This chapter reveals how FW-1 has included something called an implied rule, how to edit them, and how to view them. Discussing editing, this chapter covers the various methods of editing rule base, including adding new rules, deleting existing ones, and rearranging the rule base with cut/paste functions.

Denis R. Kasimov, Aleksandr V. Kuchuganov, Valeriy N. Kuchuganov, Individual strategies in the tasks of graphical retrieval of technical drawings, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 28, June 2015, Pages 134-146, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jvlc.2014.12.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X14001736)
Abstract: Abstract
A designer׳s information need can have a lot of finer points not expressible completely by textual attributes or global aggregated image features. The purpose of the study is to develop a cognitive environment for content-based engineering drawing retrieval, allowing a user to concretize queries, to implement strategies that are most effective for the current search task. We propose meaningful customizable graphic search patterns, various comparison modes and visualization of matched elements. The presented experiments show that the approach yields good results in the sense of relevance and is comfortable in terms of controllability. The possibility to customize search patterns can result in improving retrieval precision by 10–15%. In practice, it can significantly increase the degree of automation of the design-reuse process.
Keywords: Technical drawing; Content-based retrieval; Matching graphs; Search strategy

Jian Yu, Quan Z. Sheng, Jun Han, Yanbo Wu, Chengfei Liu, A semantically enhanced service repository for user-centric service discovery and management, Data & Knowledge Engineering, Volume 72, February 2012, Pages 202-218, ISSN 0169-023X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.datak.2011.10.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169023X11001443)
Abstract: User centricity represents a new trend in the currently flourishing service oriented computing era. By upgrading end-users to prosumers (producer + consumer) and involving them in the process of service creation, both service consumers and service providers can benefit from a cheaper, faster, and better service provisioning. The EU-IST research project OPUCE (Open Platform for User-Centric Service Creation and Execution) aims at building a unique service environment by integrating recent advances in networking, communication and information technology where personalized services can be dynamically created and managed by prosumers. This paper particularly discusses the design and development of a service repository, which is at the very core of the OPUCE platform. The repository consists of two main components: a fully functioned XML registry supporting facet-based access to service descriptions, and a novel semantic service browser that supports prosumers who are not technically experienced to explore and discover services in an intuitive and visualized manner. We demonstrate the benefits of our design by conducting usability and performance studies.
Keywords: Service repository; User-centricity; Service ontology; Semantic services; Visualized service discovery

Yan Zhang, Jin Shi, Tian Zhang, Xiangwei Liu, Zhuzhong Qian, Modeling and checking for Cyber–Physical System based on hybrid interface automata, Pervasive and Mobile Computing, Volume 24, December 2015, Pages 179-193, ISSN 1574-1192, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pmcj.2015.07.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574119215001467)
Abstract: Abstract
Cyber–Physical Systems (CPS) are hybrid, safety-critical systems. For finding safety or security hazard in the design phase, modeling for CPS and checking their properties become very important. We focus on the compatibility, i.e., two systems can work together, and behavioral nonexistent consistency, i.e., forbidden behaviors do not occur in a system. Hybrid interface automata (HIA), which extend from interface automata and is not input-enabled, are introduced to model CPS. The compatibility of HIA is checked under an optimistic approach, which means if there is an environment in which two HIA cannot reach an illegal location, namely, at the location one cannot accept the input send by the other, they are compatible. Based on a scenario that specifies forbidden behaviors, behavioral nonexistent consistency is boundedly checked by transforming it to an unconstrained dynamic programming, and solving the programming by a genetic algorithm. The method can directly apply to nonlinear hybrid model. It relaxes a restriction on the form of the system dynamic in traditional algorithms. An experiment and simulation validate our algorithms.
Keywords: Cyber–Physical System; Hybrid system; Hybrid interface automaton; Scenario; Genetic algorithm

Z.R. Ardebili, F. Manenti, Process Simulation: When Programming is Easier Than User-Friendly Packages, Procedia Engineering, Volume 42, 2012, Pages 1514-1519, ISSN 1877-7058, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.proeng.2012.07.544.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877705812029517)
Abstract: This paper presents the comparison of progress trends between the use of programming languages with all its complications for user and commercial packages despite of its ease to application, as well, limitations and obstacles, which could face in simulation procedure. Besides, the aim of this study is to show in practice the opposite derivative trends in chemical engineering education for undergraduate and graduate students.
Keywords: Programming; commercial process simulation; user-friendly package; chemical engineering

Jai Myun Jung, Jung Gi Kim, Marat I. Latypov, Hyoung Seop Kim, Effect of the interfacial condition on the microtexture near the interface of Al/Cu composites during multi-pass caliber rolling, Materials & Design, Volume 82, 5 October 2015, Pages 28-36, ISSN 0264-1275, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.matdes.2015.05.025.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S026130691500271X)
Abstract: Abstract
The local microtexture developments of Cu near the interface of Al-core/Cu-sheath composites during multi-pass caliber rolling are investigated using the finite element method in conjunction with a visco-plastic self-consistent model. Two models with different interfacial conditions between Al and Cu are used in order to investigate the effect of the interfacial condition. The resulting inverse pole figures and difference in ODFs for the different numbers of caliber rolling passes indicate that the Coulomb frictional contact condition between Al and Cu represents the final microtextures better than the fully bonded interfacial condition.
Keywords: Caliber rolling; Core/sheath composite; Interface texture; Finite element method; Visco-plastic self-consistent model

Shady Attia, Mohamed Hamdy, William O’Brien, Salvatore Carlucci, Assessing gaps and needs for integrating building performance optimization tools in net zero energy buildings design, Energy and Buildings, Volume 60, May 2013, Pages 110-124, ISSN 0378-7788, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.enbuild.2013.01.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378778813000339)
Abstract: This paper summarizes a study undertaken to reveal potential challenges and opportunities for integrating optimization tools in net zero energy buildings (NZEB) design. The paper reviews current trends in simulation-based building performance optimization (BPO) and outlines major criteria for optimization tools selection and evaluation. This is based on analyzing user's needs for tools capabilities and requirement specifications. The review is carried out by means of a literature review of 165 publications and interviews with 28 optimization experts. The findings are based on an inter-group comparison between experts. The aim is to assess the gaps and needs for integrating BPO tools in NZEB design. The findings indicate a breakthrough in using evolutionary algorithms in solving highly constrained envelope, HVAC and renewable optimization problems. Simple genetic algorithm solved many design and operation problems and allowed measuring the improvement in the optimality of a solution against a base case. Evolutionary algorithms are also easily adapted to enable them to solve a particular optimization problem more effectively. However, existing limitations including model uncertainty, computation time, difficulty of use and steep learning curve. Some future directions anticipated or needed for improvement of current tools are presented.
Keywords: Simulation-based optimization; Zero energy buildings; Evolutionary algorithms; Needs; Gaps; Review; Interview

Maria Nilsson, Joeri van Laere, Tarja Susi, Tom Ziemke, Information fusion in practice: A distributed cognition perspective on the active role of users, Information Fusion, Volume 13, Issue 1, January 2012, Pages 60-78, ISSN 1566-2535, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.inffus.2011.01.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1566253511000066)
Abstract: Traditionally, the focus of most information fusion research has been on computational aspects, as illustrated by, for example, different versions of the JDL data fusion model. Consequently, the human user has mainly been conceived as a relatively passive recipient of fused information. However, the importance of understanding the active role of human information processing in information fusion is gaining increasing recognition, as also reflected in discussions of a ”level 5” in the JDL model. This paper presents a case study of the interaction between human and machine information processing in a maritime surveillance control room. A detailed analysis of cognitive processes and information flows involved in identifying and tracking moving vessels illustrates how machines and human operators collaboratively perform fusion in a highly distributed fashion. The theoretical framework of distributed cognition provides an alternative or complementary way of analysing information fusion systems/processes that more clearly reveals the actual complexities of the interaction between human and machine information processing in practice.
Keywords: Human–computer interaction; Human factors; Distributed cognition; Maritime surveillance; User-fusion; User refinement

Anett Spring, Marc Lewerentz, Torsten Bluhm, Peter Heimann, Christine Hennig, Georg Kühner, Hugo Kroiss, Johannes G. Krom, Heike Laqua, Josef Maier, Heike Riemann, Jörg Schacht, Andreas Werner, Manfred Zilker, A W7-X experiment program editor––A usage driven development, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 87, Issue 12, December 2012, Pages 1954-1957, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2012.05.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379612002943)
Abstract: The set-up of experiment programs for the complex fusion device Wendelstein 7-X has to define a multitude of parameters which have to obey large number of rules arising from physics and technical constraints. Since this is hard to automate as long as the dependencies are not known sufficiently, the W7-X CoDaC team decided to implement an editor following a constructive approach: starting from an established experiment program the user is able to modify parts of it – thus complying the usual workflow of experimenters.

Already the very first implementation has been deployed at the W7-X CoDaC prototype, the WEGA stellarator. Driven by agile programming principles the weighting of the requirements has been influenced by the editor usage in the daily experiment routine, thus ensuring client-oriented development steps and short release cycles. At present, a stable program editor implementation with graphical preview, immediate feedback on user actions and instantaneous warnings about incorrect settings is under continuous operation at the CoDaC prototype. It has potential to improve together with growing knowledge about the physical and technical constraints. The experiences gained give certainty that the editor is suitable for future use during the start-up phase and the first years of W7-X operation.
Keywords: Wendelstein 7-X; Program editor; Graphical user interface; Segment control; High level parameters; Hierarchical component model

Gianluca Marchi, Claudio Giachetti, Pamela de Gennaro, Extending lead-user theory to online brand communities: The case of the community Ducati, Technovation, Volume 31, Issue 8, August 2011, Pages 350-361, ISSN 0166-4972, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.technovation.2011.04.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166497211000599)
Abstract: While research on user innovations within communities exists mainly in offline contexts, few studies have attempted to define the profile of lead users in online (or virtual) communities, and even fewer have been conducted in the specific context of online brand communities, formed by people with a “common interest in a brand,” in its evolution and in the discourse about it. This study focuses on innovative activities within the Ducati Motor online community. The research reveals the following characteristics as crucial factors for the identification of lead users in online brand communities: willingness to collaborate, product knowledge and strategic alignment with the brand identity. Our sample consists of 2071 messages posted by 572 Ducati Motor virtual community members in a specific blog developed by Ducati Motor with the purpose of involving members in a collaborative innovation process that took nearly 14 months. Several implications for scholars and new product development managers are discussed.
Keywords: Lead user; Online brand community; User innovation

O. Bourrion, B. Boyer, L. Derome, UCTM: A user friendly configurable trigger, scaler and delay module for nuclear and particle physics, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 665, 11 February 2011, Pages 48-53, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nima.2011.11.066.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168900211021310)
Abstract: A configurable trigger scaler and delay NIM module has been designed to equip nuclear physics experiments and lab teaching classes. It is configurable through a Graphical User Interface (GUI) and provides a large number of possible trigger conditions without any Hardware Description Language (HDL) required knowledge. The design, performances and typical applications are presented.
Keywords: Trigger; User configurable; Teaching classes

Yoshiyuki Kido, Kohei Ichikawa, Susumu Date, Yasuhiro Watashiba, Hirotake Abe, Hiroaki Yamanaka, Eiji Kawai, Haruo Takemura, Shinji Shimojo, SAGE-based Tiled Display Wall enhanced with dynamic routing functionality triggered by user interaction, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 56, March 2016, Pages 303-314, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2015.09.033.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X15003131)
Abstract: Abstract
To empower scientists who are engaged in nation-wide or global-scale collaborative projects for scientific discovery, a large amount of scientific data needs to be visualized and then shared among the scientists. Tiled Display Wall (TDW) has been widely accepted and used for visualization of large-scale scientific data. Scalable Adaptive Graphics Environment (SAGE) has received attention from scientists as a middleware that organizes multiple display monitors into a network-aware large display monitor. Using a SAGE TDW, scientists can display multiple visualized contents on a single display monitor, each of which can be located at geographically distant site managed by other organizations. However, SAGE does not have a mechanism for managing multiple visualized data streams heading to a single TDW. In a conventional network, data flows for a same destination tend to share a same link, resulting in drop of packets and therefore poor visual quality. Moreover, because of the flexible nature of SAGE, rate of each visual data flow may change dynamically as a result of user interaction on a TDW, such as moving and resizing an application window. For the reason above, we propose and develop a dynamic route allocation method that switches packet flows onto network links where better performance is expected, in response to user interaction such as window movement and resizing. Technically, we have leveraged OpenFlow, an implementation of Software Defined Networking (SDN), to integrate network programmability into SAGE. In this paper, we show how SAGE enhanced with the proposed method succeeded in avoiding network congestion and improving the quality of visualization on the TDW over the wide area OpenFlow network on the Internet.
Keywords: Tiled Display Wall; Software Defined Networking; Dynamic route allocation

Kevin Montgomery, Michael Stephanides, Stephen Schendel, Muriel Ross, User interface paradigms for patient-specific surgical planning: lessons learned over a decade of research, Computerized Medical Imaging and Graphics, Volume 29, Issues 2–3, March–April 2005, Pages 203-222, ISSN 0895-6111, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compmedimag.2004.09.014.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S089561110400120X)
Abstract: This paper covers work in virtual reality-based, patient-specific surgical planning over the past decade. It aims to comprehensively examine the user interface paradigms and system designs during that period of time and to objectively analyze their effectiveness for the task. The goal is to provide useful feedback on these interface and implementation paradigms to aid other researchers in this field.

First, specialized systems for specific clinical use were produced with a limited set of visualization tools. Later, through collaboration with NASA, an immersive virtual environment was created to produce high-fidelity images for surgical simulation, but it underestimated the importance of collaboration. The next system, a networked, distributed virtual environment, provided immersion and collaboration, but the immersive paradigm was found to be of a disadvantage and the uniqueness of the framework unwieldy. A virtual model, workbench-style display was then created using a commercial package, but limitations of each were soon apparent. Finally, a specialized display, with an integrated visualization and simulation system is described and evaluated.

Lessons learned include: surgical planning is an abstract process unlike surgical simulation; collaboration is important, as is stereo visualization; and that high-resolution preoperative images from standard viewpoints are desirable, but interaction is truly the key to planning.
Keywords: Surgical planning; Virtual environments; Surgical simulation

Edwin Blaauwgeers, Lieven Dubois, Leen Ryckaert, Real-time risk estimation for better situational awareness, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 46, Issue 15, 2013, Pages 232-239, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20130811-5-US-2037.00036.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016330695)
Abstract: Abstract
Recent calamities have demonstrated that risks are often not well communicated to management level. Operational risks are difficult to communicate and hard to assess. Research performed at the University of Leiden and adopted by Shell has resulted in the acceptance of BowTie diagrams as a way to communicate risks between specialists and non-specialists, as the BowTie approach takes into account threats and consequences, as well as control measures and recovery measures. This paper discusses the application of such diagrams in a real-time software environment as part of the supervisory control system, as part of the independent advanced control system or as part of the high performance human machine interface.
Keywords: Alarm systems; human-centred design and automation; mental workload; supervisory control; graphical user interfaces; risk representation; information management; knowledge retention; knowledge representation; knowledge execution

B. Stephen, L. Petropoulakis, An ambient software monitoring system for unsupervised user modelling, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 28, Issue 3, April 2005, Pages 557-567, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2004.12.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417404001617)
Abstract: This paper describes a means of unsupervised learning of recurring patterns in user activity through patterns in system level events generated by a graphical user interface. Earlier work has shown that using this distillation of the more complex behavioural interaction between the user and the application provides a symbolic representation of knowledge and goals that could be used to imply preference. Although prior research has explored the possibilities of removing this information acquisition bottleneck in such an expert system using ambient monitoring approaches, some have experienced difficulty in dealing with the varying length training sequences and segmentation of the continuous event stream. Unlike previous work the approach documented here handles interactions of varying sizes and is able to recall recurrent patterns in real time irrespective of the number of interactions learned. In addition to describing the proposed approach we also describe the shortcomings of various previously applied machine learning techniques on the same type of data. We also demonstrate a practical implementation of our approach applied to web browser usage.
Keywords: Finite state machines; Pattern discovery; Behaviour modelling; Gesture recognition; Human computer interaction; User interface

Johann Biedermann, Alexander Ullrich, Johannes Schöneberg, Frank Noé, ReaDDyMM: Fast Interacting Particle Reaction-Diffusion Simulations Using Graphical Processing Units, Biophysical Journal, Volume 108, Issue 3, 3 February 2015, Pages 457-461, ISSN 0006-3495, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.bpj.2014.12.025.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0006349514047729)
Abstract: Abstract
ReaDDy is a modular particle simulation package combining off-lattice reaction kinetics with arbitrary particle interaction forces. Here we present a graphical processing unit implementation of ReaDDy that employs the fast multiplatform molecular dynamics package OpenMM. A speedup of up to two orders of magnitude is demonstrated, giving us access to timescales of multiple seconds on single graphical processing units. This opens up the possibility of simulating cellular signal transduction events while resolving all protein copies.

G Manduchi, G Fregonese, C Taliercio, Tw Fredian, Ja Stillerman, The design of the user interface for a large physics experiment, Information and Software Technology, Volume 36, Issue 12, December 1994, Pages 733-742, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(94)90045-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0950584994900450)
Abstract: The paper describes the experience in developing and supporting the user interface of RFX, one of the large nuclear fusion experiments of the co-ordinated nuclear fusion experiment programme of the European Community. The aim of this work is to present the problems and some possible solutions when developing user interfaces in a scientific environment, especially in large physics experiments. An overview of the current state of interface technology in such an environment is first provided. The control and data acquisition system of the RFX experiment is then introduced and its user interface described in greater detail. Finally, our experience both in maintaining the system interface and in training its users is described.
Keywords: data acquisition and control systems; interface technology; window-based interfaces

Bin Guo, Daqing Zhang, Michita Imai, Enabling user-oriented management for ubiquitous computing: The meta-design approach, Computer Networks, Volume 54, Issue 16, 15 November 2010, Pages 2840-2855, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comnet.2010.07.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128610002458)
Abstract: This paper presents iPlumber, a user-oriented management system for ubiquitous computing environments. Different from previous low-benefit “zero-configuration” systems or high cognitive-cost “end user programming” tools, our work attempts to attain a better balance between user benefits and cost by exploring the meta-design approach. A set of typical management activities in ubicomp environments are supported, from basic-level software sharing, foraging, and low-cost software configuration to advanced-level cooperative software co-design and error handling. These activities are elaborated through a smart home control scenario. The usability of our system is validated through an initial user study with a total of 33 subjects to test the management activities from an open exhibition environment and a controlled university environment.
Keywords: Ubiquitous computing management; Meta-design; Cooperation; Semantic Web; End user development; Smart object; Wireless sensor network

A. Prakash, M. Hummel, S. Schmauder, E. Bitzek, Nanosculpt: A methodology for generating complex realistic configurations for atomistic simulations, MethodsX, Volume 3, 2016, Pages 219-230, ISSN 2215-0161, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.mex.2016.03.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2215016116000157)
Abstract: Abstract
Atomistic simulations have now become commonplace in the study of the deformation and failure of materials. Increase in computing power in recent years has made large-scale simulations with billions, or even trillions, of atoms a possibility. Most simulations to-date, however, are still performed with quasi-2D geometries or rather simplistic 3D setups. Although controlled studies on such well-defined structures are often required to obtain quantitative information from atomistic simulations, for qualitative studies focusing on e.g. the identification of mechanisms, researchers would greatly benefit from a methodology that helps realize more realistic configurations. The ideal scenario would be a one-on-one reconstruction of experimentally observed structures. To this end, we propose a new method and software tool called nanosculpt with the following features:•
The method allows for easy sample generation for atomistic simulations from any arbitrarily shaped 3D enclosed volume.
•
The tool can be used to build atomistic samples from artificial geometries, including CAD geometries and structures obtained from simulation methods other than atomistic simulations.
•
The tool enables the generation of experimentally informed atomistic samples, by e.g. digitization of micrographs or usage of tomography data.
Keywords: Experimentally informed atomistic simulations; Molecular dynamics simulations; 3D materials science; Atom probe tomography; Digitized microstructure; Ni-base superalloy

Fatos Xhafa, Leonard Barolli, Thanasis Daradoumis, Raúl Fernández, Santi Caballé, Jxta-Overlay: An interface for efficient peer selection in P2P JXTA-based systems, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 31, Issue 5, September 2009, Pages 886-893, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2008.03.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548908000342)
Abstract: In this paper we address the problem of the efficient peer selection in P2P distributed platforms. To this end, we have developed a P2P distributed platform using Sun's JXTA technology, which is endowed with resource brokerage strategies to efficiently select peers using four selection models: (a) economic scheduling model; (b) priced-based model; (c) peer-priority selection model; and, (d) random selection model. Next, we have deployed the P2P platform in a real network using nodes of the PlanetLab and have experimentally evaluated the performance of the peer selection models. The P2P platform offers a user-friendly interface for efficient peer selection and configuration of the P2P platform.
Keywords: P2P computing; Peer selection models; Economic models; JXTA technology; User interface

P.T. Helo, Q.L. Xu, S.J. Kyllönen, R.J. Jiao, Integrated Vehicle Configuration System—Connecting the domains of mass customization, Computers in Industry, Volume 61, Issue 1, January 2010, Pages 44-52, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2009.07.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361509001420)
Abstract: Configuration design for mass customized vehicles necessitates the coordination of customer requirements, product characteristics, production processes, and logistics networks, in order to achieve rapid response to customer orders. Existing product configurators are mainly used as sales tools, and fail to account for the requirements of the entire customer order fulfillment process. In this regard, this paper proposes an Integrated Vehicle Configuration System (IVCS) to facilitate customer order processing based on information from multiple domains in a mass customization environment. An IVCS business model is proposed to incorporate the decision factors for configuration design related to different planning stages. The business model is supported by a comprehensive ontology framework, which enhances communications between different stakeholders involved in the order fulfillment process. The configuration approach is based on combinations of selective and generative rules and can be integrated with existing ERP systems. It also provides mechanisms to handle configuration rules that allow users to convert soft preferences into product specifications, bill-of-materials, and, furthermore, into logistics configurations. An example of a computerized configuration system showcases the process from customer engineering to design and production.
Keywords: Configuration; Ontology; Mass customization; Vehicle manufacturing

Chuanwen Sun, Jia Jin, Jun Zhu, Haifeng Wang, Dingrong Yang, Jiahua Xing, Discovery of bis-aromatic ring neonicotinoid analogues fixed as cis-configuration: Synthesis, insecticidal activities, and molecular docking studies, Bioorganic & Medicinal Chemistry Letters, Volume 20, Issue 11, 1 June 2010, Pages 3301-3305, ISSN 0960-894X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.bmcl.2010.04.050.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0960894X10005202)
Abstract: A novel series of bis-aromatic ring neonicotinoid analogues (1a–1l, 2a–2c), were designed and prepared by introducing a new substituted aromatic ring into nitenpyram and forming a tetrahydropyrimidine ring, with the cis-configuration confirmed by X-ray diffraction. Preliminary bioassays showed most analogues exhibited good insecticidal activities at 100 mg/L, and compound 1d and 2a were highly potent even at 10 mg/L. Modeling the ligand–receptor complexes by molecular docking study explained the structure–activity relationships observed in vitro, which may provide some useful information for future design of new insecticides.
Keywords: Bis-aromatic ring; Nitenpyram; Docking model; Insecticidal; cis-Configuration

I. Wayan Mudianta, Peter L. Katavic, Lynette K. Lambert, Patricia Y. Hayes, Martin G. Banwell, Murray H.G. Munro, Paul V. Bernhardt, Mary J. Garson, Structure and absolute configuration of 3-alkylpiperidine alkaloids from an Indonesian sponge of the genus Halichondria, Tetrahedron, Volume 66, Issue 14, 3 April 2010, Pages 2752-2760, ISSN 0040-4020, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.tet.2010.01.068.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0040402010001134)
Abstract: Chemical analysis of an Indonesian sponge sample has provided three new 3-alkylpiperidine alkaloids, tetradehydrohaliclonacyclamine A, its mono-N-oxide derivative, and a 2-epi isomer. The absolute structure of tetradehydrohaliclonacyclamine A has been established by X-ray crystallography from anomalous dispersion effects using Cu radiation, which determined that the absolute configuration is 2S, 3S, 7S, 9S while an HPLC study revealed that the alkaloid is enantiomerically pure.
Keywords: Sponge; 3-Alkylpiperidine; N-Oxide; X-ray analysis; Absolute configuration; NMR; Biosynthesis; Halichondria

Avi Parush, Dafna Berman, Navigation and orientation in 3D user interfaces: the impact of navigation aids and landmarks, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 61, Issue 3, September 2004, Pages 375-395, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2003.12.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581904000448)
Abstract: This study examined how users acquire spatial cognition in 3D user interfaces depicting an on-screen virtual environment. The study was divided into two main phases: learning and a test of learning transfer. The learning phase consisted of participants directly navigating (search for objects) in the on-screen virtual environment using one of two navigation aids: a visual map or a route list. In addition, there were two virtual environments, one with landmarks and the other without landmarks. Learning transfer was examined by testing both navigation and orientation tasks (relative-direction pointing) in the environment without the use of the navigation aids. Findings show that while the initial navigation with a map appeared to be harder, with longer navigation times and more navigation steps than with a route list, this difference became insignificant at the end of the learning phase. Moreover, performance degradation upon removal of the navigation aids was less for those that navigated with a map as compared to route list. A similar pattern was found for the impact of landmarks. Initial navigation with landmarks appeared to be harder than without landmarks, but this difference became insignificant at the end of the learning phase. Moreover, performance degradation upon removal of the navigation aid was less for those that navigated with landmarks as compared to no landmarks. Finally, the combined impact of both the navigation aid used in the learning and the presence of landmarks was primarily evident in the orientation task. Relative direction pointing was better for those who learnt with a map without landmarks, or with route list with landmarks. The findings are discussed in terms of the impact of navigations aids and landmarks on the acquisition of route and survey knowledge in spatial cognition. In addition, some gender differences are discussed in terms of different strategies in spatial cognition acquisition.

Hui Li, Xiao-Yu Kuang, Yau Yuen Yeung, Theoretical calculations of energies, and radiative rates for parity-forbidden transitions within the 4f3 configuration in La-like ions Pr2+ and Nd3+, Journal of Luminescence, Volume 170, Part 2, February 2016, Pages 380-386, ISSN 0022-2313, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jlumin.2015.07.036.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0022231315004160)
Abstract: Abstract
The observed 4f3 energy levels of La isoelectronic sequence ions Pr2+ and Nd3+ were analyzed using a standard f-shell free-ion Hamiltonian. The root mean square (rms) deviation of 13.54 cm−1, 6.17 cm−1 between calculated and observed energies was obtained from the fit of 16 free-ion parameters to 38 levels for Pr2+, and to the complete set of 41 levels for Nd3+, respectively. Then, the fitted values of free-ion parameters were used to compute wavelengths, oscillator strengths, and transition rates for the forbidden magnetic dipole and electric quadrupole transitions between the 4f3 levels in Pr2+ and Nd3+ La-like ions. Detailed comparisons with other available theoretical data are also reported and discussed in this work.
Keywords: Atomic spectra; Transitions; Lanthanide ions

R. Kimura, M. Ukita, K. Kamezuka, N. Kato, H. Senga, H. Suzuki, M. Choyekh, Construction of Guidance and Control System and GUI of an Autonomous Underwater Robot SOTAB-I, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 46, Issue 33, 2013, Pages 13-18, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20130918-4-JP-3022.00007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016461264)
Abstract: Abstract
Heavy disasters of oil spill bring enormous damage on the ocean environment as well as regional economies. To know when, where and how much the spilled oil and gas float up on the sea surface, and where the floating oil on the sea surface drift ashore, we need information of advection, diffusion and dispersion of underwater oil and gas, and its prediction. This paper describes the guidance and control system and GUI of the underwater robot SOTAB-I (SOTAB; Spilled Oil Tracking Autonomous Buoy) that tracks spilled oil autonomously and gathers oceanographic data.
Keywords: Control system; Guidance systems; Graphical User Interface; Oil Spill; SOTAB

Cosmin Dumitru, Paola Grosso, Cees de Laat, A user-centric execution environment for CineGrid  workloads, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 53, December 2015, Pages 55-62, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2015.03.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X15000837)
Abstract: Abstract
The abundance and heterogeneity of IT resources available, together with the ability to dynamically scale applications poses significant usability issues to users. Without understanding the performance profile of available resources users are unable to efficiently scale their applications in order to meet performance objectives. High quality media collaborations, like CineGrid, are one example of such diverse environments where users can leverage dynamic infrastructures to move and process large amounts of data. This paper describes our user-centric approach to executing high quality media processing workloads over dynamic infrastructures. Our main contribution is the CGtoolkit  environment, an integrated system which aids users cope with the infrastructure complexity and large data sets specific to the digital cinema domain.
Keywords: Cinegrid; Resource selection; Virtual infrastructure; Semantic web; Bags-of-tasks

Wu He, Feng-Kwei Wang, Tawnya Means, Li Da Xu, Insight into interface design of web-based case-based reasoning retrieval systems, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 36, Issue 3, Part 2, April 2009, Pages 7280-7287, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2008.09.043.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417408006568)
Abstract: Case-based reasoning (CBR) is an innovative approach for problem solving. The concept of CBR is that people solve problems by retrieving past solutions based on similar problems. These new solutions are adapted from the old solutions to solve the new problem. Case-based reasoning (CBR) in computer applications has drawn considerable attention over the last 20 years with a large number of successful computer applications including those that assist with customer support, sales support, diagnostics, and help-desk systems. However, most studies on applications that implement case-based reasoning have used system-based design research and have focused on functional capability and implementation. Little attention has been given to user interface design in CBR systems. In this article, we provide a review of case retrieval interfaces of CBR systems. Based on this review and our own CBR interface design experience, insights for designing conversational and feature-based CBR user interfaces are provided.
Keywords: Case-based reasoning; User interface; Case retrieval

D. Mourtzis, M. Doukas, On the configuration of supply chains for assemble-to-order products: Case studies from the automotive and the CNC machine building sectors, Robotics and Computer-Integrated Manufacturing, Volume 36, December 2015, Pages 13-24, ISSN 0736-5845, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.rcim.2015.02.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736584515000423)
Abstract: Abstract
The product customisation trend has an unprecedented impact on manufacturing companies, as the ever-increasing number of product variants and the enlarged pool of cooperating partners vastly increase the feasible alternative supply chain configurations. In terms of decision theory, this is translated to enormous search spaces. For tackling these NP-hard problems, metaheuristic optimisation methods are utilised, which provide a trade-off between the quality of solutions and the computation time. This research work describes the modelling and solving of two supply chain configuration problems using the Simulated Annealing and Tabu Search methods. The performance of the identified solutions in terms of optimisation of multiple conflicting criteria, is compared against the results obtained from a custom Intelligent Search Algorithm and an Exhaustive enumerative method. The algorithms are developed into a web-based software platform. The approach is validated through real life applications to case studies from the automotive and CNC laser welding machine building industries.
Keywords: Simulated annealing; Tabu search; Manufacturing network design; Decision-making; Metaheuristics; Mass customisation

V. Ganine, D. Amirante, N. Hills, Enhancing performance and scalability of data transfer across sliding grid interfaces for time-accurate unsteady simulations of multistage turbomachinery flows, Computers & Fluids, Volume 115, 22 July 2015, Pages 140-153, ISSN 0045-7930, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compfluid.2015.03.030.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0045793015001036)
Abstract: Abstract
High fidelity simulations of the flow phenomena around complex geometries for turbomachinery applications require fluid solvers to run on ever increasing processor counts. For fully unsteady predictions in rotor–stator systems most of CFD codes employ the sliding interface technique. However, the scalability and efficiency of current sliding grid parallel implementations are significantly constrained by the computation and communication imbalances. They are associated with data transfer across discrete non-matching interfaces. To prepare for the challenges at extreme scales in this paper we attempt to redesign the algorithm in such a way that it maintains the scalability of the original CFD code on static grids. In the proposed parallel implementation the cell containment search and interpolation workloads are balanced by employing a deterministic geometric decomposition on an intermediate “rendezvous” set of processes. Rapidly changing dynamic communication patterns induced by the grids relative motion are handled with a sparse communication protocol. The scaling behavior and performance of the developed technique are analyzed using realistic test cases on two different computing systems.
Keywords: Computational fluid dynamics; Rotor–stator interaction; Relative grid motion; Sliding mesh interface; Parallel performance; High-performance computing

Gebremariam Mesfin, Tor-Morten Grønli, Dida Midekso, Gheorghita Ghinea, Towards end-user development of REST client applications on smartphones, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 44, February 2016, Pages 205-219, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2015.08.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548915000896)
Abstract: Abstract
HTML5 can be used to develop client applications by composing REST web services within the context of Web 2.0. However, the possibility of implementing cross-platform smartphone applications with REST services needs to be studied. Accordingly, we developed a REST-based cross-platform application with PhoneGap. The application was deployed on the Android, Windows Phone, and iOS platforms; subsequently we evaluated its usability. We observed that REST-based cross-platform smartphone applications can be implemented with HTML5 and PhoneGap, which can be scaled-up into a REST service composition tool. Moreover, the application’s usability remains unaffected on the native platforms and adaptation required only minimal effort.
Keywords: REST service; Usability; Service composition; Smartphone; Cross-platform

Wei Min Wang, Lars Wolter, Kai Lindow, Rainer Stark, Graphical Visualization of Sustainable Manufacturing Aspects for Knowledge Transfer to Public Audience, Procedia CIRP, Volume 26, 2015, Pages 58-63, ISSN 2212-8271, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procir.2014.07.032.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2212827114008452)
Abstract: Abstract
Sustainability is characterized by complex interplay between economic, environmental and social aspects and a temporal dimension. The public perception is often mistakenly limited to single aspects due to deliberated influence by marketing or misuse. Reliable scientific articles usually address expert audience only. To create a broad public understanding knowledge has to be available and comprehensible. In the World Wide Web various concepts are applied to represent knowledge each utilizing different sets of media without interactive elements. To get an overall picture of sustainability an understanding of complex relationships is necessary. Non-interactive text based approaches lack the necessary capabilities to present this picture. This paper presents a graphical approach involving a simplified product configurator based on an ontology developed in the CRC1026. It embodies gamification elements to draw people's attention and uses ontological trees to illustrate relationships.
Keywords: Sustainability; Knowledge transfer to public audience; Ontology; Gamification

G. Avellino, S. Beco, F. Pacini, A. Maraschini, A. Terracina, Job description language and user interface in a grid context: The EU datagrid experience, In: G.R. Joubert, W.E. Nagel, F.J. Peters and W.V. Walter, Editor(s), Advances in Parallel Computing, North-Holland, 2004, Volume 13, Pages 635-642, ISSN 0927-5452, ISBN 9780444516893, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0927-5452(04)80079-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0927545204800790)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The growing emergence of large scale distributed computing environments, such as computational or data grids, presents new challenges to resource management, which cannot be met by conventional systems that employ relatively static resource models and centralized allocators. The workload management is the grid component that has the responsibility of matching and managing the grid resources in such a way that applications are conveniently, efficiently, and effectively executed ensuring at the same time that possible resource usage limits are not exceeded. From the users' point of view, grid resources management should be completely transparent, in the sense that their interaction with the workload management services should be only limited to the description, via a high-level, user-oriented specification language, of the characteristics and requirements of their applications and to the submission through an appropriate interface of their requests. A digest of the solutions adopted for the development of a framework for the description, submission, management, and control of user's applications in the context of the “workload management” task of the EU datagrid project is given.

Juan C. Yelmo, José M. del Álamo, Rubén Trapero, Yod-Samuel Martín, A user-centric approach to service creation and delivery over next generation networks, Computer Communications, Volume 34, Issue 2, 15 February 2011, Pages 209-222, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comcom.2010.04.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366410001702)
Abstract: Next Generation Networks (NGN) provide Telecommunications operators with the possibility to share their resources and infrastructure, facilitate the interoperability with other networks, and simplify and unify the management, operation and maintenance of service offerings, thus enabling the fast and cost-effective creation of new personal, broadband ubiquitous services. Unfortunately, service creation over NGN is far from the success of service creation in the Web, especially when it comes to Web 2.0. This paper presents a novel approach to service creation and delivery, with a platform that opens to non-technically skilled users the possibility to create, manage and share their own convergent (NGN-based and Web-based) services. To this end, the business approach to user-generated services is analyzed and the technological bases supporting the proposal are explained.
Keywords: User-generated services; Next generation networks (NGN); Service-oriented architecture (SOA); Mobile applications; Web 2.0

Norbert Völker, Thoughts on Requirements and Design Issues of User Interfaces for Proof Assistants, Electronic Notes in Theoretical Computer Science, Volume 103, 3 November 2004, Pages 139-159, ISSN 1571-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.entcs.2004.05.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S157106610405131X)

Joseph R. Kiniry, Formalizing the User's Context to Support User Interfaces for Integrated Mathematical Environments, Electronic Notes in Theoretical Computer Science, Volume 103, 3 November 2004, Pages 81-103, ISSN 1571-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.entcs.2004.09.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S157106610405128X)

Matt Selway, Georg Grossmann, Wolfgang Mayer, Markus Stumptner, Formalising natural language specifications using a cognitive linguistic/configuration based approach, Information Systems, Volume 54, December 2015, Pages 191-208, ISSN 0306-4379, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.is.2015.04.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0306437915000630)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper addresses the problem of transforming business specifications written in natural language into formal models suitable for use in information systems development. It proposes a method for transforming controlled natural language specifications based on the Semantics of Business Vocabulary and Business Rules standard. This approach is unique in combining techniques from Model-Driven Engineering (MDE), Cognitive Linguistics, and Knowledge-based Configuration, which allows the reliable semantic processing of specifications and integration with existing MDE tools to improve productivity, quality, and time-to-market in software development. The method first learns the vocabulary of the specification from glossary-like definitions then parses the rules of the specification and outputs the resulting formal SBVR model. Both aspects of the method are tested separately, with the system correctly learning 98% of the vocabulary and correctly interpreting 98% of the rules of an SBVR SE based example. Finally, the proposed method is compared to state-of-the-art approaches for creating formal models from natural language specifications, arguing that it meets the criteria necessary to fulfil the three goals of (1) shifting control of specification to non-technical business experts, (2) reducing the manual effort involved in formalising specifications, and (3) supporting business experts in creating well-formed sets of business vocabularies and rules.
Keywords: Business rules; Business vocabulary; SBVR; Controlled natural language; Natural language processing

Anders Haug, Lars Hvam, Niels Henrik Mortensen, A layout technique for class diagrams to be used in product configuration projects, Computers in Industry, Volume 61, Issue 5, June 2010, Pages 409-418, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2009.10.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361509001936)
Abstract: The use of product configurators has produced a range of benefits for several companies, such as minimizing the use of resources and shortening the lead times in product specification processes. When developing a product configurator, two kinds of models are often created, namely analysis models and design models. Since the task of describing product knowledge in analysis models involves domain experts, the analysis language has to be easily understandable in order to avoid the need for extensive training. For this task, the so-called Product Variant Master (PVM) diagramming technique is often applied. With regard to the design model, the requirements for the language focus more on a formalized and rich language, which is why class diagrams are often applied. To avoid the use of different modelling languages in the analysis and design phase, this paper proposes the layout technique ‘Vertically Aligned Class Diagrams’ (VACDs), which incorporate the usability of PVMs into class diagrams. To validate the usefulness of the VACD technique, the paper compares VACDs to PVMs and class diagrams in a utility analysis and a usability experiment. These investigations strongly indicate that VACDs maintain to a great extent the combined advantages of PVMs and normally drawn class diagrams. Thus, the use of VACDs in configurator projects has the potential to increase efficiency, improve communication and reduce errors.
Keywords: Product configuration; Knowledge engineering; Object-oriented modelling; Class diagrams

Murray A. Rudd, Scientists’ framing of the ocean science–policy interface, Global Environmental Change, Volume 33, July 2015, Pages 44-60, ISSN 0959-3780, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.gloenvcha.2015.04.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0959378015000588)
Abstract: Abstract
Scientists’ ideas, beliefs, and discourses form the frames that shape their choices about which research to pursue, their approaches to collaboration and communicating results, and how they evaluate research outputs and outcomes. To achieve ocean sustainability, there are increasing calls for new levels of engagement and collaboration between scientists and policy-makers; scientists’ willingness to engage depends on their current and evolving frames. Here, I present results about how scientists involved in diverse fields of ocean research perceived their role as scientists working at or near the ocean science–policy interface and how this related to their perceptions regarding ocean research priorities. The survey of 2187 physical, ecological and social scientists from 94 countries showed that scientists held different perspectives about their appropriate level of engagement at the ocean science–policy interface and the relative primacy of science versus politics in formulating ocean policy. Six clusters of scientists varied in their frames; three clusters accounted for 94% of the sample. Of 67 research questions identified from 22 research prioritization and horizon scanning exercises, the top eight were shared among all three clusters, showing consistency in research priorities across scientists with different framings of their role at the science–policy interface. Five focused on the mechanisms and effects of global change on oceans, two focused on data collection and management for long-term ocean monitoring, and one focused on the links between biodiversity and ecological function at different scales. The results from this survey demonstrated that scientists’ framings of the role of ocean science at the science–policy interface can be quantified in surveys, that framing varies among scientists, and that research priorities vary according to the framings.
Keywords: Ocean research; Research priorities; Science–policy interface; Knowledge production; Frames

Harlan Carvey, 4 - Case Studies: Tracking User Activity, In Windows Registry Forensics, Syngress, Boston, 2011, Pages 159-202, ISBN 9781597495806, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-59749-580-6.00004-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597495806000048)
Abstract: This chapter discusses a great deal of the data that can be extracted from Registry hives associated with a User Profile, in order to demonstrate or illustrate indicators of patterns of activity. This information can be used by analysts to demonstrate when the user was logged into the system and to locate indicators of malware infections, intrusions, and a number of other activities.
Keywords: Registry; NTUSER.dat; USRCLASS.dat; UserAssist; MuiCache; virtualization; RecentDocs; WordWheelQuery; user

Yulin Shi, Alexander V. Veidenbaum, Alex Nicolau, Xiangmin Xu, Large-scale neural circuit mapping data analysis accelerated with the graphical processing unit (GPU), Journal of Neuroscience Methods, Volume 239, 15 January 2015, Pages 1-10, ISSN 0165-0270, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jneumeth.2014.09.022.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0165027014003471)
Abstract: AbstractBackground
Modern neuroscience research demands computing power. Neural circuit mapping studies such as those using laser scanning photostimulation (LSPS) produce large amounts of data and require intensive computation for post hoc processing and analysis.
New method
Here we report on the design and implementation of a cost-effective desktop computer system for accelerated experimental data processing with recent GPU computing technology. A new version of Matlab software with GPU enabled functions is used to develop programs that run on Nvidia GPUs to harness their parallel computing power.
Results
We evaluated both the central processing unit (CPU) and GPU-enabled computational performance of our system in benchmark testing and practical applications. The experimental results show that the GPU–CPU co-processing of simulated data and actual LSPS experimental data clearly outperformed the multi-core CPU with up to a 22× speedup, depending on computational tasks. Further, we present a comparison of numerical accuracy between GPU and CPU computation to verify the precision of GPU computation. In addition, we show how GPUs can be effectively adapted to improve the performance of commercial image processing software such as Adobe Photoshop.
Comparison with existing method(s)
To our best knowledge, this is the first demonstration of GPU application in neural circuit mapping and electrophysiology-based data processing.
Conclusions
Together, GPU enabled computation enhances our ability to process large-scale data sets derived from neural circuit mapping studies, allowing for increased processing speeds while retaining data precision.
Keywords: Data analysis; GPU; Parallel processing; Neural circuit mapping; CPU

Christophe Pascal, SORTAN: a Unix program for calculation and graphical presentation of fault slip as induced by stresses, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 30, Issue 3, April 2004, Pages 259-265, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cageo.2003.10.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098300404000287)
Abstract: Stress inversion programs are nowadays frequently used in tectonic analysis. The purpose of this family of programs is to reconstruct the stress tensor characteristics from fault slip data acquired in the field or derived from earthquake focal mechanisms (i.e. inverse methods). Until now, little attention has been paid to direct methods (i.e. to determine fault slip directions from an inferred stress tensor). During the 1990s, the fast increase in resolution in 3D seismic reflection techniques made it possible to determine the geometry of subsurface faults with a satisfactory accuracy but not to determine precisely their kinematics. This recent improvement allows the use of direct methods. A computer program, namely SORTAN, is introduced. The program is highly portable on Unix platforms, straightforward to install and user-friendly. The computation is based on classical stress-fault slip relationships and allows for fast treatment of a set of faults and graphical presentation of the results (i.e. slip directions). In addition, the SORTAN program permits one to test the sensitivity of the results to input uncertainties. It is a complementary tool to classical stress inversion methods and can be used to check the mechanical consistency and the limits of structural interpretations based upon 3D seismic reflection surveys.
Keywords: Tectonic stress,Fault slip directions,Subsurface faults,Uncertainties,Graphical output

Gert Zülch, Marcel Becker, A simulation-supported approach for man-machine configuration in manufacturing, International Journal of Production Economics, Volume 125, Issue 1, May 2010, Pages 41-51, ISSN 0925-5273, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijpe.2009.08.023.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0925527309002795)
Abstract: In addition to the traditional consideration of technical and economical issues, staffing aspects are gaining in importance in the planning of production systems. The usual approach is to determine the manufacturing equipment according to the applied technology and then to define the necessary staff. However, this approach may lead to problems after the technical issues have been determined. On the other hand, a reversed approach, namely planning the technical resources based on the personnel to be implemented, is hardly practical.

The following article deals with the topic of an integrated, simulation-supported procedure for the planning of personnel and technical resources based on a pre-determined order programme and the corresponding production logistical conditions.
Keywords: Man-machine configuration; Re-organization; Factory planning; Capacity planning; Personnel-oriented simulation

Sarvesh Dhiman, Prasad Potluri, Christopher Silva, Influence of binder configuration on 3D woven composites, Composite Structures, Volume 134, 15 December 2015, Pages 862-868, ISSN 0263-8223, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compstruct.2015.08.126.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0263822315008223)
Abstract: Abstract
3D woven composites have the potential to revolutionise structural composites, provided the knock-down in in-plane properties can be minimised through weave optimisation. Since binder tow interactions produce waviness in warp and weft tows, 3D weaving process needs optimisation. This paper presents a predictive modelling tool based on Representative Volume Elements (RVEs) of 3D weaves capturing the binder size as a function of the weaving process. Implemented in Abaqus, this predictive tool is able to predict elastic constants and strength with a reasonable accuracy compared to experimental data.
Keywords: Composites; Modelling; 3D woven; Finite element analysis (FEA); Binder

Bing Xia, Swapnil Bhatia, Ben Bubenheim, Maisam Dadgar, Douglas Densmore, J. Christopher Anderson, Chapter five - Developer's and User's Guide to Clotho v2.0: A Software Platform for the Creation of Synthetic Biological Systems, In: Christopher Voigt, Editor(s), Methods in Enzymology, Academic Press, 2011, Volume 498, Pages 97-135, ISSN 0076-6879, ISBN 9780123851208, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-385120-8.00005-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978012385120800005X)
Abstract: Abstract
To design the complex systems that synthetic biologists propose to create, software tools must be developed. Critical to success is the enablement of collaboration across our community such that individual tools that perform specific tasks combine with other tools to provide multiplicative benefits. This will require standardization of the form of the data that exists within the field (Parts, Strains, measurements, etc.), a software environment that enables communication between tools, and a sharing mechanism for distributing the tools. Additionally, this data model must describe the data in a sufficiently rigorous and validated form such that meaningful layers of abstraction can be built upon the base. Herein, we describe a software platform called “Clotho” which provides such a data model, and the plugin and sharing mechanisms needed for a rich tool environment. This document provides a tutorial for users of Clotho and information for software developers who wish to contribute new tools (known as “Apps”) to it.
Keywords: BioCAD; Clotho; Data model; Software; Developers; Users; Java; Netbeans; Apps; Parts; Features; Formats; Design flow

Harry Hochheiser, Jonathan Lazar, Revisiting breadth vs. depth in menu structures for blind users of screen readers, Interacting with Computers, Volume 22, Issue 5, September 2010, Pages 389-398, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2010.02.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543810000123)
Abstract: Numerous studies have investigated task performance times for selection from hierarchical menus, with structures containing many choices at each of a few levels (broad, shallow structures) generally outperforming structures containing fewer choices at each of many levels (narrow, deep structures). To see if these results applied to blind users who rely on screen reader software for computer access, we replicated an earlier published study, using 19 blind screen-reader users. Consistent with earlier studies, broader, shallow hierarchies outperformed narrow, deep hierarchies. Task performance times and hypertext lostness measures were correlated. Although further work will be needed to understand specific determinants of task performance rates, these results support the use of broad, shallow menus for blind as well as sighted users.
Keywords: Blind; Screen reader; Menu structure; Accessibility; Breadth vs. depth; User study

Moohyun Cha, Soonhung Han, Jaikyung Lee, Byungil Choi, A virtual reality based fire training simulator integrated with fire dynamics data, Fire Safety Journal, Volume 50, May 2012, Pages 12-24, ISSN 0379-7112, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.firesaf.2012.01.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0379711212000136)
Abstract: VR (virtual reality)-based fire training simulators provide the general public or inexperienced firefighters or commanders with wide-ranging second-hand experience so that they can make prompt decisions and safe and organized responses in actual fire situations. In order to effectively achieve this training goal, it is crucial to reliably express fire dynamics as realistic graphics. In the field of engineering, computational fluid dynamics (CFD) is widely used to precisely predict the behaviors of fluid phenomena. The resultant data, however, have structures and capacities that are not readily applied to real-time virtual reality systems. This study proposes a series of data conversion techniques and a real-time processing framework to develop a fire training simulator on the basis of a precise CFD simulation that is capable of calculating various invisible physical quantities such as toxic gases and heat as well as visible factors such as smoke and flame. By exploiting safety level-based visualization mapping, this study also proposes a new method to intuitively experience dangerous fire environments and perform training and evaluation. Lastly, this study implements a simulator that can undertake simple firefighting activities such as evacuation and rescue in fire situations at road tunnels; the functions and real-time performance of the simulator have been experimentally measured to verify the applicability of the proposed framework.
Keywords: Virtual reality; Training simulator; CFD (Computational Fluid Dynamics); Fire simulation

Hikaru Kato, Tatsuo Nehira, Koichi Matsuo, Tetsuro Kawabata, Yoshihiro Kobashigawa, Hiroshi Morioka, Fitje Losung, Remy E.P. Mangindaan, Nicole J. de Voogd, Hideyoshi Yokosawa, Sachiko Tsukamoto, Niphateolide A: isolation from the marine sponge Niphates olemda and determination of its absolute configuration by an ECD analysis, Tetrahedron, Volume 71, Issue 38, 23 September 2015, Pages 6956-6960, ISSN 0040-4020, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.tet.2015.07.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0040402015010467)
Abstract: Abstract
A diterpene with a new skeleton, niphateolide A (1), was isolated from the marine sponge, Niphates olemda, as an inhibitor of the p53-Hdm2 interaction. Its structure was elucidated by NMR spectroscopy and its absolute configuration was established as 10R, 11R by ECD at the vacuum-ultraviolet region with a theoretical calculation. Compound 1 was observed as an inseparable stereoisomeric mixture at C-17 and an ECD analysis was subsequently performed by adopting a virtual equilibrium between the simplified two forms, 10R,11R,17R- and 10R,11R,17S-1a, in which the calculated ECD spectra were correctively integrated with the theoretically-derived internal and free energies.
Keywords: Diterpene; Marine sponge; Niphates olemda; ECD analysis

Esther de Ves, Guillermo Ayala, Xaro Benavent, Juan Domingo, Esther Dura, Modeling user preferences in content-based image retrieval: A novel attempt to bridge the semantic gap, Neurocomputing, Volume 168, 30 November 2015, Pages 829-845, ISSN 0925-2312, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.neucom.2015.05.041.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0925231215007171)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper is concerned with content-based image retrieval from a stochastic point of view. The semantic gap problem is addressed in two ways. First, a dimensional reduction is applied using the (pre-calculated) distances among images. The dimension of the reduced vector is the number of preferences that we allow the user to choose from, in this case, three levels. Second, the conditional probability distribution of the random user preference, given this reduced feature vector, is modeled using a proportional odds model. A new model is fitted at each iteration. The score used to rank the image database is based on the estimated probability function of the random preference. Additionally, some memory is incorporated in the procedure by weighting the current and previous scores. Also, a novel evaluation procedure is proposed in this work based on the empirical commutative distribution functions of the relevant and non-relevant retrieved images. Good experimental results are achieved in very different experimental setups and tested in different databases.
Keywords: Semantic gap; Proportional odds model; Information retrieval; Relevance feedback; Content-based image retrieval

Bestoun S. Ahmed, Taib Sh. Abdulsamad, Moayad Y. Potrus, Achievement of minimized combinatorial test suite for configuration-aware software functional testing using the Cuckoo Search algorithm, Information and Software Technology, Volume 66, October 2015, Pages 13-29, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2015.05.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950584915001020)
Abstract: AbstractContext
Software has become an innovative solution nowadays for many applications and methods in science and engineering. Ensuring the quality and correctness of software is challenging because each program has different configurations and input domains. To ensure the quality of software, all possible configurations and input combinations need to be evaluated against their expected outputs. However, this exhaustive test is impractical because of time and resource constraints due to the large domain of input and configurations. Thus, different sampling techniques have been used to sample these input domains and configurations.
Objective
Combinatorial testing can be used to effectively detect faults in software-under-test. This technique uses combinatorial optimization concepts to systematically minimize the number of test cases by considering the combinations of inputs. This paper proposes a new strategy to generate combinatorial test suite by using Cuckoo Search concepts.
Method
Cuckoo Search is used in the design and implementation of a strategy to construct optimized combinatorial sets. The strategy consists of different algorithms for construction. These algorithms are combined to serve the Cuckoo Search.
Results
The efficiency and performance of the new technique were proven through different experiment sets. The effectiveness of the strategy is assessed by applying the generated test suites on a real-world case study for the purpose of functional testing.
Conclusion
Results show that the generated test suites can detect faults effectively. In addition, the strategy also opens a new direction for the application of Cuckoo Search in the context of software engineering.
Keywords: Combinatorial testing; Search-based software testing; Cuckoo Search; Covering array; Test generation tools; Mutation testing

Liher Granado, Oskar Berreteaga, Creating Rich Human-machine Interfaces with Rational Rhapsody and Qt for Industrial Multi-core Real-time Applications, Procedia Manufacturing, Volume 3, 2015, Pages 1903-1909, ISSN 2351-9789, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.promfg.2015.07.233.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2351978915002346)
Abstract: Abstract
Industrial real-time applications and modern rich and friendly user interfaces have been separated worlds for a long time. But today, customers demand advanced user interface solutions for their real-time products, in order to gain competitive advantage in their markets. This creates to the development teams the big challenge of integrating those two worlds. This paper presents a real-life experience of the development of a system and software architecture for a real-time application with an advanced user interface. Starting with the analysis of the existing needs and requirements, the paper presents the followed steps for the selection of the most appropriate hardware platform, operating systems, Model driven development and other working tools for each architectural requirement, the process of adaptation and integration of the different environments and development tools, and finishes with the developed system results. In addition to the presented results, an analysis of the possibilities of reusing the created platform for other products is presented, following the same process and making the required adaptations, in order to reproduce the obtained benefits in other real-time industrial solutions with advanced user interfaces.
Keywords: Industrial real-time applications; Human-machine interfaces; Model driven development; Rational Rhapsody; Qt

CHEN Heping, WANG Jincun, CHEN Bin, LI Xiaohui, A Dynamic Software Configuration Model Based on Embedded System, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 42, Issue 3, 2009, Pages 263-266, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20090520-3-KR-3006.00042.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016341702)
Abstract: Abstract
With the embedded software development, the implementation and the logic of embedded software are required to detach in application. We proposed a configuration model of embedded software based on component technology and the configuration of industrial control software. This model can abstract the whole application into some independent components, and then combine these components together by customizing the configuration. It is proved that this model can enhance both the speed and efficiency of the embedded software development greatly, as well as improve the flexibility and logic scalability of embedded software. The embedded software with the dynamic software configuration model can guarantee the realization of the requirements to the fullest extent.
Keywords: Embedded System; Configuration; HMI; Logic Configuration; Message Mapping

Mingchao Wang, Xiaoxia Hu, Xiqing Xu, Ziqi Yun, Jiachen Liu, Haiyan Du, Anran Guo, A user-friendly heat-resistant modified polymer-based adhesive for joining and repair of carbon/carbon composites, Materials & Design, Volume 86, 5 December 2015, Pages 709-713, ISSN 0264-1275, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.matdes.2015.07.178.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0264127515302410)
Abstract: Abstract
A user-friendly heat-resistant modified polymer-based adhesive was developed to join C/C composites. After calcination at 1300 °C, the bonding effect of the adhesive reached the highest as more heat-resistant ceramics and high-temperature melting glass were generated in the adhesive. Its bonding strength was kept above 15 MPa during test from RT to 500 °C and the corresponding joints ruptured at C/C substrates. Besides, after repeated thermal-cycling at 1300 °C, the bonding strength at this temperature was maintained at about 12 MPa. For cured adhesive without calcination, its bonding strength could be maintained above 5 MPa during the whole heating process, which made it to have direct application in practice after curing.
Keywords: Carbon–carbon composites; Polymers; Joining; High-temperature; Bonding strength

Andŕes Cid-López, Miguel J. Hornos, Ram´on Alberto Carrasco, Enrique Herrera-Viedma, SICTQUAL: A fuzzy linguistic multi-criteria model to assess the quality of service in the ICT sector from the user perspective, Applied Soft Computing, Volume 37, December 2015, Pages 897-910, ISSN 1568-4946, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.asoc.2015.09.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1568494615005918)
Abstract: Abstract
The Information and Communication Technologies (ICTs) play an important role in the economic development, making it necessary to assess the quality of service perceived by consumers in this sector. The most effective quality assessment from the consumer perspective is still to be researched, yet the most common approach is oriented towards quantitative indicators. This study proposes to use a two-dimensional model that combines the widely accepted segmentation of ICTs with elements from the SERVQUAL quality model. This model, useful in multi-criteria decision-making situations, has been developed using the 2-tuple linguistic representation and fuzzy logic principles. This methodology prevents data loss during processing and provides relevant information through 16 indicators related to the quality of service. Besides, an expert-based mechanism is defined for the use of historical information extracted from completed surveys. As a practical case, this mechanism is applied to the historical information of a telecommunications company for assessing the quality of the service provided to its customers.
Keywords: Segmentation of ICTs; Linguistic multi-criteria decision-making; SERVQUAL; Quality of service; 2-tuple representation model

Yoon-Hyun Kim, Ji-Hyun Lee, Game interface enhancement under smartphone platform focused on touchscreen interaction, Computers & Industrial Engineering, Volume 80, February 2015, Pages 45-61, ISSN 0360-8352, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cie.2014.11.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0360835214004057)
Abstract: Abstract
Virtual game controllers are essential for particular game genres where the game contents are transplanted from various platforms into a smart-phone platform. Virtual images are projected as a game interface at the smartphone’s output screen. Therefore, a certain amount of space needs to be abandoned for the controller’s interface projection. In addition, the functions of the game contents are fundamentally limited, thus eliciting the necessity of a limited number of buttons. In this study, diverse types of interaction that occur between the user and touch-screen were researched, and adequate interactions for smart-phone game contents were extracted and analyzed. In addition, the focus is placed on minimizing the number of controller buttons while including diverse functions at the contents level. Notably, the study pointed out that previous virtual game controllers are a mere metaphor of traditional methods, thus limited to Tap interaction. By analyzing fighting action game contents, the Tap interaction is enhanced by adding Flick and Multi-touch interaction to diversify and enhance previous interaction values. Finally, a prototype was developed by ameliorating past interfaces and referring to the intrinsic features of the aforementioned types of interaction, followed by user evaluation. A previous questionnaire method was adjusted to the particular research purpose, and quantitative evaluation was conducted while documenting and analyzing the user-log data of repetitive experiments.

The results show that Flick and Multi-touch interaction techniques are beneficial under a smartphone touchscreen environment beyond the traditional Tap-only. Furthermore, functions are maintained with a minimum number of buttons while the situation compatibility of user interaction is verified. This study also shows that adding diverse types of interaction to the simple Tap-only affords a distinctive user experience of long-term interest and fun to the players that were previously restricted to the accustomed Tap-only. The results authenticate the applicability of the intrinsic fun mechanism to the smartphone based touchscreen game interaction. The study has implications in enhancing the traditional Tap-only based virtual game controller, which is a mere metaphor of controllers loaded onto other platforms, through proposing a tailored interface design and evaluation method under a smartphone platform. Furthermore, this study contributes objective reference source for the engineers to design future game contents, interface and heuristics evaluation in the platform.
Keywords: Fighting action game; Game interface design; Touchscreen interaction; Smartphone platform; Two handed thumbs

Natalie Girouard, Gregory T. Schueneman, Meisha L. Shofner, J. Carson Meredith, Exploiting colloidal interfaces to increase dispersion, performance, and pot-life in cellulose nanocrystal/waterborne epoxy composites, Polymer, Volume 68, 26 June 2015, Pages 111-121, ISSN 0032-3861, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.polymer.2015.05.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0032386115004425)
Abstract: Abstract
In this study, cellulose nanocrystals (CNCs) are incorporated into a waterborne epoxy resin following two processing protocols that vary by order of addition. The processing protocols produce different levels of CNC dispersion in the resulting composites. The more homogeneously dispersed composite has a higher storage modulus and work of fracture at temperatures less than the glass transition temperature. Some properties related to the component interactions, such as thermal degradation and moisture content, are similar for both composite systems. The mechanism of dispersion is probed with electrophoretic measurements and electron microscopy, and based on these results, it is hypothesized that CNC preaddition facilitates the formation of a CNC-coated epoxy droplet, promoting CNC dispersion and giving the epoxide droplets added electrostatic stability. The implication of these structural changes in polymer network formation results in an extension of the epoxy and crosslinker mixture's pot life by three orders of magnitude.
Keywords: Interfaces; Colloidal stability; Polymer nanocomposite; Cellulose

Jie Tao, Holger Marten, David Kramer, Wolfgang Karl, An Intuitive Framework for Accessing Computing Clouds, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 4, 2011, Pages 2049-2057, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2011.04.224.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050911002821)
Abstract: Cloud computing introduces a novel computing paradigm that provisions on-demand computational capacity as a service. Increasing numbers of users are migrating their applications to the computing Clouds to remove or reduce the costs on resource investment and management. However, individual Cloud platforms, either private or public, provide their own interfaces for customers to interact with the underlying infrastructures. This situation undoubtedly burdens the users who compute on different Clouds. In this work, we developed a generic interface that allows the user to access the diverse Clouds in a unified way. It provides utilities for requesting and invoking the services. It offers graphical views to show the Cloud information that is visible to the users. The interface also combines different Clouds into a single platform enabling inter-Cloud communications.
Keywords: Cloud Computing; Graphical User Interface; Grid Computing; Interoperability

Harald Störrle, Cost-effective evolution of research prototypes into end-user tools: The MACH case study, Science of Computer Programming, Available online 14 August 2015, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2015.07.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S016764231500146X)
Abstract: Abstract
Much of Software Engineering research needs to provide an implementation as proof-of-concept. Often such implementations are created as exploratory prototypes without polished user interfaces, making it difficult to (1) run user studies to validate the tool's contribution, (2) validate the author's claim by fellow scientists, and (3) demonstrate the utility and value of the research contribution to any interested parties. However, turning an exploratory prototype into a “proper” tool for end-users often entails great effort. Heavyweight mainstream frameworks such as Eclipse do not address this issue; their steep learning curves constitute substantial entry barriers to such ecosystems.

In this paper, we present the Model Analyzer/Checker (MACH), a stand-alone tool with a command-line interpreter. MACH integrates a set of research prototypes for analyzing UML models. By choosing a simple command line interpreter rather than (costly) graphical user interface, we achieved the core goal of quickly deploying research results to a broader audience while keeping the required effort to an absolute minimum. We analyze MACH as a case study of how requirements and constraints in an academic environment influence design decisions in software tool development. We argue that our approach while perhaps unconventional, serves its purpose with a remarkable cost-benefit ratio.
Keywords: Architectural design process; Design decisions; Software tool research prototype; Architectural choice points; UML model analysis and checking

C. Paul Morrey, James Geller, Michael Halper, Yehoshua Perl, The Neighborhood Auditing Tool: A hybrid interface for auditing the UMLS, Journal of Biomedical Informatics, Volume 42, Issue 3, June 2009, Pages 468-489, ISSN 1532-0464, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jbi.2009.01.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1532046409000197)
Abstract: The UMLS’s integration of more than 100 source vocabularies, not necessarily consistent with one another, causes some inconsistencies. The purpose of auditing the UMLS is to detect such inconsistencies and to suggest how to resolve them while observing the requirement of fully representing the content of each source in the UMLS. A software tool, called the Neighborhood Auditing Tool (NAT), that facilitates UMLS auditing is presented. The NAT supports “neighborhood-based” auditing, where, at any given time, an auditor concentrates on a single-focus concept and one of a variety of neighborhoods of its closely related concepts. Typical diagrammatic displays of concept networks have a number of shortcomings, so the NAT utilizes a hybrid diagram/text interface that features stylized neighborhood views which retain some of the best features of both the diagrammatic layouts and text windows while avoiding the shortcomings. The NAT allows an auditor to display knowledge from both the Metathesaurus (concept) level and the Semantic Network (semantic type) level. Various additional features of the NAT that support the auditing process are described. The usefulness of the NAT is demonstrated through a group of case studies. Its impact is tested with a study involving a select group of auditors.
Keywords: Unified Medical Language System; Auditing of terminologies; Auditing of ontologies; Auditing of the UMLS; Software tool; Auditing tool; User interface; Hybrid diagram/text user interface

Jesús Chacón, Gonzalo Farias, Hector Vargas, Antonio Visioli, Sebastián Dormido, Remote Interoperability Protocol: A bridge between interactive interfaces and engineering systems*, IFAC-PapersOnLine, Volume 48, Issue 29, 2015, Pages 247-252, ISSN 2405-8963, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ifacol.2015.11.244.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2405896315025021)
Abstract: Abstract
The process of building remote or virtual laboratories to be deployed via Internet usually involves communication between different software tools. Very often, there is a separation between the software which interfaces with the model or real system, and the software responsible of providing the student with an interactive and visual representation of the data provided by the engineering system. Abstracting the way these two elements communicate with each other from the particular implementation, the requirements are frequently the same: connection and session control, data transmission control, user interaction handling, etc. This work describes a generic protocol to interoperate remotely any kind of engineering software. The solution proposes to encapsulate all the communication issues into an interoperability API that can be implemented in many different systems. In order to show the flexibility of such API, an implementation to interoperate MATLAB from Java user interfaces via JSONRPC is explained in detail.
Keywords: control education; interactive; teaching; computer interfaces; communication protocols

Shmulik P. Friedman, Gregory Communar, Alon Gamliel, DIDAS – User-friendly software package for assisting drip irrigation design and scheduling, Computers and Electronics in Agriculture, Volume 120, January 2016, Pages 36-52, ISSN 0168-1699, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compag.2015.11.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168169915003440)
Abstract: Abstract
The DIDAS software package, based on analytical solutions of linearized water flow and uptake problems, assists in drip-irrigation system design and irrigation scheduling. Water flow is described by superposition of solutions for positive sources (on-surface or subsurface emitters) and negative sinks (root systems). Steady water flow is assumed in the design module and unsteady flow in the irrigation scheduling module. The design tool, based on relative water uptake rate (RWUR) criterion, assesses the effects on water use efficiency of geometrical attributes: distances between emitters along drip lines; separation between drip lines; depth of subsurface emitters; and size and depth of root systems. Evaluation of the maximum possible RWUR assumes no plant–atmosphere resistance to water uptake, i.e., the roots are assumed to apply maximum suction and the water uptake rate depends only on the soil capability to conduct water from sources to sinks. The RWUR computations require only three parameters describing the soil texture, the root zone size, and the potential evaporation, in accounting also for evaporation from the soil surface. The optimizing tool for irrigation scheduling is based on a relative water uptake volume (RWUV) criterion. The computations of diurnal variations of water uptake rates and RWUV for a given irrigation scenario require additional information on the diurnal pattern of plant resistance to water uptake and on the soil hydraulic conductivity. DIDAS also contains a diurnal pattern module for evaluating diurnal water-uptake patterns; it assumes quasi-steady flow and accounts for the diurnal variations of plant–atmosphere resistance and evaporation in fine-tuning the design and in preliminary evaluation of scheduling scenarios. DIDAS was programmed in Delphi, runs on a PC under the Windows operating system, and requires no further software. The drip irrigation scenario is constructed via a few GUI windows, which contain also a library of the required soil input parameters, and a best-fitting procedure for determining them. The computed RWURs and RWUVs are displayed graphically and the tabulated output results can be exported to, e.g., Microsoft Excel for further processing. An updated DIDAS version can be downloaded freely from http://app.agri.gov.il/didas.
Keywords: Irrigation management; Trickle irrigation; Water use efficiency

Paul M. Di Gangi, Molly Wasko, Steal my idea! Organizational adoption of user innovations from a user innovation community: A case study of Dell IdeaStorm, Decision Support Systems, Volume 48, Issue 1, December 2009, Pages 303-312, ISSN 0167-9236, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.dss.2009.04.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167923609000888)
Abstract: Open innovation models suggest that an organization's end users can be a potentially beneficial source for new ideas and innovations. However, incorporating end users raises some interesting challenges regarding how to balance the decision making power between a firm and the user community. Using Diffusion of Innovation Theory, we propose hypotheses based on the perceived attributes of end user ideas and end user promotion efforts. Our findings suggest that the decision to adopt a user innovation was based on the ability of the firm to understand the technical requirements and respond to community concerns regarding the innovation.
Keywords: Open innovation; User innovation communities; Online community; Absorptive capacity; Sources of innovation; Organizational adoption

Chiara Monti, Carlo Neri, Fabio Pollastrone, Instrumentation, control and data acquisition system with multiple configurations for test in nuclear environment, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volumes 96–97, October 2015, Pages 873-877, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2015.02.048.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379615001398)
Abstract: Abstract
The In-Vessel Viewing System is a 3D laser scanning system which will be used to inspect the blanket first wall in ITER. To make the IVVS probe design compatible with the harsh environmental conditions present in ITER, a test campaign was performed in 2012–2013 to verify the adequacy of the main components of the IVVS probe. The IVVS components inspected were an optical encoder, passive components and two customized ultrasonic piezoceramic motors that were instrumented with various sensors. A general architecture of the Data Acquisition and Control System (DACS) was defined and then specialized for each test. To be suitable for this test campaign, the DACS had to host various I/O modules and to properly interface the driver of the customized piezo motors, in order to permit the full control of the test and the acquisition of experimental data. This paper presents the instrumentation solutions designed and implemented for different facilities constraints and the related DACS developed in four specialized versions for the described test campaign.
Keywords: ITER; IVVS; Data acquisition; Radiation resistant; Piezoceramic

L.Y. Zheng, H.F. Dong, P. Vichare, A. Nassehi, S.T. Newman, Systematic modeling and reusing of process knowledge for rapid process configuration, Robotics and Computer-Integrated Manufacturing, Volume 24, Issue 6, December 2008, Pages 763-772, ISSN 0736-5845, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.rcim.2008.03.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736584508000380)
Abstract: Rapid product development relies heavily on quick and reliable process planning and knowledge reuse. Process configuration borrows the principles of product configuration and applies them to process planning. It allows the reuse of hierarchical, historical and case-based manufacturing process knowledge to generate process plans efficiently and effectively. This paper presents a systematic knowledge model for manufacturing process cases. The model represents process knowledge at different levels of granularity and to facilitate process configuration. With this knowledge model the process knowledge is categorized into 6 levels: (i) core process skeletons, (ii) process networks, (iii) process routes, (iv) process segments, (v) processes/workplan, and (vi) operations/working step. Based on the systematic knowledge model, this paper also proposes an approach to achieve rapid process configuration by reusing the process knowledge and by performing the involved configuration rules so as to create an appropriate, reliable and effective process plan. The prototype for a graphical process planner based on this knowledge model is developed and an aerospace example is used to validate the proposed process knowledge model and process configuration.
Keywords: Process configuration; Process planning; Knowledge reuse; Product family; STEP

Ana I. Molina, Miguel A. Redondo, Manuel Ortega, Carmen Lacave, Evaluating a graphical notation for modeling collaborative learning activities: A family of experiments, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 88, 1 August 2014, Pages 54-81, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2014.02.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642314000860)
Abstract: Abstract
It is increasingly common to use languages and notations, mainly of a graphical nature, to assist in the design and specification of learning systems. There are several proposals, although few of them support the modeling of collaborative tasks. In this paper, we identify the main features to be considered for modeling this kind of activities and we propose the use of the CIAN notation for this purpose. In this work, we also try to empirically analyze the quality (in particular the understandability) of that notation. To this end, three empirical studies have been conducted. In these experiments we used several sources of information: subjective perception of the designers, their profiles and their performance on a set of understandability exercises, as well as the physical evidence provided by an eye tracker device. The results obtained denote positive perceptions about the use of the CIAN notation for modeling collaborative learning activities.
Keywords: Educational modeling; CSCL; Notation assessments; Empirical study; Eye tracking

James V. Luisi, Part III - Information Systems, In Pragmatic Enterprise Architecture, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 57-188, ISBN 9780128002056, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-800205-6.00003-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128002056000032)
Abstract: Abstract
This part enters into the main territory of enterprise architecture for information systems which is as rich in technology specialties as the IT ecosystem is diverse. Most organizations fail to recognize the need for diverse specialization within architecture because they fail to understand the depth of complexity and the costs associated with mediocrity within each area of specialization. They also believe that a general practioner, which we will call a solution architect, is qualified and appropriate to address the complexities across a wide array of technology areas. In reality, this is equivalent to staffing a medical center primarily with general practioners that act as the specialists. A healthy organization maintains top specialists with which the general practioners can participate in getting expertise that is in alignment with a future state vision that reduces complexity and costs.
Keywords: information systems architecture; enterprise architecture; business architecture; operations architecture; systems architecture; control systems architecture; cross-discipline capabilities; solution architect; subject matter expert; stakeholders; Legal; Compliance; Auditing; Chief Customer Officer; outsourcing partners; customers; investors; shareholders; regulators; enterprise architects; hedgehog principle; architectural standards; technology portfolio management; TPM; organizing technologies into portfolios; architecture ROI framework; application impact; infrastructure impact; personnel impact; vendor impact; operational workflow impact; business impact; after tax implications; net present value; NPV; internal rate of return; IRR; personnel severance costs; airfare; lodging; enhanced technology portfolio management; technology categories; technology subcategories; technology metadata; reporting architecture; OLTP; online transaction processing; OLAP; online analytical processing; business intelligence; nonstatistical analysis; data mining; predictive analytics; operational data store; ODS; DW; data warehouse; data mart; DM; GIS; geographic information system; Big Data; mashup technology; data warehouse architecture; BI Architecture; rollups; aggregates; dimensions; MOLAP; ROLAP; HOLAP; WOLAP; DOLAP; RTOLAP; CEP; complex event processing; NLP; natural language processing; data visualization; cluster diagrams; terrain maps; architectural drawings; floor plans; shelf layouts; routes; connectivity diagrams; bubbles; histograms; heat maps; scatter plots; rose charts; cockpit gauges; radar diagrams; stem and leaf plots; predict behavior; longitudinal analysis; survey sampling models; stimulus-response predictive models; statistical methods; nonstatistical models; neural networks; neural nets; polynomial; Big Data architecture; structured data; unstructured data; semistructured data; velocity; volume; frequency of updates; variety; concurrent users; OldSQL; New SQL; SQL; free space; query language; ACID; atomicity; consistency; isolation; durability; node; symmetric multiprocessing; SMP; massively parallel processing; MPP; asymmetric massively parallel processing; AMPP; Hadoop; DFS; distributed file system; MapReduce; Apache Software Foundation; ASF; FOSS; IP; Google; GFS; HDSF; GPFS; BigTable; NoSQL; Hbase; R Language; R Programming Language; Sqoop; Hive; Pig; Impala; FSF; free software foundation; CRAN; Comprehensive R Archive Network; R extensions; Luisi Prime Numbers; competing Hadoop frameworks; Cloudera; Hortonworks; MapR; IBM; Microsoft; Intel; Syncsort; SAS; Big Data is use case driven; document management/content management; knowledge management; graph DB; online transaction processing systems; data warehousing; real-time analytics; algorithmic approaches; batch analysis; advanced search; relational database technology in Hadoop; novelty discoveries; class discoveries; association discoveries; document management; content management; government archival records; business document management; IT document management; customer document management; Basho Riak; MarkLogic; MongoDB; Cassandra; Couchbase; Hadoop HDFS; Hadoop HBase; KYC; AML; SAP Hana; HP Vertica; Greenplum; Teradata; lifetime value; LTV; forecasting; Fair Isaac’s; HNC; Ward Systems; SAS complex event processing; algorithm based; matrix vector multiplication; relational algebraic operations; selections and projections; union; intersection and difference; grouping and aggregation; reducer size and replication rates; similarity joins; graph modeling; Netezza; NewSQL; e-Commerce; Akiban; Clustrix; Google Spanner; NuoDB; SQLFire; VoltDB; batch analytics; HDFS; address geocoding; linear measures event modeling; routing; topological; cartography; Neo4j; PostGIS; Oracle Spatial; Geotime; search and discovery; Lucidworks; Solr; Splunk; relational database technology in Hadoop; Splice Machine; Citus Data; use case driven; life cycle; ad hoc deployment; Big Data deployment; metadata; Big Data ecosystem; use case planning; business metadata; use case requirements; internal data discovery; external data discovery; inbound metadata; ingestion metadata; data persistence layer metadata; outbound metadata; lifecycle metadata; operations metadata; data governance metadata; compliance metadata; configuration management metadata; team metadata; directory services metadata; ecosystem administrator metadata; stakeholder metadata; workflow metadata; decommissioning metadata; metadata summary; There is no magic; Big Data accelerators; parallel and distributed processing; reduced code set that eliminates large amounts of DBMS code; fewer features; compression; proprietary hardware; SOA; OOA; LDA; CPU; LZ77; LZ78; Huffman; columnar; Big Data the future; quantum computing; code breaking; cryptography; prime number generation; traveling salesman problem; labeling images and objects within images; identifying correlations in genetic code; testing a scientific hypothesis; machine learning for problem solving (aka self-programming); adiabatic; AQC; gate model; D-Wave; qubit; quantum error correction; quantum processor; titanium; niobium; Columbian; Kelvin; Tesla; Josephson junction; Boolean SAT; SAPI interface; compiler; client libraries; frameworks; applications; mashup architecture; data virtualization layer; cross data landscape metrics; data security; data visualization styles; self-service; LDAP; compliance architecture; treaty zone; business compliance; IT compliance; ISO 17799; ISO 27000; COSO; Committee of Sponsoring Organizations of the Treadway Commission; OFAC; Office of Foreign Assets Control; Treasury department; United and Strengthening America by Providing Appropriate Tools Required to Intercept and Obstruct Terrorism; Section 314(a); USA PATRIOT Act; Office of Federal Contract Compliance Programs; OFCCP; Equal Employment Opportunity Act; EEOA; Financial Stability Board; FSB; Global Financial Markets Association; GFMA; Bank Secrecy Act; BSA; Regulation E of the Electronic Fund Transfer Act; EFTA; Dodd-Frank; Securities and Exchange Commission; SEC; Federal Trade Commission; FTC; Office of the Comptroller of the Currency; OCC; Commodity Futures Trading Commission; CFTC; International Swaps and Derivatives Association; ISDA; Sarbanes Oxley; SOX; Basel II; Solvency II; Blocked Persons List; Targeted Countries List; Denied Persons List; Denied Entities List; FBI’s Most Wanted; Debarred Parties List; Global Watch List; Politically Exposed Persons; PEP; anti-money laundering; know your client; suspicious activity report; SAR; CIP; DTCC; NSCC; DTC; SWIFT; CICI; LEI; CFTC Interim Compliant Identifier; National Securities Clearing Corporation; Customer Identification Program; Society for the Worldwide Interbank Financial Telecommunication; Legal Entity Identifier; RIM; legal hold; records information management; Governance Risk and Compliance; GRC; XBRL; 10-Q; 10-K; 20-F; 8-K; 6-K; legal compliance; HR compliance; financial compliance; application portfolio architecture; APM; applications architecture; business rules; workflow architecture; business capabilities; BPMN; workflow automation; BPM technology; application architecture; singular application; first-generation language; second-generation language; third-generation language; fourth-generation language; drag-and-drop self-service; array language; vector language; assembly language; command line interfaces; compiled language; interpreted language; data manipulation language; object-oriented language; scripting language; procedural language; rules engine; requirements traceability; error handling; software reuse; application architecture design patterns; integration pattern; distribution pattern; tier pattern; procedural pattern; processing pattern; usage pattern; analytical pattern; interactive pattern; data communication pattern; message dissemination pattern; resource sequence pattern; pipeline pattern; pipe and filter; event-driven pattern; blackboard pattern; MV pattern; integration architecture; hub and spoke; ESB; service-oriented architecture; enterprise service bus; extract transform and load; ETL; FTP; file transfer protocol; B2B; B2C; partner integration; life cycle architecture; software development life cycle; data centric life cycle; DCLC; DGLC; DLC; merger and acquisition life cycle; MALC; data center consolidation life cycle; DCCLC; corporate restructuring life cycle; CRLC; outsourcing life cycle; OSLC; insourcing life cycle; ISLC; operations life cycle; OLC; SDLC; ISO/IEC 12207; inception; high-level analysis; detail analysis; logical design; physical design; build; validation; deployment; post-implementation; logical data architecture; data requirements; data analysis; data profiling; conceptual data modeling; logical data modeling; physical data modeling; data discovery; data acquisition; data cleansing; data standardization; data integration; user acceptance; production; data governance life cycle; identifying data points; populating business data glossary; conceptual data architecture; business designated access rights; legal and compliance oversight; secure canned reporting data points; report and querying; production to nonproduction data movement; AGLC; architecture governance life cycle; analyze business direction; analyze business pain points; analyze types of technological issues; analyze all business initiative types; assess business alignment; initial architecture review; postmortem architecture review; divestiture life cycle; identify scope of business being divested; identify divested business capabilities; identify shared operations; automation supporting divested capabilities; identify dedicated operations; detach general ledger; identify unstructured data of divested areas; identify RIM data; define RIM business data; safeguard RIM data; validate RIM reporting; identify legal holds; safeguard legal hold data; validate legal hold reporting; downsize business operations; downsize automation; decommission; downsize IT operations; mergers and acquisitions; identify business scope being acquired; identify business organization impact; identify acquired automation; analyze overlapping automation; identify legal holds; compare data landscapes; identify automation impact; identify development environment impact; implement automation strategy; identify IT organization impact; general ledger integration; right-size business operations; right-size automation; right-size IT operations; data center consolidation; insourcing life cycle

Martin Swobodzinski, Piotr Jankowski, Evaluating user interaction with a web-based group decision support system: A comparison between two clustering methods, Decision Support Systems, Volume 77, September 2015, Pages 148-157, ISSN 0167-9236, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.dss.2015.07.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167923615001207)
Abstract: Abstract
Task-Technology Fit theory and the Technology Acceptance Model identify system utilization as an important indicator for the performance of complex software systems. Yet, empirical evaluations of user interaction with group decision support systems are scarce and often methodologically underdeveloped. For this study we employed an exploratory evaluation of user interaction in the context of web-based group decision support systems. Specifically, we used information-rich server logs captured through a web-based platform for participatory transportation planning to identify groups of users with similar use patterns. The groups were derived through multiple sequence alignment and hierarchical cluster analysis based on varying user activity measures. Subsequently, we assessed the reliability of the classifications obtained from the two clustering methods. Our results indicate limited reliability of classifications of activity sequences through multiple sequence alignment analysis and robust groupings from hierarchical cluster analysis for user activity initiations and durations. The presented work contributes a novel methodological framework for the evaluation of complex software systems that extends beyond the common approach of soliciting user satisfaction.
Keywords: Web-based group decision support systems; Human–computer interaction; Server log analysis; Use pattern evaluation; Cluster analysis

Zia-ur Rehman, Omar Khadeer Hussain, Farookh Khadeer Hussain, User-side cloud service management: State-of-the-art and future directions, Journal of Network and Computer Applications, Volume 55, September 2015, Pages 108-122, ISSN 1084-8045, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jnca.2015.05.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1084804515001071)
Abstract: Abstract
Cloud computing is increasing in usage because of its technical and financial advantages over traditional computing paradigms and also because of the availability of an expanding number of cloud services offered by new service providers. Consistent with its growth, there has been wide research interest in the literature that focuses on increasing cloud adoption. However, the current commercial and research-oriented cloud computing research in the literature mainly deals with functionalities closer to cloud infrastructure, such as improved performance and the management of virtualized resources, as well as fundamental issues related to efficient resource utilization, such as virtual machine (VM) migrations and server consolidation. While on the one hand, such features are very important, on the other hand, other important features, such as cloud quality of service management which is important for the cloud environment to move from a basic cloud service infrastructure to a broader cloud service ecosystem, have not received the required due attention. In cloud service management, a cloud service user has several choices for service selection and the quest to achieve interoperability and compatibility in cloud computing will consequently enable the user to easily migrate between service providers. In this scenario, the user needs to make important cloud service management decisions based on QoS, in addition to other criteria such as usage cost. These issues, when considered from a user׳s perspective, are quite different from cloud infrastructure management issues envisioned from a cloud provider׳s perspective. There are several challenges in cloud service management from a user׳s perspective, which the current cloud service management platforms in the literature do not address. To address this drawback, this paper presents a comprehensive state-of-the-art discussion on the existing approaches to cloud service management, critically evaluates them against the factors required for the user to manage the cloud service and presents a framework that assists the cloud service user in making cloud service management decisions.
Keywords: Cloud services; Cloud computing; Cloud service management; QoS prediction; Cloud service monitoring

Christopher Jones, Carol Blanchette, Matthew Brooke, John Harris, Matthew Jones, Mark Schildhauer, A metadata-driven framework for generating field data entry interfaces in ecology, Ecological Informatics, Volume 2, Issue 3, October 2007, Pages 270-278, ISSN 1574-9541, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ecoinf.2007.06.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574954107000416)
Abstract: With the advent of affordable yet powerful handheld computers, many ecologists now capture data electronically in the field, while avoiding transcription errors found in more traditional field notebook or slate-based approaches of recording data. Ecologists either use simple forms from generic handheld software that doesn’t allow for needed optimizations, or else they must spend substantial effort in the design and optimization of handheld software user interfaces. These efforts often produce highly customized software that is not easily repurposed, and that produce non-standard, undocumented data formats.

Our research is focused on reducing this effort by providing a flexible framework that uses highly structured metadata to drive the generation of customized data entry interfaces. Our approach relies on formalized metadata encoded in either XML Schema or XML instance documents, which facilitate the creation of graphical interfaces from arbitrary data schemas. Specifically, we leverage the rich metadata descriptions and structures found in the Ecological Metadata Language to create data entry forms, and output data sets that adhere to this specification. The interfaces are refined by using data-typing and domain information found in the structured metadata to generate validation routines that assist in maintaining data integrity during the entry process. The framework utilizes a rule-based engine to promote both reuse and extensibility of the modules that are created for any given data entry effort. Interfaces are rendered using open, Internet-based standards to maintain portability and to advocate the sharing of software components.

The framework represents an initial implementation of a customizable user interface generator, which should have broad applicability to researchers in need of rapidly creating field and laboratory-based forms for varied collection efforts.
Keywords: Ecological data entry; User-interface generation; Metadata; Handheld computer; Schema inference

Sergei Gorlatch, Jens Müller-Iden, Martin Alt, Jan Dünnweber, Hamido Fujita, Yutaka Funyu, Clayworks: Toward user-oriented software for collaborative modeling and simulation, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 22, Issue 3, April 2009, Pages 209-215, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.knosys.2008.12.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950705108001986)
Abstract: We consider the development of software systems that integrate collaborative real-time modeling and distributed computing. Our main goal is user-orientation: we need a collaborative workspace for geographically dispersed users with a seamless access of every user to high-performance servers. This paper presents a particular prototype, Clayworks, that allows modeling of virtual clay objects and running computation-intensive deformation simulations for objects crashing into each other. In order to integrate heterogeneous computational resources, we adopt modern Grid middleware and provide the users with an intuitive graphical interface. Simulations are parallelized using a higher-order component (HOC) which abstracts over the web service resource framework (WSRF) used to interconnect our worksuite to the computation server. Clayworks is a representative of a large class of demanding systems which combine collaborative, user-oriented modeling with performance-critical computations, e.g., crash-tests or simulations of biological population evolution.
Keywords: User-oriented software development; Collaborative environments; Real-time modeling; High-performance simulation

Kwai-Sang Chin, Kwong-Chi Lo, Jendy P.F. Leung, Development of user-satisfaction-based knowledge management performance measurement system with evidential reasoning approach, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 37, Issue 1, January 2010, Pages 366-382, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2009.05.051.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417409004977)
Abstract: Confronting fierce global competition, organizations have implemented knowledge management to enhance competitive advantages. With increasing investments in resources for knowledge management implementation in many organizations, measuring knowledge management performance has become an important agenda among researchers and practitioners. However, the current knowledge management performance measurement methods cannot truly report the results of organizations’ knowledge management efforts. To address this problem, there is a need of a better approach for measuring knowledge management performance in organizations. This paper presents the authors’ recent research in using a K-user satisfaction based approach and evidential reasoning methodology to develop a user-satisfaction-based knowledge management performance measurement system for organizations to identify strengths and weaknesses, as well as enhance continuous learning. A case study in applying the developed system and methodology in primary school education has been conducted to demonstrate its effectiveness.
Keywords: Knowledge management; Performance measurement; User satisfaction; Evidential reasoning

Kiju Lee, Donghwa Jeong, Rachael C. Schindler, Elizabeth J. Short, SIG-Blocks: Tangible game technology for automated cognitive assessment, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 65, December 2016, Pages 163-175, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2016.08.023.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563216305878)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents the SIG-Blocks system developed for automated cognitive assessment via tangible geometric games (TAG-Games). Computerized game administration and real-time cognitive and behavior assessments were realized by wireless self-synchronization in communication, decentralized hybrid-sensing, assembly and motion detection, and graphical visualization. The measurable performance data included time and accuracy at each manipulation step, overall speed of manipulative motions, and the total number of rotational motions. For preliminary evaluation, three types of TAG-Games were designed: TAG-GameA for assembly, TAG-GameS for shape matching, and TAG-GameM for memory. As a part of the game design, a computational measure of play complexity was defined for each TAG-Game based on the geometric properties and the number of blocks in the item. An evaluation with 86 participants assessed both reliability of the TAG-Game items using split-half and test-retest reliability tests and validity of the proposed complexity measures by comparing the results with three subtests of the Wechsler Adults Intelligence Scale 4th Edition (WAIS-IV), i.e. Block Design (BD), Matrix Reasoning (MR), and Digit Span (DS). The high reliability coefficients showed that TAG-Games were reliable. Regarding validity, correlations were found between TAG-GameA and BD and between TAG-GameS and MR. Behavioral analysis also showed that the TAG-Game performance was positively correlated with the manipulation speed, but not correlated with the total number of rotations applied to the blocks.
Keywords: Sensor-embedded blocks; Tangible user interface; Wireless sensor network; Cognitive assessment

Monica Drăgoicea, João Falcão e Cunha, Monica Pătraşcu, Self-organising socio-technical description in service systems for supporting smart user decisions in public transport, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 42, Issues 17–18, October 2015, Pages 6329-6341, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2015.04.029.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417415002596)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper describes an exploration towards the transposition of service science principles into design guidelines. This aims at capturing value co-creation service interactions embedding customer experience in service design and delivery activities. The new Socio-Technical Systems Engineering (STSE) process is proposed to guide improved design, and it is exemplified with a new real time service that provides integrated information for trip planning in a city. The STSE process supports a high level visual modelling approach assisted by model execution and simulation tools. From a service engineering perspective, the outcomes of this process are artefacts that automatically support consistency among design steps and effective integration of customer experience and stakeholder requirements through iterative cycles related to service design. The application of the STSE process in the design of an exploratory case study of a real time information and travel planning service is validated through simulation using an executable representation of requirements. It can be executed over more complex transport service offerings, with different resource allocation algorithms, or different public transport planning services over a sample of real users requesting information. Results of such a simulation are beneficial for the users, for the service providers, and for the authorities managing public transport in city or metropolitan areas.
Keywords: Service systems; Service interactions; Service design; Agent based simulation; Self-organisation

T. Pham-Gia, N. Turkkan, An optimal two-stage graphical search planning procedure for submerged targets, Mathematical and Computer Modelling, Volume 36, Issues 1–2, July 2002, Pages 217-230, ISSN 0895-7177, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0895-7177(02)00118-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0895717702001188)
Abstract: The graphical methods presented by Koopman [1,2] in the classical stationary search theory are extended to a two-stage search of a submerged target, subject to an overall budgetary constraint and with possible budget transfer between the stages. An algorithm, based on the technique for computing the highest posterior density region (hpd) in Bayesian statistics, developed by the authors, and an associated computer code, are provided to permit a convenient and precise graphical solution to the problem, instead of using the usual analytic approach. A numerical example, formulated under realistic hypotheses, illustrates the various capabilities of this code.
Keywords: Search theory; Allocation function; Detection function; Graphical solution; Budget transfer; Sea level search; Undersea search; Highest posterior density region

Kannan Mohan, Peng Xu, Lan Cao, Balasubramaniam Ramesh, Improving change management in software development: Integrating traceability and software configuration management, Decision Support Systems, Volume 45, Issue 4, November 2008, Pages 922-936, ISSN 0167-9236, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.dss.2008.03.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167923608000523)
Abstract: Software configuration management (SCM) and traceability are two prominent practices that support change management in software development. While SCM helps manage the evolution of software artifacts and their documentation, traceability helps manage knowledge about the process of the development of software artifacts. In this paper, we present the integration of traceability and SCM to help change management during the development and evolution of software artifacts. We developed a traceability model using a case study conducted in a software development organization. This model represents knowledge elements that are essential to comprehensively manage changes tracked within the change management function of SCM tools. A tool that supports the integrated practice of SCM and traceability is also presented. We illustrate the usefulness of our model and tool using a change management scenario that was drawn from our case study. We also present a qualitative study towards empirically evaluating the usefulness of our approach.
Keywords: Software configuration management; Traceability; Change management; Process knowledge

M. Ageron, J.A. Aguilar, I. Al Samarai, A. Albert, F. Ameli, M. André, M. Anghinolfi, G. Anton, S. Anvar, M. Ardid, K. Arnaud, E. Aslanides, A.C. Assis Jesus, T. Astraatmadja, J.-J. Aubert, R. Auer, E. Barbarito, B. Baret, S. Basa, M. Bazzotti, Y. Becherini, J. Beltramelli, A. Bersani, V. Bertin, S. Beurthey, S. Biagi, C. Bigongiari, M. Billault, R. Blaes, C. Bogazzi, N. de Botton, M. Bou-Cabo, B. Boudahef, M.C. Bouwhuis, A.M. Brown, J. Brunner, J. Busto, L. Caillat, A. Calzas, F. Camarena, A. Capone, L. Caponetto, C. Cârloganu, G. Carminati, E. Carmona, J. Carr, P.H. Carton, B. Cassano, E. Castorina, S. Cecchini, A. Ceres, Th. Chaleil, Ph. Charvis, P. Chauchot, T. Chiarusi, M. Circella, C. Compère, R. Coniglione, X. Coppolani, A. Cosquer, H. Costantini, N. Cottini, P. Coyle, S. Cuneo, C. Curtil, C. D'Amato, G. Damy, R. van Dantzig, G. De Bonis, G. Decock, M.P. Decowski, I. Dekeyser, E. Delagnes, F. Desages-Ardellier, A. Deschamps, J.-J. Destelle, F. Di Maria, B. Dinkespiler, C. Distefano, J.-L. Dominique, C. Donzaud, D. Dornic, Q. Dorosti, J.-F. Drogou, D. Drouhin, F. Druillole, D. Durand, R. Durand, T. Eberl, U. Emanuele, J.J. Engelen, J.-P. Ernenwein, S. Escoffier, E. Falchini, S. Favard, F. Fehr, F. Feinstein, M. Ferri, S. Ferry, C. Fiorello, V. Flaminio, F. Folger, U. Fritsch, J.-L. Fuda, S. Galatá, S. Galeotti, P. Gay, F. Gensolen, G. Giacomelli, C. Gojak, J.P. Gómez-González, Ph. Goret, K. Graf, G. Guillard, G. Halladjian, G. Hallewell, H. van Haren, B. Hartmann, A.J. Heijboer, E. Heine, Y. Hello, S. Henry, J.J. Hernández-Rey, B. Herold, J. Hößl, J. Hogenbirk, C.C. Hsu, J.R. Hubbard, M. Jaquet, M. Jaspers, M. de Jong, D. Jourde, M. Kadler, N. Kalantar-Nayestanaki, O. Kalekin, A. Kappes, T. Karg, S. Karkar, M. Karolak, U. Katz, P. Keller, P. Kestener, E. Kok, H. Kok, P. Kooijman, C. Kopper, A. Kouchner, W. Kretschmer, A. Kruijer, S. Kuch, V. Kulikovskiy, D. Lachartre, H. Lafoux, P. Lagier, R. Lahmann, C. Lahonde-Hamdoun, P. Lamare, G. Lambard, J.-C. Languillat, G. Larosa, J. Lavalle, Y. Le Guen, H. Le Provost, A. LeVanSuu, D. Lefèvre, T. Legou, G. Lelaizant, C. Lévéque, G. Lim, D. Lo Presti, H. Loehner, S. Loucatos, F. Louis, F. Lucarelli, V. Lyashuk, P. Magnier, S. Mangano, A. Marcel, M. Marcelin, A. Margiotta, J.A. Martinez-Mora, R. Masullo, F. Mazéas, A. Mazure, A. Meli, M. Melissas, E. Migneco, M. Mongelli, T. Montaruli, M. Morganti, L. Moscoso, H. Motz, M. Musumeci, C. Naumann, M. Naumann-Godo, M. Neff, V. Niess, G.J.L. Nooren, J.E.J. Oberski, C. Olivetto, N. Palanque-Delabrouille, D. Palioselitis, R. Papaleo, G.E. Păvălaş, K. Payet, P. Payre, H. Peek, J. Petrovic, P. Piattelli, N. Picot-Clemente, C. Picq, Y. Piret, J. Poinsignon, V. Popa, T. Pradier, E. Presani, G. Prono, C. Racca, G. Raia, J. van Randwijk, D. Real, C. Reed, F. Réthoré, P. Rewiersma, G. Riccobene, C. Richardt, R. Richter, J.S. Ricol, V. Rigaud, V. Roca, K. Roensch, J.-F. Rolin, A. Rostovtsev, A. Rottura, J. Roux, M. Rujoiu, M. Ruppi, G.V. Russo, F. Salesa, K. Salomon, P. Sapienza, F. Schmitt, F. Schöck, J.-P. Schuller, F. Schüssler, D. Sciliberto, R. Shanidze, E. Shirokov, F. Simeone, A. Sottoriva, A. Spies, T. Spona, M. Spurio, J.J.M. Steijger, Th. Stolarczyk, K. Streeb, L. Sulak, M. Taiuti, C. Tamburini, C. Tao, L. Tasca, G. Terreni, D. Tezier, S. Toscano, F. Urbano, P. Valdy, B. Vallage, V. Van Elewyck, G. Vannoni, M. Vecchi, G. Venekamp, B. Verlaat, P. Vernin, E. Virique, G. de Vries, R. van Wijk, G. Wijnker, G. Wobbe, E. de Wolf, Y. Yakovenko, H. Yepes, D. Zaborov, H. Zaccone, J.D. Zornoza, J. Zúñiga, ANTARES: The first undersea neutrino telescope, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 656, Issue 1, 11 November 2011, Pages 11-38, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nima.2011.06.103.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168900211013994)
Abstract: The ANTARES Neutrino Telescope was completed in May 2008 and is the first operational Neutrino Telescope in the Mediterranean Sea. The main purpose of the detector is to perform neutrino astronomy and the apparatus also offers facilities for marine and Earth sciences. This paper describes the design, the construction and the installation of the telescope in the deep sea, offshore from Toulon in France. An illustration of the detector performance is given.
Keywords: Neutrino; Astroparticle; Neutrino astronomy; Deep sea detector; Marine technology; DWDM; Photomultiplier tube; Submarine cable; Wet mateable connector

Kristian Beckers, Isabelle Côté, Thomas Frese, Denis Hatebur, Maritta Heisel, A structured and systematic model-based development method for automotive systems, considering the OEM/supplier interface, Reliability Engineering & System Safety, Available online 20 September 2016, ISSN 0951-8320, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ress.2016.08.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0951832016304057)
Abstract: Abstract
The released ISO 26262 standard for automotive systems requires to create a hazard analysis and risk assessment and to create safety goals, to break down these safety goals into functional safety requirements in the functional safety concept, to specify technical safety requirements in the safety requirements specification, and to perform several validation and verification activities. Experience shows that the definition of technical safety requirements and the planning and execution of validation and verification activities has to be done jointly by OEMs and suppliers. In this paper, we present a structured and model-based safety development approach for automotive systems. The different steps are based on Jackson's requirement engineering. The elements are represented by UML notation extended with stereotypes. The UML model enables a rigorous validation of several constraints. We make use of the results of previously published work to be able to focus on the OEM/supplier interface. We illustrate our method using a three-wheeled-tilting control system (3WTC) as running example and case study.
Keywords: ISO 26262; Automotive; Hazard analysis; Risk assessment; Safety goal; Safety; Functional; Technical; Requirement; UML; Validation and verification

P. Camps, M. Baes, SKIRT: An advanced dust radiative transfer code with a user-friendly architecture, Astronomy and Computing, Volume 9, March 2015, Pages 20-33, ISSN 2213-1337, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ascom.2014.10.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2213133714000511)
Abstract: Abstract
We discuss the architecture and design principles that underpin the latest version of SKIRT, a state-of-the-art open source code for simulating continuum radiation transfer in dusty astrophysical systems, such as spiral galaxies and accretion disks. SKIRT employs the Monte Carlo technique to emulate the relevant physical processes including scattering, absorption and emission by the dust. The code features a wealth of built-in geometries, radiation source spectra, dust characterizations, dust grids, and detectors, in addition to various mechanisms for importing snapshots generated by hydrodynamical simulations. The configuration for a particular simulation is defined at run-time through a user-friendly interface suitable for both occasional and power users. These capabilities are enabled by careful C++ code design. The programming interfaces between components are well defined and narrow. Adding a new feature is usually as simple as adding another class; the user interface automatically adjusts to allow configuring the new options. We argue that many scientific codes, like SKIRT, can benefit from careful object-oriented design and from a friendly user interface, even if it is not a graphical user interface.
Keywords: Radiative transfer; Numerical methods; Dust; Object-oriented design; Abstraction; Modularity

M. Mazzoleni, F. Previdi, A Comparison of Classification Algorithms for Brain Computer Interface in Drug Craving Treatment, IFAC-PapersOnLine, Volume 48, Issue 20, 2015, Pages 487-492, ISSN 2405-8963, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ifacol.2015.10.188.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2405896315020790)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper, the use of Brain Computer Interfaces (BCIs) is proposed as a means to recover patients from craving diseases, with the aim of a clinical protocol. In order to understanding the BCI messages, a classification algorithm based on logistic regression has been developed. The choice was dictated by a comparison with other known classification techniques of different reasoning type, highlighting the pros and cons of them. Finally, a result regarding the brain areas which are more involved during the activity is reported.
Keywords: Brain Computer Interface; Neural activity Machine Learning; Pattern Recognition

Anton Burykin, Tyler Peck, Timothy G. Buchman, Using “off-the-shelf” tools for terabyte-scale waveform recording in intensive care: Computer system design, database description and lessons learned, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 103, Issue 3, September 2011, Pages 151-160, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cmpb.2010.10.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S016926071000266X)
Abstract: Until now, the creation of massive (long-term and multichannel) waveform databases in intensive care required an interdisciplinary team of clinicians, engineers and informaticians and, in most cases, also design-specific software and hardware development. Recently, several commercial software tools for waveform acquisition became available. Although commercial products and even turnkey systems are now being marketed as simple and effective, the performance of those solutions is not known. The additional expense upfront may be worthwhile if commercial software can eliminate the need for custom software and hardware systems and the associated investment in teams and development.

We report the development of a computer system for long-term large-scale recording and storage of multichannel physiologic signals that was built using commercial solutions (software and hardware) and existing hospital IT infrastructure. Both numeric (1 Hz) and waveform (62.5–500 Hz) data were captured from 24 SICU bedside monitors simultaneously and stored in a file-based vital sign data bank (VSDB) during one-year period (total DB size is 4.21 TB). In total, vital signs were recorded from 1175 critically ill patients. Up to six ECG leads, all other monitored waveforms, and all monitored numeric data were recorded in most of the cases.

We describe the details of building blocks of our system, provide description of three datasets exported from our VSDB and compare the contents of our VSDB with other available waveform databases. Finally, we summarize lessons learned during recording, storage, and pre-processing of physiologic signals.
Keywords: Data acquisition; Databasing; Database; Databank; Physiological monitoring; Physiologic signals; Waveforms; Vital signs; Intensive care

Luke A. Reisner, Alex Cao, Abhilash K. Pandya, An integrated software system for processing, analyzing, and classifying Raman spectra, Chemometrics and Intelligent Laboratory Systems, Volume 105, Issue 1, 15 January 2011, Pages 83-90, ISSN 0169-7439, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chemolab.2010.09.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169743910002212)
Abstract: Raman spectroscopy is a powerful technique for analyzing various substances, but a significant amount of processing is required to extract useful information from raw spectra. Many research groups develop custom software systems to process spectra, which leads to standard algorithms being repeatedly implemented and novel techniques being difficult to share. This paper presents an integrated software system that processes, analyzes, and classifies Raman spectra. The system is freely available (http://cares.wayne.edu/rp/), open, cross-platform, and extensible, enabling interested parties to utilize and contribute to a common implementation of Raman processing algorithms.

A wide variety of useful features are included, such as noise filtering, automated background fluorescence subtraction, principal component analysis, linear discriminant analysis, artificial neural network classification, and support vector machine classification. The system supports customizable groupings of related spectra and is able to retrieve spectra using a searchable database. Everything is executed through a simple graphical user interface.

The developed system was used to process two data sets containing different types of spectra. The results demonstrate that the system is capable of fast, accurate processing of Raman spectra. The open system will become even more powerful if other developers are willing to add new and improved features. In addition, it is intended that the freely available system will make Raman spectroscopy more accessible to all researchers and promote progress in the field.
Keywords: Raman spectroscopy; Software; Graphical user interface; Signal processing; Statistical classification; Data management

Lars Hvam, Klaes Ladeby, An approach for the development of visual configuration systems, Computers & Industrial Engineering, Volume 53, Issue 3, October 2007, Pages 401-419, ISSN 0360-8352, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cie.2007.05.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0360835207000794)
Abstract: How can a visual configuration system be developed to support the specification process1The term specification process describes the business processes where the customer’s requirements are analysed, a product is tailored and specified according to the customer’s requirements, and the subsequent specification of the product’s manufacturing, assembly, shipping, erection on site and service (the life cycle properties of the product).
1 in companies that manufacture customer tailored products? This article focuses on how visual configuration systems can be developed. The approach for developing visual configuration systems has been developed by Centre for Product Modelling (CPM) at The Technical University of Denmark. The approach is based on experiences from a visualization project in co-operation between CPM and the global provider of power protection American Power Conversion (APC). The visual configuration system was developed in 2001–2002 and has during its operation since the beginning of 2003 delivered promising results. The lead-time for approval of quotations has been reduced and the percentages of first-time-completed and correct configuration sessions are increased thanks to an increased user-interaction, caused by the visualization of the product in the visual configuration system.
Keywords: Visual configuration; Visual configuration systems; Product modeling

Jei-Zheng Wu, Chen-Fu Chien, Modeling semiconductor testing job scheduling and dynamic testing machine configuration, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 35, Issues 1–2, July–August 2008, Pages 485-496, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2007.07.026.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417407002680)
Abstract: The overall flow of the final test of integrated circuits can be represented by the job shop model with limited simultaneous multiple resources in which various product mixes, jobs recirculation, uncertain arrival of jobs, and unstable processing times complicate the problem. Rather than relying on domain experts, this study aims to develop a hybrid approach including a mathematical programming model to optimize the testing job scheduling and an algorithm to specify the machine configuration of each job and allocate specific resources. Furthermore, a genetic algorithm is also developed to solve the problem in a short time for implementation. The results of detailed scheduling can be graphically represented as timetables of testing resources in Gantt charts. The empirical results demonstrated viability of the proposed approach.
Keywords: Semiconductor final testing; Machine configuration; Timetabling; Genetic algorithm; Intelligent manufacturing; Scheduling

Nolwenn Terme, Alicia Jacquemet, Thierry Benvegnu, Véronique Vié, Loïc Lemiègre, Modification of bipolar lipid conformation at the air/water interface by a single stereochemical variation, Chemistry and Physics of Lipids, Volume 183, October 2014, Pages 9-17, ISSN 0009-3084, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chemphyslip.2014.04.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0009308414000528)
Abstract: Abstract
This article describes the design and the synthesis of two analogues of archaeal bipolar lipids that differ only by the configuration of a single stereogenic centre on a glyceryl moiety. The corresponding comparative physicochemical study by tensiometry/ellipsometry and atomic force microscopy provided a set of data that points out the effect of this single stereochemical variation. The two epimers revealed different conformations at the air/water interface resulting in a more or less tendency for a bent or a stretched conformation. It strengthens the importance of the stereochemistry in such bipolar lipid packing.
Keywords: Archaea; Tetraether lipid; Air/water interface; Stereochemistry; Stretched/bent conformation

Martin Senger, Karl-Heinz Glatting, Otto Ritter, Sandor Suhai, X-HUSAR, an X-based graphical interface for the analysis of genomic sequences, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 46, Issue 2, February 1995, Pages 131-141, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-2607(94)01610-R.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016926079401610R)
Abstract: Management and analysis of nucleotide and protein sequence and structure data constitute a traditional area of bioinformatics. Since the analytical programs are frequently developed by researchers, rather than software engineers, they tend to suffer from idiosyncratic and non-ergonomic man-machine interfaces. We report on HUSAR, our 140+ collection of third-party, as well as in-house developed or adapted, sequence manipulation and analysis tools, well integrated into the UNIX operating system environment and accessible via consistent menu-aware interface. Most of the HUSAR programs can be completely specified by UNIX command-line options; they can thus be run in batches or combined into pipes. Adding such a program into the HUSAR environment is almost a ‘plug-and-play’ exercise. HUSAR has been recently complemented with a graphical client interface, X-HUSAR, to support users on UNIX platforms with X11 windowing systems. The whole X-HUSAR interface is based on a single generic program, COMLIGEN, and a number of specific configuration files. COMLIGEN interprets those files and renders appropriate windows, menus, and other interactive elements, which help the end user in selecting application programs and specifying their options. Efforts of extending both HUSAR and X-HUSAR are roughly linear to the size of the collection.
Keywords: Bio-informatics; HUSAR; X-HUSAR; COMLIGEN

Lawrence Cavedon, Christian Kroos, Damith Herath, Denis Burnham, Laura Bishop, Yvonne Leung, Catherine J. Stevens, “C׳Mon dude!”: Users adapt their behaviour to a robotic agent with an attention model, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 80, August 2015, Pages 14-23, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2015.02.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581915000452)
Abstract: Abstract
Social cues facilitate engagement between interaction participants, whether they be two (or more) humans or a human and an artificial agent such as a robot. Previous work specific to human–agent/robot interaction has demonstrated the efficacy of implemented social behaviours, such as eye-gaze or facial gestures, for demonstrating the illusion of engagement and positively impacting interaction with a human. We describe the implementation of THAMBS, The Thinking Head Attention Model and Behavioural System, which is used to model attention controlling how a virtual agent reacts to external audio and visual stimuli within the context of an interaction with a human user. We evaluate the efficacy of THAMBS for a virtual agent mounted on a robotic platform in a controlled experimental setting, and collect both task- and behavioural-performance variables, along with self-reported ratings of engagement. Our results show that human subjects noticeably engaged more often, and in more interesting ways, with the robotic agent when THAMBS was activated, indicating that even a rudimentary display of attention by the robot elicits significantly increased attention by the human. Back-channelling had less of an effect on user behaviour. THAMBS and back-channelling did not interact and neither had an effect on self-report ratings. Our results concerning THAMBS hold implications for the design of successful human–robot interactive behaviours.
Keywords: Human–robot interaction; Attention model; Social interaction; Evaluation; Engagement

S. Chiocchio, E. Martin, P. Barabaschi, Hans Werner Bartels, J. How, W. Spears, System engineering and configuration management in ITER, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 82, Issues 5–14, October 2007, Pages 548-554, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2007.06.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379607003201)
Abstract: The construction of ITER will represent a major challenge for the fusion community at large, because of the intrinsic complexity of the tokamak design, the large number of different systems which are all essential for its operation, the worldwide distribution of the design activities and the unusual procurement scheme based on a combination of in-kind and directly funded deliverables. A key requirement for the success of such a large project is that a systematic approach to ensure the consistency of the design with the required performance is adopted. Also, effective project management methods, tools and working practices must be deployed to facilitate the communication and collaboration among the institutions and industries involved in the project. The authors have been involved in the definition and practical implementation of the design integration and configuration control structure inside ITER and in the system engineering process during the selection and optimization of the machine configuration. In parallel, they have assessed design, drawing and documentation management software to be used for the construction phase. Here, they describe the experience gained in recent years, explain the drivers behind the selection of the documents and drawings management systems, and illustrate the scope and issues of the configuration management activities to ensure the congruence of the design, to control and track the design changes and to manage the interfaces among the ITER systems.
Keywords: System engineering; Configuration management

Suriadi Suriadi, Ernest Foo, Audun Jøsang, A user-centric federated single sign-on system, Journal of Network and Computer Applications, Volume 32, Issue 2, March 2009, Pages 388-401, ISSN 1084-8045, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jnca.2008.02.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1084804508000519)
Abstract: Current identity management systems are not concerned with user privacy. Users must assume that identity providers and service providers will ensure their privacy, which is not always the case. This paper proposes an extension of the existing federated single sign-on (FSSO) systems that adopts the beneficial properties of the user-centric identity management (UCIM) model. This new identity management system allows the users to control and enforce their privacy requirements while still retaining the convenience of single sign-on over a federation of service providers. Colored Petri Nets are used to formally model the new identity management system to provide assurance that the privacy goals are achieved. To our knowledge, Colored Petri Nets have not been used to model privacy in identity management systems before.
Keywords: Identity management; Privacy; Private credential; Single sign-on; User-centric

Paul Gray, Lorne Olfman, The user interface in group decision support systems, Decision Support Systems, Volume 5, Issue 2, June 1989, Pages 119-137, ISSN 0167-9236, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-9236(89)90002-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016792368990002X)
Abstract: The human interface is a critical success factor for group decision support systems (GDSS). The user interface design problem for such systems is more complex than that for individual work stations because it involves consideration of the public and private screens and their interactions, the physical environment of the facility, the response time of the network, and the cognitive style and cultural differences among users. This paper explores five interface design issues that are specific to decision support systems for groups: the design of the public scree; the interaction between the private screens and the public screen; the design of the individual's interaction with the system as a whole; the effects of varying cognitive style, and the implications of cultural differences among participants particularly in international GDSS. The design issues are illustrated by the interfaces provided in four experimental GDSS's (U. of Arizona, Claremont Graduate School, U. of Minnesota, and XEROX PARC). These systems are all of the single room type, where participants are present at the same time. The interfaces described range in approach from simple listings, to conventional microcomputer interface, to near type writerless interfaces using touchscreens, to a highly sophisticated “what you see is what I see” (WYSIWIS).
Keywords: International Group DSS; Computer Interfaces; Decision-Making; Decision Laboratories; Electronic Meetings

Enrique Hortal, Andrés Úbeda, Eduardo Iáñez, José M. Azorín, Control of a 2 DoF robot using a Brain–Machine Interface, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 116, Issue 2, September 2014, Pages 169-176, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cmpb.2014.02.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169260714000856)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper, a non-invasive spontaneous Brain–Machine Interface (BMI) is used to control the movement of a planar robot. To that end, two mental tasks are used to manage the visual interface that controls the robot. The robot used is a PupArm, a force-controlled planar robot designed by the nBio research group at the Miguel Hernández University of Elche (Spain). Two control strategies are compared: hierarchical and directional control. The experimental test (performed by four users) consists of reaching four targets. The errors and time used during the performance of the tests are compared in both control strategies (hierarchical and directional control). The advantages and disadvantages of each method are shown after the analysis of the results. The hierarchical control allows an accurate approaching to the goals but it is slower than using the directional control which, on the contrary, is less precise. The results show both strategies are useful to control this planar robot. In the future, by adding an extra device like a gripper, this BMI could be used in assistive applications such as grasping daily objects in a realistic environment. In order to compare the behavior of the system taking into account the opinion of the users, a NASA Tasks Load Index (TLX) questionnaire is filled out after two sessions are completed.
Keywords: Brain–Machine Interface; Support Vector Machine; Planar robot; Hierarchical control; Directional control

Maxime Collomb, Mountaz Hascoët, Extending drag-and-drop to new interactive environments: A multi-display, multi-instrument and multi-user approach, Interacting with Computers, Volume 20, Issue 6, December 2008, Pages 562-573, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2008.07.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543808000465)
Abstract: Drag-and-drop is probably one of the most successful and generic representations of direct manipulation in today’s WIMP interfaces. At the same time, emerging new interactive environments such as distributed display environments or large display surface environments have revealed the need for an evolution of drag-and-drop to address new challenges. In this context, several extensions of drag-and-drop have been proposed over the past years. However, implementations for these extensions are difficult to reproduce, integrate and extend. This situation hampers the development or integration of advanced drag-and-drop techniques in applications.

The aim of this paper is to propose a unifying implementation model of drag-and-drop and of its extensions. This model–called M-CIU–aims at facilitating the implementation of advanced drag-and-drop support by offering solutions to problems typical of new emerging environments. The model builds upon a synthesis of drag-and-drop implementations, an analysis of requirements for meeting new challenges and a dedicated interaction model based on instrumental interaction. By using this model, a programmer will be able to implement advanced drag-and-drop supporting (1) multi-display environments, (2) large display surfaces and (3) multi-user systems. Furthermore by unifying the implementation of all existing drag-and-drop approaches, this model also provides flexibility by allowing users (or applications) to select the most appropriate drag-and-drop technique depending on the context of use. For example, a user might prefer to use pick-and-drop when interacting with multiple displays attached to multiple computers, push-and-throw or drag-and-throw when interacting with large displays and possibly standard drag-and-drop in a more traditional context. Finally, in order to illustrate the various benefits of this model, we provide an API called PoIP which is a Java-based implementation of the model that can be used with most Java-based applications. We also describe Orchis, an interactive graphical application used to share bookmarks and that uses PoIP to implement distributed drag-and-drop like interactions.
Keywords: Distributed display environments; Wall-sized displays; Drag-and-drop; Multi-user interaction models; Plasticity

Gilbert Cockton, Interaction ergonomics, control and separation: open problems in user interface management, Information and Software Technology, Volume 29, Issue 4, May 1987, Pages 176-191, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(87)90066-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0950584987900668)
Abstract: User Interface Management Systems (UIMS) offer many potential benefits to users although problems still exist. Three main problems are discussed: interaction ergonomics, dialogue control and separation.
Keywords: software techniques; man-machine interface; software management

Antonella De Angeli, Lynne Coventry, Graham Johnson, Karen Renaud, Is a picture really worth a thousand words? Exploring the feasibility of graphical authentication systems, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 63, Issues 1–2, July 2005, Pages 128-152, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2005.04.020.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581905000704)
Abstract: The weakness of knowledge-based authentication systems, such as passwords and Personal Identification Numbers (PINs), is well known, and reflects an uneasy compromise between security and human memory constraints. Research has been undertaken for some years now into the feasibility of graphical authentication mechanisms in the hope that these will provide a more secure and memorable alternative. The graphical approach substitutes the exact recall of alphanumeric codes with the recognition of previously learnt pictures, a skill at which humans are remarkably proficient. So far, little attention has been devoted to usability, and initial research has failed to conclusively establish significant memory improvement. This paper reports two user studies comparing several implementations of the graphical approach with PINs. Results demonstrate that pictures can be a solution to some problems relating to traditional knowledge-based authentication but that they are not a simple panacea, since a poor design can eliminate the picture superiority effect in memory. The paper concludes by discussing the potential of the graphical approach and providing guidelines for developers contemplating using these mechanisms.
Keywords: User authentication; Visual memory; Usability; Security

S. Atlati, B. Haddag, M. Nouari, M. Zenasni, Thermomechanical modelling of the tool–workmaterial interface in machining and its implementation using the ABAQUS VUINTER subroutine, International Journal of Mechanical Sciences, Volume 87, October 2014, Pages 102-117, ISSN 0020-7403, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijmecsci.2014.05.034.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0020740314002173)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper the complex thermomechanical behaviour at the tool–workmaterial interface in machining has been analysed. The contact behaviour is formulated in the frame of a Lagrangian Finite Element approach. The thermomechanical laws governing the tool–workmaterial interface in machining have been implemented via the VUINTER subroutine of ABAQUS/Explicit FE code. Using this interface, velocity dependent heat partition coefficient of the frictional heat has been implemented. Numerical results (calculated heat flux transmitted into the tool and cutting force) have been compared to experimental ones for different cutting conditions, which are in good agreement. It is shown that different couples of the heat partition and heat transfer coefficients can give the same heat flux transmitted in the tool. In addition, with the new developed VUINTER subroutine, it is possible to implement any mathematical model governing the friction and heat exchange for simulations of complex contact behaviours.
Keywords: Metal cutting; Tool–chip interface; Friction; Heat exchange; Contact implementation

Alberto Díaz, Antonio García, Pablo Gervás, User-centred versus system-centred evaluation of a personalization system, Information Processing & Management, Volume 44, Issue 3, May 2008, Pages 1293-1307, ISSN 0306-4573, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ipm.2007.08.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0306457307001641)
Abstract: Some of the most popular measures to evaluate information filtering systems are usually independent of the users because they are based in relevance judgments obtained from experts. On the other hand, the user-centred evaluation allows showing the different impressions that the users have perceived about the system running. This work is focused on discussing the problem of user-centred versus system-centred evaluation of a Web content personalization system where the personalization is based on a user model that stores long term (section, categories and keywords) and short term interests (adapted from user provided feedback). The user-centred evaluation is based on questionnaires filled in by the users before and after using the system and the system-centred evaluation is based on the comparison between ranking of documents, obtained from the application of a multi-tier selection process, and binary relevance judgments collected previously from real users. The user-centred and system-centred evaluations performed with 106 users during 14 working days have provided valuable data concerning the behaviour of the users with respect to issues such as document relevance or the relative importance attributed to different ways of personalization. The results obtained shows general satisfaction on both the personalization processes (selection, adaptation and presentation) and the system as a whole.
Keywords: User-centred; System-centred; Evaluation; Personalization; Web contents; News services

Anett Spring, Marc Lewerentz, Torsten Bluhm, Peter Heimann, Christine Hennig, Georg Kühner, Hugo Kroiss, Heike Laqua, Josef Maier, Heike Riemann, Jörg Schacht, Andreas Werner, Manfred Zilker, A first W7-X experiment program editor, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 85, Issues 3–4, July 2010, Pages 525-528, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2009.10.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379609002749)
Abstract: The long Wendelstein 7-X experiment programs will be segmented into arbitrary time slices. For each of these segments the planned behaviour is stored in a configuration database – and that for every component within the W7-X hierarchical layout. Up to now we have an editor to set up these segments for each single component. But generating the compound program description out of the components’ segments is time-consuming experts’ hand work. It is planned to implement a top-down program editor which is able to break down a high level physics program proposal to component segments while observing all the physical and technical constraints – a quite ambitious intention.

This paper describes the first step to an experiment program editor: The “eXpress program editor” is able to modify parameters of a single, a subset, or all segments within a given program, thus adapting its behaviour in an easy way. A graphical program structure overview has been implemented giving fast access to program parameters for comparison and editing. Appropriate parameter editors regard type and constraints. In a single transaction all changes are saved, resulting in a new experiment program ready-to-use for the next experiment run.

Even though changing the program's structure is not supported in this version, the eXpress program editor serves as a tool for quick program adaptations in the daily experiment routine. Furthermore this implementation will be used as a design and usage study for the later high-end W7-X program editor.
Keywords: Wendelstein 7-X; Graphical user interface; Editor; Segment control

S. Phongthanapanich, P. Dechaumphai, EasyFEM—An object-oriented graphics interface finite element/finite volume software, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 37, Issue 12, December 2006, Pages 797-804, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2006.05.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997806000603)
Abstract: An object-oriented finite element/finite volume software, EasyFEM, has been developed. The software, with a fully interactive graphics interface, analyses heat transfer, solid mechanics, and fluids problems by the finite element and the finite volume methods. The Coad and Yourdon methodology is used to describe the general structure of classes and objects implemented by the software. Details of the object-oriented classes for both the graphics pre- and post-processors, as well as for the analysis solutions, are described. Several case studies with graphical representations of numerical solutions are presented to illustrate some functionalities of the software.
Keywords: Object-oriented programming; Graphics user interface; Finite element/finite volume software

Chuantong Chen, Nobuyuki Shishido, Shoji Kamiya, Kozo Koiwa, Hisashi Sato, Masaki Omiya, Masahiro Nishida, Takashi Suzuki, Tomoji Nakamura, Takeshi Nokuo, Toshiaki Suzuki, Evaluation for interface strength fluctuations induced by inhomogeneous grain structure of Cu line in LSI Interconnects, Microelectronic Engineering, Volume 120, 25 May 2014, Pages 52-58, ISSN 0167-9317, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.mee.2013.10.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167931713006485)
Abstract: Abstract
Local adhesion strength of the interface between Cu line and SiN cap layer in a Cu damascene interconnect structure of LSI has a significant fluctuation when evaluated with in-plane dimensions of 1 × 1 μm specimens, which was 4.78 ± 1.63 J/m2. The reproducibility of the evaluation technique was investigated by evaluating the strength of the Cu/SiN interface for the specimens fabricated on a plate of Cu single crystal, where the interface strength was measured as 0.62 ± 0.02 J/m2. The relative standard deviation of interface strength distribution in LSI interconnect structure was 34% which was more than ten times larger than the value 2.5% for the specimens fabricated on the plate of Cu single crystal. The significant fluctuation of interface strength was induced clearly not by the random error of the evaluation technique, but by the inhomogeneous grain structure of Cu line with various crystal orientations and grain boundaries. By means of elastic-plastic interface crack extension simulations, it was revealed that the difference in the amount of energy dissipated in plastic deformation of Cu layer mainly leads to a significant fluctuation of the apparent strength. Plastic deformation of Cu layer plays a dominant role on the local strength of interface Cu/SiN in LSI interconnects.
Keywords: Cu single crystal; Local interface strength; Elastic–plastic simulation

Chia-Yuan Chen, Cheng-Yi Lin, Ya-Ting Hu, Lin-Ying Cheng, Chun-Chieh Hsu, Efficient micromixing through artificial cilia actuation with fish-schooling configuration, Chemical Engineering Journal, Volume 259, 1 January 2015, Pages 391-396, ISSN 1385-8947, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cej.2014.07.120.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1385894714010249)
Abstract: Abstract
A protocol that can achieve efficient flow manipulation with artificial cilia actuation for micromixing is necessary to be documented to benefit the profoundly microfluidic applications. This study described a new micromixing strategy that mimics a fish-schooling configuration to design the distribution arrangement of artificial cilia inside a micromixer. Fish-schooling configuration provides several hydrodynamic benefits, including an improved flow vorticity control, which facilitates micromixing more efficiently than traditional artificial cilia distribution with line-by-line configuration. A maximum mixing efficiency of 94% was achieved using the proposed fish-schooling configuration for a micromixing task between two highly viscous flow streams. By contrast, only 65% was achieved with traditional line-by-line configuration using the same beating process. A vortex region generated using the proposed fish-schooling configuration was visualized and quantified by micro-particle image velocimetry (μPIV) analysis. To identify the underlying mechanism of induced flow fields, we analyzed and quantified the induced flow fluctuations and primary hydrodynamic parameters. Our results demonstrated the unique hemodynamic advantage of this distribution. In particular, this design strategy is advantageous for diverse chemical and biological applications at microscale, in which an accurate flow diverting function is essential.
Keywords: Micromixing; Artificial cilia; Fish schooling; Micro-particle image velocimetry (μPIV)

Davide Simonetti, Loredana Zollo, Eugenia Papaleo, Giorgio Carpino, Eugenio Guglielmelli, Multimodal adaptive interfaces for 3D robot-mediated upper limb neuro-rehabilitation: An overview of bio-cooperative systems, Robotics and Autonomous Systems, Available online 1 September 2016, ISSN 0921-8890, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.robot.2016.08.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0921889016304808)
Abstract: Abstract
Robot-mediated neuro-rehabilitation has been proved to be an effective therapeutic approach for upper limb motor recovery after stroke, though its actual potential when compared to other conventional approaches has still to be fully demonstrated. Most of the proposed solutions use a planar workspace. One key aspect for influencing motor recovery mechanisms, such as neuroplasticity and the level of motivation and involvement of the patient in the exercise, is the design of patient-tailored protocols and on-line adaptation of the assistance provided by the robotic agent to the patient performance. Also, when abilities for performing activities of daily living shall be targeted, exercises in 3D workspace are highly preferable. This paper wants to provide a complete overview on bio-cooperative systems on neuro-rehabilitation, with a special focus on 3D multimodal adaptive interfaces, by partly in-depth reviewing the literature and partly proposing an illustrative case of how to build such a bio-cooperative based on the authors’ current research. It consists of an operational robotic platform for 3D upper limb robot-aided rehabilitation, directly derived from the MAAT system previously developed by the same research group. The system features on-line adaptation of therapy characteristics to specific patient needs and to the measured level of performance, by including the patient in the control loop. The system is composed of a 7-DoF robot arm, an adaptive interaction control system, a motorized arm-weight support system and a module for on-line evaluation of patient performance. Such module records patient biomechanical data through an unobtrusive, wearable sensory system, evaluates patient biomechanical state and updates robot control parameters for modifying level of assistance and task complexity in the 3D workspace. In addition, a multimodal interface provides information needed to control the motorized arm-weight support by means of a dedicated cable–pulley system.
Keywords: Rehabilitation robotics; Stroke; Bio-cooperative systems; Activities of Daily Living (ADL); Arm-weight support

Claude-Alain Roulet, Jean-Marie Fürbringer, Pascal Cretton, The influence of the user on the results of multizone air flow simulations with COMIS, Energy and Buildings, Volume 30, Issue 1, April 1999, Pages 73-86, ISSN 0378-7788, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0378-7788(98)00047-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378778898000474)
Abstract: The multizone airflow simulation program COMIS was evaluated within an International Energy Agency research program. One of the steps in the evaluation procedure is to test the user–code interface, consisting not only in the appearance of the computer screen, but also in the user guide or any other tutorial or help system. The user–code interface of COMIS was then tested through round robin tests. Two types of problems were submitted to several users: a simple and well-defined problem and a real world problem. This study first allowed great improvements of the user guide. While results for the well-defined case were very close to each other, large differences were observed for the `real world' case. Results of simulation largely depend on the user options, and users easily make modelling errors when the studied case becomes complex.
Keywords: COMIS; Multizone air flow simulations; User–code interface

Georg Michelitsch, Girish Welling, Maximilian Ott, A user-centric view of QoS-aware communication, Computer Communications, Volume 21, Issue 15, 1 October 1998, Pages 1310-1319, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0140-3664(98)00199-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366498001996)
Abstract: Recent technological advances coupled with new trends in using today's computing and communication infrastructure have raised new challenges in designing user interfaces for distributed multimedia applications. It has become essential to present the idea of QoS to the user, not only due to limitations of the infrastructure, but also because of the need to control user-machine interface bandwidth. In addition, a need for a tighter integration of communication and collaboration has become apparent. In this paper, we motivate the need for QoS support in the user-interface by considering shared virtual spaces, a unified communication paradigm for collaboration. We present a user-interface framework which provides the user with implicit and explicit control of quality of service, and describe our experience in designing and implementing such systems.
Keywords: Communication; User-interface; Shared space; Quality of service

Ciro Leonardo Pierri, Giovanni Parisi, Vito Porcelli, Computational approaches for protein function prediction: A combined strategy from multiple sequence alignment to molecular docking-based virtual screening, Biochimica et Biophysica Acta (BBA) - Proteins and Proteomics, Volume 1804, Issue 9, September 2010, Pages 1695-1712, ISSN 1570-9639, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.bbapap.2010.04.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1570963910001068)
Abstract: The functional characterization of proteins represents a daily challenge for biochemical, medical and computational sciences. Although finally proved on the bench, the function of a protein can be successfully predicted by computational approaches that drive the further experimental assays. Current methods for comparative modeling allow the construction of accurate 3D models for proteins of unknown structure, provided that a crystal structure of a homologous protein is available. Binding regions can be proposed by using binding site predictors, data inferred from homologous crystal structures, and data provided from a careful interpretation of the multiple sequence alignment of the investigated protein and its homologs. Once the location of a binding site has been proposed, chemical ligands that have a high likelihood of binding can be identified by using ligand docking and structure-based virtual screening of chemical libraries. Most docking algorithms allow building a list sorted by energy of the lowest energy docking configuration for each ligand of the library. In this review the state-of-the-art of computational approaches in 3D protein comparative modeling and in the study of protein–ligand interactions is provided. Furthermore a possible combined/concerted multistep strategy for protein function prediction, based on multiple sequence alignment, comparative modeling, binding region prediction, and structure-based virtual screening of chemical libraries, is described by using suitable examples. As practical examples, Abl-kinase molecular modeling studies, HPV-E6 protein multiple sequence alignment analysis, and some other model docking-based characterization reports are briefly described to highlight the importance of computational approaches in protein function prediction.
Keywords: Protein function prediction; Protein–ligand interaction; Multiple sequence alignment; Comparative modeling; Binding site prediction; Docking-based virtual screening of chemical library; Abl-kinase; HPV-E6

Xuan Yin, Wei Zheng, Ming Zhang, Jing Zhang, G. Zhuang, T. Ding, A modularized operator interface framework for Tokamak based on MVC design pattern, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 89, Issue 5, May 2014, Pages 628-632, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2014.03.028.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379614002075)
Abstract: Abstract
Facing various and continually changing experimental needs, the J-TEXT Tokamak experiment requires home-made software applications developed for different sub-systems. Though dealing with different specific problems, these software applications usually share a lot of functionalities in common. With the goal of improving the productivity of research groups, J-TEXT has designed a C# desktop application framework which is mainly focused on operator interface development. Following the Model–View–Controller (MVC) design pattern, the main functionality dealing with Experimental Physics and Industrial Control System (EPICS) or MDSplus has been modularized into reusable modules. Minor difference among applications can be coped with XML configuration files. In this case, developers are able to implement various kinds of operator interface without knowing the implementation details of the bottom functions in Models, mainly focusing on Views and Controllers. This paper presents J-TEXT C# desktop application framework, introducing the technology of fast development of the modularized operator interface. Some experimental applications designed in this framework have been already deployed in J-TEXT, and will be introduced in this paper.
Keywords: C# application framework; EPICS; MDSplus; MVC; Reusable modules; Operator interface

Daniel Aarno and Jakob Engblom, Chapter 4 - System configuration in Simics, In Full-System Simulation with Simics, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2015, Pages 111-128, ISBN 9780128007259, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-800725-9.00004-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128007259000044)
Abstract: Simics structures a virtual platform into a hierarchical structure of reusable components, with typed connectors. The components mimic the physical or logical breakdown of a system. The Simics system panel can be used to provide a visualization of a system that makes sense to the end user. Chapter 4 presents the Simics component system, as well as the system panel and script systems, which are used to build systems from individual device and processor models.
Keywords: components; scripting; system setup; system panel

, 06/02123 GU12QAD–3D: a graphical interface program for QAD–CGPIC program: Subbaiah, K. V. and Sarangapani, R. Annals of Nuclear Energy, 2006, 33, (l), 22–29., Fuel and Energy Abstracts, Volume 47, Issue 5, September 2006, Page 328, ISSN 0140-6701, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0140-6701(06)82131-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140670106821314)

Adrian Neyrinck, Armin Lechler, Alexander Verl, Automatic Variant Configuration and Generation of Simulation Models for Comparison of Plant and Machinery Variants, Procedia CIRP, Volume 29, 2015, Pages 62-67, ISSN 2212-8271, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procir.2015.02.069.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2212827115001122)
Abstract: Abstract
Manufacturers of machines and plants are faced with the challenge to quickly find, compare and evaluate solutions for their customers during the tendering phase. Besides acquisition costs, figures about life cycle costs and energy efficiency are claimed by sustainability-aware customers when making a choice between different possible solution variants. In this paper an approach for automatic variant compilation and simulation model generation, based on mechatronic modules, is introduced. The results, validated using an example application of a modular transfer system, show that using the proposed method can significantly speed up the process of finding the appropriate module configuration based on reliable simulation models even for non-simulation-experts.
Keywords: Variant Management; Simulation; Mechatronic Engineering; Life Cycle Costs

Eric Halbach, Aarne Halme, Job planning and supervisory control for automated earthmoving using 3D graphical tools, Automation in Construction, Volume 32, July 2013, Pages 145-160, ISSN 0926-5805, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.autcon.2013.01.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0926580513000277)
Abstract: Abstract
Planning tools and algorithms are presented for enabling supervisory control of automated earthmoving performed by a robotic wheel loader. Interactive 3D graphical objects are rendered over a worksite model, and allow a remote human operator to specify high-level plans for pile transfer and area clearing jobs. These are automatically translated into lower-level plans for the machine to follow and are displayed graphically back to the operator, who then mostly monitors work but can intervene in a supervisory capacity. The tools were developed and tested using Matlab, and were able to guide simulated jobs to completion. Outdoor manually-driven tests using snow were also conducted to verify that heightmaps from a 3D laser rangefinder could be used to correctly track progress and generate commands using the same tools and algorithms. Augmented Reality versions of the tools present a concept of how they could be used in real-world applications.
Keywords: Earthmoving; Automation; Robotics; Job planning; Supervisory control; Simulation; 3D graphics; Wheel loader; Augmented reality

Charles Crook, Young children's skill in using a mouse to control a graphical computer interface, Computers & Education, Volume 19, Issue 3, October 1992, Pages 199-207, ISSN 0360-1315, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0360-1315(92)90113-J.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/036013159290113J)
Abstract: Preschoolers and children within the first 3 years of formal education are compared in respect of their performance on four tasks that embody basic skills underlying mouse-based control of a graphical computer interface. The children had not used such an interface before and were compared after a small number of introductory and practice sessions. Results from one preschool child studied over a longer period are included. The children's performance is set against that of their own novice teachers and a group of experts. Age differences are found on all tasks but the absolute level of control is impressive for all children involved. Younger children are mainly disadvantaged by difficulties in repositioning the instrument on the working surface while keeping the screen pointer fixed. No gender-correlated differences were found at any age. It is suggested that the results encourage the exploitation of graphical interfaces within the design of early educational software.

Uwe Zdun, Tailorable language for behavioral composition and configuration of software components, Computer Languages, Systems & Structures, Volume 32, Issue 1, April 2006, Pages 56-82, ISSN 1477-8424, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cl.2005.04.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1477842405000205)
Abstract: Many software systems suffer from missing support for behavioral (runtime) composition and configuration of software components. The concern “behavioral composition and configuration” is not treated as a first-class entity, but instead it is hard-coded in different programming styles, leading to tangled composition and configuration code that is hard to understand and maintain. We propose to embed a dynamic language with a tailorable object and class concept into the host language in which the components are written, and use the tailorable language for behavioral composition and configuration tasks. Using this approach we can separate the concerns “behavioral composition and configuration” from the rest of the software system, leading to a more reusable, understandable, and maintainable composition and configuration of software components.
Keywords: Software components; Component composition; Component configuration; Tailorable language

Mário Oleskovicz, Denis V. Coury, Odilon Delmont Felho, Wesley F. Usida, Adriano A.F.M. Carneiro, Leandro R.S. Pires, Power quality analysis applying a hybrid methodology with wavelet transforms and neural networks, International Journal of Electrical Power & Energy Systems, Volume 31, Issue 5, June 2009, Pages 206-212, ISSN 0142-0615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijepes.2009.01.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0142061509000076)
Abstract: A hybrid system to automatically detect, locate and classify disturbances affecting power quality in an electrical power system is presented in this paper. The disturbances characterized are events from an actual power distribution system simulated by the ATP (Alternative Transients Program) software. The hybrid approach introduced consists of two stages. In the first stage, the wavelet transform (WT) is used to detect disturbances in the system and to locate the time of their occurrence. When such an event is flagged, the second stage is triggered and various artificial neural networks (ANNs) are applied to classify the data measured during the disturbance(s). A computational logic using WTs and ANNs together with a graphical user interface (GUI) between the algorithm and its end user is then implemented. The results obtained so far are promising and suggest that this approach could lead to a useful application in an actual distribution system.
Keywords: Power quality; Wavelet transform; Artificial neural networks; Hybrid system; Graphical user interface

Takahiro Kiuchi, Yasuo Ohashi, Masaru Konishi, Yasutsugu Bandai, Tomoo Kosuge, Tadao Kakizoe, A world wide web-based user interface for a data management system for use in multi-institutional clinical trials—Development and experimental operation of an automated patient registration and random allocation system, Controlled Clinical Trials, Volume 17, Issue 6, December 1996, Pages 476-493, ISSN 0197-2456, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0197-2456(96)00104-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0197245696001043)
Abstract: We have employed the Hypertext Transfer Protocol (HTTP) and Hypertext Markup Language (HTML) to develop an automated patient registration and random allocation system for use in a multi-institutional clinical trial. We made it available on-line to World Wide Web clients in each hospital through a user friendly graphical user interface. During experimental operation, the physicians found it satisfactory from the viewpoint of both ease of operation and response time. For the development of a graphical user interface in a network-based information system for use in multi-institutional clinical trials, HTTP/HTML has several advantages over an ordinary client-server model. Therefore, we concluded that we would adopt HTP/HTML for the construction of user interfaces for physicians in each spital and for data managers in our coordinating center.
Keywords: WWW; data management; internet

Jonathan Butbul, David MacPhee, Asfaw Beyene, The impact of inertial forces on morphing wind turbine blade in vertical axis configuration, Energy Conversion and Management, Volume 91, February 2015, Pages 54-62, ISSN 0196-8904, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.enconman.2014.11.030.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S019689041400987X)
Abstract: Abstract
A novel flexible blade concept with the ability to morph and geometrically adapt to changing flow conditions has been proposed to improve part-load performance of horizontal-axis wind turbines. The extension of these benefits to a vertical axis wind turbine would make wind technology a more competitive player in the energy market. Both flexible and rigid wind turbine rotor blades for vertical axis application were modeled, designed, manufactured and tested. Their performances were tested in a low speed wind tunnel. The predicted magnitude and direction of blade morph was validated using a high speed camera as well as finite element analysis. The comparative results of straight rigid and straight morphing blades show that the coefficient of performance greatly depends on the tip speed ratio. Overall, the morphing blade has better performance at low RPMs, but the rigid blade performed better at high RPMs. It was observed that the flexible blade self-started in the majority of the experiments. At high RPM, the centrifugal force overwhelmed the lift force, bending the flexible blade out of phase in an undesired direction increasing drag and therefore reducing the coefficient of performance.
Keywords: Wind energy; Turbine; Morphing blade; Vertical axis

Florent Gluck, Christine Hoogland, Paola Antinori, Xavier Robin, Frederic Nikitin, Anne Zufferey, Carla Pasquarello, Vanessa Fétaud, Loïc Dayon, Markus Müller, Frederique Lisacek, Laurent Geiser, Denis Hochstrasser, Jean-Charles Sanchez, Alexander Scherl, EasyProt — An easy-to-use graphical platform for proteomics data analysis, Journal of Proteomics, Volume 79, 21 February 2013, Pages 146-160, ISSN 1874-3919, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jprot.2012.12.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1874391912007919)
Abstract: Abstract
High throughput protein identification and quantification analysis based on mass spectrometry are fundamental steps in most proteomics projects. Here, we present EasyProt (available at http://easyprot.unige.ch), a new platform for mass spectrometry data processing, protein identification, quantification and unexpected post-translational modification characterization. EasyProt provides a fully integrated graphical experience to perform a large part of the proteomic data analysis workflow. Our goal was to develop a software platform that would fulfill the needs of scientists in the field, while emphasizing ease-of-use for non-bioinformatician users. Protein identification is based on OLAV scoring schemes and protein quantification is implemented for both, isobaric labeling and label-free methods. Additional features are available, such as peak list processing, isotopic correction, spectra filtering, charge-state deconvolution and spectra merging. To illustrate the EasyProt platform, we present two identification and quantification workflows based on isobaric tagging and label-free methods.
Keywords: Protein identification; Protein quantification; Label-free; Isobaric labeling; Post-translational modifications; Mass spectrometry

S.J. van Andel, E. Stavrinos, R.E. van der Zwan, T.K. Alexandridis, Earth Observation and DSS Technical Support Tools for Operational Water Management: User's Feedback on MyWater Project, Agriculture and Agricultural Science Procedia, Volume 4, 2015, Pages 232-241, ISSN 2210-7843, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.aaspro.2015.03.027.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S221078431500090X)
Abstract: Abstract
The aim of MyWater project (http://mywater-fp7.eu/) is to provide reliable information on water quantity, quality and usage for appropriate water management. This was achieved by joining three scientific research areas: earth observation (EO), catchment modelling and meteorology. Data from these different sources were integrated through an interface platform, which provides tailored services to the water manager, including support for irrigation activities in Nestos river plain (Greece) and early flood warning in Rijnland (The Netherlands). The platform includes tools for visualization and presentation of short-term prediction of the meteorological and hydrological conditions in maps and charts. It also allows the users to make analysis of time series of data, definition of warning alarms, and other tools useful for the water managers. MyWater's users played a key role, by defining the requirements during the development phase, and providing evaluation feedback towards the project's end. The aim of this work is to present the feedback from the users, after they had been trained on using MyWater's platform and information services. Participants were asked to reflect on the platforms’ ease of use, speed performance. Secondly whether the data is easily to be retrieved and the catalogue is clear enough, and to what extend the platform could be customized. Results show that 75% of the questions concerning the Platform were answered with Good or Excellent, while 25% was marked as Average. Few participants raised their concern on the speed / performance they experienced with the platform, and indeed the internet band-width required for optimal use of the platform was not met all the time during the evaluation phase. With respect to the services offered, some participants indicated they would appreciate MyWater also to focus on water quality (e.g. salinity problems in irrigation water) and pollution. In its current version the MyWater platform focuses mainly on Water Resources Management.
Keywords: remote sensing; hydrological models; water management

Lennart Ljung, Rajiv Singh, Qinghua Zhang, Peter Lindskog, Anatoli Iouditski, Developments in The MathWorks System Identification Toolbox, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 42, Issue 10, 2009, Pages 522-527, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20090706-3-FR-2004.00086.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016387006)
Abstract: Abstract
The paper describes additions to the System Identification Toolbox™ offered by The MathWorks, Inc, that handle the estimation of nonlinear models. Both structured grey-box models and general, flexible black-box models are covered. The idea is that the look and feel of the syntax, and the graphical user interface (GUI) should be as close as possible to the linear case. This presentation is focused on the GUI functionality and the possibilities to simulate the estimated models in Simulink™.
Keywords: nonlinear system identification; neural networks; nonlinear models; graphical user interface (GUI)

Anurag Chauhan, R.P. Saini, A review on Integrated Renewable Energy System based power generation for stand-alone applications: Configurations, storage options, sizing methodologies and control, Renewable and Sustainable Energy Reviews, Volume 38, October 2014, Pages 99-120, ISSN 1364-0321, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.rser.2014.05.079.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364032114004043)
Abstract: Abstract
Uneconomical extension of the grid has led to generation of electric power at the end user facility and has been proved to be cost effective and to an extent efficient. With augmented significance on eco-friendly technologies the use of renewable energy sources such as micro-hydro, wind, solar, biomass and biogas is being explored. This paper presents an extensive review on various issues related to Integrated Renewable Energy System (IRES) based power generation. Issues related to integration configurations, storage options, sizing methodologies and system control for energy flow management are discussed in detail. For stand-alone applications integration of renewable energy sources, performed through DC coupled, AC coupled or hybrid DC–AC coupled configurations, are studied in detail. Based on the requirement of storage duration in isolated areas, storage technology options can be selected for integrated systems. Uncertainties involved in designing an effective IRES based power generation system for isolated areas is accounted due to highly dynamic nature of availability of sources and the demand at site. Different methodologies adopted and reported in literature for sizing of the system components are presented. Distributed control, centralized and hybrid control schemes for energy flow management in IRES have also been discussed.
Keywords: Renewable energy; Integrated system; Load; Demand; Stand-alone applications

Matthias Heinrich, Franz Lehmann, Franz Josef Grüneberger, Martin Gaedke, Thomas Springer, Alexander Schill, Enriching single-user web applications non-invasively with shared editing support, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 94, Part 1, 15 November 2014, Pages 53-66, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2013.07.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642313001913)
Abstract: Abstract
Collaborative real-time applications like Google Docs allow multiple users to edit the very same document simultaneously which supersedes traditional document merging and document locking techniques. However, developing collaborative web applications is a time-consuming and complex endeavor since it requires implementing document synchronization and conflict resolution services. To accelerate the development of collaborative web applications, we present a rapid transformation approach allowing to non-invasively introduce shared editing capabilities into existing single-user web applications. Instead of changing the application's source code, our non-invasive approach leverages a generic collaboration infrastructure that requires only a configuration to provide document synchronization and conflict resolution services. Hence, the effort to incorporate shared editing capabilities is considerably reduced in contrast to conventional approaches where the use of a programing library entails scattered source code changes. Moreover, we report on the results of a user study demonstrating that converted editors are convenient for collaborative work.
Keywords: Web applications; Shared editing; Groupware

T. Ziehn, A.S. Tomlin, GUI–HDMR – A software tool for global sensitivity analysis of complex models, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 24, Issue 7, July 2009, Pages 775-785, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2008.12.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815208002168)
Abstract: The high dimensional model representation (HDMR) method is a set of tools which can be used to construct a fully functional metamodel and to calculate variance based sensitivity indices very efficiently. Extensions to the existing set of random sampling (RS)-HDMR tools have been developed in order to make the method more applicable for complex models with a large number of input parameters as often appear in environmental modelling. The HDMR software described here combines the RS-HDMR tools and its extensions in one Matlab package equipped with a graphical user interface (GUI). This makes the HDMR method easily available for all interested users. The performance of the GUI–HDMR software has been tested in this paper using two analytical test models, the Ishigami function and the Sobol' g-function. In both cases the model is highly non-linear, non-monotonic and has significant parameter interactions. The developed GUI–HDMR software copes very well with the test cases and sensitivity indices of first and second order could be calculated accurately with only low computational effort. The efficiency of the software has also been compared against other recently developed approaches and is shown to be competitive. GUI–HDMR can be applied to a wide range of applications in all fields, because in principle only one random or quasi-random set of input and output values is required to estimate all sensitivity indices up to second order. The size of the set of samples is however dependent on the problem and can be successively increased if additional accuracy is required. A brief description of its application within a range of modelling environments is given.
Keywords: Global sensitivity analysis; High dimensional model representation; Random sampling; Matlab software; Graphical user interface

Jan-Willem van Dam, Michel van de Velden, Online profiling and clustering of Facebook users, Decision Support Systems, Volume 70, February 2015, Pages 60-72, ISSN 0167-9236, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.dss.2014.12.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167923614002796)
Abstract: Abstract
In a relatively short period of time, social media have acquired a prominent role in media and daily life. Although this development brought about several academic endeavors, the literature concerning the analysis of social media data to investigate one's customer base appears to be limited. In this paper, we show how data from the social network site Facebook can be operationalized to gain insight into the individuals connected to a company's Facebook site. In particular, we propose a data collection framework to obtain individual specific data and propose methodology to explore user profiles and identify segments based on these profiles. The proposed data collection framework can be used as an identification step in an analytical customer relationship management implementation that specifically focuses on potential customers. We illustrate our methodology by applying it to the Facebook page of an internationally well-known professional football (soccer) club. In our analysis, we identify four clusters of users that differ with respect to their indicated “liking” profiles.
Keywords: Online profiling; Social networks; Customer relationship management; Correspondence analysis; Cluster analysis; Facebook

Jeppe U. Walther, J. Andreas Bærentzen, Henrik Aanæs, Tangible 3D modeling of coherent and themed structures, Computers & Graphics, Volume 58, August 2016, Pages 53-65, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2016.05.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849316300474)
Abstract: Abstract
We present CubeBuilder, a system for interactive, tangible 3D shape modeling. CubeBuilder allows the user to create a digital 3D model by placing physical, non-interlocking cubic blocks. These blocks may be placed in a completely arbitrary fashion and combined with other objects. In effect, this turns the task of 3D modeling into a playful activity that hardly requires any learning on the part of the user. The blocks are registered using a depth camera and entered into the cube graph where each block is a node and adjacent blocks are connected by edges. From the cube graph, we transform the initial cubes into coherent structures by generating smooth connection geometry for some edges of the graph. Based on an analysis of the cube graph, we identify subgraphs that match given graph templates. These subgraph templates map to predefined geometric refinements of the basic shape. This, in turn, allows the user to tangibly build structures of greater details than the blocks provide in and of themselves. We show a number of shapes that have been modeled by users and are indicative of the expressive power of the system. Furthermore, we demonstrate the scalability of the tangible interface which appears to be limited only by the number of blocks available.
Keywords: TUI (Tangible User Interfaces); 3D shape modeling; Augmented reality; Depth cameras; Object tracking; Building blocks

M. Fast, M. Assadi, S. De, Development and multi-utility of an ANN model for an industrial gas turbine, Applied Energy, Volume 86, Issue 1, January 2009, Pages 9-17, ISSN 0306-2619, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apenergy.2008.03.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S030626190800072X)
Abstract: Demonstration of different utilities for industrial use of an artificial neural network (ANN) model for a gas turbine has been reported in this paper. The ANN model was constructed with the multi-layer feed-forward network type and trained with operational data using back-propagation. The results showed that operational and performance parameters of the gas turbine, including identification of anti-icing mode, can be predicted with good accuracy for varying local ambient conditions. Different possible applications of this ANN model were also demonstrated. These include instantaneous gas turbine performance estimation through a graphical user interface and extrapolation beyond the range of training data.
Keywords: ANN; Gas turbine; Modelling; Simulation

Elizabeth Losh, From Authorship to Authoring: Critical Literacy, Expert Users, and Proprietary Software, Computers and Composition, Volume 33, September 2014, Pages 40-49, ISSN 8755-4615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compcom.2014.07.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S875546151400036X)
Abstract: Abstract
This essay argues that new authoring environments fundamentally change the authorship paradigm. Four kinds of critical literacy may be useful to produce computational media that responds appropriately to the larger rhetorical context of software culture. These critical literacies include not only writing code, but also learning a range of user interfaces, participating in design practices for debugging programs, and recognizing the norms of digital labor workflows and systems of credit.
Keywords: Digital literacy; Software studies; Computer graphics

Sachit Butail, Giovanni Polverino, Paul Phamduy, Fausto Del Sette, Maurizio Porfiri, Influence of robotic shoal size, configuration, and activity on zebrafish behavior in a free-swimming environment, Behavioural Brain Research, Volume 275, 15 December 2014, Pages 269-280, ISSN 0166-4328, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.bbr.2014.09.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166432814005993)
Abstract: Abstract
In animal studies, robots have been recently used as a valid tool for testing a wide spectrum of hypotheses. These robots often exploit visual or auditory cues to modulate animal behavior. The propensity of zebrafish, a model organism in biological studies, toward fish with similar color patterns and shape has been leveraged to design biologically inspired robots that successfully attract zebrafish in preference tests. With an aim of extending the application of such robots to field studies, here, we investigate the response of zebrafish to multiple robotic fish swimming at different speeds and in varying arrangements. A soft real-time multi-target tracking and control system remotely steers the robots in circular trajectories during the experimental trials. Our findings indicate a complex behavioral response of zebrafish to biologically inspired robots. More robots produce a significant change in salient measures of stress, with a fast robot swimming alone causing more freezing and erratic activity than two robots swimming slowly together. In addition, fish spend more time in the proximity of a robot when they swim far apart than when the robots swim close to each other. Increase in the number of robots also significantly alters the degree of alignment of fish motion with a robot. Results from this study are expected to advance our understanding of robot perception by live animals and aid in hypothesis-driven studies in unconstrained free-swimming environments.
Keywords: Animal–robot interaction; Zebrafish; Behavior; Robot

C. Stephanidis, Y. Mitsopoulos, INTERACT: An interface builder facilitating access to users with disabilities, In: Yuichiro Anzai, Katsuhiko Ogawa and Hirohiko Mori, Editor(s), Advances in Human Factors/Ergonomics, Elsevier, 1995, Volume 20, Pages 923-928, ISSN 0921-2647, ISBN 9780444817952, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0921-2647(06)80332-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0921264706803321)
Abstract: This paper describes INTERACT1, a tool for the specification of interaction dialogues and the construction of user interfaces appropriate for various categories of users, including people with disabilities. INTERACT builds on the notion of separating an application in two functional components, namely the application functional core and the user interface component, thus allowing the provision of multiple user interfaces and supporting the“high-level” design of the interaction dialogue, i.e. independently from the presentation details and operational constraints of a particular technological platform.

N. Almeida, R. Alemany, F. Glege, J.C. da Silva, J. Varela, A software package for the configuration of hardware devices following a generic model, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 163, Issue 1, 15 October 2004, Pages 41-52, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2004.07.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465504004072)
Abstract: This paper describes a software package developed in C++ under the Linux environment that is intended for automatic hardware configuration in VME or PCI buses. Based on a generic model, users specify the configuration procedures and data in configuration files. Actual hardware configuration is performed by the software package, accessed through a simple C++ interface. The model is well suited for storage of configuration data in XML files or databases. The package is now being used in the local data acquisition system of the Electromagnetic Calorimeter of the CMS experiment at CERN.
Program summary
Title of program: Generic Configurator

Catalogue identifier: ADUK

Program summary URL: http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/ADUK

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen's University of Belfast, N. Ireland

Computer for which the program is designed and others on which it has been tested: Intel Pentium IV PC

Installations: ECAL Data Acquisition of the CMS experiment at CERN

Operating systems or monitors under which the program has been tested: Linux 2.4.2

Programming language used: C++

Memory required to execute with typical data: depends on the complexity of the module configuration. Test runs requires less then 500 KB

Number of bits in a word: 32

Number of processors used: 1

Distribution format: tar gzip file

Number of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 234 542

Number of lines in distributed program, including test data etc.: 17 365

Nature of physical problem: Generalization of hardware device configuration procedure in VME or PCI buses.

Method of solution: The developed package uses a generic configuration model that allows users to configure VME and PCI devices. The hardware configuration parameters and the data structures associated to each hardware register are specified in XML files. The package performs the desired configuration using these files along with a description of the hardware access proprieties of each register.

Typical running time: depends on the complexity of the device configuration and on the bus interface. The test runs using a dummy bus adapter requires less then 1 s.

Unusual features of the program: requires the installation of HAL (version 03.03) and the Xerces-C library (version 2.3).

References: [1]
J. Boyer, XML Version 1.0, W3C recommendation, 15 March 2001, http://www.w3.org/.
[2]
J. Gutleber et al., Clustered data acquisition for the CMS Experiment, in: H.S. Chen (Ed.), Proceedings of the International Conference on Computing in High Energy and Nuclear Physics, CHEP 2001, Beijing, China, Science Press, ISBN 1-880132-77-X, September 3–7, 2001, pp. 601–605.
[3]
V. Brigljevic et al., Using XDAQ in application scenarios of the CMS experiment, CMS CR-2003/007.
[4]
A.L. Hors et al., DOM Level 3 Core Specification Version 1.0, W3C working draft 09 June 3, 2003, http://www.w3.org/.
Keywords: Control systems; Data acquisition; Hardware; Configuration; VME; PCI

Alva Couch, Yizhan Sun, On observed reproducibility in network configuration management, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 53, Issue 2, November 2004, Pages 215-253, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2004.04.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642304000796)
Abstract: A rigorous language for discussing the issue of configuration management is currently lacking. To this end, we develop a simple state machine model of configuration management. Observed behaviors comprise the state of a host and configuration processes accomplish state transitions. Using this language, we show that for one host in isolation and for some configuration processes, reproducibility of observed effect for a configuration process is a statically verifiable property of the process. Using configuration processes verified in this manner, we can efficiently identify latent preconditions that affect behavior among a population of hosts. Constructing configuration management tools with statically verifiable observed behaviors thus reduces the lifecycle cost of configuration management.
Keywords: Network and system administration; Configuration management; Software installation; Software package management

S.M. Taiabul Haque, Matthew Wright, Shannon Scielzo, Hierarchy of users׳ web passwords: Perceptions, practices and susceptibilities, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 72, Issue 12, December 2014, Pages 860-874, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2014.07.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581914001037)
Abstract: Abstract
In this study, we propose a hierarchy of password importance, and we use an experiment to examine the degree of similarity between passwords for lower-level (e.g. news portal) and higher-level (e.g. banking) websites in this hierarchy. We asked subjects to construct passwords for websites at both levels. Leveraging the lower-level passwords along with a dictionary attack, we successfully cracked almost one-third of the subjects׳ higher-level passwords. In a survey, subjects reported frequently reusing higher-level passwords, with or without modifications, as well as using a similar process to construct both levels of passwords. We thus conclude that unsafely shared or leaked lower-level passwords can be used by attackers to crack higher-level passwords.
Keywords: Security; Usability; Password; Survey

J.J. Schwarz, M. Maranzana, J. Skubich, Y. Martinez, Applicative object interconnection in a graphical design for real-time applications, Control Engineering Practice, Volume 4, Issue 10, October 1996, Pages 1419-1425, ISSN 0967-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0967-0661(96)00152-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0967066196001529)
Abstract: The LACATRE environment is dedicated to multitasking real-time application developments. At the lowest level, it handles basic objects close to those supported by realtime executives (tasks, messages, semaphores…), and at the highest one, it manipulates applicative objects which are near to the application programmer's preoccupations. The aim of this paper is to show how it is possible to build re-usable graphical communication interfaces, easily and efficiently, for the interconnection of these high-level applicative objects when they are involved in a client-server relation.
Keywords: Real time; graphical design; client-server

Marco Brambilla, Piero Fraternali, Large-scale Model-Driven Engineering of web user interaction: The WebML and WebRatio experience, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 89, Part B, 1 September 2014, Pages 71-87, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2013.03.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642313000701)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper reports the experience of WebRatio, a company focusing on Model-Driven Engineering (MDE) tools (WebRatio and WebRatio BPM) and services since 2001. The adopted MDE approach is based on the transformation of models expressed in a Domain Specific Language called WebML (Web Modeling Language) into running applications, with the unique feature of creating not only the back-end data and business logic but also the Web/RIA front-end, without posing any limitation on the graphical and interaction quality of the user interface. WebRatio has been applied in many industrial projects, some of which have delivered large-scale enterprise applications, generated and maintained completely through MDE practices over the years. In this paper we present the lessons learned within this experience, describe some success stories and show some quantitative information and evaluation on the usage of the approach.
Keywords: Model-Driven Engineering; Code generation; BPM; IFML; Software engineering

T.W Carnduff, J.S Goonetillake, Configuration management in evolutionary engineering design using versioning and integrity constraints, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 35, Issues 3–4, March 2004, Pages 161-177, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2004.03.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997804000262)
Abstract: Artifacts in engineering design are structurally complex and may be represented in software as recursively composite objects. Due to the evolutionary nature of the design process each artifact and its components may evolve through several versions. The paper describes enhanced database system facilities that are used to group mutually consistent component versions together into useful configurations. The versioning system includes integrity management facilities that allow evolving design constraints to be captured flexibly at individual component/object level. In order to permit evolution, integrity constraints are represented within versionable objects, so-called constraint version objects (CVOs). Inter-dependency constraints can be modelled to express the consistency semantics necessary to combine component object versions into useful configurations. The evolution of these configurations can be captured in the database, as configurations are also represented as versioned objects. As a result of the hierarchical structure of composite artifact objects, subconfigurations may be combined to form higher-level configurations. To overcome the difficulties associated with combining object versions and subconfigurations into meaningful configurations, the computer system provides a graphical user interface which greatly eases the task of the designer. Selection of the mutually consistent object versions making up a configuration and the associated integrity validation is facilitated by the system, thus removing the need for the designer to become involved in any form of computer programming.
Keywords: Versioning; Configuration management; Computer-aided design; Design constraints

Emanuela Bauleo, Serena Carnevale, Tiziana Catarci, Stephen Kimani, Mariano Leva, Massimo Mecella, Design, realization and user evaluation of the SmartVortex Visual Query System for accessing data streams in industrial engineering applications, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 25, Issue 5, October 2014, Pages 577-601, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jvlc.2014.08.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X14000652)
Abstract: Abstract
Objective: In this paper we present a Visual Query System, which allows users to graphically build queries over data streams and traditional relational data. The Visual Query System runs on top of a DSMS (Data Stream Management System).

Methods: The system has been designed and implemented following the user-centered design approach. Two different releases of the system have been incrementally and iteratively designed and evaluated. The first release has been evaluated using heuristic evaluation. The second release, whose design was a refinement based on the results of the foregoing heuristic evaluation, was evaluated by several users. Moreover, a comparative evaluation involving users has been conducted on the second release.

Results: The paper presents the visual query system, and the results ofthe various evaluations.

Conclusion: Visual Query Systems for data streams are an effective tool for industrial engineers in querying and analyzing data streams from equipments.

Practice and implications: The proposed visual query system has been employed in real industrial scenarios in order to visually query and analyze data streams produced by industrial machines.
Keywords: Visual Query System (VQS); Data Stream Management System (DSMS); Industrial engineering; Usability evaluation

Víctor Cerdà, Laura Ferrer, Jessica Avivar and Amalia Cerdà, Chapter 5 - Instrumentation: Detectors, Accessories and Interfaces, In Flow Analysis, Elsevier, Boston, 2014, Pages 125-162, ISBN 9780444595966, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-59596-6.00005-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978044459596600005X)
Abstract: Abstract
In the previous chapter how to build useful devices commonly used in flow assemblies was described. In the present chapter most relevant elements that compose the instrumentation commonly used in flow systems, including accessories, detectors, with special emphasis on the two most frequently employed in practice, namely: electrochemical and optical detectors together with most used interfaces are presented.

This chapter also deals with various types of auxiliary devices used in flow systems including power sources for general purposes and light sources, electronic circuits for controlling solenoid valves, peripheral instruments such as inductively coupled plasma mass spectrometry or gas chromatography, and amplifiers. The devices described here have been of great help in constructing our own flow systems.
Keywords: Amplifiers; AAS; Electrochemical detectors; Electronic devices; Interface boards; Light sources; Luminescence detectors; Optical detectors; Photometric detectors; Power sources; Solenoid valve and pump controllers

Rolf Oppliger, Ralf Hauser, David Basin, SSL/TLS session-aware user authentication – Or how to effectively thwart the man-in-the-middle, Computer Communications, Volume 29, Issue 12, 4 August 2006, Pages 2238-2246, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comcom.2006.03.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366406001071)
Abstract: Man-in-the-middle attacks pose a serious threat to SSL/TLS-based electronic commerce applications, such as Internet banking. In this paper, we argue that most deployed user authentication mechanisms fail to provide protection against this type of attack, even when they run on top of SSL/TLS. As a possible countermeasure, we introduce the notion of SSL/TLS session-aware user authentication, and present different possibilities for implementing it. We start with a basic implementation that employs impersonal authentication tokens. Afterwards, we address extensions and enhancements and discuss possibilities for implementing SSL/TLS session-aware user authentication in software.
Keywords: Security; Man-in-the-middle attack; SSL/TLS protocol; User authentication; Electronic commerce

Kyle O. Bailey, James S. Okolica, Gilbert L. Peterson, User identification and authentication using multi-modal behavioral biometrics, Computers & Security, Volume 43, June 2014, Pages 77-89, ISSN 0167-4048, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cose.2014.03.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167404814000340)
Abstract: Abstract
Biometric computer authentication has an advantage over password and access card authentication in that it is based on something you are, which is not easily copied or stolen. One way of performing biometric computer authentication is to use behavioral tendencies associated with how a user interacts with the computer. However, behavioral biometric authentication accuracy rates are worse than more traditional authentication methods. This article presents a behavioral biometric system that fuses user data from keyboard, mouse, and Graphical User Interface (GUI) interactions. Combining the modalities results in a more accurate authentication decision based on a broader view of the user's computer activity while requiring less user interaction to train the system than previous work. Testing over 31 users shows that fusion techniques significantly improve behavioral biometric authentication accuracy over single modalities on their own. Between the two fusion techniques presented, feature fusion and an ensemble based classification method, the ensemble method performs the best with a False Acceptance Rate (FAR) of 2.10% and a False Rejection Rate (FRR) 2.24%.
Keywords: Computer security; Behavioral biometrics; Multi-modal fusion; Insider threat; Active authentication

Olivier St-Cyr, Greg A. Jamieson, Kim J. Vicente, Ecological interface design and sensor noise, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 71, Issue 11, November 2013, Pages 1056-1068, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2013.08.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581913001031)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper investigates the effects of the presence and magnitude of sensor noise on operators' performance and control stability when they use an Ecological Interface Design (EID) interface and a non-EID interface. Sensor noise was gradually increased in selected low-level physical sensors of DURESS III, a representative thermal-hydraulic process simulation. There are two important findings. First, participants in the EID condition achieved target goals significantly faster across all magnitudes of sensor noise. Second, participants in the EID condition exhibited more stable control; experiencing fewer and shorter oscillations around the target goals. This is the first study to empirically investigate the impact of the presence and magnitude of sensor noise on the robustness and effectiveness of an EID interface. These findings are important if EID is to be applied in industrial settings.
Keywords: Sensor noise; Ecological interface design; Display design; Human–computer interaction; Instrumentation

Alain Bignon, André Rossi, Pascal Berruet, An integrated design flow for the joint generation of control and interfaces from a business model, Computers in Industry, Volume 64, Issue 6, August 2013, Pages 634-649, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2013.03.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361513000584)
Abstract: Abstract
The design of large systems suffers from communication problems inside design team and inconsistencies in design documentation. We have identified two concurrent but complementary approaches for design. The first is a bottom-up approach where the design is made by aggregation of standard components. The second is a top-down approach where the design is made by successive refining of a model.

This paper offers an integrated design flow for the joint generation of controls and users interfaces for reconfigurable sociotechnical systems. In accordance with our industrial feedback our approach is based on a business model called the synoptic, and on a library of standard elements.

We describe the tool Anaxagore, that implements this approach and with which one can generate, in few minutes, a command and an interface for two simple input models. The results of the generation are consistent with the specifications.
Keywords: Human–machine systems; Control system design; Human–machine interfaces; Model driven engineering; Process engineering

Claudio Garino, Elisa Borfecchia, Roberto Gobetto, Jeroen A. van Bokhoven, Carlo Lamberti, Determination of the electronic and structural configuration of coordination compounds by synchrotron-radiation techniques, Coordination Chemistry Reviews, Volumes 277–278, 1 October 2014, Pages 130-186, ISSN 0010-8545, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ccr.2014.03.027.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010854514000800)
Abstract: Abstract
In this review we provide an overview of the potential of synchrotron radiation techniques to understand the structural and electronic properties of coordination compounds. Besides the largely employed multi-wavelength anomalous dispersion (MAD) and X-ray absorption spectroscopy (XAS), in both near (XANES) and post (EXAFS) edge regions, we also discuss the contribution arising from more specialized techniques that have become more widely used in the last years, such as the total scattering approach in the XRPD data analysis and X-ray emission spectroscopy (XES). Comparison with the commonly used laboratory techniques (XRD, UV–vis, luminescence, NMR, EPR) is used to underline the added value of synchrotron radiation techniques when applied to already well characterized samples. The fundamental role of DFT calculations in interpreting both diffraction and spectroscopic data to understand structural and electronic properties of coordination complexes is highlighted. A perspective summary is reported at the end of the manuscript.
Keywords: Homogeneous catalysis; Heterogeneous catalysis; Photoactive coordination compounds; Synchrotron; Structural determination; Electronic structure; X-ray scattering techniques; X-ray spectroscopies

Edward S. Blurock, Valérie Warth, Xavier Grandmougin, Roda Bounaceur, Pierre-Alexandre Glaude, Frédérique Battin-Leclerc, JTHERGAS: Thermodynamic estimation from 2D graphical representations of molecules, Energy, Volume 43, Issue 1, July 2012, Pages 161-171, ISSN 0360-5442, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.energy.2012.01.072.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0360544212000874)
Abstract: JTHERGAS is a versatile calculator (implemented in JAVA) to estimate thermodynamic information from two-dimensional graphical representations of molecules and radicals involving covalent bonds based on the Benson additivity method. The versatility of JTHERGAS stems from its inherent philosophy that all the fundamental data used in the calculation should be visible, to see exactly where the final values came from, and modifiable, to account for new data that can appear in the literature. The main use of this method is within automatic combustion mechanism generation systems where fast estimation of a large number and variety of chemical species is needed. The implementation strategy is based on meta-atom definitions and substructure analysis allowing a highly extensible database without modification of the core algorithms. Several interfaces for the database and the calculations are provided from terminal line commands, to graphical interfaces to web-services. The first order estimation of thermodynamics is based summing up the contributions of each heavy atom bonding description. Second order corrections due to steric hindrance and ring strain are made. Automatic estimate of contributions due to internal, external and optical symmetries are also made. The thermodynamical data for radicals is calculated by taking the difference due to the lost of a hydrogen radical taking into account changes in symmetry, spin, rotations, vibrations and steric hindrances. The software is public domain and is based on standard libraries such as Chemistry Development Kit (CDK) and Chemical Markup Language (CML).
Keywords: Thermodynamic estimation; Enthalpy; Entropy; Heat capacity; Benson rules; Automatic generation

J. Végh, I. Pós, Cs. Horváth, Z. Kálya, T. Parkó, M. Ignits, VERONA V6.22 – An enhanced reactor analysis tool applied for continuous core parameter monitoring at Paks NPP, Nuclear Engineering and Design, Volume 292, October 2015, Pages 261-276, ISSN 0029-5493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nucengdes.2015.06.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0029549315002551)
Abstract: Abstract
Between 2003 and 2007 the Hungarian Paks NPP performed a large modernization project to upgrade its VERONA core monitoring system. The modernization work resulted in a state-of-the-art system that was able to support the reactor thermal power increase to 108% by more accurate and more frequent core analysis. Details of the new system are given in Végh et al. (2008), the most important improvements were as follows: complete replacement of the hardware and the local area network; application of a new operating system and porting a large fraction of the original application software to the new environment; implementation of a new human-system interface; and last but not least, introduction of new reactor physics calculations. Basic novelty of the modernized core analysis was the introduction of an on-line core-follow module based on the standard Paks NPP core design code HELIOS/C-PORCA. New calculations also provided much finer spatial resolution, both in terms of axial node numbers and within the fuel assemblies. The new system was able to calculate the fuel applied during the first phase of power increase accurately, but it was not tailored to determine the effects of burnable absorbers as gadolinium. However, in the second phase of the power increase process the application of fuel assemblies containing three fuel rods with gadolinium content was intended (in order to optimize fuel economy), therefore off-line and on-line VERONA reactor physics models had to be further modified, to be able to handle the new fuel according to the accuracy requirements. In the present paper first a brief overview of the system version (V6.0) commissioned after the first modernization step is outlined; then details of the modified off-line and on-line reactor physics calculations are described. Validation results for new modules are treated extensively, in order to illustrate the extent and complexity of the V&amp;V procedure associated with the development and licensing of the new calculations running in version V6.22 of VERONA. Some details on the experience collected during the operation of the new reactor physics calculations are also discussed. Finally conceptual plans for the next system modification phase are outlined briefly; these changes are induced by the forthcoming introduction of 15 month long fuel cycles (instead of the present 12 month long cycles).

John David N. Dionisio, Alfonso F. Cárdenas, Ricky K. Taira, Denise R. Aberle, Wesley W. Chu, Michael F. McNitt-Gray, Jonathan Goldin, Robert B. Lufkin, A unified timeline model and user interface for multimedia medical databases, Computerized Medical Imaging and Graphics, Volume 20, Issue 4, July–August 1996, Pages 333-346, ISSN 0895-6111, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0895-6111(96)00023-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0895611196000237)
Abstract: A multimedia medical database model and prototype is described for supporting a timeline-based presentation of information. The database links image and text data in a way that permits users to look at medical information in a single unified view. Various visualization programs permit the user to view data in various ways, including full image views, graphs, and tables. Our technology is applied for proof-of-concept to two areas: thoracic oncology and thermal tumor ablation therapy of the brain. This effort is part of the multidisciplinary KMeD project in collaboration with medical research and clinical treatment projects at UCLA.§§Portions of this research and development supported by: National Science Foundation (NSF) grant no. IRI9224559; the Cigarette and Tobacco Surtax Fund of the State of California through the Tobacco-Related Disease Research Program of the University of California, Grant #2RT0081; and PHS Grant #P01 CA-51198-05 awarded by the National Cancer Institute.
Keywords: Multimedia databases; Time-based data modeling; Medical imaging; Medical informaties

A.M.G. Lopes, FlowVis — a CAD based solution for the graphical post-processing of scalar and vectorial data, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 12, Issues 2–3, 1997, Pages 161-168, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1364-8152(97)00006-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815297000066)
Abstract: FlowVis is a visualization tool for graphical post-processing of data defined in a 2D or 3D raster grid. These data typically represent a field of scalar and/or vectorial variables characterizing some physical phenomenon, as for instance, the wind velocity vectors over topography, or the smoke concentration within an urban area.

With a wide field of application ranging from Fluid Dynamics and Heat Transfer to Stress Analysis, both in applied engineering and fundamental research, FlowVis provides a quick and efficient way for the graphical display and analysis of data obtained from a numerical model or experimental setup. The software is written in C language and is a subsidiary application of the CAD Microstation, running in PC machines, under DOS or Windows. The present paper provides some insight into the major features of FlowVis and gives some examples of its application.
Keywords: Graphical post-processing; GUI; wind field; scalars; vectors

Sameh Y. Elnaggar, Richard Tervo, Saba M. Mattar, Optimal dielectric and cavity configurations for improving the efficiency of electron paramagnetic resonance probes, Journal of Magnetic Resonance, Volume 245, August 2014, Pages 50-57, ISSN 1090-7807, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jmr.2014.05.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1090780714001578)
Abstract: Abstract
An electron paramagnetic resonance (EPR) spectrometer’s lambda efficiency parameter (Λ) is one of the most important parameters that govern its sensitivity. It is studied for an EPR probe consisting of a dielectric resonator (DR) in a cavity (CV). Expressions for Λ are derived in terms of the probe’s individual DR and CV components, Λ1 and Λ2 respectively. Two important cases are considered. In the first, a probe consisting of a CV is improved by incorporating a DR. The sensitivity enhancement depends on the relative rather than the absolute values of the individual components. This renders the analysis general. The optimal configuration occurs when the CV and DR modes are nearly degenerate. This configuration guarantees that the probe can be easily coupled to the microwave bridge while maintaining a large Λ. It is shown that for a lossy CV with a small quality factor Q2, one chooses a DR that has the highest filling factor, η1, regardless of its Λ1 and Q1. On the other hand, if the CV has a large Q2, the optimum DR is the one which has the highest Λ1. This is regardless of its η1 and relative dielectric constant, ɛr. When the quality factors of both the CV and DR are comparable, the lambda efficiency is reduced by a factor of 2 . Thus the signal intensity for an unsaturated sample is cut in half. The second case is the design of an optimum shield to house a DR. Besides preventing radiation leakage, it is shown that for a high loss DR, the shield can actually boost Λ above the DR value. This can also be very helpful for relatively low efficiency dielectrics as well as lossy samples, such as polar liquids.
Keywords: Electron paramagnetic resonance; Dielectric resonators; Resonant cavity; Resonator modes; Coupled mode theory; Coupled modes; Coupling coefficients; Quality factor; Filling factor; Finite element methods; Field distributions; Spectrometer sensitivity; Signal-to-noise ratio; Efficiency parameter

Miguel Llopis, Antonio Ferrández, How to make a natural language interface to query databases accessible to everyone: An example, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 35, Issue 5, September 2013, Pages 470-481, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2012.09.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548912001110)
Abstract: Natural Language Interfaces to Query Databases (NLIDBs) have been an active research field since the 1960s. However, they have not been widely adopted. This article explores some of the biggest challenges and approaches for building NLIDBs and proposes techniques to reduce implementation and adoption costs. The article describes {AskMe*}, a new system that leverages some of these approaches and adds an innovative feature: query-authoring services, which lower the entry barrier for end users. Advantages of these approaches are proven with experimentation. Results confirm that, even when {AskMe*} is automatically reconfigurable against multiple domains, its accuracy is comparable to domain-specific NLIDBs.
Keywords: Natural language interface; Relational database; Ontology extraction; Concept hierarchy; Query-authoring services

Franz Penz, Pedro Antunes, Manuel Fonseca, Chapter 15 Feedback in computer supported cooperation systems: User interface design for a talk-like tool, In: Dan Shapiro, Michael Tauber and Roland Traunmüller, Editor(s), Human Factors in Information Technology, North-Holland, 1996, Volume 12, Pages 241-257, ISSN 0923-8433, ISBN 9780444819987, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0923-8433(96)80017-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0923843396800177)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter describes some enhancements of the feedback provided to users using talk-like communication tools and presents a tool, FaceTalk, which adds drawn face expressions to a talk session. Communication in the course of working life, whether formal or informal, is of equal importance for the work itself, as well as for work satisfaction of the coworkers. As FaceTalk can support interactive communication and features known from phone answering/mailing systems, FaceTalk supports a mixed synchronous/asynchronous cooperation form. FaceTalk is intended to be used remotely over a wide area network. Transmission delay times are a problem for interactive communication. FaceTalk is in its nature a collaboration-aware application. Many of its features emerge from collaboration considerations in the course of the user interface design. The face parameterization allows more intensive expressions than those most people are able to show with their real face. Studies on the usability of FaceTalk should also include a more founded and interdisciplinary approach, gathering data through ethnographic methods.

Maria Grazia Violante, Enrico Vezzetti, A methodology for supporting requirement management tools (RMt) design in the PLM scenario: An user-based strategy, Computers in Industry, Volume 65, Issue 7, September 2014, Pages 1065-1075, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2014.05.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361514001031)
Abstract: Abstract
In the current “mass customization” scenario, product complexity is increasing significantly due to the necessity to answer as quickly and effectively as possible to many different costumer needs but maintaining costs under control. In this scenario, requirements management becomes a fundamental features for the entire product lifecycle, as enterprises need to have a complete and clear idea of the market for succeeding in developing and supporting the right and innovative product. Moreover, considering that product lifecycle is characterized by many “trade-off”, so that product features are often negotiated in order to fulfil to conflicting requirements, it is important to support the “traceability” of the entire lifecycle “negotiation” process. For this reason, PLM platform has to provide suitable methodologies and tools able to efficiently support the design and management of large set of complex requirements. Requirements Management Tools (RMt) embedded in PLM solutions help keeping specifications consistent, up-to-date, and accessible. At present, there are different possible solutions, but a shared PLM integrated seems not to be available. In order to fill this gap, this paper has developed an user-based strategy, based on Kano methodology, so on “user satisfaction”, in order to define a structured set of guidelines to support the design of the features of an integrated PLM requirement management tool.
Keywords: Requirements management; Customer requirements; Product Lifecycle Management; Kano; Satisfaction

Deborah Hix, H.Rex Hartson, Antonio C. Siochi, David Ruppert, Customer responsibility for ensuring usability: Requirements on the user interface development process, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 25, Issue 3, June 1994, Pages 241-255, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0164-1212(94)90033-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0164121294900337)
Abstract: An organization developing an interactive system will often find usability a compelling, but elusive, goal. The goal of ensuring usability becomes even more difficult to attain when the system is contracted to an outside developer, and control of both process and product becomes remote. Without a clear statement of requirements for the user interface of the system, this control may be lost from the beginning. Further, the cost of interactive system usage is especially significant in the case of contracted-out development, because the customer—the organization that lets a contract for interactive system development—bears the costs of training and poor user productivity.

In spite of the good publicity that usability has received lately, most customers still do not state requirements for the user interface of an interactive system. Although it has been shown that the process by which a user interface is developed has an overwhelmingly large effect on usability of the product, almost never are requirements for the interface development process included in the overall system requirements. How, then, can a customer hope to ensure usability in an interactive system that the customer is contracting out for development? We propose a solution: The customer establishes requirements for the user interface development process, even as early as a Request for Proposal (RFP). To successfully write and enforce such requirements, the customer (or a knowledgeable representative of the customer) must be well informed about human-computer interaction, usability, and existing user interface development techniques. As a case study, we describe how one customer organization, the Bureau of Land Management, produced user interface development process requirements and included them in an RFP. We also discuss how a customer can use product requirements in an RFP to describe the desired general interface style without constraining the developer to a specific design.

Riccardo Falconi, Claudio Melchiorri, RobotiCad: an Educational Tool for Robotics, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 41, Issue 2, 2008, Pages 9111-9116, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20080706-5-KR-1001.01538.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016404179)
Abstract: Abstract
RobotiCad is a user-friendly Matlab/Simulink toolbox for the modeling and simulation of robotic manipulators. With RobotiCad, starting from Denavit-Hartenberg parameters, it is possible to create the kinematic and dynamic models of any serial mechanical structure, together with its 3D graphical model. When a robot is created, it can be exported in a dedicated file that can be loaded in a Simulink scheme and easily interfaced with other block-sets. A robot, then, can be simulated and, eventually, an AVI file of the simulation can be obtained. Moreover, a rich collection of Matlab functions properly developed in order to study industrial robots is included in RobotiCad, e.g. functions for trajectory generation, manipulability analysis, control, and so on.
Keywords: Robotic Education; Robot Simulation; Graphical User Interface; Matlab

Ting-Kou Peng, Amy J.C. Trappey, User-friendly interface development for cad-based engineering data management systems, In: Yuichiro Anzai, Katsuhiko Ogawa and Hirohiko Mori, Editor(s), Advances in Human Factors/Ergonomics, Elsevier, 1995, Volume 20, Pages 1153-1158, ISSN 0921-2647, ISBN 9780444817952, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0921-2647(06)80182-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0921264706801826)
Abstract: A system designed to help engineers define and manage product engineering data is called an Engineering Data Management system (EDMS). Although a lot of CAD tools for 3-D design applications are capable of modeling objects using personal computers, there are still obstacles to manage huge existing product engineering data or define a new product comprehensively and efficiently. Further, these CAD systems often have functional limitation for specialized applications. This paper will develop an EDMS to manage existing products data and define new products. We focus on the development of a userfriendly interface for EDMS in order to achieve the objective of a user-oriented design and engineering environment.

C.J. Wang, Jenny Chen, J.S. Chen, G.J. Jan, The design schemes of graphic user interface database and intelligent local controller in the SRRC control system, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 352, Issues 1–2, 15 December 1994, Pages 300-305, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0168-9002(94)91528-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0168900294915288)
Abstract: The control system of the SRRC has been utilized to facilitate commisioning since the beginning, and it provides operators an easy to use environment. Hence, we would like to discuss the design schemes and relationships between the user's interface, the database and the ILC (Intelligent Local Controller) levels. The whole control system in SRRC is a two-level design connected by Ethernet. From operator's view, the upper level is the CONSOLE level and the lower one is the ILC level. Those signals from, or to, equipment are connected to ILCs through analog/digital interfaces, GPIB buses, RS232 serial links, etc.; the ILC is an IEEE 1014 bus (VMEbus) based system running PSOS + real-time multi-tasking kernel and PNA + (TCP/IP protocols) communication software. The control software of CONSOLE level is developed in the VMS operating system on DEC workstations, and The Graphic User Interfaces are built on the X-Window/Motif environment. The control system has fulfilled the expectations of the facility commissioning group. It has also proved to be a simple, stable, accurate, easily maintained system.

Jens Hellmers, Karsten Heiken, Eike Foken, Jörg Thomaschewski, Thomas Wriedt, Customizable web service interface for light scattering simulation programs, Journal of Quantitative Spectroscopy and Radiative Transfer, Volume 113, Issue 17, November 2012, Pages 2243-2250, ISSN 0022-4073, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jqsrt.2012.07.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0022407312003317)
Abstract: Investigation of light scattering by simulations became increasingly important in recent years. Applications range from plasmonics to optical particle characterization. While there are hundreds of programs available, using them can be very time consuming: installation, configuration and operation often are laborious. As a result potential users of such software might be discouraged by the complexity of the necessary tasks. Not only ‘casual users’ – scientists who need light scattering simulation results for their daily work but who are not specialized on the topic – could benefit from tools to execute the calculations online via an easy to use web-interface accessed by a browser. In this case no local installation of the software is necessary, a user friendly interface helps learning and understanding the use of programs, while calculations can be done from anywhere and any time as long as a user is connected to the internet.

This paper describes a newly developed interface that can be used for these purposes. It is made freely available to everyone and can be adapted to a variety of existing light scattering programs.
Keywords: Online interface; Light scattering simulation; T-matrix method

Rafał Michalski, The influence of color grouping on users’ visual search behavior and preferences, Displays, Volume 35, Issue 4, October 2014, Pages 176-195, ISSN 0141-9382, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.displa.2014.05.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0141938214000389)
Abstract: Abstract
The article investigates how the various colors and color pairs used as grouping factors affect the visual search process and direct manipulation activities in the context of toolbar-like graphical panels. Red, green, and blue colors having the same perceptual distance in the CIELab space are used. The results demonstrate significant influence of the examined color-related factors on the speed and accuracy. The color preattentive property depends strongly on the grouping pattern: layouts with smaller colored areas were operated worse than panels divided into larger parts. Meaningful differences were also observed between panels with single and two colored backgrounds.

Preferences were examined by pairwise comparisons before and after performing the ‘search and select’ tasks. Subjective judgments were significantly differentiated by the toolbar background color pattern both prior to the performance tasks and after them. The initial relative weights structure changed decidedly after the performance experience being more consistent with the ‘search and select’ results. The location factor was irrelevant for the speed and accuracy as well as for preferences. Objective and subjective findings are compared and discussed. Linear regression models showing the preference structure change and the relationship between mean acquisition times and mean preference weights are developed and discussed.
Keywords: Color grouping; Display design; Visual search; Preattentive processing; Analytic Hierarchy Process preferences; Direct manipulation

C.G. Thomas, Design, implementation and evaluation of an adaptive user interface, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 6, Issue 4, December 1993, Pages 230-238, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-7051(93)90014-K.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095070519390014K)
Abstract: Software systems developed in recent years are becoming increasingly powerful, but in most cases they tend to abandon the user to deal with the complexity of the system alone. There is an immense need for systems with individual, context-sensitive support. The paper discusses the development of such a support system with special focus on the user interface. The extension of an existing and complex program. Excel, to an adaptive and customizable system is described. This extension is called Flexcel, and it has been implemented and evaluated.

The primary aim of this extension is to provide a convenient environment for adapting Excel's user interface to particular users and their current tasks. For example, it allows the user to define new menu for actions that are frequently needed and normally require a tedious dialog step. Flexcel also analyzes the user's interaction style and presents adaptation suggestions. A critique component supports the user in his/her problem solving and learning activities related to the adaptability of Flexcel's user interface.
Keywords: adaptivity; customizability; critique; knowledge bases; usage profiles

Chun Cheng Hsu, Comparison of gender differences in young people’s blog interface preferences and designs, Displays, Volume 33, Issue 3, July 2012, Pages 119-128, ISSN 0141-9382, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.displa.2012.04.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0141938212000212)
Abstract: Besides usability, visual aesthetics also strongly influence whether users will continue to trust and use a website. This study examined blogs to determine whether a correlation exists between the gender and visual preferences of young people toward blog interfaces. Few research on gender differences in visual preferences for blog interfaces have been published. Therefore the goal of this research is to determine the different design features of blog interfaces preferred by males and females. Using two Multidimensional Scaling (MDS) algorithms, ALSCAL and PREFMAP analysis, the perceptual space of user blog interface preferences was plotted to explore the hidden perceptual configuration of users as well as examine gender related ideal points.

The results showed four typical blog interfaces and three dimensions that affected user preference and the spatial distribution of ideal preference point for each user. Last, gender differences in the blog interface preference of young people were discussed and guidelines were recommended for developers. The results are applicable to blog interface customization in digital device displays.
Keywords: Blog; Interface design; Gender differences; Multidimensional Scaling (MDS) analysis; PREFMAP

J.J. Skubich, J.J. Schwarz, M. Maranzana, T. Szmuc, Time requirement specification in the graphical design of real-time software, Control Engineering Practice, Volume 4, Issue 2, February 1996, Pages 207-215, ISSN 0967-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0967-0661(95)00227-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0967066195002278)
Abstract: The aim of the LACATRE graphical environment, described in this paper, is to facilitate the design of multitasking real-time applications. It covers the preliminary and detailed design steps of the software life-cycle. It permits an easy description of both the behaviour and the transformational aspects of an application. The introduction in this environment of task time characteristics offers the developer the possibility of choosing a scheduling policy adapted to a particular application, and of verifying the adequacy of a design relative to time constraints (for the respect of deadlines, etc.). The application of the environment to a mining robot is illustrated in the paper.
Keywords: Real time; graphical design; time constraints; scheduling

Charles Ottino, User interface in the 1990's, ISA Transactions, Volume 32, Issue 2, July 1993, Pages 95-121, ISSN 0019-0578, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0019-0578(93)90033-S.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/001905789390033S)
Abstract: The process control industry is highly competitive. Most systems have similar features. However, a major factor to consider in the selection process is the user interface. This is where the user, operator, engineer, production control engineer, scheduler, etc., obtains the information he/she needs to effectively operate the plant in a safe and efficient manner. In discussing the scope of the user interface, three major areas will be reviewed: the functional areas of the production process and how the user interface fits into that domain in terms of functional scope, the user trends in terms of emerging operational trends and their impact on functional requirements, and the user interface concepts including control room operations, control room layout, non-control room operations, and solution management.

H. Fang, A.J. Hand, J.E. Haddock, T.D. White, An object-oriented framework for finite element pavement analysis, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 38, Issues 11–12, November–December 2007, Pages 763-771, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2006.08.045.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997806002043)
Abstract: In this study, we developed an object-oriented (OO) framework with interactive graphics to assist pavement studies using finite element analysis (FEA). FEA has been proven to be effective in studying various pavement failure problems; however, it is time consuming and error prone to manually generate the load sequences where non-regular tire footprints, non-uniform tire-pavement contact stresses, and transverse wheel wander distributions are used. After FEA, extracting the deformations for failure analysis is necessary but tedious. The OO framework developed in this study handles the preprocessing and postprocessing tasks for the FEA of pavements. It has a graphical user interface and is platform independent. It was successfully used in developing a new criterion for characterizing pavement failures that involved approximately four hundred different FEA simulations.
Keywords: Object-oriented; Framework; Finite element analysis; Pavement; Failure; Graphical user interface

Ángel Martín, Fidel A. Mato, Hint: An educational software for heat exchanger network design with the pinch method, Education for Chemical Engineers, Volume 3, Issue 1, June 2008, Pages e6-e14, ISSN 1749-7728, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ece.2007.08.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1749772807000036)
Abstract: A free piece of educational software for heat exchanger network design based on the pinch method is presented. The interface of the program has been designed focusing on getting a clear presentation of the concepts of the pinch design methods and letting students the control of all the stages of the design. The program guides students through all the main steps of the design, including energy and cost targeting, utilities selection, heat exchanger network specification, and optimisation and retrofitting analysis. The program has been tested in a MSc pinch technology course for several years, and the feedback obtained from students during this period has been used to optimise the program functionality and its interface. The use of the program improves the efficiency of the course since it let students practice the concepts of the pinch method while relieving them of tedious repetitive calculations.
Keywords: Heat integration; Pinch technology; Freeware educational software; Heat exchanger network; Retrofitting analysis

William T. Baxter, ArDean Leith, Joachim Frank, SPIRE: The SPIDER Reconstruction Engine, Journal of Structural Biology, Volume 157, Issue 1, January 2007, Pages 56-63, ISSN 1047-8477, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jsb.2006.07.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1047847706002358)
Abstract: SPIRE is a Python program written to modernize the user interaction with SPIDER, the image processing system for electron microscopical reconstruction projects. SPIRE provides a graphical user interface (GUI) to SPIDER for executing batch files of SPIDER commands. It also lets users quickly view the status of a project by showing the last batch files that were run, as well as the data files that were generated. SPIRE handles the flexibility of the SPIDER programming environment through configuration files: XML-tagged documents that describe the batch files, directory trees, and presentation of the GUI for a given type of reconstruction project. It also provides the capability to connect to a laboratory database, for downloading parameters required by batch files at the start of a project, and uploading reconstruction results at the end of a project.
Keywords: Cryo-electron microscopy; Single-particle reconstruction; Graphical user interface

D. Wang, J.M. He, J.A. Knuteson, DripFume: A Visual Basic program for simulating distribution and atmospheric volatilization of soil fumigants applied through drip irrigation, Computers and Electronics in Agriculture, Volume 56, Issue 2, April 2007, Pages 111-119, ISSN 0168-1699, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compag.2007.01.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S016816990700018X)
Abstract: A Windows-based graphical user interface program (DripFume) was developed in MS Visual Basic (VB) to utilize a two-dimensional multi-phase finite element pesticide transport model to simulate distribution and emission of volatile fumigant chemicals when applied through drip irrigation or shank injection. The program provides an intuitive user interface by linking databases with default soil and chemical properties to predict subsurface distribution patterns and surface volatilization losses of soil fumigants under selected field configurations and application regimes. The interface program was configured to simulate up to three chemicals simultaneously to accommodate the need of fumigation with multiple chemicals. Physical and chemical properties of cis- and trans-isomers of 1,3-dichloropropene and chloropicrin for a typical medium-textured soil were given as default values in the model input. Properties of other soil fumigants can be easily substituted as input options during program initialization. A database containing transport properties of 12 soil groups (from clay to sand) were created in DripFume as selectable sets of input values. Substitution is also allowed if properties of an individual soil are known. The VB output includes a normalized run-time volatilization flux display and selections in post-processing using MS Excel linked by VB. Output options from the post-processing VB/Excel program include data and graphs of cumulative volatilization loss, volatilization flux density, concentration profile by time for a selected location or by location for selected lapsed times after fumigant application. Although there are still limitations in selectable field configurations, the program should be useful in helping pesticide specialists, farm managers, or policy makers to optimize the depth, rate, and duration of fumigant application to achieve the highest possible distribution uniformity and the lowest volatilization loss.
Keywords: Fumigation; Drip irrigation; Shank injection; Volatile organic chemicals; Graphical user interface

Dieter Roller, Ingo Kreuz, Selecting and parameterising components using knowledge based configuration and a heuristic that learns and forgets, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 35, Issue 12, October 2003, Pages 1085-1098, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0010-4485(02)00180-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S001044850200180X)
Abstract: In this paper we suggest the use of knowledge based configuration in connection with CAD systems to enhance the ability of reusing models of CAD components and to automate solution processes especially of variational design problems. Configuration systems can support design engineers in choosing components and in checking consistency. We have investigated how configuration mechanisms can be applied to the design of engineering products and introduce our heuristic relevant knowledge first (RKF). This heuristic solves many of the problems which occur with configuration in engineering domains which continuously change, e.g. as a consequence of innovation. We conclude with the presentation of experiments performed with RKF.
Keywords: Coupling of CAD and configuration; Machine learning in design; Forgetting; Reuse of CAD models

Anni Sassi, Perttu Pöyhönen, Sini Jakonen, Sini Suomi, Tolga Capin, Jukka Häkkinen, Enhanced user performance in an image gallery application with a mobile autostereoscopic touch display, Displays, Volume 35, Issue 3, July 2014, Pages 152-158, ISSN 0141-9382, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.displa.2014.05.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0141938214000341)
Abstract: Abstract
In this study, we explored how stereoscopic depth affects performance and user experience in a mobile device with an autostereoscopic touch display. Participants conducted a visual search task with an image gallery application on three layouts with different depth ranges. The task completion times were recorded, and the participants were asked to rate their experiences. The results revealed that the image search times were facilitated by a mild depth effect and that too great a depth slowed search times and decreased user-experience ratings.
Keywords: Interaction; Mobile device; Autostereoscopic display; Touch display; Image gallery; Visual search

Danilo Avola, Matteo Spezialetti, Giuseppe Placidi, Design of an efficient framework for fast prototyping of customized human–computer interfaces and virtual environments for rehabilitation, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 110, Issue 3, June 2013, Pages 490-502, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cmpb.2013.01.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169260713000126)
Abstract: Rehabilitation is often required after stroke, surgery, or degenerative diseases. It has to be specific for each patient and can be easily calibrated if assisted by human–computer interfaces and virtual reality. Recognition and tracking of different human body landmarks represent the basic features for the design of the next generation of human–computer interfaces. The most advanced systems for capturing human gestures are focused on vision-based techniques which, on the one hand, may require compromises from real-time and spatial precision and, on the other hand, ensure natural interaction experience. The integration of vision-based interfaces with thematic virtual environments encourages the development of novel applications and services regarding rehabilitation activities. The algorithmic processes involved during gesture recognition activity, as well as the characteristics of the virtual environments, can be developed with different levels of accuracy. This paper describes the architectural aspects of a framework supporting real-time vision-based gesture recognition and virtual environments for fast prototyping of customized exercises for rehabilitation purposes. The goal is to provide the therapist with a tool for fast implementation and modification of specific rehabilitation exercises for specific patients, during functional recovery. Pilot examples of designed applications and preliminary system evaluation are reported and discussed.
Keywords: Rehabilitation; Gesture recognition; Human–computer interfaces; Time-of-Flight camera; Depth map; Virtual reality

Maulik R. Kamdar, Dimitris Zeginis, Ali Hasnain, Stefan Decker, Helena F. Deus, ReVeaLD: A user-driven domain-specific interactive search platform for biomedical research, Journal of Biomedical Informatics, Volume 47, February 2014, Pages 112-130, ISSN 1532-0464, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jbi.2013.10.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1532046413001536)
Abstract: Abstract
Bioinformatics research relies heavily on the ability to discover and correlate data from various sources. The specialization of life sciences over the past decade, coupled with an increasing number of biomedical datasets available through standardized interfaces, has created opportunities towards new methods in biomedical discovery. Despite the popularity of semantic web technologies in tackling the integrative bioinformatics challenge, there are many obstacles towards its usage by non-technical research audiences. In particular, the ability to fully exploit integrated information needs using improved interactive methods intuitive to the biomedical experts. In this report we present ReVeaLD (a Real-time Visual Explorer and Aggregator of Linked Data), a user-centered visual analytics platform devised to increase intuitive interaction with data from distributed sources. ReVeaLD facilitates query formulation using a domain-specific language (DSL) identified by biomedical experts and mapped to a self-updated catalogue of elements from external sources. ReVeaLD was implemented in a cancer research setting; queries included retrieving data from in silico experiments, protein modeling and gene expression. ReVeaLD was developed using Scalable Vector Graphics and JavaScript and a demo with explanatory video is available at http://www.srvgal78.deri.ie:8080/explorer. A set of user-defined graphic rules controls the display of information through media-rich user interfaces. Evaluation of ReVeaLD was carried out as a game: biomedical researchers were asked to assemble a set of 5 challenge questions and time and interactions with the platform were recorded. Preliminary results indicate that complex queries could be formulated under less than two minutes by unskilled researchers. The results also indicate that supporting the identification of the elements of a DSL significantly increased intuitiveness of the platform and usability of semantic web technologies by domain users.
Keywords: Domain-specific languages; Human–computer interaction; Semantic web technologies; Knowledge discovery; Visual query system; Data visualization

Sandra Martelli, Laura Nofrini, Paolo Vendruscolo, Andrea Visani, Criteria of interface evaluation for computer assisted surgery systems, International Journal of Medical Informatics, Volume 72, Issues 1–3, December 2003, Pages 35-45, ISSN 1386-5056, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijmedinf.2003.08.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1386505603001540)
Abstract: Objectives: The evaluation of computer assisted surgery (CAS) systems in terms of clinical outcomes and ergonomic features is more and more relevant. The goal of this paper is to provide criteria to define effective evaluation protocols of HCI for CAS systems. Method: The proposed criteria include the use of two questionnaires prepared by the authors, aimed at analyzing the subjective feeling of the surgeons in using the system’s tools, and objective aspects of the system. These questionnaire have to be submitted to system’s end-users and to experts in HCI development iteratively during the system development or once at the end. A quantitative evaluation of the main parameters related to the surgical application is also required as an index of system efficacy. The demonstration application was planning software developed for the total knee replacement (TKR). Results and Conclusions: In our TKR planning software the proposed evaluation procedure provided useful indications about the efficacy of HCI and also about further developments of its design and functionality. Moreover, since surgical training systems and surgical navigation platforms also share data treatment and layout similar to the presented TKR planner, these kinds of applications can benefit directly from the proposed approach to HCI design and evaluation.
Keywords: Computer assisted surgery systems; User interface evaluation; Surgical training systems; Human computer interfaces (HCI); Surgical planning

Andreas Schoob, Dennis Kundrat, Stefan Lekon, Lüder A. Kahrs, Tobias Ortmaier, Color-encoded distance for interactive focus positioning in laser microsurgery, Optics and Lasers in Engineering, Volume 83, August 2016, Pages 71-79, ISSN 0143-8166, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.optlaseng.2016.03.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0143816616000671)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents a real-time method for interactive focus positioning in laser microsurgery. Registration of stereo vision and a surgical laser is performed in order to combine surgical scene and laser workspace information. In particular, stereo image data is processed to three-dimensionally reconstruct observed tissue surface as well as to compute and to highlight its intersection with the laser focal range. Regarding the surgical live view, three augmented reality concepts are presented providing visual feedback during manual focus positioning. A user study is performed and results are discussed with respect to accuracy and task completion time. Especially when using color-encoded distance superimposed to the live view, target positioning with sub-millimeter accuracy can be achieved in a few seconds. Finally, transfer to an intraoperative scenario with endoscopic human in vivo and cadaver images is discussed demonstrating the applicability of the image overlay in laser microsurgery.
Keywords: Surgical user interface; Augmented reality; Laser-to-camera registration; Stereo vision

Mohammed E. Fathy, Vishal M. Patel, Tom Yeh, Yangmuzi Zhang, Rama Chellappa, Larry S. Davis, Screen-based active user authentication, Pattern Recognition Letters, Volume 42, 1 June 2014, Pages 122-127, ISSN 0167-8655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.patrec.2014.02.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167865514000488)
Abstract: Abstract
We investigate if screen-based recordings of computer interactions can be used for accurate active user authentication. A dataset of screen recordings of some PC interactions (MouseMoving, Typing, Scrolling, Other) of 21 users was collected and we ran a set of experiments to help our investigation. Low-dimensional feature vectors based on histogram of optical flows from each screen recording were used in our study. The first set of experiments investigated if these low-dimensional features can be used to recognize the type of interaction taking place in a particular recording and we found that linear SVM could succeed in achieving this with an accuracy of 91% on 5 test users. The second set of experiments explored if classifiers trained on different types of recordings can be used to verify user identity. The results indicated that SVMs trained on Scrolling recordings can achieve moderately low FAR and FRR error rates of 20.7% and 12.4%, respectively. These preliminary results indicate that further research in using screen-based recordings for active authentication can lead to a reliable soft cyber biometric.
Keywords: Cyber biometrics; Interaction classification; Active authentication

Satoshi Ono, Hiroshi Maeda, Kiyomasa Sakimoto, Shigeru Nakayama, User-system cooperative evolutionary computation for both quantitative and qualitative objective optimization in image processing filter design, Applied Soft Computing, Volume 15, February 2014, Pages 203-218, ISSN 1568-4946, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.asoc.2013.10.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1568494613003530)
Abstract: Abstract
This study proposes a cooperative evolutionary optimization method between a user and system (CEUS) for problems involving quantitative and qualitative optimization criteria. In a general interactive evolutionary computation (IEC) model, both the system and user have their own role in the evolution, such as individual reproduction or evaluation. In contrast, the proposed CEUS allows the user to dynamically change the allocation of search roles between the system and user, resulting in simultaneous optimization of qualitative and quantitative objective functions without increasing user fatigue. This is achieved by a combination of user evaluation prediction and the integration of interactive and non-interactive EC. For instance, the system performs a global search at the beginning, the user then intensifies the search area, and finally the system conducts a local search in the intensified search area. This study applies CEUS to an image processing filter design problem that involves both quantitative (filter output accuracy) and qualitative (filter behavior) criteria. Experiments have shown that the proposed CEUS can design image filters in accordance with user preferences, and CEUS interacting with a non-naive user enhanced the initial global search so that it converged and found a reasonable solution more than four times faster than a non-interactive search.
Keywords: Interactive evolutionary computation; Genetic network programming; Genetic algorithm; Image filter design

Raymond W. Crow Jr., Robert F. Starbird, Easier said than done: Practical considerations in user interface design, Government Information Quarterly, Volume 9, Issue 2, 1992, Pages 169-185, ISSN 0740-624X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0740-624X(92)90050-V.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0740624X9290050V)
Abstract: User interfaces for CD-ROM products in the academic library environment must accommodate a variety of user and task profiles. Here, one publisher discusses the practical considerations that govern the implementation of interface design principles for such electronic databases.

Andrea Bottino, Andrea Martina, Francesco Strada, Amirhosein Toosi, GAINE – A portable framework for the development of edutainment applications based on multitouch and tangible interaction, Entertainment Computing, Volume 16, July 2016, Pages 53-65, ISSN 1875-9521, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.entcom.2016.04.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S187595211630012X)
Abstract: Abstract
In the last few years, Multitouch and Tangible User Interfaces have emerged as a powerful tool to integrate interactive surfaces and responsive spaces that embody digital information. Besides providing a natural interaction with digital contents, they allow the interaction of multiple users at the same time, thus promoting collaborative activities and information sharing. In particular, these characteristics have opened new exploration possibilities in the edutainment context, as witnessed by the many applications successfully developed in different areas, from children’s collaborative learning to interactive storytelling, cultural heritage and medical therapy support. However, due to the availability of different multitouch and tangible interaction technologies and of different target computing platforms, the development and deployment of such applications can be challenging. To this end, in this paper we present GAINE (tanGible Augmented INteraction for Edutainment), a software framework that enables rapid prototyping and development of tangible augmented applications for edutainment purposes. GAINE has two main features. First, it offers developers high-level context specific constructs that significantly reduces the implementation burden. Second, the framework is portable on different operating systems and offers independence from the underlying hardware and tracking technology. In this paper, we also discuss several case studies to show the effectiveness of GAINE in simplifying the development of entertainment and edutainment applications based on multitouch and tangible interaction.
Keywords: Multitouch Interfaces; Tangible User Interfaces; Edutainment; Entertainment; Portable framework

H. Wright, C. Mathers, J.P.R.B. Walton, Using visualization for visualization: An ecological interface design approach to inputting data, Computers & Graphics, Volume 37, Issue 3, May 2013, Pages 202-213, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2013.01.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849313000150)
Abstract: Visualization is experiencing growing use by a diverse community, with continuing improvements in the availability and usability of systems. In spite of these developments the problem of how first to get the data in has received scant attention: the established approach of pre-defined readers and programming aids has changed little in the last two decades. This paper proposes a novel way of inputting data for scientific visualization that employs rapid interaction and visual feedback in order to understand how the data is stored. The approach draws on ideas from the discipline of ecological interface design to extract and control important parameters describing the data, at the same time harnessing our innate human ability to recognize patterns. Crucially, the emphasis is on file format discovery rather than file format description, so the method can therefore still work when nothing is known initially of how the file was originally written, as is often the case with legacy binary data.
Keywords: File organization; Information search; Ecological interface design; Pattern recognition; Scientific visualization

A.W.W. Yew, S.K. Ong, A.Y.C. Nee, Towards a griddable distributed manufacturing system with augmented reality interfaces, Robotics and Computer-Integrated Manufacturing, Volume 39, June 2016, Pages 43-55, ISSN 0736-5845, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.rcim.2015.12.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736584515301605)
Abstract: Abstract
Rapidly changing demand and mass customization require highly flexible and adaptive manufacturing systems. Manufacturing operations have evolved in order to keep up by organizing themselves into smaller units of specialized production processes that are combined in different ways to create different products. Human workers are integral in the manufacturing systems and they too must be flexible and adaptive. This paper describes an augmented reality manufacturing system that aims to greatly improve the information perception of the different types of workers in a manufacturing facility and to make interaction with manufacturing software natural and efficient. In this approach, traditionally paper-based and computer-based tasks are augmented to the workers’ interactions in the environment. The system is distributed and modular as the different functions of CAD/CAM software are provided by individual physical or virtual objects in the environment or by a combination of them working cooperatively. This modularity allows the individual resources and facilities to be linked via internet onto a manufacturing grid with universally-accessible augmented reality interfaces to their services.
Keywords: Augmented reality; Manufacturing grid; Manufacturing system; Smart objects; Ubiquitous computing

Michael L. Van De Vanter, Susan L. Graham, Robert A. Ballance, Coherent user interfaces for language-based editing systems, International Journal of Man-Machine Studies, Volume 37, Issue 4, October 1992, Pages 431-466, ISSN 0020-7373, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0020-7373(92)90004-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0020737392900045)
Abstract: Many kinds of complex documents, including programs, are based on underlying formal languages. Language-based editing systems exploit knowledge of these languages to provide services beyond the scope of traditional text editors. To be effective, these services must use the power of language-based information to broaden the options available to the user, but without revealing complex linguistic and implementation models. Users understand complex documents in terms of many overlapping structures, only some of which are related to linguistic structure. Communications with the user concerning document structures must be based on models of document structure that are natural, convenient and coherent to the user. Pan is a language-based editing and browsing system designed to support development and maintenance of complex software documents. Pan's implementation combines several approaches: unrestricted text editing, language-based browsing and editing, description-driven language definition for incremental analysis and support for multiple languages per session. Pan uses a variety of mechanisms to help users understand and manipulate complex documents effectively, in terms of underlying language when necessary, but always in the framework of a coherent, user-oriented interface. This paper describes that interface, the mechanisms needed to support it, and the complex relationships between interface design and implementation techniques demanded by the goals of the system.

Jean-Louis Allombert and Giuseppe Attilio Mauri, A tool for the automatic generation of user interface modules in CIM applications developed in the ESPRIT project CIDAM, In Human Aspects in Computer Integrated Manufacturing, edited by G.J. OLLING and F. KIMURA, Elsevier, Amsterdam, 1992, Pages 535-541, ISBN 9780444894656, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-89465-6.50049-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444894656500491)
Abstract: Keywords Codes: D.1.2, D.2.2, H.5.2

Keywords:, Automatic Programming, Tools and Techniques, User Interfaces

Qiang Xu, Zixing Lu, An elastic–plastic cohesive zone model for metal–ceramic interfaces at finite deformations, International Journal of Plasticity, Volume 41, February 2013, Pages 147-164, ISSN 0749-6419, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijplas.2012.09.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0749641912001386)
Abstract: This study concerns an elastic–plastic cohesive zone model for metal–ceramic interfaces and the corresponding nonlinear finite element implementation for general boundary value problems that accounts for nonlinear traction separation constitutive relation including fine scale mechanisms of the bonded interfaces failure. The interfacial model, formulated in terms of geometrically nonlinear theory of plasticity, allows for localization of plastic deformation, ensuing damage and failure/fracture behavior of the interface at finite deformations. From the numerical simulations, fiber is modeled as a linearly elastic material while the constitutive relation of matrix material is modeled using large deformation of isotropic porous plastic material which includes the voids nucleate, grow and coalesce. Further, an extensive parametric study is conducted in which the effects of hardening/softening, cohesive yield stress and the damage displacement jumps in determining stress-strain response of the composite and fiber/matrix debonding process under quasi-static transverse loading. Moreover, the effects of initial yield stress and void volume fraction in the porous matrix are also considered. Results show there are significant effects of interface yield and failure/fracture as well as matrix porous plasticity on the overall deformational and failure response of composites.
Keywords: Interface yielding; Damage; Metal matrix composites; Numerical modeling

Chris P. Jobling, USER INTERFACE ISSUES AND THE ROLE OF ARTIFICIAL INTELLIGENCE in COMPUTER-AIDED CONTROL ENGINEERING, In Application of Artificial Intelligence in Process Control, Pergamon, Oxford, 1992, Pages 303-338, ISBN 9780080420165, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-08-042016-5.50022-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978008042016550022X)
Abstract: KEYWORDS

Computer-aided control systems design; computer-aided control engineering; human computer interfaces; artificial intelligence; expert systems.

A.Q. Dozier, O. David, M. Arabi, W. Lloyd, Y. Zhang, A minimally invasive model data passing interface for integrating legacy environmental system models, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 80, June 2016, Pages 265-280, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2016.02.031.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815216300512)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents the Model Data Passing Interface (MODPI). The approach provides fine-grained, multidirectional feedbacks between legacy environmental system models through read and write access to relevant model data during simulation using a bidirectional, event-based, publish-subscribe system with a message broker. MODPI only requires commented directives in the original code and an XML linkage file with an optional custom data conversion module. Automated code generation, compilation, and execution reduce the programming burden on the modeler. Case study results indicated that MODPI required less code modifications within each model code base both before and after automated code generation, outperforming a baseline subroutine approach. Performance overhead for MODPI was minimal for the use case, offering speedup in some cases through parallel execution. MODPI is much less invasive than other techniques, potentially encouraging adoption by the modeling community in addition to maintainability and reusability of integrated model code.
Keywords: Framework invasiveness; Integrated assessment and modeling; Integrated environmental modeling; Inter-process communication

Diana Herrera, Jean-Loup Florens, Alina Voda, Identification approach for the analysis of human- haptic interface coupling, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 46, Issue 11, 2013, Pages 187-192, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20130703-3-FR-4038.00106.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016329433)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper, the least squares method (LSM) is proposed as an identification approach for the analysis of human-haptic interface coupling. We present an oscillator used to describe a periodical movement generated by the user while manipulating the haptic device. This model is based on the assumption of a temporary hybrid system (THS) that considers the system formed by the human handling the haptic device as a coupled dynamical system. Then, the identification approach is used to estimate the parameters of the coupled system from position data acquired during real time simulation.
Keywords: Least-squares method; man-machine interfaces; real time system; simulation

Holger Gast, Engineering the Prover Interface, Electronic Notes in Theoretical Computer Science, Volume 285, 19 September 2012, Pages 3-16, ISSN 1571-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.entcs.2012.06.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1571066112000229)
Abstract: Practical prover interfaces are sizeable pieces of software, whose construction and maintenance requires an extensive amount of effort and resources. This paper addresses the engineering aspects of such developments. Using non-functional properties as quality attributes for software, we discuss which properties are particularly relevant to prover interfaces and demonstrate, by the example of the I3P interface for Isabelle, how judicious architectural and design decisions lead to an interface software possessing these properties. By a comparison with other proposed interfaces, we argue that our considerations can be applied beyond the example project.
Keywords: prover interfaces; software engineering; software quality

Jeffrey J. Birac, William B. Sherman, Jens Kopatsch, Pamela E. Constantinou, Nadrian C. Seeman, Architecture with GIDEON, a program for design in structural DNA nanotechnology, Journal of Molecular Graphics and Modelling, Volume 25, Issue 4, December 2006, Pages 470-480, ISSN 1093-3263, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jmgm.2006.03.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1093326306000659)
Abstract: We present geometry based design strategies for DNA nanostructures. The strategies have been implemented with GIDEON—a graphical integrated development environment for oligonucleotides. GIDEON has a highly flexible graphical user interface that facilitates the development of simple yet precise models, and the evaluation of strains therein. Models are built on a simple model of undistorted B-DNA double-helical domains. Simple point and click manipulations of the model allow the minimization of strain in the phosphate-backbone linkages between these domains and the identification of any steric clashes that might occur as a result. Detailed analysis of 3D triangles yields clear predictions of the strains associated with triangles of different sizes. We have carried out experiments that confirm that 3D triangles form well only when their geometrical strain is less than 4% deviation from the estimated relaxed structure. Thus geometry-based techniques alone, without detailed energetic considerations, can be used to explain certain general trends in DNA structure formation. We have used GIDEON to build detailed models of double crossover and triple crossover molecules, evaluating the non-planarity associated with base tilt and junction misalignments. Computer modeling using a graphical user interface overcomes the limited precision of physical models for larger systems, and the limited interaction rate associated with earlier, command-line driven software.
Keywords: GIDEON; Geometrical molecular modeling; Graphical user interface; DNA; DNA models; DNA tensegrity triangle; DNA double crossover; DNA triple crossover

Luca Chiaraviglio, Antonio Cianfrani, Esther Le Rouzic, Marco Polverini, Sleep modes effectiveness in backbone networks with limited configurations, Computer Networks, Volume 57, Issue 15, 29 October 2013, Pages 2931-2948, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comnet.2013.06.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128613002028)
Abstract: Abstract
In this work we propose a strategy to minimize the impact of energy saving techniques on the performance of an Internet Service Provider network. We study the problem of putting in sleep mode links of a backbone network, while limiting the number of times each device changes its power state (full power mode or sleep mode). Our aim is to limit the number of network configurations, i.e., the change of the current set of network links at full power. We tackle the problem both analytically and by simulations. We first present a model, based on random graph theory, to compute the links energy saving given a traffic variation, QoS requirements, and the number of allowed network configurations. The same analysis is then repeated over two realistic case studies, and with realistic algorithms to choose the set of links in sleep mode. Results show (both analytically and by simulation) that the energy savings with few configurations (two or three per day) are close to the maximum one, in which a new configuration is applied for each traffic matrix. Moreover, we show that few configurations per day limit the number of overhead messages required for exchanging information about the device state. Thus, we can conclude that a practical implementation of sleep mode strategies for network operators is to define, on the basis of typical traffic trend, few configurations to be activated in specific time instants.
Keywords: Link sleep mode; Network management; QoS and energy savings

Diganta Bhusan Das, Mark Lewis, Dynamics of fluid circulation in coupled free and heterogeneous porous domains, Chemical Engineering Science, Volume 62, Issue 13, July 2007, Pages 3549-3573, ISSN 0009-2509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ces.2007.02.053.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S000925090700276X)
Abstract: Fluid flow in coupled free and porous domain, particularly when the porous medium is heterogeneous, is encountered in many hydro-environmental conditions, e.g., leakage from underground pipe, combined groundwater lake–subsurface interactions. One of the most difficult problems in the study of coupled flow behaviour has been the development of a universally applicable modelling scheme for combining the flow regimes. This is because the free/porous interfacial properties (e.g., shear-stress; velocity slip) that govern the coupled flow behaviour are difficult to determine experimentally under hydro-environmental conditions. On the other hand, the implications of various forms of heterogeneity in the porous media properties can be very different on the fluid-flow behaviour. Difficulties may also arise in direct coupling of the model equations that govern the fluid flow in the individual regions (e.g., Navier–Stokes for free-flow region and the Darcy's equation for the porous flow region). Consequently, models of coupled free and porous flow for hydro-environmental conditions are not very well developed at the moment. While there are some indications that fluids in coupled free and porous domains may circulate (i.e., development of flow cells), there is a lack of appropriate 3D analysis on how heterogeneities in porous media may affect such flow patterns. In this paper, we aim to analyse how porous media heterogeneity affects the dynamics of flow circulation in the porous side of a coupled free and porous domain. For this purpose, we analyse flow patterns in several model domains made up of two porous layers with differing permeabilities. The governing model equations are discretised and solved using the standard finite volume method on a staggered cell-centred mesh. The temporal discretisation is done using the explicit method. An in-house graphical user interface (GUI) has been created specifically to aid in the visualisation of otherwise complex flow patterns. The GUI contains many post-processing options and provides a comprehensive tool for the analysis of hydrodynamics and contaminant motion (not discussed in this paper) in coupled free and porous flow domains. This GUI is described in this paper briefly. The effects of altering the aspect ratio (i.e., multi-scale) of the domain on the coupled flow pattern have also been discussed.
Keywords: Coupled free and porous domain; Flow circulation; Porous media heterogeneity; Flow visualisation; Navier–Stokes equation; Darcy's equation; Finite volume formulation; MATLAB; Graphical user interface

Claire LaVelle, Almudena Konrad, FriendlyRoboCopy: A GUI to RoboCopy for computer forensic investigators, Digital Investigation, Volume 4, Issue 1, March 2007, Pages 16-23, ISSN 1742-2876, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.diin.2007.01.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1742287607000023)
Abstract: One of the most pressing challenges in digital investigations today is the extraction and forensic preservation of a subset of data on computer clusters and other large storage systems. As the number and capacity of computer systems increases, it is no longer feasible to create forensic duplicates of every system in their entirety. Although forensic tools are being developed to cope with such situations, they do not support all file systems. Experienced digital investigators use tools such as RoboCopy to preserve a subset of data on target systems, and take steps to document their process and results. This paper explores the need for these tools in digital investigations, and demonstrates the strengths and weaknesses of using RoboCopy to acquire data on a network share. This paper then introduces FriendlyRoboCopy, which provides an effective, user-friendly interface to RoboCopy that addresses the requirements of forensic preservation.
Keywords: Digital forensics; Network forensics; Drive mapping; RoboCopy application; Microsoft OS forensics; Network system administration; NAS; Computer cluster; Graphical User Interface; Perl; Open Source application

R.A. King and J.O. Gray, A METHODOLOGY FOR THE DESIGN AND IMPLEMENTATION OF GRAPHICAL MAN-MACHINE INTERFACES, In Knowledge Engineering and Computer Modelling in CAD, edited by Alison Smith,, Butterworth-Heinemann, 1986, Pages 419-430, ISBN 9780408008242, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-408-00824-2.50047-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780408008242500470)
Abstract: A real-time graphics operating system is outlined which can facilitate both the design and Implementation of large computer aided control system design packages. A total graphics environment is proposed, which could result in the evolution of standard and efficient procedures for the development of such packages and which also could result in the creation of an anthropomorphic user Interface to optimise human interpretive skills for the ready use of the resulting computer based design tools.

M. Patriarca, A. Kuronen, M. Robles, K. Kaski, Three-dimensional interactive Molecular Dynamics program for the study of defect dynamics in crystals, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 176, Issue 1, 1 January 2007, Pages 38-47, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2006.07.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465506003158)
Abstract: The study of crystal defects and the complex processes underlying their formation and time evolution has motivated the development of the program ALINE for interactive molecular dynamics experiments. This program couples a molecular dynamics code to a Graphical User Interface and runs on a UNIX-X11 Window System platform with the MOTIF library, which is contained in many standard Linux releases. ALINE is written in C, thus giving the user the possibility to modify the source code, and, at the same time, provides an effective and user-friendly framework for numerical experiments, in which the main parameters can be interactively varied and the system visualized in various ways. We illustrate the main features of the program through some examples of detection and dynamical tracking of point-defects, linear defects, and planar defects, such as stacking faults in lattice-mismatched heterostructures.
Program summary
Title of program:ALINE

Catalogue identifier:ADYJ_v1_0

Program summary URL: http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/ADYJ_v1_0

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen University of Belfast, N. Ireland

Computer for which the program is designed and others on which it has been tested: Computers:DEC ALPHA 300, Intel i386 compatible computers, G4 Apple Computers

Installations:Laboratory of Computational Engineering, Helsinki University of Technology, Helsinki, Finland

Operating systems under which the program has been tested:True64 UNIX, Linux-i386, Mac OS X 10.3 and 10.4

Programming language used:Standard C and MOTIF libraries

Memory required to execute with typical data:6 Mbytes but may be larger depending on the system size

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.:16 901

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.:449 559

Distribution format:tar.gz

Nature of physical problem:Some phenomena involving defects take place inside three-dimensional crystals at times which can be hardly predicted. For this reason they are difficult to detect and track even within numerical experiments, especially when one is interested in studying their dynamical properties and time evolution. Furthermore, traditional simulation methods require the storage of a huge amount of data which in turn may imply a long work for their analysis.

Method of solution:Simplifications of the simulation work described above strongly depend also on the computer performance. It has now become possible to realize some of such simplifications thanks to the real possibility of using interactive programs. The solution proposed here is based on the development of an interactive graphical simulation program both for avoiding large storage of data and the subsequent elaboration and analysis as well as for visualizing and tracking many phenomena inside three-dimensional samples. However, the full computational power of traditional simulation programs may not be available in general in programs with graphical user interfaces, due to their interactive nature. Nevertheless interactive programs can still be very useful for detecting processes difficult to visualize, restricting the range or making a fine tuning of the parameters, and tailoring the faster programs toward precise targets.

Restrictions on the complexity of the problem:The restrictions on the applicability of the program are related to the computer resources available. The graphical interface and interactivity demand computational resources that depend on the particular numerical simulation to be performed. To preserve a balance between speed and resources, the choice of the number of atoms to be simulated is critical. With an average current computer, simulations of systems with more than 105 atoms may not be easily feasible on an interactive scheme. Another restriction is related to the fact that the program was originally designed to simulate systems in the solid phase, so that problems in the simulation may occur if some particular physical quantities are computed beyond the melting point.

Typical running time:It depends on the machine architecture, system size, and user needs.

Unusual features of the program:In the program, besides the window in which the system is represented in real space, an additional graphical window presenting the real time distribution histogram for different physical variables (such as kinetic or potential energy) is included. Such tool is very interesting for making demonstrative numerical experiments for teaching purposes as well as for research, e.g., for detecting and tracking crystal defects. The program includes: an initial condition builder, an interactive display of the simulation, a set of tools which allow the user to filter through different physical quantities the information—either displayed in real time or printed in the output files—and to perform an efficient search of the interesting regions of parameter space.
Keywords: Graphical user interface; Molecular dynamics; Crystal defects; Molecular dynamics; Lennard-Jones; Sutton–Chen; EAM; Dislocations; Cracks; Interfaces; Visualization

Alistair Sutcliffe and Sarah Thew, Chapter 13 - The Design Implications of Users’ Values for Software and System Architecture, In Economics-Driven Software Architecture, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 297-321, ISBN 9780124104648, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-410464-8.00013-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124104648000131)
Abstract: This chapter argues the case for investigating users’ values as important influences on the design of software architecture. First, definitions of values in the psychological and sociological literature are reviewed, followed by a proposed taxonomy of values that are relevant to software engineering domains, such as trust, cooperativeness, privacy, and creativity. Stakeholder values are related to nonfunctional requirements or system quality attributes. The architectural implications for user values are described by linking values to design for autonomy, monitoring/awareness, and other architectural components. Implications are explained in terms of software and system (i.e., sociotechnical) architecture that relate software components to operations in system design with human factors and organizational concerns. Application of the value-based requirements engineering and architecture design method is illustrated in a case study of a medical research support system. Methods for eliciting user values in the requirements analysis process are explained, and the implications for the future of value-based software architectures are discussed.
Keywords: Conceptual System Architecture; Design Reuse; Health Informatics; Design Rationale; Nonfunctional Requirements

AM Christie, A graphical process definition language and its application to a maintenance project, Information and Software Technology, Volume 35, Issues 6–7, June–July 1993, Pages 364-374, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(93)90007-P.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095058499390007P)
Abstract: The purpose of the paper is to describe a graphical process modelling language (ProNet) which contains a synthesis of object-oriented, behavioural and data flow ideas. While the main focus of the current efforts has been to develop the graphical elements of the language, the language's notation also has the potential for enactability as the semantics allow a direct mapping between the graphical constructs and a set of production rules. The latter part of the paper is devoted to describing ProNet's use in a complex real-world example involving a software maintenance project.
Keywords: graphical process modelling; software maintenance

Alexander Bubeck, Benjamin Maidel, Felipe Garcia Lopez, Model Driven Engineering for the Implementation of User Roles in Industrial Service Robot Applications, Procedia Technology, Volume 15, 2014, Pages 605-612, ISSN 2212-0173, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.protcy.2014.09.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2212017314001364)
Abstract: Abstract
The implementation and installation of today's service robot applications into industrial processes is a challenging and time taking task that is usually executed by domain experts. The aim of the PRACE EU-project is to bring a mobile dual arm service robot into small part assembly tasks, which should be used by regular workers. To fulfill this goal a model driven engineering (MDE) tool chain was developed that separates three different user roles in the development process of an industrial service robot application. For each of these roles, the spectrum of required knowledge is reduced, especially for the role of the end user. Based on the implementation of this separation, an evaluation during the development of the PRACE demonstration use case was done.
Keywords: Service robotics; tool chain; model driven engineering

John Howell, Geraint Bevan, Tom Burr, Inspector interfaces to facilitate subjective reasoning about quantities in trends, Computers & Chemical Engineering, Volume 48, 10 January 2013, Pages 29-39, ISSN 0098-1354, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compchemeng.2012.07.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098135412002396)
Abstract: Nuclear safeguards inspectors view historical trends on a regular basis to reassure themselves that a plant is operating as declared. Other types of inspector are likely to perform similar activities. Nuclear safeguards are founded on materials accountancy, and hence nuclear safeguards inspectors often want to relate what they see to laws of mass conservation. The interfaces discussed in this paper facilitate a synergy between qualitative reasoning regarding trends with quantitative reasoning about simple models that are driven by forcing functions, which describe materials flows through a plant. The focus in the paper is on the assessment of data trends that pertain to a standard 3-tank arrangement in a nuclear fuel reprocessing plant, and on how inspectors might wish to interact with evaluations performed.
Keywords: Nuclear safeguards; Inspector interfaces; Monitoring; Trend analysis; Data analysis; Diagnosis

Glenn Chubak, Igor Morozov, Integrated software framework for processing of geophysical data, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 32, Issue 6, July 2006, Pages 767-775, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cageo.2005.10.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S009830040500230X)
Abstract: We present an integrated software framework for geophysical data processing, based on an updated seismic data processing program package originally developed at the Program for Crustal Studies at the University of Wyoming. Unlike other systems, this processing monitor supports structured multi-component seismic data streams, multi-dimensional data traces, and employs a unique backpropagation execution logic. This results in an unusual flexibility of processing, allowing the system to handle nearly any geophysical data. A modern and feature-rich graphical user interface (GUI) was developed for the system, allowing editing and submission of processing flows and interaction with running jobs. Multiple jobs can be executed in a distributed multi-processor networks and controlled from the same GUI. Jobs, in their turn, can also be parallelized to take advantage of parallel processing environments, such as local area networks and Beowulf clusters.
Keywords: Seismic; Gravity; Processing; Multi-component; Graphical user interface; Parallel computations; Cluster; Beowulf

Nasser Modiri, Kin-Yuen Hoh, Graphical object verifier and managed object class precompiler, Computer Communications, Volume 15, Issue 9, November 1992, Pages 593-602, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0140-3664(92)90058-M.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/014036649290058M)
Abstract: During the last two years the International Standards Organization (ISO) IEC JTC1/SC21/WG4 and other ISO Working Groups have defined many Open System Interconnection (OSI) system management standards. These standards have recently reached a stable stage, in the form of the Network Management (NM) Forum working standards, thus providing computer network developers with confidence to implement the OSI network management services. These organizations intend to provide interoperable OSI network management interfaces to network management communities. Today, the developers of network management systems need to widen the management scope of NMSs (i.e. to make proprietary objects visible through their standardization by converting objects into Managed Object Classes). The graphical compiler design outlined here - Graphical Object Verifier and Managed Object Class Precompiler (Ovmop) - reduces much of the expert knowledge required on the part of the implementors of MOCs. It provides a high-level approach to organizing containment graphs by means of prototyping the MOCs hierarchy of a NMS; for example, the NM Forum MOCs.
Keywords: ASN1; containment graph; graphical object verifier; managed object class precompiler; managed object class; managed object instance

Alejandro Catala, Patricia Pons, Javier Jaen, Jose A. Mocholi, Elena Navarro, A meta-model for dataflow-based rules in smart environments: Evaluating user comprehension and performance, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 78, Issue 10, 1 October 2013, Pages 1930-1950, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2012.06.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642312001232)
Abstract: A considerable part of the behavior in smart environments relies on event-driven and rule specification. Rules are the mechanism most often used to enable user customization of the environment. However, the expressiveness of the rules available to users in editing and other tools is usually either limited or the available rule editing interfaces are not designed for end-users with low skills in programming. This means we have to look for interaction techniques and new ways to define user customization rules. This paper describes a generic and flexible meta-model to support expressive rules enhanced with data flow expressions that will graphically support the definition of rules without writing code. An empirical study was conducted on the ease of understanding of the visual data flow expressions, which are the key elements in our rule proposal. The visual dataflow language was compared to its corresponding textual version in terms of comprehension and ease of learning by teenagers in exercises involving calculations, modifications, writing and detecting equivalences in expressions in both languages. Although the subjects had some previous experience in editing mathematical expressions on spreadsheets, the study found their performance with visual dataflows to be significantly better in calculation and modification exercises. This makes our dataflow approach a promising mechanism for expressing user-customized reactive behavior in Ambient Intelligence (AmI) environments. The performance of the rule matching processor was validated by means of two stress tests to ensure that the meta-model approach adopted would be able to scale up with the number of types and instances in the space.
Keywords: Ambient intelligence; Customization; Dataflow; Visual language; Rule; Event based; Non-expert programmer; Smart home

Nikil D. Dutt, Joong Hwee Cho and Tedd Hadley, A User Interface for VHDL Behavioral Modeling, In Computer Hardware Description Languages and their Applications, edited by DOMINIQUE BORRIONE and RONALD WAXMAN, North-Holland, Amsterdam, 1991, Pages 407-425, ISBN 9780444892089, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-89208-9.50029-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444892089500296)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper describes a user-interface for capturing system-level behavior using a graphical/tabular input and an algorithm for automatically translating the input to behavioral VHDL. The interface uses an internal representation that has good semantics for modeling and synthesis and therefore complements VHDL – a language that has good semantics for simulation but lacks the same for synthesis. Furthermore, VHDL is rich in features, making it a complex language which can be verbose and hard to learn. The user interface described in this paper enhances user-interaction and productivity in designing with VHDL, since designers avoid the intricate and time-consuming task of using VHDL directly. The interface and translator are implemented on Suns under C/UNIX and the X Window System, and have been tested and simulated on several examples of varying complexity using commercial VHDL simulators. The experimental results presented in this paper reinforce our belief that the user-interface is a good input path for designing with VHDL. The translation algorithm also introduces an elegant method for describing behavioral hierarchy in VHDL

Bachkhaznadji Abdeldjebbar, Belhamri Azeddine, Generating Interface Prototype for EnergyPlus IDD File Using Unified Modeling Language and Coloured Petri-nets, Energy Procedia, Volume 18, 2012, Pages 1458-1484, ISSN 1876-6102, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.egypro.2012.05.164.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1876610212009344)
Abstract: Abstract
Based on user requirement techniques, this paper suggests a new approach to the generation of a building performance simulation tool interface prototype. This approach requires the Unified Modelling Language (UML) and scenario specifications for analysing user interactions with the computer program core. At the level of user interface specifications, designer can draw interfaces but it is difficult to specify their dynamic behaviour. Coloured Petri-nets are used in specification and check on the behaviour of these interfaces before their implementation. The EnergyPlus input data definition (IDD) file is provided as an example to illustrate the process of generating an executable interface prototype which can be used for scenario validation, and can be evolved towards the target interface tool. The result of the overall approach is a specification consisting of a global coloured Petri-net which can be analysed by means of a simulation together with the generated and refined IDD interface prototype
Keywords: Building; Energy simulation; Data input; Interface prototype

Robbie T. Nakatsu, Designing business logistics networks using model-based reasoning and heuristic-based searching, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 29, Issue 4, November 2005, Pages 735-745, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2005.06.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417405001004)
Abstract: This article describes an intelligent system called LogNet that provides advice on how to design business logistics networks. It implements its capabilities by utilizing model-based reasoning techniques. In addition, it utilizes heuristic-based searching to guide an end-user toward more effective network designs.

The network design problem studied in this article addresses the warehouse facility location problem: how many warehouses are needed in a network and to which customer markets should they be assigned? LogNet enables end-users to incrementally create and test a logistics network design by using a graphical user interface. LogNet employs model-based reasoning procedures that analyze the structure of the current network design in order to offer recommendations on how to consolidate or decentralize a network. The overall goal of LogNet is to provide a flexible user interface that is capable of supporting this design task.
Keywords: Model-based reasoning; Heuristics; Business logistics networks; Graphical user interface; Intelligent systems

Riccardo Falconi, Claudio Melchiorri, Luigi Biagiotti, Alessandro Macchelli, ROBOTICAD: A MATLAB© TOOLBOX FOR ROBOT MANIPULATORS, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 39, Issue 15, 2006, Pages 431-436, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20060906-3-IT-2910.00073.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016385524)
Abstract: Abstract
RobotiCad is a user—friendly Matlab©/Simulink graphical interface for the modeling and simulation of serial manipulators. Starting from Denavit-Hartenberg parameters, it is possible to create the kinematic and dynamic models of any serial mechanical structure, together with its 3D graphical model. When a robot is created, it can be exported in a dedicated file which can be loaded in a Simulink scheme that can be easily interfaced with other block-sets. A robot, then, can be simulated and, eventually, an AVI file of the simulation can be created. Moreover, a rich collection of Matlab functions properly developed in order to study industrial robots is included in RobotiCad, e.g. functions for trajectory generation, manipulability analysis, control, and so on.
Keywords: Robot Simulation; Graphical User Interface; CAD; Matlab©

Juan C. Castellanos, Fabiano Fruett, Embedded system to evaluate the passenger comfort in public transportation based on dynamical vehicle behavior with user’s feedback, Measurement, Volume 47, January 2014, Pages 442-451, ISSN 0263-2241, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.measurement.2013.08.068.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0263224113004600)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper shows the development of a system (Hardware, Firmware and Software) focused to assess the dynamic motion factors that affect the comfort in public transportation systems. The data is collected, on-board processed and transported using the public transportation system vehicles as mobile smart sensors. Therefore, the acceleration measurement using a tri-axial accelerometer, the position detection using Global Positioning System (GPS) and the appropriate algorithms allow the system to detect rude driver styles and defects on the pavement. The firmware is composed by two algorithms. The first one is based on the detection of acceleration and Jerk magnitudes out of the comfort range, which is called Jerk-Acceleration Threshold Detection (JATD). An algorithm to compute the Jerk with comparable results to prior researches is proposed in this paper. The second algorithm, called Comfort Index with Acceleration Threshold Detection (CI-ATD), is based on the detection of acceleration values out of comfort range and the average ride comfort. The average ride comfort is supported by the recommendation of the international standard ISO2631-1. The comfort range or threshold values can be set using the user’s perception. A software developed in LabVIEW™ interface, visualizes discomfort event in online maps for geographic location of each event. Also, the software implements road unevenness detection, which is based on the collected data analysis. The system was successful tested in a conventional bus line on its daily ride, the results reveals that most of the events are due to vertical acceleration disturbances. Also, a preliminary test indicates higher sensibility for vertical than longitudinal or transversal accelerations.
Keywords: Global Positioning Systems; Accelerometer; Comfort; Intelligent transportation systems

J.T. Mościcki, F. Brochu, J. Ebke, U. Egede, J. Elmsheuser, K. Harrison, R.W.L. Jones, H.C. Lee, D. Liko, A. Maier, A. Muraru, G.N. Patrick, K. Pajchel, W. Reece, B.H. Samset, M.W. Slater, A. Soroko, C.L. Tan, D.C. van der Ster, M. Williams, Ganga: A tool for computational-task management and easy access to Grid resources, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 180, Issue 11, November 2009, Pages 2303-2316, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2009.06.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465509001970)
Abstract: In this paper, we present the computational task-management tool Ganga, which allows for the specification, submission, bookkeeping and post-processing of computational tasks on a wide set of distributed resources. Ganga has been developed to solve a problem increasingly common in scientific projects, which is that researchers must regularly switch between different processing systems, each with its own command set, to complete their computational tasks. Ganga provides a homogeneous environment for processing data on heterogeneous resources. We give examples from High Energy Physics, demonstrating how an analysis can be developed on a local system and then transparently moved to a Grid system for processing of all available data. Ganga has an API that can be used via an interactive interface, in scripts, or through a GUI. Specific knowledge about types of tasks or computational resources is provided at run-time through a plugin system, making new developments easy to integrate. We give an overview of the Ganga architecture, give examples of current use, and demonstrate how Ganga can be used in many different areas of science.
Program summary
Program title: Ganga

Catalogue identifier: AEEN_v1_0

Program summary URL: http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AEEN_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen's University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: GPL

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 224 590

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 14 365 315

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: Python

Computer: personal computers, laptops

Operating system: Linux/Unix

RAM: 1 MB

Classification: 6.2, 6.5

Nature of problem: Management of computational tasks for scientific applications on heterogenous distributed systems, including local, batch farms, opportunistic clusters and Grids.

Solution method: High-level job management interface, including command line, scripting and GUI components.

Restrictions: Access to the distributed resources depends on the installed, 3rd party software such as batch system client or Grid user interface.
Keywords: Grid computing; Data mining; Task management; User interface; Interoperability; System integration; Application configuration

Gin Chong Lee, Chu Kiong Loo, Letchumanan Chockalingam, An integrated approach for head gesture based interface, Applied Soft Computing, Volume 12, Issue 3, March 2012, Pages 1101-1114, ISSN 1568-4946, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.asoc.2011.11.014.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S156849461100456X)
Abstract: The head pose and movement of a user is closely related with his/her intention and thought, recognition of such information could be useful to develop a natural and sensitive user–wheelchair interface. This paper presents an original integrated approach to a head gesture based interface (HGI) which can perform both identity verification and facial pose estimation. Identity verification is performed by two-factor face authentication which is implemented by the combination of topographic independent component analysis (TICA) and multispace random projection (MRP). Modified synergetic computer with melting (Modified SC-MELT) is introduced to classify facial poses. Motion profile generator (MPG) is thoroughly developed during the integration to convert each estimated facial pose sequence into motion control signal to actuate motor movements. The HGI is intended to be deployed as a user–wheelchair interface for disabled and elderly users in which only users with genuine face and valid token may be granted authorized access and hence pilot an electric powered wheelchair (EPW) using their faces. The integration has been verified under a number of experiments to justify the feasibility and performance of the proposed face-based control strategy.
Keywords: Facial pose estimation; Face authentication; Head gesture based interface; State machine; Electric powered wheelchair

Luis Assuncao, Jose C. Cunha, Enabling Global Experiments with Interactive Reconfiguration and Steering by Multiple Users, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 29, 2014, Pages 2137-2144, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2014.05.198.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050914003755)
Abstract: Abstract
In global scientific experiments with collaborative scenarios involving multinational teams there are big challenges related to data access, namely data movements are precluded to other regions or Clouds due to the constraints on latency costs, data privacy and data ownership. Furthermore, each site is processing local data sets using specialized algorithms and producing intermediate results that are helpful as inputs to applications running on remote sites. This paper shows how to model such collaborative scenarios as a scientific workflow implemented with AWARD (Autonomic Workflow Activities Reconfigurable and Dynamic), a decentralized framework offering a feasible solution to run the workflow activities on distributed data centers in different regions without the need of large data movements. The AWARD workflow activities are independently monitored and dynamically reconfigured and steering by different users, namely by hot-swapping the algorithms to enhance the computation results or by changing the workflow structure to support feedback dependencies where an activity receives feedback output from a successor activity. A real implementation of one practical scenario and its execution on multiple data centers of the Amazon Cloud is presented including experimental results with steering by multiple users.
Keywords: Scientific Workflows; Interactive Reconfigurations and Steering; Global Experiments on Cloud

Theodoros Kostoulas, Iosif Mporas, Otilia Kocsis, Todor Ganchev, Nikos Katsaounos, Juan J. Santamaria, Susana Jimenez-Murcia, Fernando Fernandez-Aranda, Nikos Fakotakis, Affective speech interface in serious games for supporting therapy of mental disorders, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 39, Issue 12, 15 September 2012, Pages 11072-11079, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2012.03.067.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417412005908)
Abstract: We describe a novel design, implementation and evaluation of a speech interface, as part of a platform for the development of serious games. The speech interface consists of the speech recognition component and the emotion recognition from speech component. The speech interface relies on a platform designed and implemented to support the development of serious games, which supports cognitive-based treatment of patients with mental disorders. The implementation of the speech interface is based on the Olympus/RavenClaw framework. This framework has been extended for the needs of the specific serious games and the respective application domain, by integrating new components, such as emotion recognition from speech. The evaluation of the speech interface utilized purposely collected domain-specific dataset. The speech recognition experiments show that emotional speech moderately affects the performance of the speech interface. Furthermore, the emotion detectors demonstrated satisfying performance for the emotion states of interest, Anger and Boredom, and contributed towards successful modelling of the patient’s emotion status. The performance achieved for speech recognition and for the detection of the emotional states of interest was satisfactory. Recent evaluation of the serious games showed that the patients started to show new coping styles with negative emotions in normal stress life situations.
Keywords: Speech interface; Serious games; Mental disorders; Emotion recognition; Affect recognition; Speech recognition

Miriam Gil, Estefanía Serral, Pedro Valderas, Vicente Pelechano, Designing for user attention: A method for supporting unobtrusive routine tasks, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 78, Issue 10, 1 October 2013, Pages 1987-2008, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2013.03.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642313000476)
Abstract: Abstract
The automation of user routine tasks is one of the most important challenges in the development of Ambient Intelligence systems. However, this automation may be annoying since some tasks may grab users attention in inappropriate situations. Since user attention is a valuable resource, task automation must behave in a considerate manner demanding user attention only when it is required. To address this issue, this work presents a systematic method for supporting the design and automation of unobtrusive routine tasks that can adjust their obtrusiveness level at runtime according to the user attentional resources and context. This method proposes to design the routine tasks that the system must carry out and how they must interact with users in terms of obtrusiveness. The method also provides a software infrastructure that makes the execution of the tasks at the appropriate obtrusiveness degree a reality. Finally, the system has been validated by means of usefulness and performance tests and a practical case study that demonstrates the correctness and applicability of our approach without compromising system performance.
Keywords: Unobtrusive routine tasks; Obtrusiveness adaptation; Ambient Intelligence; Model-based approach

Pedro Antunes, David Simões, Luis Carriço, José A. Pino, An end-user approach to business process modeling, Journal of Network and Computer Applications, Volume 36, Issue 6, November 2013, Pages 1466-1479, ISSN 1084-8045, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jnca.2013.03.014.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S108480451300101X)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper discusses the main differences between humanistic and mechanistic business process modeling. While the mechanistic approach requires strict process formalization, emphasizes technical details, and constrains the modeling task to technology experts, the humanistic approach is more centered on the end-user. We developed a modeling approach and a collaborative tool supporting end-user business process modeling. Design storyboards were adopted as a paradigm for knowledge representation and visual composition. The main contributions from this research include the knowledge representation structure and a collaborative tool supporting visual composition of business process models.
Keywords: Humanistic business process modeling; Collaborative modeling; Modeling tool

Jennifer Pérez, Jessica Díaz, Juan Garbajosa and Agustín Yagüe, Chapter 9 - Bridging User Stories and Software Architecture: A Tailored Scrum for Agile Architecting, In Agile Software Architecture, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 215-241, ISBN 9780124077720, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-407772-0.00008-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124077720000083)
Abstract: Abstract
Agile architecting is a key issue to scale agile to develop large software systems. This chapter describes a set of mechanisms that make agile architecting feasible. These mechanisms are smoothly integrated in a tailored Scrum for agile architecting by (1) defining product requirements in terms of features by using feature pools and feature trees to provide the portfolio and roadmap visions of a product, (2) designing highly flexible architecture called working architecture, (3) bridging user stories and software architecture through features and design decisions as traceability mechanisms, and (4) systematically assisting agile practitioners by conducting change impact analysis of features through various iterations of the agile process. This tailored Scrum for agile architecting has been successfully put into practice to develop several projects, which have been deployed in a software factory set up in collaboration between the Technical University of Madrid (UPM) and the company Indra. In this chapter, one of these projects is used to illustrate how this tailored Scrum has been applied and how it can be adopted.
Keywords: Agile architecting; Scrum; Features; Working architecture; Change impact analysis; Traceability

Sooyoung Yoo, Seok Kim, Seungja Lee, Kee-Hyuck Lee, Rong-Min Baek, Hee Hwang, A study of user requests regarding the fully electronic health record system at Seoul National University Bundang Hospital: Challenges for future electronic health record systems, International Journal of Medical Informatics, Volume 82, Issue 5, May 2013, Pages 387-397, ISSN 1386-5056, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijmedinf.2012.08.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1386505612001554)
Abstract: Objective
Although the adoption rates for Electronic Health Records (EHRs) are growing, significant opportunities for further advances in EHR system design remain. The goal of this study was to identify issues that should be considered in the design process for the successful development of future systems by analyzing end users’ service requests gathered during a recent three-year period after a comprehensive EHR system was implemented at Seoul National University's Bundang Hospital in South Korea.
Methods
Data on 11,400 service requests from end users of the EHR system made from 2008 through 2010 were used in this study. The requests were categorized as program modification/development, data request, insurance-fee identification/generation, patient-record merging, or other. The authors further subcategorized the requests for program modification/development into the following nine areas of concern: (1) indicators and statistics, (2) patient safety and quality of care, (3) special task-oriented functionalities, (4) ease of use and user interface, (5) system speed, (6) interoperability and integration, (7) privacy and security, (8) customer service, and (9) miscellaneous. The system users were divided into four groups—direct care, care support, administrative/insurance, and general management—to identify each group's needs and concerns.
Results
The service requests for program modification/development, data request, insurance-fee identification/generation, patient-record merging, and other issues constituted approximately 49.2%, 33.9%, 11.4%, 4.0%, and 1.5% of the total data set, respectively. The number of data-request service requests grew over the three years studied. Different groups of users were found to have different concerns according to their activities and tasks. Within the program-modification/development category, end users were most frequently concerned with ease of use and user interface (38.1% of the total) and special task-oriented functionalities (29.3% of the total) in their use of the EHR system, with increasing numbers of requests in both categories over the three years. Users in the direct-care group differed from the other groups in that they most frequently submitted requests related to ease of use and user interface, followed by special functionalities, patient safety and quality care, and customer service, while users in other groups submitted requests concerning ease of use and user interface and special functionalities with a similarly high frequency.
Conclusions
Users have continued to make suggestions about their needs and requirements, and the EHR system has evolved to optimize ease of use and special functionalities for particular groups of users and particular subspecialties. Based on our experiences and the lessons we have learned in the course of maintaining full-EHR systems, we suggest that the key goals to be considered for future EHR systems include innovative new user-interface technologies; special extended functions for each user group's specific task-oriented requirements; powerful, easy-to-use functions to support research; new flexible system architecture; and patient-directed functions.
Keywords: Hospital information systems; Electronic health records; Management information systems; Needs assessments; Organizational case studies

Maurice Lemaire, Maurice Pendola, phimeca-soft, Structural Safety, Volume 28, Issues 1–2, January–April 2006, Pages 130-149, ISSN 0167-4730, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.strusafe.2005.03.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167473005000196)
Abstract: This paper provides a presentation of phimeca software for reliability analysis. The completion of this software has been achieved thanks to years of experience at the French Institute for Advanced Mechanics and phimeca engineering company is developing the commercial version. First, inherent hypotheses of first/second order and conditional simulation methods are briefly stated and their implementation discussed. Algorithms combining the physical model under concern – defined through an explicit formula, a finite element code computation or a user-defined function – and a stochastic model of the input are then presented to the reader. A special attention is given to the graphical user interface GUI in this paper so as to comply with the objectives of this special issue of “Structural Reliability Software” and the use of the GUI is illustrated through a very basic example. To conclude, a significant industrial application is presented demonstrating the capabilities of the software in the context of a large finite element model and a non-linear material behaviour.
Keywords: Reliability analysis; form/sorm; Simulations; Finite element; Graphical user interface; Industrial applications

Joseph Sharit, Sara J. Czaja, Dolores Perdomo, Chin Chin Lee, A cost–benefit analysis methodology for assessing product adoption by older user populations, Applied Ergonomics, Volume 35, Issue 2, March 2004, Pages 81-92, ISSN 0003-6870, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apergo.2003.12.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0003687004000213)
Abstract: A methodology for assessing perceptions of a product through cost–benefit analysis is demonstrated in an experimental study involving use of one of two products for supporting interaction with telephone voice menu systems. The method emphasizes ratings of constructs related to costs and benefits considered relevant to decisions regarding product adoption, and the use of the analytic hierarchy process technique to derive subjective importance weights associated with those constructs. Twenty-five younger subjects (18–39 years of age) and 27 older subjects (60–82 years of age) interacted with simulated telephone voice menu systems supported by either a screen phone or a graphical device. Although analysis of the benefit–cost ratios revealed that benefits were perceived as more important than costs, the analysis of the constituent item ratings and importance weights provided potentially more useful information for predicting product adoption.
Keywords: User-centered design; Cost–benefit analysis; Older populations; Telephone voice menu systems

Ayelet Levy, Kara Kopplin, Amit Gefen, Simulations of skin and subcutaneous tissue loading in the buttocks while regaining weight-bearing after a push-up in wheelchair users, Journal of the Mechanical Behavior of Biomedical Materials, Volume 28, December 2013, Pages 436-447, ISSN 1751-6161, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jmbbm.2013.04.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1751616113001380)
Abstract: Abstract
Pressure ulcers (PUs) are common in patients who chronically depend on a wheelchair for mobility, such as those with a spinal cord injury (SCI). In attempt to prevent the formation of PUs, pressure relieving maneuvers, such as push-ups, are commonly recommended for individuals with SCI. However, very little is known about skin and subcutaneous fat tissue load distributions during sitting and in particular their development during the process of regaining weight-bearing after a push-up. Knowledge on how these loads evolve during sitting-down is critical for understanding the susceptibility of skin to PUs. Considering the potential practical implications on guidelines for wheelchair users, we studied herein the build-up of shear loads in skin and subcutaneous fat using a model of the buttocks of a single SCI subject. Using 12 variants of our finite element (FE) model, we determined the shear loads in skin and subcutaneous fat tissues under the ischial tuberosities when sitting down on foam cushions with different stiffness properties, in healthy skin and scarred skin conditions, focusing on the time course of the build-up of tissue loads. We found substantial differences between the loading curves of skin and fat: While the fat was loaded at a nearly constant rate, skin loads increased nonlinearly - with a greater load/time slope at early skin-support contact. In the context of tissue health and prevention of PUs, this indicates that the more sensitive period with respect to skin integrity is at initial skin-support contact. We further found that the edges of a pre-existing scar are more susceptible to injury, and the greater risk for that is when a hypertrophic scar is present. Despite that this is a theoretical modeling study with associated limitations, we believe that it is already appropriate to recommend to patients to reposition themselves gradually and gently, and not to “fall” back into the wheelchair after finishing a push-up maneuver.
Keywords: Pressure ulcer; Scar; Cushion; Finite element model; Sitting

M.F McTear, Intelligent interface technology: from theory to reality?, Interacting with Computers, Volume 12, Issue 4, February 2000, Pages 323-336, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0953-5438(99)00002-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543899000028)
Abstract: The relationship between theory and practice is particularly important in Intelligent Interface Technology as the ultimate proof of concept here is that the interface actually works, and that it is acceptable to users. For this reason practical issues such as performance, reliability and usability would seem to be more important than theoretical issues such as choice of system design methodology or specification notations. This article reviews two important areas of Intelligent Interface Technology, user modelling and spoken dialogue systems, considering the potential contribution of Artificial Intelligence research to the ‘intelligent’ components of this technology and examining the extent to which theoretical research in Artificial Intelligence contributes to the commercial deployability of Intelligent Interface Technology. It is concluded that, while theoretical foundations are necessary to prevent ad hoc solutions that lack generalisability, practical constraints of performance and usability will constrain the applicability of theoretical research in real systems.
Keywords: Intelligent interfaces; Commercial deployability; User modelling; Spoken dialogue; Computational linguistics

Travis E. Swanson, M.Bayani Cardenas, Ex-Stream: A MATLAB program for calculating fluid flux through sediment–water interfaces based on steady and transient temperature profiles, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 37, Issue 10, October 2011, Pages 1664-1669, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cageo.2010.12.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098300411000239)
Abstract: Temperature is a useful environmental tracer for quantifying movement and exchange of water and heat through and near sediment–water interfaces (SWI). Heat tracing involves analyzing temperature time series or profiles from temperature probes deployed in sediments. Ex-Stream is a MATLAB program that brings together two transient and two steady one-dimensional coupled heat and fluid flux analytical models. The program includes a graphical user interface, a detailed user manual, and postprocessing capabilities that enable users to extract fluid fluxes from time-series temperature observations. Program output is written to comma-separated values files, displayed within the MATLAB command window, and may be optionally plotted. The models that are integrated into Ex-Stream can be run collectively, allowing for direct comparison, or individually.
Keywords: MATLAB; Interface; Heat tracing; Hyporheic exchange

F Kon, R.H Campbell, K Nahrstedt, Using dynamic configuration to manage a scalable multimedia distribution system, Computer Communications, Volume 24, Issue 1, 1 January 2001, Pages 105-123, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0140-3664(00)00293-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366400002930)
Abstract: Multimedia applications and interfaces will change radically the way computer systems will look like in the coming years. Radio and TV broadcasting will assume a digital format and their distribution networks will be integrated to the Internet. Existing hardware and software infrastructures, however, are unable to provide all the scalability, flexibility, and quality of service (QoS) that these applications require.

We present a framework for building scalable and flexible multimedia distribution systems that greatly improves the possibilities for the provision of quality of service in large-scale networks. We show how to use architectural-awareness, mobile agents, and a CORBA-based framework to support dynamic (re)configuration, efficient code distribution, and fault-tolerance. This approach can be applied not only for multimedia distribution, but also for any QoS-sensitive distributed application.
Keywords: Multimedia distribution; Dynamic configuration; Middleware; CORBA; QoS-aware resource management

Chih-Hsuan Wang, One-Zen Hsueh, A novel approach to incorporate customer preference and perception into product configuration: A case study on smart pads, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 35, Issue 5, September 2013, Pages 549-556, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2013.01.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548913000032)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper proposes a hybrid framework combining AHP (analytical hierarchy process), KM (Kano model), with DEMATEL (decision making trial and evaluation laboratory) to incorporate customer preference and perception into the process of product development. Initially, AHP is applied to respondents to form a basis of market segmentation. Thereafter, with respect to identified segments, AHP and KM are employed to extract customer preference for design attributes (DAs) and customer perception of marketing requirements (MRs), respectively. Finally, by means of DEMATEL, the causal relationships between MRs and DAs are systematically recognized to uncover new ideas of next-generation products.
Keywords: AHP; DEMATEL; Kano model; Preference segmentation; Concept evaluation

Tristan Dyer, John Baugh, SMT: An interface for localized storm surge modeling, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 92, February 2016, Pages 27-39, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2015.10.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997815001428)
Abstract: Abstract
The devastation wrought by Hurricanes Katrina (2005), Ike (2008), and Sandy (2012) in recent years continues to underscore the need for better prediction and preparation in the face of storm surge and rising sea levels. Simulations of coastal flooding using physically based hydrodynamic codes like ADCIRC, while very accurate, are also computationally expensive, making them impractical for iterative design scenarios that seek to evaluate a range of countermeasures and possible failure points. We present a graphical user interface that supports local analysis of engineering design alternatives based on an exact reanalysis technique called subdomain modeling, an approach that substantially reduces the computational effort required. This interface, called the Subdomain Modeling Tool (SMT), streamlines the pre- and post-processing requirements of subdomain modeling by allowing modelers to extract regions of interest interactively and by organizing project data on the file system. Software design and implementation issues that make the approach practical, such as a novel range search algorithm, are presented. Descriptions of the overall methodology, software architecture, and performance results are given, along with a case study demonstrating its use.
Keywords: Hurricane storm surge; Subdomain modeling; Finite element analysis; ADCIRC; Range search; Visualization

Alexander Breijs, Ben Klaassens, Robert Babuška, MATLAB DESIGN ENVIRONMENT FOR ROBOTIC MANIPULATORS, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 38, Issue 1, 2005, Pages 373-378, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20050703-6-CZ-1902.01332.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S147466701637344X)
Abstract: Abstract
An automated modelling and control design environment for serial manipulators has been implemented in Matlab/Simulink. This development was motivated by the need for a fast and insightful modelling tool, given that currently available modelling environments are not well suited for control design. The manipulator configuration is defined within a graphical user interface and the corresponding mathematical model is automatically generated. The model is exported to Matlab for analysis and control design, as well as to Simulink for simulation and verification purposes. Friction and stiction phenomena are included in the model. The simulation results can be visualized by standard Matlab means as well as through virtual reality animations. The modelling environment has been used in the design of a control system for a seven-degree-of-freedom manipulator in a tunnel-boring machine.
Keywords: Rapid prototyping; Serial manipulator; Graphical user interface; Virtual reality; Matlab; Simulink; Robot

W.H. Bares, J.C. Lester, Intelligent multi-shot 3D visualization interfaces, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 12, Issue 8, December 1999, Pages 403-412, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0950-7051(99)00034-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950705199000349)
Abstract: In next-generation virtual 3D simulation, training, and entertainment environments, intelligent visualization interfaces must respond to user-specified viewing requests so users can follow salient points of the action and monitor the relative locations of objects. Users should be able to indicate which object(s) to view, how each should be viewed, what cinematic style and pace to employ, and how to respond when a single satisfactory view is not possible. When constraints fail, weak constraints can be relaxed or multi-shot solutions can be displayed in sequence or as composite shots with simultaneous viewports. To address these issues, we have developed ConstraintCam, a real-time camera visualization interface for dynamic 3D worlds.
Keywords: Intelligent 3D visualization; Adaptive and customizable user interfaces; Camera planning

Michael Clerx, Pieter Collins, Enno de Lange, Paul G.A. Volders, Myokit: A simple interface to cardiac cellular electrophysiology, Progress in Biophysics and Molecular Biology, Volume 120, Issues 1–3, January 2016, Pages 100-114, ISSN 0079-6107, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pbiomolbio.2015.12.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0079610715002576)
Abstract: Abstract
Myokit is a new powerful and versatile software tool for modeling and simulation of cardiac cellular electrophysiology. Myokit consists of an easy-to-read modeling language, a graphical user interface, single and multi-cell simulation engines and a library of advanced analysis tools accessible through a Python interface. Models can be loaded from Myokit's native file format or imported from CellML. Model export is provided to C, MATLAB, CellML, CUDA and OpenCL. Patch-clamp data can be imported and used to estimate model parameters. In this paper, we review existing tools to simulate the cardiac cellular action potential to find that current tools do not cater specifically to model development and that there is a gap between easy-to-use but limited software and powerful tools that require strong programming skills from their users. We then describe Myokit's capabilities, focusing on its model description language, simulation engines and import/export facilities in detail. Using three examples, we show how Myokit can be used for clinically relevant investigations, multi-model testing and parameter estimation in Markov models, all with minimal programming effort from the user. This way, Myokit bridges a gap between performance, versatility and user-friendliness.
Keywords: Computational models; Cardiac action potential; Software tools; Ion channels; Simulation

S.J. Holmes, Chapter 9 - Doubleview — A User Interface Design Tool, In APIC, edited by ALAN W. BROWN,, Academic Press, London, 1991, Volume 33, Pages 191-208, Integrated Project Support Environments, ISBN 9780121367404, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-136740-4.50014-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780121367404500143)

Daniel Amyot, Introduction to the User Requirements Notation: learning by example, Computer Networks, Volume 42, Issue 3, 21 June 2003, Pages 285-301, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1389-1286(03)00244-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128603002445)
Abstract: Recognizing the need for a notation that would be used in the very first and often informal stages of the development cycle, the International Telecommunication Union (ITU-T) initiated a question on a User Requirements Notation (URN), which will be standardized as the Z.150 series of Recommendations. URN supports the development, description, and analysis of requirements for telecommunications systems and services, as well as for other types of complex reactive, distributed, and dynamic systems. Through a wireless telephony example, this paper gives an overview of the core elements and typical usage of the two complementary notations comprised in URN. The Goal-oriented Requirement Language (GRL) is used to describe business goals, non-functional requirements, alternatives, and rationales, whereas Use Case Map (UCM) enables the description of functional requirements as causal scenarios. This paper also briefly explores methodology elements and the complementarity between URN and the existing ITU-T languages.
Keywords: Goals; GRL; ITU-T languages; Requirements engineering; Scenarios; UCM; User requirements notation

James Wilson and Daniel Rosenberg, Chapter 39 - Rapid Prototyping for User Interface Design, In Handbook of Human-Computer Interaction, edited by MARTIN HELANDER,, North-Holland, Amsterdam, 1988, Pages 859-875, ISBN 9780444705365, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-70536-5.50044-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444705365500440)
Abstract: 39.1 Abstract
The present chapter provides an introduction to the rationale and techniques used for the rapid prototyping of the user interface (UI). It is intended primarily for those practitioners who are now known as “user interface designers” or “dialogue designers.” The reader will become familiar with the benefits to rapid prototyping, the role of prototyping in alternative development strategies, and the classes of prototyping techniques.

First we review the major issues surrounding the integration of prototyping tools into the user interface design process. Both the nature of the products that can be simulated and the nature of the users applying the tools are explored. The remaining sections analyze the components of a prototyping tool. A complete prototyping system requires methods for specifying interface graphics as well as product logic. Support tools and embedded data collection test facilities can also be integrated to facilitate the testing process.

L.L Lohr, Designing the instructional interface, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 16, Issue 2, 31 March 2000, Pages 161-182, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0747-5632(99)00057-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563299000576)
Abstract: Designing the instructional interface is a challenging endeavor requiring knowledge and skills in instructional and visual design, psychology, human-factors, ergonomic research, computer science and editorial design. While numerous design guidelines are available to assist the designer, many do not fit the specific needs of an instructional environment. The designer is also faced with a challenging design environment. Rapid application development (RAD) settings in which instructional interfaces are developed are characterized by intense production schedules and limited resources. In these environments learning goals may often be bypassed in favor of aesthetics or technical needs. This paper describes the instructional interface, the challenges of its development, and an instructional systems approach to its design that integrates principles of message design, information design, and systems design.
Keywords: Instructional interface; Instructional development; Computer interface; User interface; User friendly interface

Volker Haarslev, Human Factors in Computer Vision Systems: Design of an Interactive User Interface, In Human–Computer Interaction–INTERACT '87, edited by H.-J. BULLINGER and B. SHACKEL, North-Holland, Amsterdam, 1987, Pages 1021-1026, ISBN 9780444703040, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-70304-0.50160-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444703040501606)
Abstract: A new approach for engineering the user interfaces of image sequence analysis systems is presented. This approach is based on a cognitive model of potential users and on a systematic evaluation of the man-machine communication aspects of image sequence analysis systems. We developed an adaptive user interface for a class of image sequence analysis systems using a data flow architecture. The user interface offers an object-oriented interaction model and allows the direct manipulation of graphical representations of system components. Finally, a corresponding prototype system is described which has been implemented in the programming language Ada.

Bertrand DAVID, Tao XU, Huiliang JIN, Yun ZHOU, René CHALON, Bingxue ZHANG, Chuantao YIN, Chen WANG, User-oriented System for Smart City approaches, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 46, Issue 15, 2013, Pages 333-340, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20130811-5-US-2037.00072.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016330853)
Abstract: Abstract
The SMART CITY is an important field for ubiquitous computing (UC), ambient intelligence (AmI), connected vehicles (CV), and the User Interface approach. Data vitalization related to in-city data collection and their appropriate diffusion to city actors (private and professional) and their services (applications) is the main issue. In the context of Hotspot-based Internet, Location-based services and Internet of Things, we study User-oriented systems with four typical variants related to transportation and user' behavior: a dynamic lane allocation system, a system for urban goods delivery, bus shelter-based communication, and street and store consumer adapted guidance and advertising.
Keywords: ambient intelligence; ubiquitous computing; data vitalization; middleware; location-based services; in-environment HCI; contextual mobile learning; dynamic lane allocation; urban goods delivery

R. Scaife, Chapter 13 - Control system interface design, In Human Factors in the Chemical and Process Industries, edited by Janette Edmonds,, Elsevier, 2016, Pages 223-239, ISBN 9780128038062, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-803806-2.00013-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128038062000133)
Abstract: Abstract
Human factors in control system interface design is a complex area of human factors, drawing from cognitive psychology and other human sciences. The chapter provides guidance on the key principles for achieving an optimal design which includes: the presentation of information; the associated system controls; and alarm system management. Consideration of even a few simple principles during design can avoid significant human errors and usability issues during prototyping and final design. The aim of this chapter is to ensure that the reader is aware of the key principles and is equipped to seek more detailed information or advice for developing human interfaces that support the user interaction effectively and reduce the risk of human error.
Keywords: Presentation of information; control design; alarm systems

Farhan Siddiqui, Sherali Zeadally, Thabet Kacem, Scott Fowler, Zero Configuration Networking: Implementation, performance, and security, Computers & Electrical Engineering, Volume 38, Issue 5, September 2012, Pages 1129-1145, ISSN 0045-7906, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compeleceng.2012.02.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S004579061200033X)
Abstract: The ubiquitous access to wired and wireless networks is making information access possible from anywhere, anytime, and any device. Today, end-users are also highly mobile, often equipped with a range of portable devices, and they expect service availability when they require it. In addition, they do not want to be burdened by complex configurations before they can discover and use services. The Zero Configuration (Zeroconf) Networking technology promises to alleviate this configuration burden by allowing users to discover services and devices with little end-user intervention. We compare two popular implementations of Zeroconf namely, Avahi and Mono.Zeroconf running on Linux and Windows XP operating systems, respectively. We evaluate their performance using service discovery time as the performance metric. Our empirical results show that Linux Avahi yields almost 99% improvements in service discovery time over Windows Mono.Zeroconf. We also discuss security solutions that can be deployed to enhance the security of Zeroconf networks. We further investigate the performance of the IP Security (IPSec) protocol when used by our Mono.Zeroconf implementation running on the Windows XP platform. With IPSec, service discovery time increases by almost 45% with our prototype implementation.

Yin-Ho Yao, Amy J.C Trappey, ISO10303 compatible data model and its applications for PC configuration management, Robotics and Computer-Integrated Manufacturing, Volume 16, Issue 5, October 2000, Pages 339-352, ISSN 0736-5845, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0736-5845(99)00062-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736584599000629)
Abstract: This paper focuses on identifying and defining standard data model for conducting configuration management (CM) of Personal Computer (PC) design and redesign. ISO product data representation and exchange standard (ISO10303) is adopted to support the realization of PC industry's global logistic management. The required data types are studied, identified and interpreted using ISO10303 Application Protocol 203 (AP203) to support the ISO10007-based standard CM procedure. This research enables the CM-related data being exchanged using a common data model among heterogeneous PDM systems of the supply chain partners for data sharing and virtual enterprise integration.
Keywords: Configuration management (CM); Product data management (PDM); Supply chain management (SCM); ISO10007; ISO10303

Tobias Kaufmann, Claus Vögele, Stefan Sütterlin, Steve Lukito, Andrea Kübler, Effects of resting heart rate variability on performance in the P300 brain-computer interface, International Journal of Psychophysiology, Volume 83, Issue 3, March 2012, Pages 336-341, ISSN 0167-8760, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijpsycho.2011.11.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167876011003655)
Abstract: Objective
Brain computer interfaces (BCI) can serve as a communication system for people with severe impairment in speech and motor function due to neurodegenerative disease or injury. Reasons for inter-individual differences in capability of BCI usage are not yet fully understood. Paradigms making use of the P300 event-related potential are widely used. Success in a P300 based BCI requires the capability to focus attention and inhibit interference by distracting irrelevant stimuli. Such inhibitory control has been closely linked to peripheral physiological parameters, such as heart rate variability (HRV). The present study investigated the association between resting HRV and performance in the P300-BCI.
Methods
Heart rate was recorded from 34 healthy participants under resting conditions, and subsequently a P300-BCI task was performed.
Results
Frequency domain measures of HRV were significantly associated with BCI-performance, in that higher vagal activation was related to better BCI-performance.
Conclusions
Resting HRV accounted for almost 26% of the variance of BCI performance and may, therefore, serve as a predictor for the capacity to control a P300 oddball based BCI.
Significance
This is the first study to demonstrate resting vagal-cardiac activation to predict capability of P300-BCI usage.
Keywords: Brain-computer interface; P300-BCI; Cardiac autonomic regulation; Heart rate variability; Executive function

M.T. Munir, W. Yu, B.R. Young, A software algorithm/package for control loop configuration and eco-efficiency, ISA Transactions, Volume 51, Issue 6, November 2012, Pages 827-833, ISSN 0019-0578, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.isatra.2012.04.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0019057812000523)
Abstract: Software is a powerful tool to help us analyze industrial information and control processes. In this paper, we will show our recently development of a software algorithm/package which can help us select the more eco-efficient control configuration. Nowadays, the eco-efficiency of all industrial processes/plants has become more and more important; engineers need to find a way to integrate control loop configuration and measurements of eco-efficiency. The exergy eco-efficiency factor; a new measure of eco-efficiency for control loop configuration has been developed. This software algorithm/package will combine a commercial simulator, VMGSim, and Excel together to calculate the exergy eco-efficiency factor.
Keywords: Software algorithm/package; Process simulation; Energy efficiency; Eco-efficiency; Exergy eco-efficiency factor

Janus S. Liang, Generation of automotive troubleshooting configuration system using an ontology-based approach, Computers in Industry, Volume 63, Issue 5, June 2012, Pages 405-422, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2012.01.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361512000061)
Abstract: Automotive troubleshooting configuration is a critical way to implement the specific paradigm by integrating a set of specific elements to satisfy both technical criteria and users’ needs. With the objective of enabling efficient generation of automotive troubleshooting configuration by reusing configuration knowledge, an ontology-based approach to building troubleshooting configuration knowledge is presented in this study. The utilization of ontologies as metadata descriptions of the information sources is a possible approach to offer an integrated view of multiple elements libraries. A configuration meta-model is defined. The meta-concepts have explicit ontological semantics, so that they assist to identify domain concepts consistently and structure them systematically. As a result, configuration models have well-defined semantics due to the logic semantics of OWL, making it possible to automatically detect inconsistencies of configuration knowledge bases. Actual configuration processes are executed using jess, a rule engine for the java platform, by mapping OWL-based configuration facts and SWRL-based configuration criteria into jess facts and jess rules, respectively. Modeling ontologies of real automotive standard braking system is taken as an example task to show how to use the meta-concepts for configuring the troubleshooting information.
Keywords: Ontology-based approach; Automotive troubleshooting work; Knowledge modeling

Paul J.P. Slater, Pconfig: a Web-based configuration tool for Configure-To-Order products, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 12, Issues 5–6, October 1999, Pages 223-230, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0950-7051(99)00016-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950705199000167)
Abstract: Pconfig is a modern Web-based constraint system managing the complex configuration requirements of one product range from a specific computer manufacturer. The range spans multiple CPU types, Operating Systems, Option cards and all the diverse multi-way relationships found in the assembly of complex computers.

A principled approach to configuration was adopted from the outset with special attention given to ongoing product enhancement. Computer Parts and Engineering Constraints are separated in this unique configuration engine allowing each to be updated independently; typically by different people. The complex modelling essential in capturing multi-way relationships is dealt with by coding configuration information using a tool boasting a patented pattern-matching algorithm. This highly versatile rules-based, object-orientated development tool encouraged the simplification of a potentially difficult and complex problem into a relatively straightforward and extensible system.

This online configuration system goes live on the Digital customer Web pages early next year. Future enhancements to Pconfig includes a parts editor, a constraints editor and ordering methods allowing users to place orders not only by part numbers, but also system functions and system benefits.
Keywords: Configuration; Configure To Order; CTO; Constraints: Web-based tools; Multiple Configuration Methods; Pconfig; Modelling

Benjamin Weyers, Wolfram Luther, Nelson Baloian, Interface creation and redesign techniques in collaborative learning scenarios, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 27, Issue 1, January 2011, Pages 127-138, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2010.05.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X10000816)
Abstract: User interfaces are redesigned for various purposes, like adapting interfaces or meeting new requirements during software creation processes. In the context of learning systems, the aim of interface redesign is to let the student creates his or her own interface corresponding to the abstract concept to be learned, which is reflected in the interface designed. In this article we present an approach to interface redesign in a cooperative learning scenario for cryptographic protocols. We describe an iterative workflow using two different pieces of software for the creation and redesign of interfaces and distributed simulation and evaluate this approach.
Keywords: Interface redesign; Concept keyboard; Cooperative learning; Distributed learning; Iterative interface creation

Wil M.P. van der Aalst, Niels Lohmann, Marcello La Rosa, Ensuring correctness during process configuration via partner synthesis, Information Systems, Volume 37, Issue 6, September 2012, Pages 574-592, ISSN 0306-4379, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.is.2011.08.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0306437911001086)
Abstract: Variants of the same process can be encountered within one organization or across different organizations. For example, different municipalities, courts, and rental agencies all need to support highly similar processes. In fact, procurement and sales processes can be found in almost any organization. However, despite these similarities, there is also the need to allow for local variations in a controlled manner. Therefore, many academics and practitioners have advocated the use of configurable process models (sometimes referred to as reference models). A configurable process model describes a family of similar process models in a given domain. Such a model can be configured to obtain a specific process model that is subsequently used to handle individual cases, for instance, to process customer orders. Process configuration is notoriously difficult as there may be all kinds of interdependencies between configuration decisions. In fact, an incorrect configuration may lead to behavioral issues such as deadlocks and livelocks. To address this problem, we present a novel verification approach inspired by the “operating guidelines” used for partner synthesis. We view the configuration process as an external service, and compute a characterization of all such services which meet particular requirements via the notion of configuration guideline. As a result, we can characterize all feasible configurations (i.e., configurations without behavioral problems) at design time, instead of repeatedly checking each individual configuration while configuring a process model.
Keywords: Configurable process model; Operating guideline; Petri net; C-YAWL

Robert F. Cromp, Sharon Crook, An intelligent user interface for browsing satellite data catalogs, Telematics and Informatics, Volume 6, Issues 3–4, 1989, Pages 299-312, ISSN 0736-5853, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0736-5853(89)80023-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736585389800231)
Abstract: A large scale domain-independent spatial data management expert system that serves as a front-end to databases containing spatial data is described. This system is unique for two reasons. First, it uses spatial search techniques to generate a list of all the primary keys that fall within a user's spatial constraints prior to invoking the database management system, thus substantially decreasing the amount of time required to answer a user's query. Second, a domain-independent query expert system uses a domain-specific rule base to preprocess the user's English query, effectively mapping a broad class of queries into a smaller subset that can be handled by a commercial natural language processing system. The methods used by the spatial search module and the query expert system are explained, and the system architecture for the spatial data management expert system is described. The system is applied to data from the International Ultraviolet Explorer (IUE) satellite, and results are given.

Prof. Trygve Thomessen, MSc Tomasz Kosicki, Multimodal human-machine interface for remote operation of robot systems, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 45, Issue 22, 2012, Pages 811-815, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20120905-3-HR-2030.00138.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016337090)
Abstract: Abstract
The trend in robotization is to use industrial robot more and more frequently in small and medium sized enterprises (SMEs). Wide spread of the enterprises over considerable area and small number of applied robot units per enterprise, emerges need to provide an efficient, inexpensive and immediate support remotely. Since there are a lot of important information to be communicated to efficiently support an industrial robot system, traditional data acquisition and human-machine-interfaces (HMI) cannot provide complete and effectively comprehended overview of the state of the robot cell.

The goal of the paper is to demonstrate new methodology and technology for remote HMI based upon Cognitive Informatics Communication (CogInfoCom 2011) that augments efficiency of communication between an industrial robot system and remote operator exercising control over the system. For the purposes of evaluation a remote operating laboratory is developed. The laboratory consists of multimodal HMI interfacing an operator with physically separated seven axes NACHI MR20 robot. By means of multi-camera vision, multi-speaker sound system, and advanced 3D simulation, the robot is controlled remotely. The results show that HMI based upon CogInfoCom can be beneficially applied to communicate complex states of an industrial robot system to a remote operator.
Keywords: Industrial robots; Telerobotics; Human-machine interface; CogInfoCom; Multi Modal; Man-Machine Communication

Thang Nguyen, Dejan Ničković, Assertion-based monitoring in practice – Checking correctness of an automotive sensor interface, Science of Computer Programming, Volume 118, 1 March 2016, Pages 40-59, ISSN 0167-6423, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.scico.2015.11.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167642315003512)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper provides an evaluation of the assertion-based monitoring technology for mixed-signal systems applied to a real-world case study from the automotive domain. We first motivate the case study by presenting the state-of-the-practice verification and validation work-flow typically used in the automotive industry. We identify the shortcomings of this work-flow, and propose a more rigorous and automated methodology based on monitoring correctness of simulated mixed signal designs with respect to Signal Temporal Logic (STL) assertions, which formalize the requirements from the design specification. We apply this assertion-based monitoring framework to check the correctness of a Distributed System Interface (DSI3) mixed-signal protocol implementation in a modern airbag system-on-chip application. We present all the relevant steps in our proposed work-flow and evaluate the results. We discuss potential benefits of the framework and identify its current shortcomings. Finally, we propose a number of future research directions based on the case study outcome.
Keywords: Assertion-based monitoring; Analog and mixed-signal verification; Case study; Temporal logic; Automotive airbag system

V. Kalenteridis, H. Pournara, K. Siozos, K. Tatas, N. Vassiliadis, I. Pappas, G. Koutroumpezis, S. Nikolaidis, S. Siskos, D.J. Soudris, A. Thanailakis, A complete platform and toolset for system implementation on fine-grain reconfigurable hardware, Microprocessors and Microsystems, Volume 29, Issue 6, 11 August 2005, Pages 247-259, ISSN 0141-9331, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.micpro.2004.09.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0141933104001395)
Abstract: In this paper a complete system for the implementation of digital logic in a fine-grain reconfigurable platform is introduced. The system is composed of two parts: the fine-grain reconfigurable hardware platform (FPGA) on which the logic is implemented and the set of CAD tools for mapping logic to the FPGA platform. It is the first such complete academic system. The novel energy efficient FPGA architecture was designed and simulated in STM 0.18 μm CMOS technology. The detailed design and circuit characteristics of the Configurable Logic Block as well as the interconnection network are determined and evaluated for energy, delay and area. Concerning the tool flow, each tool can operate as a standalone program as well as part of a complete design framework, composed by existing and new tools.
Keywords: Low power FPGA; Interconnect architecture; Energy-efficient CLB architecture; Graphical user interface

J.C Miles, W.A Gray, T.W Carnduff, I Santoyridis, A Faulconbridge, Versioning and configuration management in design using CAD and complex wrapped objects, Artificial Intelligence in Engineering, Volume 14, Issue 3, July 2000, Pages 249-260, ISSN 0954-1810, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0954-1810(00)00019-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0954181000000194)
Abstract: In concurrent design, there is a need to control the interaction between the participants and also to manage the compatibility of the various components being designed. This requires a carefully defined structure to control the changes and additions to the design of artefacts and a means of allowing all participants to see as much of the design information as possible. For situations where colocation is not possible, this is best achieved through a suitably designed computer system. This paper covers the development of the Describe environment which consists of a CAD system linked to an Object-Oriented Database (OODB) via AutoLISP and a C++ executable. The interaction model within Describe has been developed to be as simple and flexible as possible and is based on fresults from a design experiment. Within the system, design information is stored as complex, wrapped objects which allow the seamless integration of graphical and other design information. The resulting system automatically updates design calculations when dimensions are altered in the CAD system. The system has been developed in conjunction with practising designers and applied to the domain of beam/slab bridges.
Keywords: Versioning and configuration management; Complex wrapped objects; Computer-aided design

Ramon M. Felciano, Richard O. Chen, Russ B. Altman, RNA secondary structure as a reusable interface to biological information resources, Gene, Volume 190, Issue 2, 6 May 1997, Pages GC59-GC70, ISSN 0378-1119, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0378-1119(96)00855-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378111996008554)
Abstract: The dissemination of biological information has become critically dependent on the Internet and World Wide Web (WWW), which enable distributed access to information in a platform independent manner. The mode of interaction between biologists and on-line information resources, however, has been mostly limited to simple interface technologies such has hypertext links, tables and forms. The introduction of platform-independent runtime environments facilitates the development of more sophisticated WWW-based user interfaces. Until recently, most such interfaces have been tightly coupled to the underlying computation engines, and not separated as reusable components. We believe that many subdisciplines of biology have intuitive and familiar graphical representations of knowledge that can serve as multipurpose user interface elements. We call such graphical idioms “domain graphics”. In order to illustrate the power of such graphics, we have built a reusable interface based on the standard two dimensional (2D) layout of RNA secondary structure. The interface can be used to represent any pre-computed layout of RNA, and takes as a parameters the sets of actions to be performed as a user interacts with the interface. It can provide to any associated application program information about the base, helix, or subsequence selected by the user. We show the versatility of this interface by using it as a special purpose interface to BLAST, Medline and the RNA MFOLD search/compute engines. These demonstrations are available at: ir|url|http://www-smi.stanford.edu/projects/helix/pubs/ gene-combis-96/
Keywords: RNA; Domain graphic; User interface; Component software; Java; Secondary structure; 16S; 30S; Internet; World Wide Web

Jelena Jovanović, Dragan Gašević, Vladan Devedžić, A GUI for Jess, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 26, Issue 4, May 2004, Pages 625-637, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2003.12.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417403002203)
Abstract: The paper describes JessGUI, a graphical user interface developed on top of the Jess expert system shell. The central idea of the JessGUI project was to make building, revising, updating, and testing Jess-based expert systems easier, more flexible, and more user friendly. There are many other expert system building tools providing a rich and comfortable integrated development environment to expert system builders. However, they are all either commercial or proprietary products. Jess and JessGUI are open-source freeware, and yet they are well suited for building even complex expert system applications, both stand-alone and Web-based ones. An important feature of JessGUI is its capability of saving knowledge bases in XML format (in addition to the original Jess format), thus making them potentially easy to interoperate with other knowledge bases on the Internet. Jess and JessGUI are also used as practical knowledge engineering tools to support both introductory and advanced university courses on expert systems. The paper presents design details of JessGUI, explains its links with the underlying Jess knowledge representation and reasoning tools, and shows examples of using JessGUI in expert system development. It also discusses some of the current efforts in extending Jess/JessGUI in order to provide intelligent features originally not supported in Jess.
Keywords: Expert systems; Development tools; Graphical user interface; Knowledge base interoperability

Mikko V.J. Heikkinen, Jukka K. Nurminen, Timo Smura, Heikki Hämmäinen, Energy efficiency of mobile handsets: Measuring user attitudes and behavior, Telematics and Informatics, Volume 29, Issue 4, November 2012, Pages 387-399, ISSN 0736-5853, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.tele.2012.01.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736585312000068)
Abstract: The purpose of this research is to understand the behavior and expectations of mobile handset users towards energy consumption. We analyze mobile handset monitoring traces from subsequent years with N = 253 and 105, and questionnaire studies with N = 155 and 150. The data allows us to study both the actual behavior of the users and their explicit attitudes, expectations, and experiences. Additional difference to prior work is the use of longitudinal data from multiple years and a user sample that is much larger than in earlier studies. We present hypotheses drawn both from literature and from our own experience, and use the datasets to support or refute them. Our results indicate that mobile device users need more detailed and clearer information of the battery status and energy consumption. Moreover, users want to understand how different applications and services affect the energy consumption and to learn what they can do to control it.
Keywords: Attitude; Battery; Behavior; Energy; Mobile

Andreas Brunn, Klaus Lay and Uwe Rettich, AN INTERACTIVE 3D-GRAPHICS USER INTERFACE FOR ENGINEERING DESIGN, In Human–Computer Interaction–INTERACT '87, edited by H.-J. BULLINGER and B. SHACKEL, North-Holland, Amsterdam, 1987, Pages 677-682, ISBN 9780444703040, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-70304-0.50110-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444703040501102)
Abstract: An interactive 3D-graphics user interface for the design and layout of production systems was developed at the Fraunhofer Institut für Arbeitswirtschaft und Organisation (IAO). Qualities like uniformity, openness of the system and software ergonomical criteria like flexibility, good handling and userfriend-liness played an important role during the design of the interface. The graphic manipulations are based on objects which are built up with primitives (for example cubes, cylinders, prisms) or which can be transmitted from CAD-systems. Different windows which show the actual layout on the screen can be defined, modified or deleted. The user can choose between 2D- and 3D-representation (hidden surface or wire-frame model). The movements of objects within one arrangement are shown in all corresponding views on the screen simultaneously. Menus are guiding the user within the system. Input facilities are the mouse and the keyboard. Help functions are providing additional information about graphic objects and about all available functions. An application of the 3D-graphics user interface is shown at the example of a robot simulation program.

Anatoli S Koulinitch, Leonid B. Sheremetov, Coordination and communication issues in multi-agent expert system: concurrent configuration design advisor, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 15, Issues 3–4, October–November 1998, Pages 295-307, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0957-4174(98)00056-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417498000566)
Abstract: The model of concurrent configuration design and the architecture of Concurrent Configuration Design Advisor (CCDA) are considered. The CCDA is developed as an open dynamic expert system of interacting agents. In the context of this article a configuration problem is defined as a decision-making procedure performed by concurrent processes (agents). The analysis of concurrent and sequential activities in this system is based on structural transformations (in the form of graph grammars) that permits the definition of correct criteria for data integrity and the consistency of configured project data model, and any dynamic changes in the project to be modeled conveniently. This approach also makes it possible to handle complex hierarchial data structures of real configured objects and to model communication and synchronization of decision making in a distributed expert system in a common formalism. The system to be configured is decomposed into structured objects, called fragments. The proposed model consists of three types of agents. D-agents are those capable of the object configuration design within the constraints on their attributes. To cope with agents' coordination, objects' consistency and data integrity problems, a special type of agent, facilitator or F-agent, is introduced. Finally, project assistants or A-agents are responsible for the user interface at the stage of object model definition. The discussion is illustrated with examples from the application domain of flexible manufacturing systems. Experimental results, current and future work on the expert system implementation are considered.
Keywords: Expert systems; Agent concurred configuration design

Fatma Ghorbel, Nebrasse Ellouze, Elisabeth Métais, Fayçal Hamdi, Faiez Gargouri, Noura Herradi, MEMO GRAPH: An Ontology Visualization Tool for Everyone, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 96, 2016, Pages 265-274, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2016.08.139.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050916319408)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents a user-friendly tool, called MEMO GRAPH, for visualizing and navigating ontologies. Compared to related work, MEMO GRAPH is designed to be used by everyone, including ontology experts and users not familiar with ontologies. It provides an accessible and understandable user interface that follows the “design-for-all” philosophy. Precisely, it offers an Alzheimer's patients-friendly interface. The MEMO GRAPH ontology visualization tool is integrated in the CAPTAIN MEMO memory prosthesis and it is applied for visualizing a small-scale ontology (PersonLink) and a large-scale ontology (DBpedia). We discuss the encouraging results derived from the preliminary empirical evaluation, which confirms that MEMO GRAPH is an intuitive and usable ontology visualization tool.
Keywords: Semantic Web; Ontology; Visualization; Design-For-All; Alzheimer's Disease Patient; User Interface

T.H Mize, I Taban, M Duursma, M Seynen, M Konijnenburg, A Vijftigschild, C.V Doornik, G.V Rooij, R.M.A Heeren, A modular data and control system to improve sensitivity, selectivity, speed of analysis, ease of use, and transient duration in an external source FTICR-MS, International Journal of Mass Spectrometry, Volume 235, Issue 3, 15 July 2004, Pages 243-253, ISSN 1387-3806, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijms.2004.05.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1387380604002192)
Abstract: We present here a new Fourier transform ion cyclotron resonance mass spectrometry (FTICR-MS) controller designed and constructed to meet the growing need for increased speed, memory, and ease of use. The system realizes these goals via the first published application of fast PXI bus technology and by employing a graphical user interface (GUI) for control of all aspects of ion production, delivery, containment, manipulation of internal and kinetic energies, and measurement in an external source instrument. Additionally, new hardware for monitoring and control of these aspects and for processing extended datasets both to and from the instrument have been implemented.

The modular nature of the control hardware makes the instrument platform, in this case a modified external source 7T FTICR-MS, irrelevant. The GUI consists of two separate modules; one provides a temporal representation of the pulses, voltages (rf and dc), and dc heater currents that control all aspects of the experiment while the other provides complex data analysis capabilities and design of excitation waveforms. Real-time monitoring of the transient signal is available in this module as well as near real-time monitoring of the resulting mass spectrum (using a truncated dataset). A PXI bus with 40 digital to analog converters (DAC) and 64 digital (TTL) sources drive the source, optics, and trapping functions of the instrument as well as the other peripheral hardware. Acquisition is realized using a VME bus with a TTL triggered program resident on an embedded processor to minimize dead time. The acquisition system is equipped with 192 MB memory for both excitation and detection waveforms with FIFO buffering to provide full rate bandwidth of 10 MHz, and four digital down converters (DDCs) to enable mixing of heterodyne signals for narrow band measurements completes the ensemble.
Keywords: FTMS; Modular data station; Ion cyclotron resonance; Excitation; Stored waveform inverse fourier transform; Graphical user interface; Ion isolation

Matti Vihola, Grapham: Graphical models with adaptive random walk Metropolis algorithms, Computational Statistics & Data Analysis, Volume 54, Issue 1, 1 January 2010, Pages 49-54, ISSN 0167-9473, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csda.2009.09.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167947309003193)
Abstract: Recently developed adaptive Markov chain Monte Carlo (MCMC) methods have been applied successfully to many problems in Bayesian statistics. Grapham is a new open source implementation covering several such methods, with emphasis on graphical models for directed acyclic graphs. The implemented algorithms include the seminal Adaptive Metropolis algorithm adjusting the proposal covariance according to the history of the chain and a Metropolis algorithm adjusting the proposal scale based on the observed acceptance probability. Different variants of the algorithms allow one, for example, to use these two algorithms together, employ delayed rejection and adjust several parameters of the algorithms. The implemented Metropolis-within-Gibbs update allows arbitrary sampling blocks. The software is written in C and uses a simple extension language Lua in configuration.

Madjid Tavana, Intelligent flight support system (IFSS): a real-time intelligent decision support system for future manned spaceflight operations at Mission Control Center, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 35, Issue 5, May 2004, Pages 301-313, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2004.04.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997804000419)
Abstract: The Mission Control Center Systems (MCCS) is a functionally robust set of distributed systems primarily supporting the Space Shuttle Program (SSP) and the International Space Station (ISS) mission operations. Forged around the uniquely complex and demanding requirements of human spaceflight, the MCCS has evolved within the limits of the technological capabilities of the time. The dynamic environment in which MCCS functions has demanded that the systems architecture continue to evolve as well.

The MCCS provides the primary means of controlling crewed spacecraft operated by NASA. Flight controllers (FCs) monitor the spacecraft systems through telemetry sent from the spacecraft to the ground and from the ground to the vehicle. FCs utilize several application software to present telemetry data in a variety of output presentations. While most displays simply provide a densely packed screen of telemetry data, only a few provide graphical representations of the vehicle systems' status. New technological advances in user interface design have not penetrated into MCC especially since the SSP and ISS systems were developed when these technologies were not available. The Intelligent Flight Support System (IFSS) described in this paper promotes situational awareness at MCC with an interactive virtual model of the ISS and Space Shuttle combined with data and decision support displays. IFSS also incorporates an intelligent component to model various characteristics of space vehicle systems when predictable results of unknown scenarios are required. IFSS supports FCs in the planning, communications, command, and control operations of the ISS and Space Shuttle by providing knowledge and skills that are unavailable from internal representation.
Keywords: NASA; Decision support system; Graphical user interface; Virtual reality; Systems design

A.-M. Raclariu, S. Deshpande, J. Bruggemann, W. Zhuge, T.H. Yu, C. Ratsch, S. Shankar, A fast method for predicting the formation of crystal interfaces and heterocrystals, Computational Materials Science, Volume 108, Part A, October 2015, Pages 88-93, ISSN 0927-0256, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.commatsci.2015.05.023.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0927025615003365)
Abstract: Abstract
In order to address an important problem in Computational Materials Design, we have demonstrated the feasibility of an algorithm which rapidly scans through various surface configurations of two single crystals selected from a crystal structures database and identifies those pairs which are likely to form stable heterointerfaces. Any two crystals are cut along different planes and all possible heterocrystal interfaces are generated based on geometric criteria and predicted bond directions of atoms on both constituent surfaces. Each configuration is assigned two scores derived using deviations of interfacial bond lengths from ideal and electronegativity differences between atoms on each side of the interface. We present some results to illustrate our method for PtNi3 on Pt3Co, GaP on Si, and Si on SiO2. This technique can be used as a fast filter for further analysis by more detailed ab initio-based methods, and is meant to address the higher throughput methods needed in the Materials Genome Initiative for complex material structures.
Keywords: Heterocrystal formation; Heterointerface; Atomistic simulation; Linear scaling algorithm

Christos D. Giachritsis, Manuel Ferre, Jordi Barrio, Alan M. Wing, Unimanual and bimanual weight perception of virtual objects with a new multi-finger haptic interface, Brain Research Bulletin, Volume 85, Issue 5, 30 June 2011, Pages 271-275, ISSN 0361-9230, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.brainresbull.2011.03.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0361923011001055)
Abstract: Accurate weight perception is important particularly in tasks where the user has to apply vertical forces to ensure safe landing of a fragile object or precise penetration of a surface with a probe. Moreover, depending on physical properties of objects such as weight and size we may switch between unimanual and bimanual manipulation during a task. Research has shown that bimanual manipulation of real objects results in a misperception of their weight: they tend to feel lighter than similarly heavy objects which are handled with one hand only [8]. Effective simulation of bimanual manipulation with desktop haptic interfaces should be able to replicate this effect of bimanual manipulation on weight perception. Here, we present the MasterFinger-2, a new multi-finger haptic interface allowing bimanual manipulation of virtual objects with precision grip and we conduct weight discrimination experiments to evaluate its capacity to simulate unimanual and bimanual weight. We found that the bimanual ‘lighter’ bias is also observed with the MasterFinger-2 but the sensitivity to changes of virtual weights deteriorated.
Keywords: Haptics; Weight perception; Haptic interfaces; Psychophysics

Eric Conte, Benjamin Fuks, Guillaume Serret, MadAnalysis 5, a user-friendly framework for collider phenomenology, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 184, Issue 1, January 2013, Pages 222-256, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2012.09.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465512002950)
Abstract: We present MadAnalysis 5, a new framework for phenomenological investigations at particle colliders. Based on a C++ kernel, this program allows us to efficiently perform, in a straightforward and user-friendly fashion, sophisticated physics analyses of event files such as those generated by a large class of Monte Carlo event generators. MadAnalysis 5 comes with two modes of running. The first one, easier to handle, uses the strengths of a powerful Python interface in order to implement physics analyses by means of a set of intuitive commands. The second one requires one to implement the analyses in the C++ programming language, directly within the core of the analysis framework. This opens unlimited possibilities concerning the level of complexity which can be reached, being only limited by the programming skills and the originality of the user.
Program summary
Program title: MadAnalysis 5

Catalogue identifier: AENO_v1_0

Program summary URL:http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AENO_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen’s University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: Permission to use, copy, modify and distribute this program is granted under the terms of the GNU General Public License.

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 31087

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 399105

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: PYTHON, C++.

Computer: All platforms on which Python version 2.7, Root version 5.27 and the g++ compiler are available. Compatibility with newer versions of these programs is also ensured. However, the Python version must be below version 3.0.

Operating system: Unix, Linux and Mac OS operating systems on which the above-mentioned versions of Python and Root, as well as g++, are available.

Classification: 11.1.

External routines: ROOT (http://root.cern.ch/drupal/)

Nature of problem: Implementing sophisticated phenomenological analyses in high-energy physics through a flexible, efficient and straightforward fashion, starting from event files such as those produced by Monte Carlo event generators. The event files can have been matched or not to parton-showering and can have been processed or not by a (fast) simulation of a detector. According to the sophistication level of the event files (parton-level, hadron-level, reconstructed-level), one must note that several input formats are possible.

Solution method: We implement an interface allowing the production of predefined as well as user-defined histograms for a large class of kinematical distributions after applying a set of event selection cuts specified by the user. This therefore allows us to devise robust and novel search strategies for collider experiments, such as those currently running at the Large Hadron Collider at CERN, in a very efficient way.

Restrictions: Unsupported event file format.

Unusual features: The code is fully based on object representations for events, particles, reconstructed objects and cuts, which facilitates the implementation of an analysis.

Running time: It depends on the purposes of the user and on the number of events to process. It varies from a few seconds to the order of the minute for several millions of events.
Keywords: Particle physics phenomenology; Monte Carlo event generators; Hadron colliders

J.L. Alty and J. Mullin, THE ROLE OF THE DIALOGUE SYSTEM IN A USER INTERFACE MANAGEMENT SYSTEM, In Human–Computer Interaction–INTERACT '87, edited by H.-J. BULLINGER and B. SHACKEL, North-Holland, Amsterdam, 1987, Pages 1007-1012, ISBN 9780444703040, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-70304-0.50158-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444703040501588)
Abstract: The respective roles of the Dialogue Controller and Application Model in a User Interface Management System are discussed in the context of a process control application, and application dependent and independent aspects of the dialogue are identified. A multi-channel dialogue controller is proposed which allows concurrent interaction on the interface and dialogues are implemented as a set of dialogue assistants. Application independent assistants control the transfer of information and application dependent assistants implement the task-orientated conversations. As far as possible the design of an assistant is independent of any other. This seases problems in dialogue design and allows assistants to be defined in a specification language which can be analysed for appropriate properties. Assistants can be constructed using a number of paradigms. An event-driven network approach is given as an example. A possible object-orientated approach is briefly outlined.

M. Varga, S. Balogh, B. Csukas, An extensible, generic environmental process modelling framework with an example for a watershed of a shallow lake, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 75, January 2016, Pages 243-262, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2015.10.022.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815215300803)
Abstract: Abstract
We present a modelling framework for the generation of environmental process models. The framework builds on the Direct Computer Mapping method with an editable, process network based expert module and interpreter. The expert interface supports mapping of objects from the GIS layers onto the prototyped state, transition and connection elements of the case specific generic process model. The developed general purpose interpreter generates the standardized declarative facts and clauses, describing the actual model with the locally executable program prototypes. This input is executed by the general kernel. The model interpreter generates also the case specific templates for the (optionally web based) user interface, while map-server utilizes the GIS shape files of expert model. The implementation supports the extension of the model with new components in space and time. The framework is illustrated by an example for the watershed of Lake Balaton.
Keywords: GIS based process modelling; Network based expert interface; Generic model interpreter; Extensible process model; Generic user interface; Watershed

Yacine Bellik, Multimodal text editor interface including speech for the blind, Speech Communication, Volume 23, Issue 4, December 1997, Pages 319-332, ISSN 0167-6393, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-6393(97)00052-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167639397000526)
Abstract: This paper describes the results of a joint project funded by two French research laboratories, LIMSI-CNRS and INSERM-CREARE, and one end-user organisation, INJA (National Institute for Young Blind People). This project applies multimodal interfaces including speech recognition and synthesis to provide improved computer access for the blind. A multimodal text editor designed to provide enriched texts, direct manipulation and immediate feedback for text editing tasks is described. Using speech recognition and synthesis in a combined way with pointing gestures and touch helped to resolve many problems that blind people encounter with traditional access methods. Promising results are presented, but combining speech with other modalities in the same interface also reveals some new technological problems that are hidden when speech is used in an isolated way. These problems are discussed, and user needs and expectations are presented.
Keywords: Multimodal interfaces; Speech recognition; Speech synthesis; Non visual interfaces; Blind users; Rehabilitation engineering

Esther Kaufmann, Abraham Bernstein, Evaluating the usability of natural language query languages and interfaces to Semantic Web knowledge bases, Web Semantics: Science, Services and Agents on the World Wide Web, Volume 8, Issue 4, November 2010, Pages 377-393, ISSN 1570-8268, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.websem.2010.06.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1570826810000582)
Abstract: The need to make the contents of the Semantic Web accessible to end-users becomes increasingly pressing as the amount of information stored in ontology-based knowledge bases steadily increases. Natural language interfaces (NLIs) provide a familiar and convenient means of query access to Semantic Web data for casual end-users. While several studies have shown that NLIs can achieve high retrieval performance as well as domain independence, this paper focuses on usability and investigates if NLIs and natural language query languages are useful from an end-user's point of view. To that end, we introduce four interfaces each allowing a different query language and present a usability study benchmarking these interfaces. The results of the study reveal a clear preference for full natural language query sentences with a limited set of sentence beginnings over keywords or formal query languages. NLIs to ontology-based knowledge bases can, therefore, be considered to be useful for casual or occasional end-users. As such, the overarching contribution is one step towards the theoretical vision of the Semantic Web becoming reality.
Keywords: Natural language interfaces; Query languages; Usability study

Manfred LÜDTKE and Ivar NACKUNSTZ, USER INTERFACES TO A MEDICAL ARCHIVING AND COMMUNICATION SYSTEM, In Human–Computer Interaction–INTERACT '87, edited by H.-J. BULLINGER and B. SHACKEL, North-Holland, Amsterdam, 1987, Pages 637-642, ISBN 9780444703040, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-70304-0.50104-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444703040501047)
Abstract: The design of Viewing Stations emerging in digital radiology has to take account of the difficulties of non-technical users, pressure from routine work, complex dependencies with other working places and the need for compatibility with older systems. Philips Medical Systems has undertaken laboratory studies comprising two Viewing Stations for a PACS environment, one being a rapid prototype, and a Radiology Information System. These studies address questions of interaction syntax and the conceptual model of a user. A desk/lightbox metaphor is successfully applied to the viewing station design.

Andrew G Taube, Sankaran Subramanian, Ramachandran Murugesan, Nallathamby Devasahayam, James B Mitchell, Murali C Krishna, John A Cook, An application system for automation of constant-time radio frequency electron paramagnetic resonance imaging, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 72, Issue 2, October 2003, Pages 127-138, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0169-2607(02)00124-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169260702001244)
Abstract: A Windows based application system for data collection, Fourier reconstruction and analysis of pure phase encoded constant-time radio frequency electron paramagnetic resonance (EPR) images, is described. The graphical user interface (GUI) of the system was written in matlab version 5.0, using its built-in GUI utilities. Design considerations of the application system included speed, flexibility and user-friendly data display and analysis. To maximize the speed of image data collection, matlab's built-in C interface system, MEX was not used for data collection. Instead, matlab programs call the C programs from the dos prompt directly, based on the data collection parameters entered through the GUI. Computational procedures included various digital signal-processing steps such as filtering, interpolation etc. for the Fourier reconstruction of 2D, and 3D EPR images from the pure phase encoded data. Examples of 2D images illustrating the performance of the system are presented. Although the application system has been developed for the specific purpose of EPR imaging, it can easily be adapted to other areas such as magnetic resonance microscopy as well.
Keywords: Constant time imaging; Single-point imaging; Gyromagnetic ratio; Electron paramagnetic resonance; Phase encoding; Graphical user interface

Christian Brecher, Wolfram Lohse, Evaluation of toolpath quality: User-assisted CAM for complex milling processes, CIRP Journal of Manufacturing Science and Technology, Volume 6, Issue 4, 2013, Pages 233-245, ISSN 1755-5817, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cirpj.2013.07.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1755581713000539)
Abstract: Abstract
Complex machining technologies such as simultaneous five-axis milling become increasingly significant for today's production industry. Although most existing CAM systems support planning engineers to design these processes, they do not assist in evaluating the quality of resulting NC programmes concerning given objectives. Therefore, a new approach – presented in this paper – has been developed for identifying potentially critical areas of planned five-axis toolpaths as part of a user-assisting CAM system. It is based on aggregating data to information by combining domain-specific knowledge elements and concepts of expert systems in inference networks. These networks compute coefficients along the toolpath giving the user an intuitive idea whether errors corresponding to the employed networks are to be expected at these locations.
Keywords: CAM planning; Process data feedback; Virtual machine tool; NC simulation

Gunnar Johannsen, Cooperative human-machine interfaces for plant-wide control and communication, Annual Reviews in Control, Volume 21, 1997, Pages 159-170, ISSN 1367-5788, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1367-5788(97)00022-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1367578897000229)
Abstract: Cooperation and communication among different people have become more and more important for industrial, transportation, and service sectors. This survey paper integrates the achievements from the fields of human-machine and human-computer interfaces with the considerations about more cooperation and communication. A cognition space metaphor and a conceptual model of human control, problem solving and communication are explained. The design principles and the components of human-machine interfaces are presented, including such issues as user participation, traditional and knowledge-based components, and advanced technologies. Examples of cooperative interfaces for multi-user interaction in plant-wide applications are discussed on different levels, such as the operational, the design, the maintenance, the management, and the marketing levels.
Keywords: Human-machine interface; co-operation; communication; human-centered design; man-machine systems; knowledge-based systems; cognitive engineering; metaphors; user interfaces; human supervisory control

H.E. BEZ and D.J. COOKE, A FORMAL DESIGN METHODOLOGY FOR END-USER INTERFACES - A SMALL CASE STUDY BASED ON UNICON™, In Human–Computer Interaction–INTERACT '87, edited by H.-J. BULLINGER and B. SHACKEL, North-Holland, Amsterdam, 1987, Pages 989-995, ISBN 9780444703040, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-70304-0.50155-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444703040501552)
Abstract: A unified design methodology [3] currently under study is applied to a small system developed some years ago at L.U.T. [7]. Although simple, the system has been exploited commercially and hence provide a realistic test vehicle for the new methodology. We show how a full formal description of the required interface is evolved by graphical and algebraic means and how it can be ‘exercised’ by logic programming tools in order to permit the specification to be tested by the system designer. The resulting specification can be used to verify implementations or as a starting point for the application of transformational techniques aimed at producing a procedural realisation of the system. The relationship between our approach and other methodologies is also considered.

Joe Tekli, Richard Chbeir, Minimizing user effort in XML grammar matching, Information Sciences, Volume 210, 25 November 2012, Pages 1-40, ISSN 0020-0255, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ins.2012.04.026.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0020025512002903)
Abstract: XML grammar matching has found considerable interest recently, due to the growing number of heterogeneous XML documents on the Web, and the need to integrate, search and retrieve XML documents originated from different data sources. In this study, we provide an approach for automatic XML grammar matching and comparison aiming to minimize the amount of user effort required to perform the match task. This requires (i) considering the various characteristics and constraints of XML grammars (in comparison with ‘grammar simplifying’ approaches), (ii) allowing a flexible combination of different matching criteria (in comparison with static approaches), and (iii) effectively considering the semi-structured nature of XML (in contrast with heuristic methods). To achieve this, we propose an extensible framework based on the concept of tree edit distance as an optimal technique to consider XML structure, integrating different matching criteria to capture all basic XML grammar characteristics, ranging over element semantic and syntactic similarities, cardinality and alternativeness constraints, as well as data-type correspondences and relative ordering. In addition, our framework is flexible, enabling the user to choose mapping cardinality (i.e., 1:1, 1:n, n:1, n:n), in comparison with exiting static methods (usually constrained to 1:1). User constraints and feedback are equally considered in order to adjust matching results to the user’s perception of correct matches. Experiments on real and synthetic XML grammars demonstrate the effectiveness and efficiency of our matching strategy in identifying mappings, in comparison with alternative methods.
Keywords: XML; Semi-structured data; XML grammar; Schema matching; Structural similarity; Semantic similarity

Clint Feher, Yuval Elovici, Robert Moskovitch, Lior Rokach, Alon Schclar, User identity verification via mouse dynamics, Information Sciences, Volume 201, 15 October 2012, Pages 19-36, ISSN 0020-0255, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ins.2012.02.066.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0020025512001946)
Abstract: Identity theft is a crime in which hackers perpetrate fraudulent activity under stolen identities by using credentials, such as passwords and smartcards, unlawfully obtained from legitimate users or by using logged-on computers that are left unattended. User verification methods provide a security layer in addition to the username and password by continuously validating the identity of logged-on users based on their physiological and behavioral characteristics.

We introduce a novel method that continuously verifies users according to characteristics of their interaction with the mouse.

The contribution of this work is threefold: first, user verification is derived based on the classification results of each individual mouse action, in contrast to methods which aggregate mouse actions. Second, we propose a hierarchy of mouse actions from which the features are extracted. Third, we introduce new features to characterize the mouse activity which are used in conjunction with features proposed in previous work.

The proposed algorithm outperforms current state-of-the-art methods by achieving higher verification accuracy while reducing the response time of the system.
Keywords: Mouse dynamics; Behavioral biometrics; Security monitoring; Verification; Mouse; Pointing devices

N Heaton and M Sinclair, An annotated bibliography of end-user interface design, In Designing End-User Interfaces, Pergamon, 1988, Pages 225-241, ISBN 9780080341200, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-08-034120-0.50023-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780080341200500230)

M.K. Bennett, S. Rohani, Design of a software application for the simulation and control of continuous and batch crystallizer circuits, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 33, Issue 6, June 2002, Pages 365-374, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0965-9978(02)00022-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997802000224)
Abstract: A computer application was developed for the simulation of industrial crystallizers, including the draft-tube baffled, forced-circulation, and Oslo crystallizers. The application enables the design and control of single and multiple effect, batch and continuous crystallizer circuits. C++ classes that dynamically simulate several batch and continuous industrial crystallizers, auxiliary vessels such as mixers and pumps, and controllers, are coupled with a graphical user interface. The flowsheet-style interface facilitates the configuration and interconnection of various components. Graphs for the dynamic display of simulation data were created and an example simulation illustrates the use of the program.
Keywords: Object oriented programming; Graphical user interface; Dynamic simulation; Industrial crystallizers; Batch; Continuous; Single and multiple effect

Ellen Dekkers, Leif Kobbelt, Richard Pawlicki, Randall C. Smith, A sketching interface for feature curve recovery of free-form surfaces, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 43, Issue 7, July 2011, Pages 771-780, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cad.2010.10.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010448511000108)
Abstract: In this paper, we present a semi-automatic approach to efficiently and robustly recover the characteristic feature curves of a given free-form surface where we do not have to assume that the input is a proper manifold. The technique supports a sketch-based interface where the user just has to roughly sketch the location of a feature by drawing a stroke directly on the input mesh. The system then snaps this initial curve to the correct position based on a graph-cut optimization scheme that takes various surface properties into account. Additional position constraints can be placed and modified manually which allows for an interactive feature curve editing functionality. We demonstrate the usefulness of our technique by applying it to two practical scenarios. At first, feature curves can be used as handles for surface deformation, since they describe the main characteristics of an object. Our system allows the user to manipulate a curve while the underlying non-manifold surface adopts itself to the deformed feature. Secondly, we apply our technique to a practical problem scenario in reverse engineering. Here, we consider the problem of generating a statistical (PCA) shape model for car bodies. The crucial step is to establish proper feature correspondences between a large number of input models. Due to the significant shape variation, fully automatic techniques are doomed to failure. With our simple and effective feature curve recovery tool, we can quickly sketch a set of characteristic features on each input model which establishes the correspondence to a pre-defined template mesh and thus allows us to generate the shape model. Finally, we can use the feature curves and the shape model to implement an intuitive modeling metaphor to explore the shape space spanned by the input models.
Keywords: Feature extraction; Sketch-based interfaces; Curve-based modeling; Surface registration; Statistical shape model

Saeid Azizian, Derivation of a simple equation for close to equilibrium adsorption dynamics of surfactants at air/liquid interface using statistical rate theory, Colloids and Surfaces A: Physicochemical and Engineering Aspects, Volume 380, Issues 1–3, 5 May 2011, Pages 107-110, ISSN 0927-7757, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.colsurfa.2011.02.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0927775711001178)
Abstract: The statistical rate theory was applied for modeling of dynamics of surfactant adsorption at air/liquid interface, when the system is close to equilibrium. By using an approximation in the rate equation of statistical rate theory, a simple equation was derived for close to equilibrium systems. Based on this new equation, it is possible to find the rate constant of surfactant adsorption at air/liquid interface by a linear plot, easily. The applicability of the obtained equation was evaluated by analysis of set of numerically simulated data based on stochastic method and also two different sets of experimental data.
Keywords: Adsorption dynamics; Surfactant; Statistical rate theory; Air/liquid interface

Líney Árnadóttir, Eric M. Stuve, Hannes Jónsson, The effect of coadsorbed water on the stability, configuration and interconversion of formyl (HCO) and hydroxymethylidyne (COH) on platinum (1 1 1), Chemical Physics Letters, Volume 541, 10 July 2012, Pages 32-38, ISSN 0009-2614, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cplett.2012.05.024.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0009261412006008)
Abstract: Two forms of the methanol electro-oxidation intermediate with stoichiometry C:H:O, COH (hydroxymethylidyne) and HCO (formyl), on Pt (1 1 1) with and without coadsorbed water were studied using density functional theory calculations. The structure, adsorption energy and stability with respect to dissociation were calculated. Both HCO and C–OH were stable on clean Pt (1 1 1) and with a single coadsorbed water molecule, while only the HCO configuration was stable in the presence of a whole water layer. The vibrational modes of HCO on a bridge site showed no mode around 1700 cm−1 characteristic of CO stretch making it hard to distinguish it from C–OH.

Matthias Hettel, Claudia Diehm, Henning Bonart, Olaf Deutschmann, Numerical simulation of a structured catalytic methane reformer by DUO: The new computational interface for OpenFOAM® and DETCHEM™, Catalysis Today, Volume 258, Part 2, 1 December 2015, Pages 230-240, ISSN 0920-5861, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cattod.2015.02.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920586115000887)
Abstract: Abstract
The catalytic partial oxidation of methane over a honeycomb-structured Rh/Al2O3 coated catalyst is studied at a molar C/O ratio of unity and short-contact times experimentally and numerically. Axial species and temperature profiles inside the catalytic monolith are measured by a capillary sampling technique. A detailed numerical analysis of the flow, temperature and species concentration profiles is conducted using the new software tool DUO, which is an interface for the coupling of the computational tools OpenFOAM® and DETCHEM™. This interface enables the integration of detailed surface chemistry into OpenFOAM® and allows the time-efficient calculation of structured catalysts and other catalytic reactors with multiple combined fluid and solid regions including heterogeneous reactions. In comparison with experimental data, spatial profiles of species and temperature are analyzed. The thermal boundary conditions are shown to have a strong impact on reliable predictions. Even though the characteristics of the influence of radial heat loss on the conversion can be governed, the use of a radiation model is recommended.
Keywords: Methane; Partial oxidation; Rh, monolithic catalysts; Numerical simulation; CFD

Brett Shavers and Eric Zimmerman, Chapter 7 - Advanced Use of X-Ways Forensics, In X-Ways Forensics Practitioner’s Guide, Syngress, 2014, Pages 153-179, ISBN 9780124116054, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-411605-4.00007-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124116054000077)
Abstract: Abstract
As mentioned in previous chapters, X-Ways Forensics (XWF) allows for looking at the contents of objects as they exist on disk. XWF includes several features that allow you to selectively include pieces of data from an object as opposed to the entire object. XWF also provides ways to adjust the majority of options via dialog boxes using common Windows paradigms such as checkboxes, drop-down lists, text boxes, etc., directly in the graphical user interface (GUI). Most users will never have a need to go beyond what is provided directly in XWF. There are, however, occasions where it is necessary to customize certain aspects of XWF that are not possible using the XWF GUI. Both of these topics as well as other advanced techniques will be covered in this chapter.
Keywords: Configuration file; Template; Timeline; Events; Free space; Slack; User search hit; Virtual file

Giulio Zanni, Gordon R. Pennock, A unified graphical approach to the static analysis of axially loaded structures, Mechanism and Machine Theory, Volume 44, Issue 12, December 2009, Pages 2187-2203, ISSN 0094-114X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.mechmachtheory.2009.07.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0094114X09001311)
Abstract: The paper presents a unified approach to graphical methods for the static force analysis of axially loaded plane structures. This approach consists of a unified diagram which incorporates both the frame and stress diagrams. This unified representation is applied to a simple Maxwell frame and the authors include a rigorous investigation of the equivalence between the unified diagram and traditional diagrams. The paper shows that traditional diagrams can, in fact, be regarded as particular cases of the unified diagram. The concept of self-reciprocity is introduced and a dual kinematic interpretation of the unified diagram is obtained from a sequence of equivalent diagrams. These diagrams can be obtained in a straightforward manner by changing the force scale factor.
Keywords: Statics; Frame diagrams; Stress diagrams; Reciprocal figures; Unified and interactive diagrams; Determinate and indeterminate trusses

S.K. Ghosh, Ehab Al-Shaer and P. Bera, Chapter 24 - Formal Analysis of Policy-Based Security Configurations in Enterprise Networks, In Handbook on Securing Cyber-Physical Critical Infrastructure, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2012, Pages 595-631, ISBN 9780124158153, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-415815-3.00024-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124158153000248)
Abstract: Due to an increasing complexity of network configurations including large topology, use of heterogeneous network services, and accessibility to different network/cyber users, enterprise networks deploy security measures based on organizational security requirements. Typically, organizational security policy represents the high-level security requirements for controlling allowing/denying network resource accesses constrained by traffic source, destination, protocol, access time, encryption property/secured tunneling, etc. These policies are configured in the network by deploying varieties of security devices (routers, firewalls, IPSec, etc.) in a distributed manner. Each security device implements a specific policy using a set of access control rules, usually called as access control lists (ACLs).

However, the major problem the network administrators are facing today is to verify the consistency of the distributed security configuration with the organizational security policy. The complexity of this verification problem lies in various issues: (i) intra- and inter-device policy configuration conflicts; (ii) complex policy constraints (time-dependent access control); and (iii) presence of inconsistent hidden access paths in the configuration. Manual analysis of this problem can be overwhelming and potentially inaccurate due to high potential of human errors. Therefore, developing models and methodologies for automated analysis of network security policy configurations is an important but challenging problem. In this chapter, we present formal approaches for verifying policy-based security configurations in enterprise networks. The chapter mainly focuses on analyzing consistency of distributed Router ACL and IPSec-based policy configurations using Boolean satisfiability (SAT) analysis and Binary Decision Diagram (BDD). The efficacy of these approaches are presented through experimentations and evaluation.

Keywords: network security, security policy, access control lists (ACL), IPSec, formal methods, Boolean satisfiability (SAT), binary decision diagram (BDD)

Carlos Camacho, Luis Llana, Alberto Núñez, Cost-related interface for software product lines, Journal of Logical and Algebraic Methods in Programming, Volume 85, Issue 1, Part 2, January 2016, Pages 227-244, ISSN 2352-2208, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jlamp.2015.09.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2352220815000917)
Abstract: Abstract
Software Product Lines modeling improves software development processes by automating system debugging and analysis. The objective of this paper focuses on extending the formal framework SPLA to represent features such as cost objects and comparisons between products in terms of production costs. We illustrate this extension with a practical example by modeling the creation of valid run-lists for Chef, a widely used configuration management tool. Also, we execute our formal specification in a distributed system using SCOOP and we provide strategies to optimize the effort required to compute a SPLA term.
Keywords: Software product lines; Cost models; Formal methods; Feature models; Chef.io; Run-list

Rolf J. Korneliussen, The Bergen echo integrator post-processing system, with focus on recent improvements, Fisheries Research, Volume 68, Issues 1–3, July 2004, Pages 159-169, ISSN 0165-7836, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fishres.2004.01.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0165783604000499)
Abstract: The Bergen echo integrator (BEI), which has evolved over many years, is a software system designed for convenient post-processing of echo-sounder data. BEI meets international standards and is essentially machine-independent. The development of BEI for the analysis of various scatterers such as zooplankton, pelagic fish, demersal fish and bottom is reviewed. The system design is described and the latest improvements are discussed. Among these improvements are the ability to quantify and remove noise, and a system that combines data at different acoustic frequencies for the generation and analysis of synthetic echograms. General operating procedures are described for the extraction of information while scrutinising and interpreting acoustical data.
Keywords: Echo integration; Post-processing; Graphical user interface; Relative frequency response; Noise removal; Interpretation; Fisheries research acoustics

Chen Xiaobing, A New Layout Method Allowing the Overlapped Configuration of Photos, Physics Procedia, Volume 24, Part C, 2012, Pages 2207-2213, ISSN 1875-3892, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.phpro.2012.02.324.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1875389212003677)
Abstract: We propose a new photo summarization system that provides the user with a summarized view of clustered photos. The summarized view provides the following major functions to the user. It selects a representative photo from each clusters. It detects the noticeable region based on the image feature extraction method system.
Keywords: photo; photo clustering; layout

Ahmet Cengizhan Dirican, Mehmet Göktürk, Involuntary postural responses of users as input to Attentive Computing Systems: An investigation on head movements, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 28, Issue 5, September 2012, Pages 1634-1647, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2012.04.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563212000945)
Abstract: Automatic motor or involuntary postural behaviors of users have been receiving an increasing interest in recent years, as unobtrusive measures of cognitive states. In this paper, we investigate the involuntary postural responses of seated users derived from their cognitive changes as input for Attentive Computing Systems. The paper first introduces seated posture, its advantages for cognitive state assessment and connections with cognitive states and, related studies in order to provide a research background for this emerging area of research. We then focus on head posture of seated users and examine the involuntary head movements correlated with task engagement and changing task difficulty through an experiment conducted using a display-oriented cognitive task with changing difficulties. The experiment included 31 participants. Based on different measures, head response and speed, data gathered from user studies were analyzed. Repeated measures Analysis of Variances revealed that head response and speed could serve as cognitive engagement measures. The results indicated that participants get closer to a computer display and became more stationary when they were engaged in a task. The task difficulty analysis results, conversely, partially fulfilled our initial expectations. Head response and speed exhibited limited sensitive behaviors as task difficulties changed.
Keywords: Attentive Computing Systems; Cognitive state assessment; Involuntary; Seated posture; Head movements; Nonverbal communication

Sandeep R. Kondaveeti, Iman Izadi, Sirish L. Shah, Tim Black, Graphical Representation of Industrial Alarm Data, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 43, Issue 13, 2010, Pages 181-186, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20100831-4-FR-2021.00033.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015325283)
Abstract: Abstract
Alarms are important for safe and reliable operation of a process. Ideally, every alarm that is presented to the operator requires an action. Owing to the ease in implementing alarms, many modern day process plants have a large number of alarms configured in their alarm system. Many of these alarms are set without proper rationalization resulting in the generation of nuisance alarms. During process upsets, the volume of alarms presented to the operator is often too large to facilitate appropriate and timely actions. This work demonstrates some novel visualization tools that can be used for assessing the performance of alarm systems in terms of effectively identifying nuisance alarms. The utility of the developed tools is illustrated using real industrial alarm data.
Keywords: Alarm systems; Process monitoring; Fault detection; Visualization; HMI

Diana L. Knittle, Stephen Ruth, Ella Paton Gardner, Establishing user-centered criteria for information systems: A software ergonomics perspective, Information & Management, Volume 11, Issue 4, November 1986, Pages 163-172, ISSN 0378-7206, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0378-7206(86)90001-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0378720686900017)
Abstract: Despite its importance and increasing cost, interactive software is rarely considered a suitable subject for the development of metrics or standards of performance beyond those traditionally used for hardware: speed, response time, etc. This article examines and extends a specific set of criteria first recommended by Louis Fried as a possible basis for evaluating such software rigorously. This approach is based on the concepts of ergonomics, which focus directly on the reaction of the user to the system rather than the system to the user. It is then possible to be much more specific in identifying effects of system messages, prompts, formats and a wide range of other characteristics of the user's milieu. Examples are given, and the authors conclude that such approaches make it possible to be rigorous and exact in specifying the characteristics of the interactive language of the system.
Keywords: Software metrics; interface design; software ergonomics; software engineering; user centered programming; human factors in systems design

Vinayak, Karthik Ramani, A gesture-free geometric approach for mid-air expression of design intent in 3D virtual pottery, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 69, December 2015, Pages 11-24, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cad.2015.06.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S001044851500086X)
Abstract: Abstract
The advent of depth cameras has enabled mid-air interactions for shape modeling with bare hands. Typically, these interactions employ a finite set of pre-defined hand gestures to allow users to specify modeling operations in virtual space. However, human interactions in real world shaping processes (such as pottery or sculpting) are complex, iterative, and continuous. In this paper, we show that the expression of user intent in shaping processes can be derived from the geometry of contact between the hand and the manipulated object. Specifically, we describe the design and evaluation of a geometric interaction technique for bare-hand mid-air virtual pottery. We model the shaping of a pot as a gradual and progressive convergence of the pot’s profile to the shape of the user’s hand represented as a point-cloud (PCL). Thus, a user does not need to learn, know, or remember any gestures to interact with our system. Our choice of pottery simplifies the geometric representation, allowing us to systematically study how users use their hands and fingers to express the intent of deformation during a shaping process. Our evaluations demonstrate that it is possible to enable users to express their intent for shape deformation without the need for a fixed set of gestures for clutching and deforming a shape.
Keywords: Hand-based shape modeling; Mid-air interactions; Virtual pottery; Gestures; Natural user interfaces; Mesh deformation

Halvard Haug, Johannes Greulich, Achim Kimmerle, Erik Stensrud Marstein, PC1Dmod 6.1 – state-of-the-art models in a well-known interface for improved simulation of Si solar cells, Solar Energy Materials and Solar Cells, Volume 142, November 2015, Pages 47-53, ISSN 0927-0248, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.solmat.2015.05.047.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0927024815002640)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper, we present a new, updated version of the commonly used semiconductor device simulator PC1D named PC1Dmod 6.1. The new program is based on the previously published command line version cmd-PC1D 6.0, which has implemented several new options related to the device physics, but now uses an updated version of the original PC1D graphical user interface. The program thus provides the possibility for using Fermi–Dirac statistics and a selection of state-of-the-art models for crystalline silicon, including injection-dependent band gap narrowing, carrier mobility and Auger recombination, in a familiar setting.

Version 6.1 also has implemented the recently published band gap narrowing model by Yan and Cuevas, which is based on empirical studies of a large selection of both n+ and p+ emitters, in addition to Schenk's model. It has also implemented the mobility model for compensated material by Schindler et al. Finally, the maximum number of nodes, time steps and wavelengths have been increased in order to reduce unnecessary constraints on simulations and external files.

The results from the PC1Dmod 6.1 simulations have been compared with those of other simulation tools and with previously published data to verify the correct implementation of the new models. Emitter saturation currents calculated using PC1Dmod 6.1 showed an excellent agreement with those obtained using the emitter recombination calculator EDNA 2, and the new program was able to successfully reproduce previously published experimental data and previous implementations of the models. Both PC1Dmod 6.1 and the command line version cmd-PC1D 6.1 are open source software, and are freely available for download.
Keywords: Silicon; Device simulation; Solar cell; Fermi–Dirac statistics

Daniel Castaño-Díez, Mikhail Kudryashev, Marcel Arheit, Henning Stahlberg, Dynamo: A flexible, user-friendly development tool for subtomogram averaging of cryo-EM data in high-performance computing environments, Journal of Structural Biology, Volume 178, Issue 2, May 2012, Pages 139-151, ISSN 1047-8477, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jsb.2011.12.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1047847711003650)
Abstract: Dynamo is a new software package for subtomogram averaging of cryo Electron Tomography (cryo-ET) data with three main goals: first, Dynamo allows user-transparent adaptation to a variety of high-performance computing platforms such as GPUs or CPU clusters. Second, Dynamo implements user-friendliness through GUI interfaces and scripting resources. Third, Dynamo offers user-flexibility through a plugin API. Besides the alignment and averaging procedures, Dynamo includes native tools for visualization and analysis of results and data, as well as support for third party visualization software, such as Chimera UCSF or EMAN2. As a demonstration of these functionalities, we studied bacterial flagellar motors and showed automatically detected classes with absent and present C-rings.

Subtomogram averaging is a common task in current cryo-ET pipelines, which requires extensive computational resources and follows a well-established workflow. However, due to the data diversity, many existing packages offer slight variations of the same algorithm to improve results. One of the main purposes behind Dynamo is to provide explicit tools to allow the user the insertion of custom designed procedures – or plugins – to replace or complement the native algorithms in the different steps of the processing pipeline for subtomogram averaging without the burden of handling parallelization. Custom scripts that implement new approaches devised by the user are integrated into the Dynamo data management system, so that they can be controlled by the GUI or the scripting capacities.

Dynamo executables do not require licenses for third party commercial software. Sources, executables and documentation are freely distributed on http://www.dynamo-em.org.
Keywords: Subtomogram averaging; Single Particle Tomography; High-performance computing; GPU computing; Classification

R.D. Kent, M. Schlesinger, Data structure techniques for the graphical special unitary group approach to arbitrary spin representations, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 43, Issue 3, February–March 1987, Pages 413-437, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0010-4655(87)90058-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0010465587900580)
Abstract: Title of programs: GENDRT, DRTDIM Catalogue number: AATF Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen's University of Belfast, N. Ireland (see application form in this issue) Computer: IBM PC, PC/XT, PC/AT; Installation: University of Windsor Operating system: MS-DOS (PC-DOS) version 2.1 or higher Programming language used: Pascal High speed storage required: GENDRT - 128 Kwords minimum, DRTDIM - 128 Kwords minimum Number of bits in a word: 16 Peripherals used: video terminal, floppy or hard disk Number of lines in combined program and test deck: GENDRT - 2048, DRTDIM - 2337
Keywords: SU(n) groups; graph theory; graphical data structures; arbitrary spin representations; spectroscopy; micro-computer applications

Eui S. Jung, Youngjae Im, Touchable area: An empirical study on design approach considering perception size and touch input behavior, International Journal of Industrial Ergonomics, Volume 49, September 2015, Pages 21-30, ISSN 0169-8141, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ergon.2015.05.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169814115000736)
Abstract: Abstract
As the use of mobile touch devices continues to increase, distinctive user experiences can be provided through a direct manipulation. Therefore, the characteristics of touch interfaces should be considered regarding their controllability. This study aims to provide a design approach for touch-based user interfaces. A derivation procedure for the touchable area is proposed as a design guideline based on input behavior. To these ends, two empirical tests were conducted through a smart phone interface. Fifty-five participants were asked to perform a series of input tasks on a screen. As results, touchable area with a desirable hit rate of 90% could be yielded depending on the icon design. To improve the applicability of the touchable area, user error was analyzed based on omission-commission classification. The most suitable design had a hit rate of 95% compared to 90 and 99%. This study contributes practical implications for user interaction design with finger-based controls.
Relevance to industry
This research describes a distinctive design approach that guarantees the desired touch accuracy for effective use of mobile touch devices. Therefore, the results will encourage interface designers to take into account the input behavior of fingers from a user-centered perspective.
Keywords: Design approach; Touch user interface; Touchable area; Input behavior and hit rate

Arun Katkere, Jennifer Schlenzig, Amarnath Gupta, Ramesh Jain, Interactive video on WWW: Beyond VCR-like interfaces, Computer Networks and ISDN Systems, Volume 28, Issues 7–11, May 1996, Pages 1559-1572, ISSN 0169-7552, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-7552(96)00025-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0169755296000256)
Abstract: The WWW is evolving into a predominantly visual medium. The demand for access to images and video has been increasing rapidly. Interactive Video systems, which provide access to the content in video archives, are starting to emerge on the www. Partly due to the two-dimensional nature of the web, and partly due to the fact that images that comprise the video are two dimensional, most of these systems provide a VCR-like interface (play, fast-forward, reverse, etc., with additions like object selection, motion specification in the image space, and viewpoint selection). The basis of this paper is the realization that the video streams represent projections of a three-dimensional world, and the user is interested in this three-dimensional content and not the actual configuration of pixels in the image space. In this paper, we justify this intuition by enumerating the information-bearing entities that the user is interested in, and the information specification mechanisms that allow the user to query upon these entities. We will describe how such a intuitive system could be implemented using WWW technologies — VRML, HTML, and HTTP — and present our current WWW prototype which is based on extensions to some of these standards. This system is built on top of our multiple perspective interactive video (MPI Video) paradigm which provides a framework for the management of and interactive access to multiple streams of video data capturing different perspectives of related events.
Keywords: Interactive video; Interactive television; Multiple perspective video; Intuitive user interfaces; Three-dimensional user interfaces; Multimedia; Scene modeling; Visual Information Management Systems (VIMS); VRML

Dennis Koelma, Arnold Smeulders, A visual programming interface for an image processing environment, Pattern Recognition Letters, Volume 15, Issue 11, November 1994, Pages 1099-1109, ISSN 0167-8655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-8655(94)90125-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0167865594901252)
Abstract: The paper presents a visual programming interface for an image processing environment improving traditional interfaces by combining the user-friedliness of the menu &amp; dialogue approach with programming capabilities. The interface gives a layman the opportunity to develop powerful image processing applications in a two-dimensional, data flow metaphor. This metaphor provides a better insight into the structure of an application than a traditional interface.

The visual programming interface was developed in the principle of dialogue independence (Hartson and Hix, 1989). The communication between the user interface components and the computational components is well defined without jeopardizing the expressive power of the user interface. This allows for the independent development of image processing functions and user interface aspects. The integration of new functions into the environment is trivial.
Keywords: Image processing environment; Visual programming; User interface; Dialogue independence

L.P Maguire, T.M McGinnity, L.J McDaid, Issues in the development of an integrated environment for embedded system design: Part A: user needs and commercial products, Microprocessors and Microsystems, Volume 23, Issue 4, 11 October 1999, Pages 191-197, ISSN 0141-9331, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0141-9331(99)00036-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0141933199000368)
Abstract: Today's embedded system designer has limited assistance in performing system design tasks but yet has a range of software tools to assist the implementation process. The availability of these tools is often the most important issue when selecting a particular microcontroller. In this paper the authors describe research performed to analyse the requirements for the development of an Integrated Development Environment (IDE) for embedded system design. Issues are considered from a users’ viewpoint in terms of the usability and functionality of the system, and the commercial products currently available in the market. The paper concludes with a description of the need and content of a new IDE to meet the users’ requirements.
Keywords: Integrated environment; Tool integration; Survey of user needs; Commercial products

Steffen Lipperts, Anthony Sang-Bum Park, An agent-based middleware – a solution for terminal and user mobility, Computer Networks, Volume 31, Issue 19, 31 August 1999, Pages 2053-2062, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1389-1286(99)00079-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128699000791)
Abstract: Mobile agents have been identified as a high-potential technology for many application areas. One very promising domain for mobile agent deployment is mobile information access and management. Here, mobile agents promise an increased performance as well as enhanced user mobility through their ability of asynchronous, disconnected operations. However, concrete concepts for the realisation of such an agent-based user mobility are still to be delivered. Therefore, the focus in this paper is on the architecture and the agent environment design that allows terminal mobility as well as user mobility. We propose a distributed directory service like X.500 as an agent directory containing the descriptions of services available in a system, as well as the locations of the corresponding agents. A second directory structure functions as a database for terminal and user profiles. Together with concepts for mobile agent management presented in this paper, these two directories support an agent based middleware which serves as a basis for user mobility. In the following, the concepts of this mobility-supporting middleware enabled through mobile agent technology are explained.
Keywords: Mobile agents; Agent management; Kindergarten service; Service center; User mobility; Terminal mobility

Vimal Gahlot, B.L. Swami, M. Parida, Pawan Kalla, User oriented planning of bus rapid transit corridor in GIS environment, International Journal of Sustainable Built Environment, Volume 1, Issue 1, June 2012, Pages 102-109, ISSN 2212-6090, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijsbe.2012.07.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S221260901200009X)
Abstract: This paper discusses a model for, user oriented selection of bus rapid transit (BRT) corridor for Jaipur city in GIS environment. The objective of the model is to select the BRT corridor based on spatial distribution of transit trips in the city for horizon year. The model uses the demographic, transit trip and land use characteristics of the city to identify the high ridership oriented BRT corridor. The methodology comprises of two models, first model deals with BRT transit demand forecasting and second model is responsible for selection of the BRT corridor based on some pre-defined conditions. The model generates graphical GIS based maps as output for the better understanding of the transit demand pattern and policy making, for the urban planners. The methodology can be utilized for any similar size cities in Indian context for mass transit planning effectively.
Keywords: Bus rapid transit; Integrated mass rapid transit; Geographic information system; Transit demand forecasting; Alignment selection

Peter C. Lockemann, Guido Moerkotte, Andrea Neufeld, Klaus Radermacher, Norbert Runge, Database design with user-definable modelling concepts, Data & Knowledge Engineering, Volume 10, Issue 3, July 1993, Pages 229-257, ISSN 0169-023X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-023X(93)90031-J.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0169023X9390031J)
Abstract: Modelling is an integral part of engineering processes. Consequently, database design for engineering applications should take into account the modelling concepts used by engineers. On the other hand, these applications exhibit a wide diversity of modelling concepts. Rather than consolidating these into one single semantic data model one should aim for correspondingly specialized semantic models. This paper takes a constructive approach to developing such specialized models by proposing an Extensible Semantic Model (ESM) as the basis for declaring specialized semantic data models. The paper introduces a computerized environment for database design based on an ESM, and discusses the consequences of the ESM for a number of design tools: the need for a formal definition of the notion of modelling concept in order to have reliable and precise foundation for the extensions, declarative techniques for quickly introducing graphical representations for new concepts and for using them during schema design, conceptual-level test data generation for a designer-oriented evaluation of designs, and optimization techniques to control the wide latitude in mapping a conceptual schema to a logical schema. First experiences seem to point to considerable productivity gains during database design.
Keywords: Database design; logical design; database design environment; computer-aided engineering; data models; conceptual modelling; modelling concepts; deductive databases; database consistency; graphical modelling; rapid prototyping; test data generation; schema translation; data translation

Nicholas Ballard, Stefan A.F. Bon, Equilibrium orientations of non-spherical and chemically anisotropic particles at liquid–liquid interfaces and the effect on emulsion stability, Journal of Colloid and Interface Science, Volume 448, 15 June 2015, Pages 533-544, ISSN 0021-9797, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jcis.2015.02.069.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0021979715002453)
Abstract: Abstract
The effective stabilization of emulsions by solid particles, a phenomenon known as Pickering stabilization, is well known to be highly dependent on the wettability and the adhesion energy of the stabilizer employed at the liquid–liquid interface. We present a user-friendly computational model that can be used to determine equilibrium orientations and the adhesion energy of colloidal particles at interfaces. The model determines the free energy profile of particle adsorption at liquid–liquid interfaces using a triangular tessellation scheme. We demonstrate the use of the model, using a variety of anisotropic particles and demonstrate its ability to predict and explain experimental observations of particle behaviour at interfaces. In particular, we show that the concept of hydrophilic lipophilic balance commonly applied to molecular surfactants is insufficient to explain the complexity of the activity of colloidal particles at interfaces. In addition, we show the importance of the knowledge of the free energy adsorption profile of single particles at interfaces and the impact on overall free energy of emulsification of packed ensembles of particles. The delicate balance between optimization of adhesion energy, adsorption dynamics and particle packing is shown to be of great importance in the formation of thermodynamically stable emulsions. In order to use the model, the code is implemented by freely available software that can be readily deployed on personal computers.
Keywords: Pickering; Janus particle; Interfacial adsorption

Sukumar Rathnam, Michael V. Mannino, Tools for building the human-computer interface of a decision support system, Decision Support Systems, Volume 13, Issue 1, January 1995, Pages 35-59, ISSN 0167-9236, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-9236(93)E0030-H.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0167923693E0030H)
Abstract: There has been a recent trend towards using graphical, direct-manipulation interfaces in Decision Support Systems (DSS). The development of graphical, direct-manipulation interfaces for a DSS is often expensive in programming resources and elapsed time. To reduce the time and cost of interfaces development, User Interface Management Systems (UIMS) have been developed. The guiding principles of UIMSs are the re-use of interface code, the promotion of interfaces with a consistent ‘look and feel’, and the separation of the functional part of an application from its interface. UIMSs have not been as successful as expected, even if due consideration is given to the immaturity of the technology. We feel this is due to a poor understanding of the basic theoretical formalisms and software design principles for UIMSs as well as the variety of competing standards. This expository paper surveys UIMSs and their role in the construction of the human-computer interface of DSSs. It covers the formalisms underlying UIMSs and describes representative systems. It then describes the direction DSS interfaces are headed towards by presenting illustrative examples of recent systems. Finally, we raise a set of six issues that need to be addressed if UIMSs are to become a standard tool to build DSSs.
Keywords: User interface; User interface management system; Interaction modelling; DSS implementation

X. Guan, D.A. Stevenson, K.J. MacCallum, A prototype system for early geometric configuration design, Computers in Industry, Volume 30, Issue 3, 15 October 1996, Pages 233-239, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0166-3615(96)00024-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0166361596000243)
Abstract: In this paper, we present a prototype system that has been developed to support geometric configuration of objects at the early stages of design. Guided by the general principle of minimum commitment, this system assists in the iterative development of alternative geometric configurations based on approximately or precisely defined information. The system has been evaluated in the context of computer enclosure design.
Keywords: Early geometric design support; Geometric configuration; Computer aided design

Andrew P. Dove, Larry O. Jundt, J.Michael Lucas, Using an object-oriented database as a repository for process configuration data, ISA Transactions, Volume 36, Issue 4, 1997, Pages 339-343, ISSN 0019-0578, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0019-0578(97)00031-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0019057897000311)
Abstract: This paper describes the use of object-oriented database (ODBMS) technology to store process configuration data in a modern process control system. To demonstrate the improved utility and performance of an ODBMS, a comparison is made with relational databases (RDBMS). An example of how an ODBMS can be used to store Fieldbus™ configuration information is given.
Keywords: Objects; Control; Relational; Database; Configuration; Fieldbus Foundation

Thomas E. Crowl, Leslie C. Minnich Jr, Configuration techniques for a validated plant, ISA Transactions, Volume 36, Issue 3, 1997, Pages 209-218, ISSN 0019-0578, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0019-0578(97)00019-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0019057897000190)
Abstract: A major challenge in automating a validated plant is to maximize quality while optimizing the time and effort spent developing and validating the configuration. One method to achieve this optimization is to organize the detailed design and configuration effort into small pieces which can be managed more efficiently. If designed properly, the configuration can be constructed implementing reusable modules of code that are developed individually. As the reusable modules are completed, they are tested and stored in a software library under change control. ISA S88.01 models define a structure of modular entities that can be used to organize the design and configuration effort. The IEC 1131-3 configuration languages fit well into the S88.01 structures and provide a means to create, library, and reuse the change-controlled individual software modules. This paper focuses on the techniques available in IEC 1131-3 to implement generic reusable software modules for S88.01 control modules, phases and units.
Keywords: ISA S88.01; IEC 1131-3; Batch; Validation; Reusable modules; Configuration; Unit-relative

Carlos-Miguel Lorenzo, Miguel Ángel Sicilia, Salvador Sánchez, Studying the effectiveness of multi-user immersive environments for collaborative evaluation tasks, Computers & Education, Volume 59, Issue 4, December 2012, Pages 1361-1376, ISSN 0360-1315, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compedu.2012.06.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0360131512001443)
Abstract: Massively Multiuser On-line Learning (MMOL) Platforms, often called “virtual learning worlds”, constitute a still unexplored context for communication-enhanced learning, where synchronous communication skills in an explicit social setting enhance the potential of effective collaboration. In this paper, we report on an experimental study of collaborative evaluation in an MMOL setting with 21 graduate students enrolled in university courses in technology-mediated teaching and learning. This study was carried out using a prototype of a 3D MMOL platform built around an interactive space called “MadriPolis”. This space was used to recreate an adequate scenario for a collaborative experience about Learning Object evaluation using the mainstream Learning Object Review Instrument (LORI), which is based on a Convergent Participation Model (CPM). The same experience was carried out using a conventional LCMS (Learning Content Management System) platform with the aim of contrasting the outcomes and interaction patterns in the two settings. This study makes use of Social Network Analysis (SNA) measures to describe the interactions between tutors and learners. By dwelling on the advantages of immersive environments, SNA indexes revealed that these interactions were rather dense and that student participation was rather broad-based in the case of the MMOL. The results suggest that MMOL platforms could be used in collaborative evaluation tasks as a means to enhance both tutor interaction patterns and the strength of the group's relationship.
Keywords: MMOL platform; Virtual world; Immersive education; Simulations; Mixed reality; Augmented reality; Socio-computacional system; Distributed learning environment; e-learning; Educational virtual world; LORI; Convergent participation model; SNA

Kelly C. Bourne, Chapter 4 - Features Common to Many Applications, In Application Administrators Handbook, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2014, Pages 41-62, ISBN 9780123985453, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-398545-3.00004-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123985453000042)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter describes features that are common to many third-party (COTS—commercial off the shelf software) applications. Some of these features are reporting, user preferences, data, methods of importing data, application administration tools, log files, navigation, menus, breadcrumbs, dashboards, and workflow.
Key Words: COTS; modules; customizations; configuration changes; user preferences; data types; databases; imports; admin consoles; log files; breadcrumbs; dashboards; workflow; cookies

B.H. Thomas, V. Demczuk, Which animation effects improve indirect manipulation?, Interacting with Computers, Volume 14, Issue 3, April 2002, Pages 211-229, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0953-5438(01)00041-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543801000418)
Abstract: This paper describes an experiment to explore the effectiveness of animation in improving indirect manipulation operations. Indirect manipulation operations are those initiated by command menus and buttons to perform a transformation on a graphical object or set of graphical objects. The particular improvement is an operation's ability to show both what would happen if the operation were committed and what would happen if it were cancelled while an operation is being considered. The experiment required subjects to watch a simple alignment operation for a set of graphical objects. They were then asked to record the original placement of those graphical objects. Each task used one of four visual cues: modified telltale, wiggle, colour, or no visual cue. We found the modified telltale, wiggle, and colour visual effects significantly more effective than no visual feedback for cuing the user as to original position of the graphical objects. The modified telltale and colour effects were significantly more effective than the wiggle effect. The major conclusion drawn from this experiment is the use of visual feedback improves a user's ability to remember the previous position of graphical objects after an alignment operation.
Keywords: Graphical user interfaces; Indirect manipulation; Animation; Warping

Trevor Martin, Chapter 9 - Cortex Microcontroller Software Interface Standard-Real-Time Operating System, In The Designer's Guide to the Cortex-M Processor Family (Second Edition), Newnes, 2016, Pages 293-350, ISBN 9780081006290, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-08-100629-0.00009-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780081006290000098)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter introduces the key concepts needed to start development using a Real-Time Operating System (RTOS) on a Cortex-M microcontroller. The use of an RTOS is becoming an essential skill required to develop increasingly complex Cortex-M applications. The practical examples demonstrate all of the main features within the CMSIS-RTOS specification.
Keywords: CMSIS-RTOS; real time; kernel; SysTick; RTX; thread; semaphore; mutex

Spyros G. Tzafestas, 14 - Generic Systemic and Software Architectures for Mobile Robot Intelligent Control, In Introduction to Mobile Robot Control, Elsevier, Oxford, 2014, Pages 589-633, ISBN 9780124170490, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-417049-0.00014-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124170490000146)
Abstract: This chapter is concerned with systemic and software architectures that can be used for integrating controllers and high-level functional units to achieve overall intelligent performance of a mobile robot. Software architectures help to deal with the high degree of heterogeneity among the subsystems involved, to face strict operational constraints posed by real-time interactions with the robot’s environment, and to treat the system’s complexity that goes beyond the capabilities of a single designer.

The purpose of this chapter is to provide a tour to fundamental concepts and architectures that integrate low-, medium-, and high-level control and planning functions of mobile robotic systems. Specifically, the following issues are considered: (i) hierarchical, multiresolutional, reference model, and behavior-based system control architectures; (ii) basic characteristics of software architectures; (iii) two examples of robot software control architectures; (iv) comparative evaluation of two software architectures; (v) intelligent human–robot interfaces; (vi) two intelligent mobile robot research prototypes (SENARIO, ROMAN); (vii) design for heterogeneity and modularity.
Keywords: Intelligent control architecture (ICA); hierarchical ICA; multiresolutional ICA; reference model ICA; behavior-based ICA; mobile robot control software architecture; Jde component-oriented architecture; layered mobile robot control software architecture; BERRA; Saphira architecture; WMR software control architecture characteristics; intelligent human–robot interface (HRI); HRI function; intelligent WMR prototype; graphical HRI; SENARIO intelligent wheelchair; semi-autonomous mode; fully autonomous mode; ROMAN intelligent mobile manipulator; multimodel HRI; design for heterogeneity; modular design

Kristina M. Gruevski, Michael W.R. Holmes, Chad E. Gooyers, Clark R. Dickerson, Jack P. Callaghan, Lumbar postures, seat interface pressures and discomfort responses to a novel thoracic support for police officers during prolonged simulated driving exposures, Applied Ergonomics, Volume 52, January 2016, Pages 160-168, ISSN 0003-6870, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apergo.2015.07.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0003687015300442)
Abstract: Abstract
A high prevalence of low back pain has been reported among professional drivers, including mobile police officers. The purpose of this investigation was to develop and evaluate a novel thoracic support designed for mobile police officers. Fourteen participants (7 male, 7 female) attended two 120-min driving simulations using a Crown Victoria Interceptor seat and the same seat equipped with a surface mounted thoracic support. Time-varying spine postures, seat pressures and ratings of discomfort were measured. Averaged discomfort values were low (less than 10 mm of a possible 100 mm) for both seating conditions. The postures in the thoracic support condition were more similar to non-occupational driving without occupational equipment than the Crown Victoria seating condition. The reduction in pressure area at the low back with the thoracic support has the potential to reduce discomfort reporting in officers compared to a standard vehicle package.
Keywords: Occupational driving; Low back pain; Thoracic support

Alistair Sutcliffe and Jan Gulliksen, Chapter 18 - User-Centered Requirements Definition, In Usability in Government Systems, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2012, Pages 285-300, ISBN 9780123910639, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-391063-9.00050-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978012391063900050X)
Abstract: Requirements play an essential role in all types of system development, and their role in public and government systems cannot be overestimated. However, new technological platforms, new software engineering processes, and new demands from clients and legislation are changing the nature of development. These changes demand more flexible, user-centered requirements analysis processes and increase the criticality of the role that requirements play in the communication between developers and users.

This chapter outlines the general principles behind user-centered requirements definition and summarizes our experiences and the major lessons we have learned from a number of applied projects in the public sector.

Keywords: Agile processes, requirements analysis, user-centered design

C.J. Butz, S. Hua, J. Chen, H. Yao, A simple graphical approach for understanding probabilistic inference in Bayesian networks, Information Sciences, Volume 179, Issue 6, 1 March 2009, Pages 699-716, ISSN 0020-0255, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ins.2008.10.036.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0020025508004556)
Abstract: We present a simple graphical method for understanding exact probabilistic inference in discrete Bayesian networks (BNs). A conditional probability table (conditional) is depicted as a directed acyclic graph involving one or more black vertices and zero or more white vertices. The probability information propagated in a network can then be graphically illustrated by introducing the black variable elimination (BVE) algorithm. We prove the correctness of BVE and establish its polynomial time complexity. Our method possesses two salient characteristics. This purely graphical approach can be used as a pedagogical tool to introduce BN inference to beginners. This is important as it is commonly stated that newcomers have difficulty learning BN inference due to intricate mathematical equations and notation. Secondly, BVE provides a more precise description of BN inference than the state-of-the-art discrete BN inference technique, called LAZY-AR. LAZY-AR propagates potentials, which are not well-defined probability distributions. Our approach only involves conditionals, a special case of potential.
Keywords: Bayesian networks; Join tree propagation; Probabilistic inference; Conditional independence

Alun Thomas, Estimation of graphical models whose conditional independence graphs are interval graphs and its application to modelling linkage disequilibrium, Computational Statistics & Data Analysis, Volume 53, Issue 5, 15 March 2009, Pages 1818-1828, ISSN 0167-9473, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csda.2008.02.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167947308000546)
Abstract: Estimation of graphical models whose conditional independence graph comes from the general class of decomposable graphs is compared with estimation under the more restrictive assumption that the graphs are interval graphs. This restriction is shown to improve the mixing of the Markov chain Monte Carlo search to find an optimal model with little effect on the haplotype frequencies implied by the estimates. A further restriction requiring intervals to cover specified points is also considered and shown to be appropriate for modelling associations between alleles at genetic loci. As well as usefully describing the patterns of associations, these estimates can also be used to model population haplotype frequencies in statistical gene mapping methods such as linkage analysis and association studies.

Daniel W. Spring, Glaucio H. Paulino, Computational homogenization of the debonding of particle reinforced composites: The role of interphases in interfaces, Computational Materials Science, Volume 109, November 2015, Pages 209-224, ISSN 0927-0256, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.commatsci.2015.07.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S092702561500422X)
Abstract: Abstract
There are four primary factors which influence the macroscopic constitutive response of particle reinforced composites: component properties, component concentrations, interphases, and interfacial debonding. Interphases are often a byproduct of surface treatments applied to the particles to control agglomeration. Alternatively, in polymer based materials such as carbon-black reinforced rubber, an interphase or “bound rubber” phase often occurs at the particle–matrix interface. This interphasial region has been known to exist for many decades, but is often omitted in computational investigations of such composites. In this paper, we present an investigation into the influence of interphases on the large deformation response of particle reinforced composites. In addition, since particles tend to debond from the matrix at large deformations, we investigate the influence of interfacial debonding on the macroscopic constitutive response. The investigation considers two different microstructures; both a simplified single particle model, and a more complex polydisperse representative unit cell. Cohesive elements, which follow the Park–Paulino–Roesler traction–separation relation, are inserted between each particle and its corresponding interphase to account for debonding. To account for friction, we present a new, coupled cohesive–friction model and detail its formulation and implementation. For each microstructure, we discuss the influence of the interphase thickness and stiffness on the global constitutive response in both uniaxial tension and simple shear. To validate the computational framework, comparisons are made with experimental results available in the literature.
Keywords: Representative unit cells; Interphases; Interfacial debonding; Coupled cohesive–friction relation

Alan Witten, Geophysica: MATLAB-based software for the simulation, display and processing of near-surface geophysical data, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 28, Issue 6, July 2002, Pages 751-762, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0098-3004(01)00109-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098300401001091)
Abstract: A MATLAB-based computer code has been developed for the simulation and processing of near-surface geophysical data. The methods considered include: seismic reflection and refraction, ground penetrating radar, magnetometry, electromagnetic induction, gravity, and electrical resistivity. The primary motivation for this effort is to support the teaching of near-surface geophysics; however, the code can also be used as a tool to design field surveys and to display and process actual data. The complete code is a sequence of “m-files” and, as such, it is easily modified or extended to suit the needs of other users.
Keywords: Modeling; Data processing; Visualization; Graphical user interface; Interactive

Carina Fors, Katja Kircher, Christer Ahlström, Interface design of eco-driving support systems – Truck drivers’ preferences and behavioural compliance, Transportation Research Part C: Emerging Technologies, Volume 58, Part D, September 2015, Pages 706-720, ISSN 0968-090X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.trc.2015.03.035.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0968090X15001242)
Abstract: Abstract
The aim of the study was to investigate the perceived usefulness of various types of in-vehicle feedback and advice on fuel efficient driving. Twenty-four professional truck drivers participated in a driving simulator study. Two eco-driving support systems were included in the experiment: one that provided continuous information and one that provided intermittent information. After the simulator session, the participants were interviewed about their experiences of the various constituents of the systems. In general, the participants had a positive attitude towards eco-driving support systems and behavioural data indicated that they tended to comply with the advice given. However, different drivers had very different preferences with respect to what type of information they found useful. The majority of the participants preferred simple and clear information. The eco-driving constituents that were rated as most useful were advice on gas pedal pressure, speed guidance, feedback on manoeuvres, fuel consumption information and simple statistics. It is concluded that customisable user interfaces are recommended for eco-driving support systems for trucks.
Keywords: Eco-driving; Driver support system; Truck; Interview; Driving simulator

Badri Narayanan, Sanket A. Deshmukh, Subramanian K.R.S. Sankaranarayanan, Shriram Ramanathan, Strong correlations between structural order and passive state at water–copper oxide interfaces, Electrochimica Acta, Volume 179, 10 October 2015, Pages 386-393, ISSN 0013-4686, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.electacta.2015.03.221.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0013468615008701)
Abstract: Abstract
A fundamental understanding of coupled electrochemical processes including metal dissolution, structural evolution and solvation dynamics at the atomic level is of interest to corrosion research and electrochemistry in general. Using molecular dynamics (MD) simulations based on a reactive force field (ReaxFF), we evaluate the impact of non-stoichiometry in a model system of copper oxide passive films on the local fluctuation of the chloride ion density and structure and dynamics of interfacial water layers. We investigate (a) the interplay of oxygen content in the passive oxide film and the solvation dynamics of halide ions in the aqueous interfacial layers during breakdown of the oxide film, and (b) their combined effects on the dissolution kinetics of copper and adsorption of chloride ions on the copper-oxide surface. We demonstrate that the solvation behavior, particularly near the oxide/aqueous medium interface, is strongly correlated with the interfacial chloride ion concentration, which in turn is influenced by the oxygen stoichiometry in the passive oxide. Residence probability and hydrogen-bond correlations show that water present in the aqueous media forms ordered layers on oxide films with high oxygen content; and as the oxygen content is reduced, this order gets disrupted due to increased chloride ion adsorption. Interfacial molecular order is, therefore, strongly correlated with stoichiometry of the passive oxide film.

Yung-Wei Kao, Shyan-Ming Yuan, User-configurable semantic home automation, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 34, Issue 1, January 2012, Pages 171-188, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2011.08.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548911000821)
Abstract: The ideas of smart home and home automation have been proposed for many years. However, when discussing homes of the future, related studies have usually focused on deploying various smart appliances (or devices) within a home environment and employing those appliances automatically by pre-defined procedures. The difficulties of supporting user-configurable automation are due to the complexity of various dynamic home environments. Moreover, within their home domains, users usually think semantically; for example, “I want to turn off all the lights on the second floor”. This paper proposes a semantic home automation system, USHAS (User-configurable Semantic Home Automation System), which adopts Web Service and WSBPEL for executing automated process; OWL and OWL-S for defining home environments and service ontology; and a self-defined markup language, SHPL (Semantic Home Process Language), for describing semantic processes.
Keywords: Smart home; Semantic home; Home automation; Web service; OWL

F. Fotopoulos, C. Makropoulos, M.A. Mimikou, Flood forecasting in transboundary catchments using the Open Modeling Interface, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 25, Issue 12, December 2010, Pages 1640-1649, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2010.06.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815210002021)
Abstract: Using satellite data for flood forecasting in catchments located in mid-latitudes is challenging to engineers and model developers, in no small part due to the plethora of data sets that need to be retrieved, combined, calibrated and used for simulation in real time. The differences between the various satellite rainfall data products and the continuous improvement in their quantity and quality render the development of a single software tool, able to read and process all the different data sets, particularly difficult. Even if such an endeavour was undertaken, the degree of flexibility and extensibility that such a tool would require to accommodate future versions of data sets, available in different file formats as well as different temporal and spatial resolution should not be underestimated. This paper describes the development of a flood forecasting system that addresses this issue through a modular architecture based on the use of the Open Modeling Interface (OpenMI) standard, which facilitates the interaction between a number of separate software components. It is suggested that this approach greatly simplifies programming and debugging and eliminates the need to create spatial and temporal transformation functions without significantly compromising the overall execution speed. The approach and system were tested for forecasting flood events within a particularly challenging transboundary catchment, the Evros catchment, extending between Greece, Bulgaria and Turkey. The system uses two sets of data sources, as an example (NASA’s TRMM 3B42 and 3B42RT satellite data sets) to forecast flooding in the Evros catchment. Results indicate that OpenMI greatly facilitates the complex interaction of various software components and considerably increases the flexibility and extensibility of the overall system and hence its operational value and sustainability.
Keywords: 3B42; 3B42RT; Early warning; Evros; Flood forecasting; Open modeling interface; OpenMI; Rainfall – runoff; Remote sensing; Satellite

Jerzy Hoja, Grzegorz Lentka, Interface circuit for impedance sensors using two specialized single-chip microsystems, Sensors and Actuators A: Physical, Volume 163, Issue 1, September 2010, Pages 191-197, ISSN 0924-4247, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.sna.2010.08.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0924424710003596)
Abstract: The paper presents an interface circuit designed for the measurement of impedance parameters of sensors or measurement cells installed on technical objects. The interface circuit allows measurement of the modulus and argument of impedance in the range of 10 Ω ≤ |Zx| ≤ 10 GΩ at a measurement frequency in the range of 0.01 Hz to 100 kHz. The new solution based on two specialized SoC AD5933 microsystems has been used. This has allowed to obtain miniaturization, low power consumption and low-cost of the circuit of the impedance interface. During tests of the realized prototype using the reference object, the object impedance measurement errors have been determined and they do not exceed ±1.6% (for relative error of impedance modulus) and ±0.6° (for absolute error of impedance argument). The obtained accuracy is fully acceptable in case of impedance measurement of anticorrosion coating in the field. The comparison measurements performed with the aid of Solartron set of instruments showed that the impedance measurement accuracy of the proposed module is comparable to laboratory set of instruments. The important advantage of the used solution based on AD5933 microsystems is lowering the power consumption down to ca. 0.7 W, which makes possible powering the measurement module from a PC using +5 V from the USB. It is a very profitable feature for a module designed to work directly in the field.
Keywords: Impedance interface; Impedance measurement; Impedance spectroscopy

Thomas S. Richardson, Cormac McFarlane, Askin Isikveren, Ken Badcock, Andrea Da Ronch, Analysis of conventional and asymmetric aircraft configurations using CEASIOM, Progress in Aerospace Sciences, Volume 47, Issue 8, November 2011, Pages 647-659, ISSN 0376-0421, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.paerosci.2011.08.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0376042111000741)
Abstract: One of the main drivers behind the SimSAC project and the CEASIOM software is to bring stability analysis and control system design earlier into the aircraft conceptual design process. Within this paper two very different aircraft are considered, a conventional T-tail based on the existing EA500 Very Light Jet and the second, a novel Z-wing configuration known as the GAV or general aviation vehicle. The first aircraft serves as a baseline comparison for the second, and the cruise case is considered as a benchmark for identifying potential drag reductions and aircraft stability characteristics. CEASIOM, the Computerised Environment for Aircraft Synthesis and Integrated Optimisation Methods, is used to generate aerodynamic data sets for both aircraft, create trim conditions and the associated linear models for classical stability analysis. The open-loop Z-wing configuration is shown to display both highly unstable and coupled modes before a multivariable Stability Augmentation System (SAS) is applied both to decouple and stabilise the aircraft. Within this paper, these two aircraft provide a test case with which to demonstrate the capabilities of the CEASIOM environment and the tools which have been developed during the SimSAC project. This new software suite is shown to allow conceptual development of unconventional novel configurations from mass properties through adaptive-fidelity aerodynamics to linear analysis and control system design.
Keywords: CEASIOM; SimSAC; Flight Control; Z-wing; Asymmetric Aircraft; Eigenstructure Assignment

Martin Ashworth, M.Susan Bloor, Alison McKay, Jon Owen, Adopting STEP for in-service configuration control, Computers in Industry, Volume 31, Issue 3, 30 November 1996, Pages 235-253, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0166-3615(96)00054-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361596000541)
Abstract: This paper shows the potential of STEP,11STEP is the ISO standard for the Exchange of Product Model Data, developed since June 1984 under the aegis of ISO TC184/SC4.
 as it is today, to represent product data to support a range of engineering requirements. STEP is designed to enable data exchange between computer applications used throughout the product life cycle. The resulting architecture of STEP, and the methodology to produce the exchange data models, are explained briefly. The exchange data models of STEP are documented in Application Protocols. Emphasis in this paper is on the Integrated Resources, the conceptual data models from which all of the STEP exchange models are derived. These resources are not well understood and hence their value is not widely appreciated. A case study for the MoD(N) concerning information support for the in-service configuration (logistics support) of naval equipment allowed the authors to use the Integrated Resources and hence demonstrate the potential of STEP. The data model which was produced is presented in this paper. It met the requirements of the MoD(N) and was simple and flexible. The authors conclude that this work confirms the feasibility of a STEP-based approach to the development of information systems to support in-service configuration control. More importantly, it demonstrates the unexploited value of the product data framework and the detailed data models already in STEP which are used in an area not yet covered by any STEP Application Protocols.
Keywords: STEP; Product data models; Logistics support; In-service configuration control

Yong-Gu Lee, Hyungjun Park, Woontaek Woo, Jeha Ryu, Hong Kook Kim, Sung Wook Baik, Kwang Hee Ko, Han Kyun Choi, Sun-Uk Hwang, Duck Bong Kim, HyunSoo Kim, Kwan H. Lee, Immersive modeling system (IMMS) for personal electronic products using a multi-modal interface, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 42, Issue 5, May 2010, Pages 387-401, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cad.2009.11.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010448509002863)
Abstract: In developing new personal electronic products, the development time has shortened to a few months due to high competition in the market. Now it has become very hard to meet the time to market by evaluating products by making physical prototypes. To overcome this problem, we propose an immersive modeling system (IMMS) that enables us to interact with a digital product model in the augmented virtual environment using a multi-modal interface. The IMMS allows the user to evaluate the product model realistically using visual, auditory, and tactile/force senses. The architecture and main modules of the system are described in detail. The integration problems encountered during the development of the test bed are discussed. Application examples to personal electronic products are also included.
Keywords: Multi-modal interface; Immersive modeling; Haptics; Augmented reality; Human machine interaction

Laura L. Downey and Sylvia Rosales, Chapter 1 - A Brief History of User Experience in Government Systems, In Usability in Government Systems, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2012, Pages 1-15, ISBN 9780123910639, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-391063-9.00033-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978012391063900033X)
Abstract: This chapter provides a brief overview of user experience (UX) in government systems from the early days of military systems to more recent activities in e-government. UX in government systems began as a result of human factor issues in defense systems. As time progressed, government information systems and intranets, as well as public-facing technology such as voting systems and government web sites, realized the benefits of UX.

Keywords: history, government, government systems, military, e-government, human-computer interaction, usability, user experience, human factors, ergonomics

Judith Günther, Andreas Bergner, Manfred Hendlich, Gerhard Klebe, Utilising Structural Knowledge in Drug Design Strategies: Applications Using Relibase†, Journal of Molecular Biology, Volume 326, Issue 2, 14 February 2003, Pages 621-636, ISSN 0022-2836, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0022-2836(02)01409-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0022283602014092)
Abstract: The concept of structure-based drug design is based upon an in-depth understanding of the principles of molecular recognition. Despite our lack of a thorough comprehension of these principles, the wealth of protein structures available opens up unprecedented possibilities for new insights from the analysis of these data. Unravelling universal rules of molecular recognition is certainly one of the most appealing goals. But our knowledge is enhanced also when studying the specific determinants that characterise single targets or target families only, and the factors governing and discriminating their recognition properties.

Here, we illustrate how the structure-based design process can benefit from the consequent incorporation of database query tools. We discuss representative examples to address issues such as protein flexibility, water molecules in binding pockets, and ligand specificity as some of the most critical aspects of drug design. All studies are carried out using our database system Relibase. We also show the application of Relibase in searching for preferred geometrical patterns between interacting molecular fragments.
Keywords: structure-based drug design; protein–ligand interaction; 3D database; data mining

Teena A.M. Carnegie, Interface as Exordium: The Rhetoric of Interactivity, Computers and Composition, Volume 26, Issue 3, September 2009, Pages 164-173, ISSN 8755-4615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compcom.2009.05.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S8755461509000401)
Abstract: In this article, I outline how the interface of new media functions rhetorically as an exordium to engage users and to dispose them to persuasion. The modular, networked, and interactive nature of new media requires an interface: a central place of interaction for the technological, human, social, and cultural aspects of new media. I propose that the interface functions rhetorically through three modes of interactivity, including multi-directionality, manipulability, and presence. By understanding these modes of interactivity and how they function to create various degrees of interaction and engagement, we can begin to develop the analytic tools needed to increase critical awareness of the interface. A rhetorical understanding of the interface enables us and our students to see that the shape and design of the interface is not natural and inevitable. The design of the interface is a design of human experience and, as such, the interface becomes a locus of power. The modes of interactivity it deploys are capable of enabling empowerment and enacting rhetorical patterns of control.
Keywords: Interface; Exordium; New media; Rhetoric; Interactivity; Directionality; Manipulability; Presence; Immersion; Flow

Yu-Hang Tang, Shuhei Kudo, Xin Bian, Zhen Li, George Em Karniadakis, Multiscale Universal Interface: A concurrent framework for coupling heterogeneous solvers, Journal of Computational Physics, Volume 297, 15 September 2015, Pages 13-31, ISSN 0021-9991, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jcp.2015.05.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0021999115003228)
Abstract: Abstract
Concurrently coupled numerical simulations using heterogeneous solvers are powerful tools for modeling multiscale phenomena. However, major modifications to existing codes are often required to enable such simulations, posing significant difficulties in practice. In this paper we present a C++ library, i.e. the Multiscale Universal Interface (MUI), which is capable of facilitating the coupling effort for a wide range of multiscale simulations. The library adopts a header-only form with minimal external dependency and hence can be easily dropped into existing codes. A data sampler concept is introduced, combined with a hybrid dynamic/static typing mechanism, to create an easily customizable framework for solver-independent data interpretation. The library integrates MPI MPMD support and an asynchronous communication protocol to handle inter-solver information exchange irrespective of the solvers' own MPI awareness. Template metaprogramming is heavily employed to simultaneously improve runtime performance and code flexibility. We validated the library by solving three different multiscale problems, which also serve to demonstrate the flexibility of the framework in handling heterogeneous models and solvers. In the first example, a Couette flow was simulated using two concurrently coupled Smoothed Particle Hydrodynamics (SPH) simulations of different spatial resolutions. In the second example, we coupled the deterministic SPH method with the stochastic Dissipative Particle Dynamics (DPD) method to study the effect of surface grafting on the hydrodynamics properties on the surface. In the third example, we consider conjugate heat transfer between a solid domain and a fluid domain by coupling the particle-based energy-conserving DPD (eDPD) method with the Finite Element Method (FEM).
Keywords: Multiscale modeling; Concurrent coupling; Multiphysics simulation; Energy-conserving DPD; SPH; FEM; Programming framework

G.G. Gentiletti, J.G. Gebhart, R.C. Acevedo, O. Yáñez-Suárez, V. Medina-Bañuelos, Command of a simulated wheelchair on a virtual environment using a brain-computer interface, IRBM, Volume 30, Issues 5–6, November–December 2009, Pages 218-225, ISSN 1959-0318, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.irbm.2009.10.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1959031809001122)
Abstract: Objective
The goal of this research was to design, set up, use and evaluate a realistic simulation platform that could host real-time simulated robotics applications controlled with a brain-computer interface based on an event-related potential paradigm.
Materials and methods
The platform is composed of the following modules: (i) six band-limited channels of electroencephalographic signal acquisition; (ii) signal processing and classification with the BCI2000 software platform; (iii) stimulus presentation and (iv) robotics simulation. A modified Donchin speller matrix that uses iconic elements to indicate diverse navigational commands was implemented as the stimuli for the brain-computer interface, and an alternative interface was also included for independent manual navigation. A physically realistic wheelchair model with both autonomous and user control was used as the robotic element in the system.
Results
Two healthy subjects were asked to perform a given navigation task throughout a simulated home environment using both navigational interfaces. For each task, each subject drove the wheelchair along similar paths and distances. The task execution time was greater when using the brain-computer interface, but both subjects were successful in adequately driving the wheelchair with the BCI.
Discussion
The wheelchair model within the simulation and control platform serves as a proof of purpose of the proposed system and demonstrates its potential. Further tests and experiments are needed, along with the definition of adequate metrics to characterize the entire user-controller-robot-task ensemble.
Conclusions
With the developed platform, evaluation of prospective brain-computer interfaces can go beyond classical measurements of error and bit transfer rates, to include metrics accounting for the integrated system.
Keywords: Brain computer interface; Electroencephalography; Robotics simulation; Smart wheelchair; Virtual environmentés; Interface cerveau-ordinateur; Électroencéphalographie; Simulation robotique; Fauteuil roulant intelligent; Environnement virtuel

M. Acacio, O. Cánovas, J.M. Garcı́a, P.E. López-de-Teruel, MPI–Delphi: an MPI implementation for visual programming environments and heterogeneous computing, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 18, Issue 3, January 2002, Pages 317-333, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-739X(01)00054-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X01000541)
Abstract: The goal of a parallel program is to reduce the execution time, compared to the fastest sequential program solving the same problem. Parallel programming is growing due to the widespread use of network of workstations (NOWs) or powerful PCs in high-performance computing. Because the hardware components are all commodity devices, NOWs are much more cost-effective than custom machines with similar technology. In this environment, the typical programming model used has been message-passing and the MPI library has become the standard in the distributed-memory computing model. On the other hand, visual programming environments try to simply the task of developing applications. They provide programmers with several standard components for creating programs. Delphi constitutes one of the most popular visual programming environments nowadays in the Windows market place. In this paper, we present MPI–Delphi, an implementation of MPI for writing parallel applications using Delphi visual programming environment. We show how MPI–Delphi has been developed, and how it makes possible to manage a cluster of homogeneous/heterogeneous PCs. Two examples of use of MPI–Delphi in a heterogeneous cluster of workstations with a mixture of Windows and Linux operating systems are also included. The MPI–Delphi interface is suitable for some specific kinds of problems, such as monitoring parallel programs of long execution time, or computationally intensive graphical simulations. In addition, MPI–Delphi has proven to be a good tool for research, as the development of new algorithms can be carried out quickly and, therefore, time spent on the debugging of such algorithms is reduced. Finally, we conclude by explaining some of the tasks we think MPI–Delphi is suitable for.
Keywords: Network of workstations/PCs; Parallel visual programming environment; MPI for Delphi; Graphical user interface; Heterogeneous computing

M. Saffarian, R. Happee, D. Abbink, M. Mulder, Investigating the Functionality of Different Human Machine Interfaces for Cooperative Adaptive Cruise Control, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 43, Issue 13, 2010, Pages 25-30, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20100831-4-FR-2021.00006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015325015)
Abstract: Abstract
Cooperative-Adaptive Cruise Control (C-ACC) systems are seen as a potential technology to increase capacity and safety within Intelligent Traffic Systems (ITS). In this research, interaction mediums of the driver for both advisory and autonomous platforms are investigated. Two different advisory and automated frameworks with three different interfaces including a visual dashboard display, a Head Up Display (HUD) and a haptic gas pedal are studied. It is shown that the designed advisory interfaces do not result in significant improvement in velocity control but subjective evaluation indicates a preference for haptic feedback. For the autonomous cooperative cruise control, the designed HUD interface results in about 50% reduction of undesired human intervention which is significant for some conditions. Next versions of the HMI systems will be tested with more subjects, more scenarios and longer test durations to gain more insight into variation and accommodation.
Keywords: Cooperative Adaptive Cruise Control; Human Machine Interface; Visual Feedback; Haptic Feedback

Javier Ferreiros, Rubén San-Segundo, Roberto Barra, Víctor Pérez, Increasing robustness, reliability and ergonomics in speech interfaces for aerial control systems, Aerospace Science and Technology, Volume 13, Issue 8, December 2009, Pages 423-430, ISSN 1270-9638, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ast.2009.06.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S127096380900025X)
Abstract: This paper proposes several speech technology improvements for increasing robustness, reliability and ergonomics in speech interfaces for controlling aerial vehicles. These improvements consist of including a statistical language model for increasing the robustness against spontaneous speech, incorporating confidence measures for evaluating the performance of on-line the speech engines (better reliability), and a flexible response generation for improving the interface ergonomics. This paper includes a detailed description of the speech control interface developed as a result of the collaboration between the GTH (Grupo de Tecnología del Habla or Speech Technology Group) at Universidad Politécnica de Madrid (UPM) and the company Boeing Research and Technology Europe under the contract No. 206/05. This interface includes modules that perform speech recognition, natural language understanding and response generation via a speech synthesizer. In the system evaluation, the final results reported a 96.4% Word Accuracy and a 92.2% Semantic Concept Accuracy. This paper also provides a state-of-art review of using Speech Technology for controlling aerial vehicles, comparing the main initiatives carried out. A significant conclusion of this work is that Speech Technology is now ready enough to be considered as a new modality (in parallel with traditional ones) for introducing high level commands while the controller is carrying out others actions when interacting with these control systems. In critical applications (such as this) the best performance of this technology is achieved when all the configuration possibilities of the speech engines are accessible and the speech interface is designed in collaboration with Speech Technology experts.
Keywords: Aerial control systems; Aerial vehicles; Spontaneous speech; Robustness; Reliability and ergonomics of aerial control systems; Speech human–computer interfaces

Christoph M Hoffmann, Robert Joan-Arinyo, On user-defined features, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 30, Issue 5, April 1998, Pages 321-332, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0010-4485(97)00048-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010448597000481)
Abstract: Feature-based design is becoming one of the fundamental design paradigms of CAD systems. In this paradigm, the basic unit is a feature and parts are constructed by a sequence of feature attachment operations. The type and number of possible features involved depend upon product type, the application reasoning process and the level of abstraction. Therefore to provide CAD systems with a basic mechanism to define features that fit the end-user needs seems more appropriate than trying to provide a large repertoire of features covering every possible application.A procedural mechanism is proposed for generating and deploying user-defined features in a feature-based design paradigm. The usefulness of the mechanism relies on two functional capabilities. First the shape and size of the user-defined features are instantiated according to parameter values given by the end-user. Second the end-user positions and orients the feature in the part being designed by means of geometric gestures on geometric references.
Keywords: computer-aided design; feature-based design; user-defined features; parametric design

W. Łodyga, M. Kręglewski, P. Pracna, Š. Urban, Advanced graphical software for assignments of transitions in rovibrational spectra, Journal of Molecular Spectroscopy, Volume 243, Issue 2, June 2007, Pages 182-188, ISSN 0022-2852, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jms.2007.02.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0022285207000331)
Abstract: We have developed advanced graphical software for significantly accelerated and verified assignments of rotationally resolved rovibrational molecular spectra. The program combines the traditional approach of Loomis–Wood diagrams, which are used to visualize spectral branches and facilitate their identification, with the power of interactive combination difference checking, which provides an immediate verification of correct assignments of quantum numbers to spectral lines. Assignment procedures and other tools of the program are designed in a fully graphical Windows environment to accelerate the usually tedious assignment work and make the use of the program highly intuitive. The use of an appropriate rovibrational Hamiltonian for fitting the assigned transitions is made easy by the flexible, user-programmed interfaces for exporting assigned data directly in the needed format and importing rovibrational energies back to the assignment program. The program is designed for the MS Windows operating systems and is available upon request with a full documentation on http://www.lww.amu.edu.pl.
Keywords: Assignments of high-resolution molecular spectra; Combination difference checking; Loomis–Wood algorithm

J.A. Ghani, M. Rizal, M.Z. Nuawi, M.J. Ghazali, C.H.C. Haron, Monitoring online cutting tool wear using low-cost technique and user-friendly GUI, Wear, Volume 271, Issues 9–10, 29 July 2011, Pages 2619-2624, ISSN 0043-1648, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.wear.2011.01.038.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0043164811000871)
Abstract: Cutting tool wear is known to affect tool life, surface quality and production time. Because of this an online tool wear measurement and monitoring system has been developed, using a low-cost sensor. The system is able to detect and analyze signals relating to the deflection of the tool holder from the cutting force, and the corresponding estimation of wear is displayed on the computer screen. New statistical analysis is used to identify and characterise the changes in signals from the sensors. A two-channel strain gauge is mounted at the tool holder to measure the deflection in both tangential direction and feed direction. The signal is transmitted to the signal conditioning device, then to data acquisition, and finally to the computer system. MATLAB software is used as the platform software to develop a user-friendly graphical user interface (GUI) for online monitoring purposes. Results show that this developed online monitoring system, using the strain gauge signal, is an effective method of detecting the progression of flank wear width during machining. This is an efficient and low-cost method which can be used in the real machining industry to predict the level of wear in the cutting tool.
Keywords: Flank wear; Low-cost monitoring; Strain gauge; I-Kaz™ method

Ulrich Flemming, Suresh K. Bhavnani, Bonnie E. John, Mismatched metaphor: user vs system moeel in computer-aided drafting, Design Studies, Volume 18, Issue 4, October 1997, Pages 349-368, ISSN 0142-694X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0142-694X(97)00006-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0142694X97000069)
Abstract: We report findings from an extensive study of the users of a Computer-Aided Drafting (CAD) system. Our observations suggest that the CAD system is used inefficiently, because users approach computer-aided drafting from a T-square metaphor reflecting their past experience with traditional drawing media. This prevents them from discovering and using effectively powerful system commands that have no equivalent in manual techniques. These findings suggest that we should rethink the ways in which CAD users are trained and manuals are written, and that we introduce CAD users to a more strategic use of CAD, particularly to a Detail/Aggregate/Manipulate (DAM) strategy that takes advantage of the compositional logic underlying a design.
Keywords: Architectural design; computer-aided drafting; user behaviour; case study; modelling

Kevin Ponto, Kai Doerr, Tom Wypych, John Kooker, Falko Kuester, CGLXTouch: A multi-user multi-touch approach for ultra-high-resolution collaborative workspaces, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 27, Issue 6, June 2011, Pages 649-656, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2010.11.026.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X10002463)
Abstract: This paper presents an approach for empowering collaborative workspaces through ultra-high resolution tiled display environments concurrently interfaced with multiple multi-touch devices. Multi-touch table devices are supported along with portable multi-touch tablet and phone devices, which can be added to and removed from the system on the fly. Events from these devices are tagged with a device identifier and are synchronized with the distributed display environment, enabling multi-user support. As many portable devices are not equipped to render content directly, a remotely scene is streamed in. The presented approach scales for large numbers of devices, providing access to a multitude of hands-on techniques for collaborative data analysis.
Keywords: Collaborative workspaces; Multi-touch interaction; High-resolution displays; Multi-device interaction; Tiled displays

M.D. López-Rodríguez, A.J. Castro, H. Castro, S. Jorreto, J. Cabello, Science–policy interface for addressing environmental problems in arid Spain, Environmental Science & Policy, Volume 50, June 2015, Pages 1-14, ISSN 1462-9011, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsci.2015.01.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1462901115000155)
Abstract: Abstract
Science–policy interfaces are avenues for finding solutions for environmental challenges through strengthening collaborations between research disciplines and public administrations. Here we present a methodology for the conduct of science–policy interfaces between scientists and policymakers for addressing day-to-day environmental problems in the southeastern Spanish drylands. A knowledge brokering approach based on six consecutive workshops was used to facilitate mutual understanding and trust between scientists and policymakers. Water policy and biodiversity loss were identified as major environmental concerns in the region, and 12 final environmental problems were agreed as priorities. A graphical tool was used for diagnosing each environmental problem according to the available scientific knowledge, the current regulatory capacity of administrations, and the level of public engagement necessary for addressing the problem. The use of the graphical tool also allowed for (a) the clarification of roles involved in problem solving, and (b) the promotion of a culture of shared responsibility for the implementation of management actions based on collaborative work. We discuss lessons learned and propose recommendations for future experiences.
Keywords: Biodiversity loss; Community of practice; Culture of share responsibility; Decision-making; Participatory workshop; Water policy

G. Thiele, H.J. Beestermöller, L. Renner, M. Dorno, D. Popovic, Task-configuration of a pearl-based programmable controller for process automation, Control Engineering Practice, Volume 3, Issue 6, June 1995, Pages 843-848, ISSN 0967-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0967-0661(95)00068-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0967066195000686)
Abstract: This paper describes the configuration of real-time tasks using a PEARL-based programmable controller (“PEARL-PLC”). It will be shown that tasks can be consistently configured with function-blocks for logic, sequence and feedback control. Furthermore, the synchronization of cooperating tasks, controlling interdependent sub-processes, can also be configured using communication function-blocks based on Multicomputer-PEARL. Moreover, using the explicit task-scheduling offered by PEARL, the needed processor-time can be reduced to a conceptual minimum. Details of the configuration of a sequence-control task and a fuzzy-control task, the latter as a representative of a feedback-control task, are presented. Finally, trends of future developments of the “PEARL-PLC”, e.g. the implementation of fault-tolerance, are pointed out.
Keywords: Programmable controller; task configuration; PEARL-PLC; aperiodic task scheduling; sequence control; task synchronization; fuzzy control

Marco Conedera, Marj Tonini, Lorenzo Oleggini, Carmen Vega Orozco, Michael Leuenberger, Gianni Boris Pezzatti, Geospatial approach for defining the Wildland-Urban Interface in the Alpine environment, Computers, Environment and Urban Systems, Volume 52, July 2015, Pages 10-20, ISSN 0198-9715, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compenvurbsys.2015.02.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0198971515000241)
Abstract: Abstract
Problems related to fire hazard and fire management have become in recent decades one of the most relevant issues in the Wildland-Urban Interface (WUI), that is the area where human infrastructures meet or intermingle with natural vegetation. In this paper we develop a robust geospatial method for defining and mapping the WUI in the Alpine environment, where most interactions between infrastructures and wildland vegetation concern the fire ignition through human activities, whereas no significant threats exist for infrastructures due to contact with burning vegetation. We used the three Alpine Swiss cantons of Ticino, Valais and Grisons as the study area. The features representing anthropogenic infrastructures (urban or infrastructural components of the WUI) as well as forest cover related features (wildland component of the WUI) were selected from the Swiss Topographic Landscape Model (TLM3D). Georeferenced forest fire occurrences derived from the WSL Swissfire database were used to define suitable WUI interface distances. The Random Forest algorithm was applied to estimate the importance of predictor variables to fire ignition occurrence. This revealed that buildings and drivable roads are the most relevant anthropogenic components with respect to fire ignition. We consequently defined the combination of drivable roads and easily accessible (i.e. 100 m from the next drivable road) buildings as the WUI-relevant infrastructural component. For the definition of the interface (buffer) distance between WUI infrastructural and wildland components, we computed the empirical cumulative distribution functions (ECDF) of the percentage of ignition points (observed and simulated) arising at increasing distances from the selected infrastructures. The ECDF facilitates the calculation of both the distance at which a given percentage of ignition points occurred and, in turn, the amount of forest area covered at a given distance. Finally, we developed a GIS ModelBuilder routine to map the WUI for the selected buffer distance. The approach was found to be reproducible, robust (based on statistical analyses for evaluating parameters) and flexible (buffer distances depending on the targeted final area covered) so that fire managers may use it to detect WUI according to their specific priorities.
Keywords: Fire management; WUI; GIS-model; Variable importance; Alpine environment

Rafael Duque, Crescencio Bravo, Manuel Ortega, A model-based framework to automate the analysis of users' activity in collaborative systems, Journal of Network and Computer Applications, Volume 34, Issue 4, July 2011, Pages 1200-1209, ISSN 1084-8045, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jnca.2011.01.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1084804511000221)
Abstract: The automated analysis of users' activity in collaborative systems aims at characterizing the collective process established between the participants and contributing to improving the deficiencies that occur during the users' activity and that are identified by means of this characterisation. This type of analysis, however, requires the completion of complex and costly software development tasks such as capturing information about the actions carried out by the users, calculating low and high level variables to characterize the users' work and behaviour and, finally, defining different kinds of interventions to improve the users' experience solving this way all of those problems that have been detected. To enable the automation of these tasks, reducing the required development effort, we propose a framework that allows software developers to specify the processes of analysis of the activity supported by a collaborative system by means of visual languages in a model-based approach and to automate the analysis accordingly. This framework is used in two case studies. Firstly, the framework is applied for the collaboration analysis in a social network system. Secondly, the collaborative programming activity supported by the COLLECE system is analysed using the framework, and the impact of using the framework is then evaluated.
Keywords: Collaboration analysis; Collaborative systems

David J. Hill, Yong Liu, Luigi Marini, Rob Kooper, Alejandro Rodriguez, Joe Futrelle, Barbara S. Minsker, James Myers, Terry McLaren, A virtual sensor system for user-generated, real-time environmental data products, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 26, Issue 12, December 2011, Pages 1710-1724, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2011.09.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815211001988)
Abstract: With the advent of new instrumentation and sensors, more diverse types and increasing amounts of data are becoming available to environmental researchers and practitioners. However, accessing and integrating these data into forms usable for environmental analysis and modeling can be highly time-consuming and challenging, particularly in real time. For example, radar-rainfall data are a valuable resource for hydrologic modeling because of their high resolution and pervasive coverage. However, radar-rainfall data from the Next Generation Radar (NEXRAD) system continue to be underutilized outside of the operational environment because of limitations in access and availability of research-quality data products, especially in real time. This paper addresses these issues through the development of a prototype Web-based virtual sensor system at NCSA that creates real-time customized data streams from raw sensor data. These data streams are supported by metadata, including provenance information. The system uses workflow composition and publishing tools to facilitate creation and publication (as Web services) of user-created virtual sensors. To demonstrate the system, two case studies are presented. In the first case study, a network of point-based virtual precipitation sensors is deployed to analyze the relationship between radar-rainfall measurements, and in the second case study, a network of polygon-based virtual precipitation sensors is deployed to be used as input to urban flooding models. These case studies illustrate how, with the addition of some application-specific information, this general-purpose system can be utilized to provide customized real-time access to significant data resources such as the NEXRAD system. Additionally, the creation of new types of virtual sensors is discussed, using the example of virtual temperature sensors.
Keywords: Cyberinfrastructure; Virtual sensor; NEXRAD; Real-time sensing; Workflow; Environmental sensors; Collaborative technology; Data integration

F. Pereniguez, R. Marin-Lopez, G. Kambourakis, S. Gritzalis, A.F. Gomez, PrivaKERB: A user privacy framework for Kerberos, Computers & Security, Volume 30, Issues 6–7, September–October 2011, Pages 446-463, ISSN 0167-4048, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cose.2011.04.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167404811000617)
Abstract: Kerberos is one of the most well-respected and widely used authentication protocols in open and insecure networks. It is envisaged that its impact will increase as it comprises a reliable and scalable solution to support authentication and secure service acquisition in the Next Generation Networks (NGN) era. This means however that security and privacy issues related to the protocol itself must be carefully considered. This paper proposes a novel two-level privacy framework, namely PrivaKERB, to address user privacy in Kerberos. Our solution offers two privacy levels to cope with user anonymity and service access untraceability. We detail how these modes operate in preserving user privacy in both single-realm and cross-realm scenarios. By using the extensibility mechanisms already available in Kerberos, PrivaKERB does not change the semantics of messages and enables future implementations to maintain interoperability. We also evaluate our solution in terms of service time and resource utilization. The results show that PrivaKERB is a lightweight solution imposing negligible overhead in both the participating entities and network.
Keywords: Identity; Kerberos; Network Federation; Privacy; Security

Xianghui Cao, Jiming Chen, Youxian Sun, An interface designed for networked monitoring and control in wireless sensor networks, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 31, Issue 3, March 2009, Pages 579-585, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2008.03.026.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548908000457)
Abstract: In this paper, a new interface is developed in detail that provides terminal users with ways for direct and convenient interactions with the wireless sensor networks (WSNs). It also embraces an Internet based subsystem for remote monitoring and controlling of the WSNs. Different from existing platforms and interfaces, our design is general, extensible and not constrained for specific applications. More importantly, it paves the way for improving the data processing efficiency and avoiding data execution congestion. It proposes the idea utilizing the advantages of existing professional mathematical software tools, such as Matlab, Mathematica and Maple, to process the WSN data.
Keywords: Wireless sensor networks; Interface; Server; Client; Monitoring

Sho YOKOTA, Kazuya HIRAMATSU, Yasuhiro OHYAMA, Jin-Hua SHE, Hiroshi HASHIMOTO, E-learning System with a Real System and Graphical Simulator for Embedded System, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 41, Issue 2, 2008, Pages 12649-12654, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20080706-5-KR-1001.02140.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016410062)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper describes an e-learning system with a real system and simulator for studying embedded system. Proposed e-learning system provides learners with three items for studying embedded system. First one is on-line textbook. Second one is a graphical simulator, and third one is a real system. The simulator consists of microprocessor and its peripheral circuit. The real system consists of same composition as a simulator and is connected to the internet, namely it is a remote experimental embedded system. The simulator is used for the verifying the programming and for understanding the theory of embedded system operation, namely it is used for exercise The real system is used for the experiment to check the real reaction of the system, namely it is used for experiment. Therefore the leaner can study embedded system regardless of location and time. Moreover they can learn even if they do not have a real system. Thus they do not have to prepare any equipment needed for developing embedded system.

Rex Hartson and Partha S. Pyla, Chapter 21 - The Interaction Cycle and the User Action Framework, In The UX Book, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2012, Pages 663-688, ISBN 9780123852410, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-385241-0.00021-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978012385241000021X)

Giovanna Lehmann Miotto, Igor Aleksandrov, Antonio Amorim, Giuseppe Avolio, Elisabeta Badescu, Mihai Caprini, Alina Corso-Radu, Georgiana L. Darlea, Andre dos Anjos, Ivan Fedorko, Andrei Kazarov, Serguei Kolos, Vladislav Kotov, Andrew J. Lankford, Marius Leahu, Livio Mapelli, Raul Murillo Garcia, Yuri Ryabov, John E. Sloper, Igor Soloviev, Lourenco Vaz Gil Lopes, Configuration and control of the ATLAS trigger and data acquisition, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 623, Issue 1, 1 November 2010, Pages 549-551, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nima.2010.03.066.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168900210006303)
Abstract: ATLAS is a general purpose experiment aimed at studying high-energy particle interactions at the Large Hadron Collider (LHC). This paper describes the evolution of the Controls and Configuration system of the ATLAS Trigger and Data Acquisition from the Technical Design Report to the first events taken with circulating beams. We present the lessons learned during the development.
Keywords: LHC; ATLAS; Data acquisition; Online software; Run control

Sanford Friedenthal, Alan Moore and Rick Steiner, Chapter 18 - Integrating SysML into a Systems Development Environment, In The MK/OMG Press, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2015, Pages 507-541, A Practical Guide to SysML (Third Edition), ISBN 9780128002025, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-800202-5.00018-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128002025000187)
Abstract: Abstract
Chapter 18 describes the approach and considerations for integrating SysML into an overall systems development environment. This includes a discussion of the relationship between the system model and other models that support development, the different tool roles in the development environment, the logical interfaces between systems modeling tools and other tools in the environment, configuration and data management concepts, approaches to data exchange between tools, and criteria for selecting a SysML tool.
Keywords: system model; descriptive model; analytical model; simulation; systems development environment; system modeling tool; tool roles; tool interface; configuration management; document generation; data exchange

Abdulaziz Azamatov, Jae-Woo Lee, Yung-Hwan Byun, Comprehensive aircraft configuration design tool for Integrated Product and Process Development, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 42, Issues 1–2, January–February 2011, Pages 35-49, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2010.10.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S096599781000150X)
Abstract: This paper describes an efficient aircraft geometry design tool which is necessary for design and analysis applications through Integrated Product and Process Development (IPPD). The design process decomposes aircraft geometry into several components to represent it accurately and realistically with a reduced number of shape control parameters. For this purpose, several configuration representation algorithms are thoroughly investigated and discussed. The proposed configuration generation algorithm employs the super ellipse equation with simple analytic distribution functions, Class function/Shape function Transformation (CST) and can represent and manipulate complex shapes accurately with a small number of control parameters. A model of aircraft geometry, represented in this approach, can be applied to conceptual and preliminary stages of aircraft design and development with realistic and accurate configuration data. A Parameter-based Comprehensive Aircraft Design (PCAD) tool which implements a geometry generation process for aircraft design and optimization using customization of commercial computer-aided design software (CATIA V5) and the Product Data Management (Enovia Smarteam). The proposed configuration design tool could be especially efficient when automation, flexibility and rapid changes of geometry are required in a short time and with low computational resources.
Keywords: Aircraft design; Wireframe; Parameterization; Aerodynamic surface representation; IPPD; Helicopter

W. Langley, M.B. Zaremba, I. Popescu, Graphics-oriented expert shell for the design and configuration of distributed control systems, Control Engineering Practice, Volume 3, Issue 4, April 1995, Pages 555-559, ISSN 0967-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0967-0661(95)00028-S.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/096706619500028S)
Abstract: The paper describes the concept and architecture of GOES (Graphics-Oriented Expert Shell) - an expert system shell built inside a standard CAD environment. The system is intended to associate logical engineering design procedures with graphical representations, and is particularly useful for managing and documenting large-scale control and automation design activity. The expert-system structure of the software allows GOES to operate as an intelligent CASE tool, and eases the task of identifying, assembling, and parametrizing function block subroutines of distributed control systems.
Keywords: Computer-aided system design; distributed control; expert systems; system configuration; industrial automation; control engineering

Ming-Shi Chen, Ming-Chyuan Lin, Chen-Cheng Wang, C. Alec Chang, Using HCA and TOPSIS approaches in personal digital assistant menu–icon interface design, International Journal of Industrial Ergonomics, Volume 39, Issue 5, September 2009, Pages 689-702, ISSN 0169-8141, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ergon.2009.01.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169814109000109)
Abstract: Mobile electronic products have recently become very popular because of their portable convenience and versatile functions. The personal digital assistant (PDA) can even access the Internet. However, there is still plenty of room for improvement in the PDA interface. This research proposes a systematic approach to analyze, generate and evaluate a PDA integrated menu–icon interface design for the DigitHub Company based on customer requirements.

Hierarchical clustering analysis (HCA) is incorporated with the analytic hierarchy process (AHP) to identify and categorize functional PDA menus and their corresponding icons. We evaluate the importance of each of the different functional menus and categories. We generate five PDA menu–icon interface design alternatives that meet the proposed design guidelines, and we evaluate each for their respective feasibilities. The technique for order preference by similarity to ideal solution (TOPSIS) method is applied to measure the overall operating performance of the five PDA menu–icon interface design alternatives. The evaluation results show that the preferred design is option PDA5, a hierarchical and separated menu–icon layout style that features a two-layer menu structure.

We expect that the proposed development procedure for the generation and evaluation of PDA menu–icon design alternatives based on customer requirements will be of interest to interface designers who wish to focus on mobile products.
Relevance to industry
This paper proposes an integrated procedure for designing PDA menu–icon interfaces. Our methodology should help in the creation and optimization of screen layouts for mobile phones, global positioning system (GPS) navigation devices, digital cameras and related screen interfaces.
Keywords: Personal digital assistant; Hierarchical clustering analysis; Analytic hierarchy process; Technique for order preference by similarity to ideal solution; Interface design

Bingli Xu, Hui Lin, Long S. Chiu, Sammy Tang, Jimmy Cheung, Ya Hu, Liping Zeng, VGE-CUGrid: An integrated platform for efficient configuration, computation, and visualization of MM5, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 25, Issue 12, December 2010, Pages 1894-1896, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2010.05.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815210001799)
Abstract: The platform of VGE-CUGrid integrates a computational grid (CUGrid) and a virtual geographic environment (VGE) to enable an efficient life-cycle process of MM5. The CUGrid is used to speed up MM5 computation. The VGE, which is supported by an underlying GIS system and virtual reality, is adopted as the friendly and efficient interface for initiation, computation, and visualization and analysis of MM5.
Keywords: Virtual geographic environments; CUGrid; MM5; Grid computation; Visualization

Konstantin Stoychev Tsvetkov, Teodor Georgiev, An Alternative Approach and Attempt to Come Up with a Standard for Biometric User Authentication in a Network Based Environment, Procedia - Social and Behavioral Sciences, Volume 47, 2012, Pages 74-78, ISSN 1877-0428, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.sbspro.2012.06.615.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877042812023518)
Abstract: People who make their first steps into the information technologies are much more vulnerable to various security threats than experienced individuals. They don’t know how to protect their passwords, they can’t pick up complex passwords, and they cannot type quickly their passwords. During their education they can become a victim of hostile individuals. Their education process can be hindered when it comes to password authentication. Children who are still illiterate cannot take full advantage of all online resources that offer innovative education content. The same matters for adult people with low level of literacy. With some ba sic reading skills and with the latest touch-screen technologies they can be easily integrated into the IT world. When it comes to writing (typing passwords) however, things can become different for them.
Keywords: fingerprint; biometric authentication; fingerprint hardware vendor; “two-fingers” authentication technique

Javier Varona, Cristina Manresa-Yee, Francisco J. Perales, Hands-free vision-based interface for computer accessibility, Journal of Network and Computer Applications, Volume 31, Issue 4, November 2008, Pages 357-374, ISSN 1084-8045, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jnca.2008.03.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1084804508000210)
Abstract: Physically disabled and mentally challenged people are an important part of our society that has not yet received the same opportunities as others in their inclusion in the Information Society. Therefore, it is necessary to develop easily accessible systems for computers to achieve their inclusion within the new technologies. This paper presents a project whose objective is to draw disabled people nearer to new technologies. It presents a vision-based user interface designed to achieve computer accessibility for disabled users with motor impairments. The interface automatically finds the user's face and tracks it through time to recognize gestures within the face region in real time. Subsequently, a new information fusion procedure is proposed to acquire data from computer vision algorithms and its results are used to carry out a robust recognition process. Finally, we show how the system is used to replace a conventional mouse device for computer interaction and as a communication system for non-verbal children.
Keywords: Human–computer interaction; Multimodal interfaces; Accessibility

Florian Floerchinger, Mathias Schmitt, A Concept for a user-friendly first Communication Initiation between Stationary Field Devices and Mobile Interaction Devices, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 44, Issue 1, January 2011, Pages 1614-1619, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20110828-6-IT-1002.02845.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016438401)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents a concept for a user-friendly way to establish ad-hoc physical communication connections between industrial field devices and mobile control devices supporting several communication standards. For the human user in the future factory, this concept allows for more flexibility, mobility and safety. Hence it represents the basis for the nomadic user.

Key of the presented concept is a reference model that specifies all communication relevant information of a field device, attaching this information to the device by using an inexpensive passive data carrier. Furthermore, this reference model manages data like multi-user behavior and user-rights, enabling a flexible user-centered device interaction which satisfies the needs of industrial environments in future factories. With a reference model like that most ubiquitous technologies will be much easier to use in ad-hoc linked environments. The concept presented in this paper has been tested and evaluated in the SmartFactoryKL, the intelligent factory of the future. The results of this evaluation, which focus on the acceptance of users with regard to usability, show that there is a significant enhancement in compare to the state of the art identification methods.
Keywords: Industrial communication protocols; RFID and ubiquitous manufacturing; Protocols and information communication

Zhu Yongli, O.P Malik, An easy-to-use software for subtransmission network analysis, International Journal of Electrical Power & Energy Systems, Volume 23, Issue 2, 1 February 2001, Pages 137-145, ISSN 0142-0615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0142-0615(00)00047-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0142061500000478)
Abstract: This paper describes a graphical easy-to-use power system simulation software. The software is specially designed to meet the requirements of saving time and effort in its use. Visualization, automation of some manual procedures and solution of special problems in subtransmission networks has been realized. An efficient network diagram editor is introduced. The combined use of the network diagram and the automated substation diagrams facilitates network operation state setting and interpretation of results. Some practical techniques have been adopted to improve the convergence of load flow and var optimization computations. Furthermore, the automatic network topology analysis function has contributed a lot to error finding in the built network database and the input data of network status. It has been successfully used in two Chinese electric utilities.
Keywords: Graphical user interface; Subtransmission networks; Power system simulation; Artificial intelligence

Steven Koepnick, Roger V. Hoang, Matthew R. Sgambati, Daniel S. Coming, Evan A. Suma, William R. Sherman, RIST: Radiological Immersive Survey Training for two simultaneous users, Computers & Graphics, Volume 34, Issue 6, December 2010, Pages 665-676, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2010.09.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S009784931000141X)
Abstract: National Guard Civil Support Teams (CST) respond to a variety of situations involving dangerous materials. Many of these situations can be safely simulated for training purposes in the real world. Radiological threats, however, are difficult to simulate due to the lack of materials that can mimic radiation sources without the danger of the real radiation. To address the need for a system to train CSTs to respond to radiological threats, we have developed the Radiological Immersive Survey Training (RIST) system. RIST simulates radiological threats from multiple sources using a realistic real-time shielding model based on ray casting and allows users to practice surveying the threat using simulated representations of the world and equipment. We have developed an after action review tool to allow a trainer to show trainees a recording of their survey and how they can improve. We also created a scenario design tool to allow the trainer to create complex environments with radiological threats.

We developed novel multi-user interaction techniques to enable simultaneous training for two CST members in an immersive virtual environment. We also introduced a novel multi-perspective rendering technique for two users based on each user's task rather than field of view. Finally, we conducted a preliminary user study with several pairs of expert users to measure user preferences and the effects of using this technique, in conjunction with how altering which user navigated, on user performance. CST survey teams from two states have now used the system for training.
Keywords: Virtual reality; Computer-based training; Human factors; Collaborative virtual environment

Nasser Kehtarnavaz, CHAPTER 2 - LabVIEW Graphical Programming Environment, In Digital Signal Processing System Design (Second Edition), Academic Press, Burlington, 2008, Pages 5-56, ISBN 9780123744906, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-374490-6.00002-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123744906000027)

G Thiele, H.J Beestermöller, L Renner, M Dorno, D Popovic, Task-configuration of a pearl-based programmable controller for process-automation, Annual Review in Automatic Programming, Volume 18, 1994, Pages 115-120, ISSN 0066-4138, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0066-4138(94)90020-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0066413894900205)
Abstract: This paper describes the configuration of real-time tasks using a PEARL-based programmable controller (“PEARL-PLC”). It will be shown that tasks can be consistently configurated with function-blocks for logic-, sequence- and feedback-control. Furthermore, the synchronization of cooperating tasks, controlling interdependent sub-processes, can also be configurated using communication function-blocks based on Multicomputer-PEARL. Moreover, using the explicit task-scheduling offered by PEARL, the needed processor-time can be reduced to a conceptual minimum. Details of the configuration of a sequence-control task and a fuzzy-control task, the last one as a representative of a feedback-control task, are presented. Finally, trends of future developments of the “PEARL-PLC”, e.g. the implementation of fault-tolerance, are pointed out.
Keywords: Programmable controller; task-configuration; PEARL-PLC; aperiodic task scheduling; sequence-control; task-synchronization; fuzzy-control

Michel dos Santos Soares, Jos Vrancken, Alexander Verbraeck, User requirements modeling and analysis of software-intensive systems, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 84, Issue 2, February 2011, Pages 328-339, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jss.2010.10.020.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0164121210002876)
Abstract: The increasing complexity of software systems makes Requirements Engineering activities both more important and more difficult. This article is about user requirements development, mainly the activities of documenting and analyzing user requirements for software-intensive systems. These are modeling activities that are useful for further Requirements Engineering activities. Current techniques for requirements modeling present a number of problems and limitations. Based on these shortcomings, a list of requirements for requirements modeling languages is proposed. The proposal of this article is to show how some extensions to SysML diagrams and tables can fulfill most of these requirements. The approach is illustrated by a list of user requirements for a Road Traffic Management System.
Keywords: Requirements; UML; SysML; Software-intensive systems

G.E. Vazquez, I. Ponzoni, M.C. Sánchez, N.B. Brignole, ModGen: a model generator for instrumentation analysis, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 32, Issue 1, January 2001, Pages 37-48, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0965-9978(00)00073-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997800000739)
Abstract: A computer software tool for the automatic generation of steady-state process models to be used in instrumentation analysis was developed. We describe the program, called ModGen, discussing its main advantages and potential benefits. ModGen constitutes the front-end of a complete decision support system (DSS) for plant instrumentation design and revamp. This DSS is currently under development. The paper concludes with the description of ModGen's application to the classification of unmeasured variables of an existing medium-size process plant by means of GS-FLCN's structural technique for observability analysis.
Keywords: Graphical user interface; Computer-aided design; Model generation; Chemical engineering applications; Observability

Tomasz Hachaj, Danuta Baraniewicz, Knowledge Bricks—Educational immersive reality environment, International Journal of Information Management, Volume 35, Issue 3, June 2015, Pages 396-406, ISSN 0268-4012, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijinfomgt.2015.01.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0268401215000079)
Abstract: Abstract
The purpose of this paper is to describe our newest achievement – the scientific concept of a novel Virtual Reality Educational System and its implementation – the Knowledge Bricks application. The synthesis of various scientific methodologies and technical approaches that we use led to this unique and novel and fully practical solution. In our opinion one of the most valuable elements of Knowledge Bricks is the application of the Gesture Description Language technology as a natural user interface and easy to manage gestures knowledge base usable for teachers when they are designing virtual worlds or visual information management application. The task-based architecture of the virtual world enables a clear definition of the interaction goal. What is more, our implementation based on off-the-shelf hardware has proven that deploying such an application in schools does not require expensive hardware or dedicated classrooms. We evaluated our approach on a group of students of different ages, particularly of the pre-school and primary school age for whom we believe our proposition will be the most valuable and attractive. Based on this system evaluation we can conclude that our natural user interface can be successfully used for all the considered age groups. We believe that 6–9-year-olds are the best target group for our system.
Keywords: Virtual reality; Gesture Description Language; Natural user interface; Gestures and actions recognition; Gestures knowledge base management

Jeff Magee, Naranker Dulay, A configuration approach to parallel programming, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 8, Issue 4, September 1992, Pages 337-347, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-739X(92)90067-L.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0167739X9290067L)
Abstract: This paper advocates a configuration approach to parallel programming for distributed memory multicomputers, in particular, arrays of transputers. The configuration approach prescribes the rigorous separation of the logical structure of a program from its component parts. In the context of parallel programs, components are processes which communicate by exchanging messages. The configuration defines the instances of these processes which exist in the program and the paths by which they are interconnected.

The approach is demonstrated by a toolset (Tonic) which embodies the configuration paradigm. A separate configuration language is used to describe both the logical structure of the parallel program and the physical structure of the target multicomputer. Different logical to physical mappings can be obtained by applying different physical configurations to the same logical configuration. The toolset has been developed from the Conic system for distributed programming. The use of the toolset is illustrated through its application to the development of a parallel program to compute Mandelbrot sets.
Keywords: Parallel programming environment; parallel programming language; configuration language; transputers

Jia Wang, Robert Lindeman, Coordinated hybrid virtual environments: Seamless interaction contexts for effective virtual reality, Computers & Graphics, Volume 48, May 2015, Pages 71-83, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2015.02.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849315000151)
Abstract: Abstract
Despite the benefits of presence, immersive virtual reality is still too limiting and ineffective to be widely adopted in people׳s everyday lives. One important reason for this is its inability to handle highly diverse 3D interaction tasks, such as object manipulation from different scales, perspectives, reference frames, and dimensions. Inspired by preliminary development of an immersive world builder tool, this paper offers an in-depth presentation of our solution to this problem, using a coordinated, tablet- and HMD-based, hybrid virtual environment (HVE) system. Wearing a non-occlusive HMD, the user is able to view and interact with a tablet mounted on the non-dominant forearm, which provides a multi-touch interaction surface, as well as an exocentric God view of the virtual world. To reduce transition gaps across 3D interaction tasks and interfaces, four coordination mechanisms are proposed, two of which were implemented, and one was evaluated in a user study featuring complex level-editing tasks. Based on subjective ratings, task performance, interview feedback, and video analysis, we found that having multiple seamless Interaction Contexts (ICs) with complementary benefits can lead to good performance and user experience, despite the complexity of learning and using the hybrid system. The results also suggest keeping 3DUI tasks synchronized across the ICs, as this can help users understand their relationships, smoothen within- and between-task IC transitions, and inspire more creative use of different interfaces. Finally, based on these findings, a four-step design process is proposed to aid the process of designing and implementing HVE systems, as well as applying them to appropriate task scenarios.
Keywords: Hybrid virtual environments; 3D user interface; Tablet interface; Transitional continuity; Virtual reality

D. Hofman, L. Monte, P. Boyer, J. Brittain, G. Donchyts, E. Gallego, D. Gheorghiu, L. Håkanson, R. Heling, A. Kerekes, G. Kocsy, S. Lepicard, O. Slavik, D. Slavnicu, J. Smith, M. Zheleznyak, Computerised Decision Support Systems for the management of freshwater radioecological emergencies: assessment of the state-of-the-art with respect to the experiences and needs of end-users, Journal of Environmental Radioactivity, Volume 102, Issue 2, February 2011, Pages 119-127, ISSN 0265-931X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jenvrad.2010.11.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0265931X1000247X)
Abstract: Assessment of the environmental and radiological consequences of a nuclear accident requires the management of a great deal of data and information as well as the use of predictive models. Computerised Decision Support Systems (CDSS) are essential tools for this kind of complex assessment and for assisting experts with a rational decision process. The present work focuses on the assessment of the main features of selected state-of-the-art CDSS for off-site management of freshwater ecosystems contaminated by radionuclides. This study involved both developers and end-users of the assessed CDSS and was based on practical customisation exercises, installation and application of the decision systems. Potential end-users can benefit from the availability of several ready-to-use CDSS that allow one to run different kinds of models aimed at predicting the behaviour of radionuclides in aquatic ecosystems, evaluating doses to humans, assessing the effectiveness of different kinds of environmental management interventions and ranking these interventions, accounting for their social, economic and environmental impacts. As a result of the present assessment, the importance of CDSS “integration” became apparent: in many circumstances, different CDSS can be used as complementary tools for the decision-making process. The results of this assessment can also be useful for the future development and improvement of the CDSS.
Keywords: Decision support systems; Nuclear emergency management; Countermeasure effectiveness; Radionuclides; Freshwater ecosystems

Gaurav Singhal, Mainuddin, R.K. Tyagi, A.L. Dawar, P.M.V. Subbarao, Pressure recovery studies on a supersonic COIL with central ejector configuration, Optics & Laser Technology, Volume 42, Issue 7, October 2010, Pages 1145-1153, ISSN 0030-3992, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.optlastec.2010.02.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S003039921000068X)
Abstract: A chemical oxygen–iodine laser (COIL) is an electronic transition, low pressure, high throughput system. The field use of this laser demands the development of suitable pressure recovery systems. Ejector based pressure recovery systems form a potent alternative for open cycle COIL operation. The two possible configurations of motive gas injection in ejectors are peripheral and central. The present paper focuses on the investigation of a central injection low pressure ejector operated with a small scale supersonic COIL (SCOIL). The ejector handles a motive flow of nearly 120 g s−1 and an entrained laser flow of nearly 3 g s−1. The predicted geometry using integral methods has been validated numerically by employing Fluent 6.1 software in a 2-d axisymmetric viscous turbulent flow formulation. The numerical predictions have been experimentally validated, which indicate a pressure recovery of 63 Torr at design conditions. The results also show that the recovered pressure improves to 75 Torr for an off-design condition of higher motive flow rate.
Keywords: SCOIL; Central ejector; Pressure recovery

Gaoliang Peng, Gongdong Wang, Wenjian Liu, Haiquan Yu, A desktop virtual reality-based interactive modular fixture configuration design system, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 42, Issue 5, May 2010, Pages 432-444, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cad.2009.02.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010448509000402)
Abstract: Modular fixture configuration design is a complicated task requiring strong professional background and practical experience. However, automated or semi-automated computer aided modular fixture systems based on CAD packages still are not well accepted by the manufacturing industry due to the lack of intuitive interaction and immediate feedback compared with traditional models such as paper and physical models. In this paper, a novel Virtual Reality-based system for interactive modular fixture configuration design is presented. We use a multi-view based modular fixture assembly model to assist information representation and management. In addition, the suggested strategy is compatible with the principles of virtual environment and it is easy to reutilize the element model. Based on geometric constraints, we propose a precise 3D manipulation approach to improve intuitive interaction and accurate 3D positioning of fixture components in virtual space. Thus, the modular fixture configuration design task can precisely be performed in virtual space.
Keywords: Modular fixture design; Virtual reality; Virtual assembly model; 3D manipulation approach

Markus M. Ulrich, Dieter M. Imboden, RenéP. Schwarzenbach, MASAS—A user-friendly simulation tool for modeling the fate of anthropogenic substances in lakes, Environmental Software, Volume 10, Issue 3, 1995, Pages 177-198, ISSN 0266-9838, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0266-9838(95)00012-A.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/026698389500012A)
Abstract: MASAS is a computer simulation tool to investigate anthropogenic organic compounds in lakes. Models included are based on a dynamic one-dimensional vertical lake model describing the time-dependent concentration of a compound in the water column and in the sediment. Provision of data is ensured by library files. Interactive specification of transport and transformation processes yields models of different complexity, suitable for the initial assessment of chemicals and for chemodynamic studies. A hypothetical spill of an insecticide (disulfoton) serves as an illustration. Aspects relevant to the development of user-friendly software in the environmental sciences are discussed. User-friendliness is found to depend more on program concepts than on a particular user interface. The management of data sets on lakes and compounds, and the implementation of transport and transformation processes in MASAS exemplify the significance of modularization, program data structures, the use of metaphors, and the distinction between automatic and user-controlled program functions.
Keywords: dynamic lake model; anthropogenic pollution; organic chemical; environment; disulfoton; design concepts; user-friendly software

G Winstanley, JM Kellett, A computer-based configuration and planning system, International Journal of Project Management, Volume 11, Issue 2, May 1993, Pages 103-110, ISSN 0263-7863, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0263-7863(93)90018-I.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/026378639390018I)
Abstract: Product-oriented domains are characterized by their commitment to one product, or a relatively small range of similar products. In many cases, their products are large, highly complex and costly, and, because of the reliance of such manufacturing companies on a steady, but sometimes small, flow of manufacturing projects, the accurate, cost- effective and timely production of bids to prospective clients is crucial to their survival. The paper outlines the results of research into the application of expert-systems techniques to the modelling, configuration and planning of product-oriented manufacture, and, in particular, to one particular industry: the manufacture of flight simulators.
Keywords: configuration; planning; knowledge-based systems

Dominique Foray, Users, standards and the economics of coalitions and committees, Information Economics and Policy, Volume 6, Issues 3–4, December 1994, Pages 269-293, ISSN 0167-6245, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-6245(94)90005-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0167624594900051)
Abstract: The goal of this paper is two-fold. Firstly, it attempts to demonstrate that the exclusion of users from the information technology standardization process results in losses as regards the social benefits of standardization. Secondly, the paper deals with two problems regarding the user's involvement in the standard-setting process: (1) involving users in IT standardization requires the creation of effective user coalitions; and (2) including users in the work of standardization committees introduces even more objective functions that must be accommodated.
Keywords: Standardization; Compatibility; User; Coalitions; Committees

Mandana Sotoodeh, Rachel Pottinger, Philippe Kruchten, Towards Supporting Users in Semantic Exploration of Large Distributed Schemas, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 5, 2011, Pages 570-577, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2011.07.074.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050911003991)
Abstract: Emergency management increasingly depends on various information systems to support crisis operations and facilitate communication and coordination. In this paper, we address the issues that may arise in large schemas that are developed collaboratively by diverse community of users for data sharing. We share our experience with the U.S. National Information Exchange Model and the free web-based tools available for searching its schemas. Based on what we learned, we propose techniques for enhancing the tools designed for search and exploration of such complex schemas.
Keywords: Emergency management; Data standards; NIEM; Schema exploration; Schema matching

Klaus-Peter Engelbrecht, Sebastian Möller, Sequential classifiers for the prediction of user judgments about spoken dialog systems, Speech Communication, Volume 52, Issue 10, October 2010, Pages 816-833, ISSN 0167-6393, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.specom.2010.06.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167639310001032)
Abstract: So far, predictions of user quality judgments in response to spoken dialog systems have been achieved on the basis of interaction parameters describing the dialog, e.g. in the PARADISE framework. These parameters do not take into account the temporal position of events happening in the dialog. It seems promising to apply sequence classification algorithms to the raw annotations of the data, instead of interaction parameters describing the overall dialog.

As dialogs can be of very different length, Hidden Markov Models (HMM) and Markov Chains (MC) are handy, because they describe the likelihood of traversing to a state given only the previous state and the transition probability, thus they can be trained and applied to sequences of different lengths.

This paper analyzes the feasibility of predicting user judgments with HMMs and MCs. In order to test the models, we acquire data with different types of users, forcing users to do as similar interactions as possible, and asking for user judgments after each turn. This allows comparing predicted distributions of judgments to the distributions measured empirically. We also apply the models to less rich corpora and compare them with results from Linear Regression models as used in the PARADISE framework.
Keywords: Prediction model; Evaluation; PARADISE; Spoken dialog system; Usability

E.S. Fraga, G.W.A. Rowe, A discrete interactive graphical method for heat exchanger network synthesis, In: W. Marquardt and C. Pantelides, Editor(s), Computer Aided Chemical Engineering, Elsevier, 2006, Volume 21, Pages 877-882, ISSN 1570-7946, ISBN 9780444529695, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1570-7946(06)80156-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1570794606801562)
Abstract: A discrete formulation for heat exchanger network synthesis (hens) problems has been defined. The formulation provides the basis for a stochastic optimization procedure based on simulated annealing and also for visualisation and user interaction through a graphical interface. The discrete formulation is based on the concept of a quantum of heat flux used to discretize all the strams in the schens problem. The design problem then consists of identifying matches of pairs of quanta. The simulated annealing procedure builds chains consisting of contiguous matches in the discrete search space. Results for a case study from the literature are presented highlighting the ease with which good solutions are obtained and the benefits from engineer-computer interaction.

H.Rex Hartson, Eric C. Smith, Rapid prototyping in human-computer interface development, Interacting with Computers, Volume 3, Issue 1, April 1991, Pages 51-91, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0953-5438(91)90005-M.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095354389190005M)
Abstract: Some conventional approaches to interactive system development tend to force commitment to design detail without a means for visualizing the result until it is too late to make significant changes. Rapid prototyping and iterative system refinement, especially for the human interface, allow early observation of system behaviour and opportunities for refinement in response to user feedback. The role of rapid prototyping for evaluation of interface designs is set in the system development life-cycle. Advantages and pitfalls are weighed, and detailed examples are used to show the application of rapid prototyping in a real development project. Kinds of prototypes are classified according to how they can be used in the development process, and system development issues are presented. The future of rapid prototyping depends on solutions to technical problems that presently limit effectiveness of the technique in the context of present day software development environments.
Keywords: rapid prototyping; human-computer interaction; prototyping; user interface; development environment; development methodology; evaluation; life-cycle; software tools; user interface management

G. De Tommasi, P. Di Sanzo, A. Pironti, A GRAPHICAL TOOL FOR DESIGN PORTABLE AUTOMATION SOFTWARE, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 39, Issue 6, 2006, Pages 440-445, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20060621-3-ES-2905.00076.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015331700)
Abstract: Abstract
UniSim is a graphical tool which can be used to avoid the choice of a specific commercial platform when teaching the IEC 61131-3 standard for programmable logic controllers. UniSim allows to develop automation software which is fully compliant with the standard, and to validate it via simulation. It can also be used to fast prototyping automation systems using a desktop equipped with low-cost commercial I/O boards. This prototype can be interfaced with a plant simulator to perform hardware-in-the-loop validation of the control system.
Keywords: IEC 61131-3; programmable logic controllers; fast prototyping; hardware-in-the-loop-validation

Seungjun Kim, N.P. Mahalik, Anind K. Dey, Jeha Ryu, Byungha Ahn, Feasibility and infrastructural study of AR interfacing and intuitive simulation on 3D nonlinear systems, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 30, Issues 1–2, January 2008, Pages 36-51, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2007.07.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548907000487)
Abstract: High-fidelity simulations with intuitive user interfaces expedite real-world tasks. Augmented Reality (AR), enables 3D computer-generated entities to coexist in users' view of their real workspace. In this paper, the AR methodology is combined with custom-built 3D simulators of two nonlinear systems that show different motion characteristics: robot and spacecraft. The target systems are modeled on the basis of system parametric datasets, and their motions are specified and graphically represented according to characteristics of applied control algorithms. In our proposed system architecture, an AR process is incorporated with a 3D graphic engine and other functional modules for system analysis, simulation and control. Experiments demonstrate a feasibility study as well as intuitive 3D simulation performance and interactive AR interface features.
Keywords: Augmented reality; Interface; 3D simulation; Robot; Spacecraft

M. Ott, G. Michelitsch, D. Reininger, G. Welling, An architecture for adaptive QoS and its application to multimedia systems design, Computer Communications, Volume 21, Issue 4, 10 April 1998, Pages 334-349, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0140-3664(97)00167-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366497001679)
Abstract: We describe a prototype implementation of a distributed multimedia system that generalizes the concept of QoS to all layers of its software architecture. Each layer deals with QoS at its appropriate level of abstraction using a generic API for communicating QoS parameters and values to layers above and below. The aggregation of these parameters and values is called a service contract. This architecture provides a hierarchical framework to design adaptive multimedia systems. Furthermore, the API allows for reporting of contract violations as well as dynamic renegotiation of the contract terms.

A proof-of-concept multimedia system was built to evaluate the proposed architecture. Key components of this system are: a graphical user interface that dynamically requests the quality expected by the user to lower level components, a dynamic network service that efficiently matches network resources to user requirements and a processor scheduler which schedules tasks according to their execution requirements. Our experience with this system showed that the proposed architecture is an efficient framework for building adaptive multimedia systems.
Keywords: multimedia distributed systems; quality of service; variable bit-rate video; graphical user interface

Felix Wang, Simulation Tool for Asynchronous Cortical Streams (STACS): Interfacing with Spiking Neural Networks, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 61, 2015, Pages 322-327, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2015.09.149.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050915029798)
Abstract: Abstract
We present a Simulation Tool for Asynchronous Cortical Streams (STACS) for studying spiking neural networks exhibiting adaptation in a closed-loop system. The goal is to develop a more complete understanding of the emergent behaviors at the network level, and attention is given to methods of analysis at this scale. In particular, STACS facilitates the development of network level metrics of spiking activity. At the same time, emphasis is placed on biologically faithful models of spiking and plasticity with respect to the underlying neural substrate. The essential component, however, is the ability of the neural system in interfacing with the environment. This is because behaviors such as learning and adaptation are inherently closed-loop processes that involve the interaction between an intelligent agent and its environment, here, embodied cognition. To this end, STACS utilizes a portable communication protocol, YARP, for interfacing and interacting with a wide range of external devices, both sensory and motor, as well as the ability to create user-defined methods. In doing so, we may capture and respond to real world input to a neural network, simulating experimentation of live cortical cultures such as on multielectrode arrays.
Keywords: simulation; spiking; neural network; asynchronous communication; closed-loop; embodied cognition; biological models

Jianfeng Hua, Xinfan Lin, Liangfei Xu, Jianqiu Li, Minggao Ouyang, Bluetooth wireless monitoring, diagnosis and calibration interface for control system of fuel cell bus in Olympic demonstration, Journal of Power Sources, Volume 186, Issue 2, 15 January 2009, Pages 478-484, ISSN 0378-7753, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jpowsour.2008.10.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378775308019198)
Abstract: With the worldwide deterioration of the natural environment and the fossil fuel crisis, the possible commercialization of fuel cell vehicles has become a hot topic. In July 2008, Beijing started a clean public transportation plan for the 29th Olympic games. Three fuel cell city buses and 497 other low-emission vehicles are now serving the Olympic core area and Beijing urban areas. The fuel cell buses will operate along a fixed bus line for 1 year as a public demonstration of green energy vehicles. Due to the specialized nature of fuel cell engines and electrified power-train systems, measurement, monitoring and calibration devices are indispensable. Based on the latest Bluetooth wireless technology, a novel Bluetooth universal data interface was developed for the control system of the fuel cell city bus. On this platform, a series of wireless portable control auxiliary systems have been implemented, including wireless calibration, a monitoring system and an in-system programming platform, all of which are ensuring normal operation of the fuel cell buses used in the demonstration.
Keywords: Fuel cell bus; Bluetooth; Universal data interface; Control system; Wireless calibration and monitoring; In-system programming

Linda W.P. Peute, Nicolette F. de Keizer, Monique W.M. Jaspers, The value of Retrospective and Concurrent Think Aloud in formative usability testing of a physician data query tool, Journal of Biomedical Informatics, Volume 55, June 2015, Pages 1-10, ISSN 1532-0464, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jbi.2015.02.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1532046415000386)
Abstract: AbstractObjective
To compare the performance of the Concurrent (CTA) and Retrospective (RTA) Think Aloud method and to assess their value in a formative usability evaluation of an Intensive Care Registry-physician data query tool designed to support ICU quality improvement processes.
Methods
Sixteen representative intensive care physicians participated in the usability evaluation study. Subjects were allocated to either the CTA or RTA method by a matched randomized design. Each subject performed six usability-testing tasks of varying complexity in the query tool in a real-working context. Methods were compared with regard to number and type of problems detected. Verbal protocols of CTA and RTA were analyzed in depth to assess differences in verbal output. Standardized measures were applied to assess thoroughness in usability problem detection weighted per problem severity level and method overall effectiveness in detecting usability problems with regard to the time subjects spent per method.
Results
The usability evaluation of the data query tool revealed a total of 43 unique usability problems that the intensive care physicians encountered. CTA detected unique usability problems with regard to graphics/symbols, navigation issues, error messages, and the organization of information on the query tool’s screens. RTA detected unique issues concerning system match with subjects’ language and applied terminology. The in-depth verbal protocol analysis of CTA provided information on intensive care physicians’ query design strategies. Overall, CTA performed significantly better than RTA in detecting usability problems. CTA usability problem detection effectiveness was 0.80 vs. 0.62 (p &lt; 0.05) respectively, with an average difference of 42% less time spent per subject compared to RTA. In addition, CTA was more thorough in detecting usability problems of a moderate (0.85 vs. 0.7) and severe nature (0.71 vs. 0.57).
Conclusion
In this study, the CTA is more effective in usability-problem detection and provided clarification of intensive care physician query design strategies to inform redesign of the query tool. However, CTA does not outperform RTA. The RTA additionally elucidated unique usability problems and new user requirements. Based on the results of this study, we recommend the use of CTA in formative usability evaluation studies of health information technology. However, we recommend further research on the application of RTA in usability studies with regard to user expertise and experience when focusing on user profile customized (re)design.
Keywords: User–computer interface; Usability; Methodologies; Think Aloud; ICU; Databases

Febo Cincotti, Donatella Mattia, Fabio Aloise, Simona Bufalari, Gerwin Schalk, Giuseppe Oriolo, Andrea Cherubini, Maria Grazia Marciani, Fabio Babiloni, Non-invasive brain–computer interface system: Towards its application as assistive technology, Brain Research Bulletin, Volume 75, Issue 6, 15 April 2008, Pages 796-803, ISSN 0361-9230, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.brainresbull.2008.01.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0361923008000142)
Abstract: The quality of life of people suffering from severe motor disabilities can benefit from the use of current assistive technology capable of ameliorating communication, house-environment management and mobility, according to the user's residual motor abilities. Brain–computer interfaces (BCIs) are systems that can translate brain activity into signals that control external devices. Thus they can represent the only technology for severely paralyzed patients to increase or maintain their communication and control options.

Here we report on a pilot study in which a system was implemented and validated to allow disabled persons to improve or recover their mobility (directly or by emulation) and communication within the surrounding environment. The system is based on a software controller that offers to the user a communication interface that is matched with the individual's residual motor abilities. Patients (n = 14) with severe motor disabilities due to progressive neurodegenerative disorders were trained to use the system prototype under a rehabilitation program carried out in a house-like furnished space. All users utilized regular assistive control options (e.g., microswitches or head trackers). In addition, four subjects learned to operate the system by means of a non-invasive EEG-based BCI. This system was controlled by the subjects’ voluntary modulations of EEG sensorimotor rhythms recorded on the scalp; this skill was learnt even though the subjects have not had control over their limbs for a long time.

We conclude that such a prototype system, which integrates several different assistive technologies including a BCI system, can potentially facilitate the translation from pre-clinical demonstrations to a clinical useful BCI.
Keywords: EEG-based brain–computer interfaces; Assistive robotics; Severe motor impairment; Technologies for independent life

Isaac José Antonio Luquetti dos Santos, Douglas Vidal Teixeira, Fernando Toledo Ferraz, Paulo Victor Rodrigues Carvalho, The use of a simulator to include human factors issues in the interface design of a nuclear power plant control room, Journal of Loss Prevention in the Process Industries, Volume 21, Issue 3, May 2008, Pages 227-238, ISSN 0950-4230, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jlp.2007.04.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950423007000447)
Abstract: Technology plays an important role in advanced control rooms that relies on complex technical equipment and interfaces. Human error has many causes such as performance shaping factors, organizational factors and interface design. In the safe operation of nuclear power plant, the performance of the control room crew plays an important role. In this respect, a well-designed control room and human–system interfaces (HSIs) are crucial for safe and efficient operation of the plant, reducing the occurrence of incidents, accidents and the risks of human error. Therefore, it is essential that the interfaces design must be conducted in a well-structured way, applying human factors principles in all phases of the control room life cycle. The aim of this paper is to present an approach to design the interfaces for a nuclear reactor control room. The methodological framework includes human factors guidelines and standards, checklists and ergonomics as an aid tool, based on the operator activity analysis. In this paper, we describe the application of the proposed methodology in an advanced control room of a nuclear power plant simulator.
Keywords: Human factors; Interfaces; Design; Control room; Nuclear reactor

Vagner Figueredo de Santana, Maria Cecília Calani Baranauskas, WELFIT: A remote evaluation tool for identifying Web usage patterns through client-side logging, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 76, April 2015, Pages 40-49, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2014.12.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581914001682)
Abstract: Abstract
Although websites evaluation tools use different data sources (e.g., Web pages, server logs, and mouse tracks), few of them support remote evaluation using detailed observational data. Without considering data that represent the user’s real interaction with the interface, usability problems and/or accessibility barriers may remain unknown. This work contributes to the field by providing a tool to identify usage patterns based on client-side event logs and by presenting event stream composition characteristics. The work results from a long-term project and the tool is now available to the community. The system records usage data during real use, identifies usage patterns, and indicates potential user interface design problems. The proposed tool was experimented, counting on 180 participants, during a 15 month period collecting data from website usage. Results obtained are promising regarding the identification of usage patterns and the characterization of event streams based on the types of events that compose them.
Keywords: User interface evaluation; Remote evaluation; User interface events; Client-side events; Web usability; Web accessibility

F. Cleary, M.J. McGrath, M. Gaiser, J.F. O’Connor, M. Everard, J. Holland, Development of a Low Cost Data Acquisition System for Milk Powder Production Line Monitoring, Journal of Dairy Science, Volume 82, Issue 9, September 1999, Pages 2039-2048, ISSN 0022-0302, http://dx.doi.org/10.3168/jds.S0022-0302(99)75442-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0022030299754421)
Abstract: A growing need for detailed process information exists within the food industry. However many small to medium sized companies are reluctant to install the necessary levels of automation and data capture because of the high capital expenditure necessary. This paper details the development of a monitoring system based on the use of off the shelf, low cost data acquisition hardware and software tools. The system is used to monitor a milk powder production plant. It supplies the necessary information to calculate yield defined specifically as gallons of milk per tonne of powder produced. This volume is calculated at 15-min intervals. Detailed information on utility, chemical, and energy usage rates is also acquired. This information is used to calculate accurately the costs per tonne of powder produced. All data are stored in a relational database, which facilitates historical trending and analysis of process efficiency. This powerful tool can evaluate performance of the process over an extended period and compare previous performances. Use of the collected data allowed an accurate economic evaluation of the milk powder process to be obtained. This system is a significant improvement over manual recording of data on logsheet and manual input of this data into a spreadsheet.
Key words: data acquisition; yield accounting; process control

L. Overmeyer, J. Dreyer, D. Altmann, Data mining based configuration of cyclically interlinked production systems, CIRP Annals - Manufacturing Technology, Volume 59, Issue 1, 2010, Pages 493-496, ISSN 0007-8506, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cirp.2010.03.081.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S000785061000082X)
Abstract: Cyclically interlinked production systems are commonly used production facilities. During the bidding phase manufacturers of these systems assure customers about the performance and operating efficiency despite numerous uncertainties. Up to now, there has been no planning approach that could hedge these results. Recently however, a method for configuring cyclically interlinked production systems during the bidding phase has been developed in order to resolve this deficit. Data mining models are built to predict performance figures of production systems, whereas, characteristic curves are used to predict the operating efficiency of a system configuration. This paper introduces the challenge of bid proposal management and explains the developed method.
Keywords: Planning; Production; System

Bruce A. Shapiro, Wojciech Kasprzak, Calvin Grunewald, Javed Aman, Graphical exploratory data analysis of RNA secondary structure dynamics predicted by the massively parallel genetic algorithm, Journal of Molecular Graphics and Modelling, Volume 25, Issue 4, December 2006, Pages 514-531, ISSN 1093-3263, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jmgm.2006.04.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1093326306000842)
Abstract: Studies indicate that RNA may enter intermediate and multiple conformational states, which may impact gene expression and molecular function. It is known that the biologically functional states of RNA molecules may not correspond to their minimum energy conformations, that kinetic barriers may trap the molecule in a local minimum, that folding often occurs during transcription, and that cases exist in which a molecule will transition between one or more functional conformations. Thus, methods for simulating the folding pathway and dynamic behavior of an RNA molecule are important for the prediction of RNA structure and its associated functions.

We have developed several data mining techniques guided by interactive visualization tools associated with our massively parallel genetic algorithm for RNA/DNA secondary structure prediction, MPGAfold, and StructureLab analysis workbench. Most of the methods and tools are also applicable to dynamic programming algorithm (DPA) folding data analysis. When applied to MPGAfold results these methodologies are used to determine the significant intermediate and final structures associated with co-transcriptional and full length RNA folding. Since the genetic algorithm is essentially stochastic, multiple runs are required to develop a consensus understanding of an RNA structure. The interactive visualizations facilitate interpretation of results from sequential or full length individual MPGAfold runs, final results of multiple folding runs, including multiple population sizes, and the results from multiple RNA sequences of one family. This paper describes several of these techniques and shows how they are used to help solve this highly combinatoric problem.
Keywords: RNA secondary structure; HIV-1 structural metastability; Folding pathway; Visual datamining; Massively parallel genetic algorithm (MPGAfold); StructureLab analysis workbench

Min-Hsiung Hung, Tsung-Li Wang, Feng-Yi Hsu, Fan-Tien Cheng, Development of an Interface C framework for semiconductor e-Diagnostics systems, Robotics and Computer-Integrated Manufacturing, Volume 24, Issue 3, June 2008, Pages 370-383, ISSN 0736-5845, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.rcim.2007.02.020.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736584507000440)
Abstract: Interface C has been defined as the access interface of an e-Diagnostics system by International SEMATECH. This paper proposes a novel Interface C framework, called ICF, which aims to be a solution to the implementation of Interface C. The ICF is developed using several technologies, such as Web Services, Clustering, XML-related security techniques, and object-oriented methods. In addition to providing a variety of e-Diagnostics functions, the ICF possesses dedicated mechanisms which can solve many important issues in Interface C, such as interoperability among distributed systems, supporting remote diagnoses through multi-party collaboration, data isolation for different suppliers, diagnostics service and storage failover for assuring system availability, and the security measures related to the above issues. A prototype e-Diagnostics system based on the ICF has been constructed. Integration tests show that it works smoothly with good performance and meets the designed objectives. It is believed that the proposed ICF can be an effective solution for implementing the Interface C of e-Diagnostics systems in semiconductor industry.
Keywords: e-Diagnostics; Interface C framework; Web services; Data isolation; Security measures; Clustering technology

Gareth R. James, Chapter 7 - Fundamental Configuration of the Citrix Provisioning Server, In Citrix XenDesktop Implementation, Syngress, Boston, 2010, Pages 191-258, ISBN 9781597495820, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-59749-582-0.00007-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597495820000075)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter presents the fundamentals of using the provisioning server in a XenDesktop environment. The primary tool used to manage provisioning server is the Provisioning Services Console. The Provisioning Services Console allows users to manage how they provision virtual disks (vDisks) to workstations (Target Devices). The Stores node is used to configure the storage locations for the vDisks. It is important that all the provisioning servers in a farm can access the same vDisks to enable fail over and load balancing of the vDisks among provisioning servers in the farm. The first step required, before the user can provision vDisks, is to create a storage location to store the vDisks and write cache. The vDisk component is always mounted through the provisioning server, which can store the vDisk in one of two places: on a local hard disk or on shared storage. Local storage is recommended for smaller implementations; larger Enterprise implementations can equally use local storage or Storage Area Network (SAN) attached storage. SAN storage may, however, be useful in larger environments where the benefits of the replication of the vDisks outweigh the costs.

David T. Limmer, Adam P. Willard, Nanoscale heterogeneity at the aqueous electrolyte–electrode interface, Chemical Physics Letters, Volume 620, 20 January 2015, Pages 144-150, ISSN 0009-2614, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cplett.2014.11.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0009261414009476)
Abstract: Abstract
Using molecular dynamics simulations, we reveal emergent properties of hydrated electrode interfaces that while molecular in origin are integral to the behavior of the system across long times scales and large length scales. Specifically, we describe the impact of a disordered and slowly evolving adsorbed layer of water on the molecular structure and dynamics of the electrolyte solution adjacent to it. Generically, we find that densities and mobilities of both water and dissolved ions are spatially heterogeneous in the plane parallel to the electrode over nanosecond timescales. These and other recent results are analyzed in the context of available experimental literature from surface science and electrochemistry. We speculate on the implications of this emerging microscopic picture on the catalytic proficiency of hydrated electrodes, offering a new direction for study in heterogeneous catalysis at the nanoscale.

J. Arjan Wardekker, Jeroen P. van der Sluijs, Peter H.M. Janssen, Penny Kloprogge, Arthur C. Petersen, Uncertainty communication in environmental assessments: views from the Dutch science-policy interface, Environmental Science & Policy, Volume 11, Issue 7, November 2008, Pages 627-641, ISSN 1462-9011, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsci.2008.05.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1462901108000658)
Abstract: Scientific assessments of environmental problems, and policy responses to those problems, involve uncertainties of many sorts. Meanwhile, potential impacts of wrong decisions can be far-reaching. This article explores views on uncertainty and uncertainty communication in the Dutch science-policy interface and studies several issues concerning presentation of uncertainty information. Respondents considered uncertainty communication to be important, but it should be concise and policy relevant. Several factors influence policy relevance, including the place of an issue in the policy cycle, and its novelty, topicality and controversiality. Respondents held particular interest in explicit communication on the implications of uncertainty. Related to this, they appreciated information on different sources and types of uncertainty and qualitative aspects of uncertainty (e.g. pedigree charts). The article also studies probability terms, particularly for IPCC's 33–66% probability interval (‘about as likely as not’). Several terms worked reasonably well, with a median interpretation of 40–60%. Finally, as various target groups have different information needs and different amounts of attention for various parts of a report or communication process, it is important to progressively disclose uncertainty information throughout the communication. Improved communication of uncertainty information leads to a deeper understanding and increased awareness of the phenomenon of uncertainty and its policy implications.
Keywords: Risk communication; Uncertainty; Probability; Pedigree; Science-policy interface; Information needs

Olivier Pauplin, Praminda Caleb-Solly, Jim Smith, User-centric image segmentation using an interactive parameter adaptation tool, Pattern Recognition, Volume 43, Issue 2, February 2010, Pages 519-529, ISSN 0031-3203, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.patcog.2009.03.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0031320309000879)
Abstract: Creating successful machine vision systems often begins a process of developing customised reliable image segmentation algorithms for the detection, and possibly categorisation of regions of interest within images. This can require significant investment of time from both the image processing and the domain experts to set up. Frequently this process is mediated via interviews, or language-based systems which may not fully capture the visual decision-making process of the domain experts. The resulting algorithms can also often be “brittle” in the sense of being highly specialised to the task for which they are tuned, and are consequently sensitive to changes in operating conditions or image specifications.

One approach is to use interactive evolution for developing rapidly reconfigurable systems in which the users’ tacit knowledge and requirements can be elicited and used for finding the appropriate parameters to achieve the required segmentation without any need for specialised knowledge of the underlying machine vision systems. This paper presents an interactive tool that can be used to quickly and easily evolve optimal image segmentation parameters from scratch. Building on previous work, the new algorithm reported here incorporates user-guided local search and makes the fitness function more flexible to facilitate the underlying multi-objective decision-making process.

One of the key requirements for any interactive system is a high level of usability, both in terms of effectiveness—being able to build accurate models that meet end-user requirements—and efficiency—being able to achieve the required results within a minimal amount of time and undue effort. The system described in this paper has been designed with these considerations in mind to ensure a high level of user-experience of the interaction process. We present results from a series of experiments with a range of users to analyse the effect of the improvements that have been made over the previous system. The efficiency of the tool is also tested with “novice users”, and its usability by “novice users” is analysed.
Keywords: Interactive evolution; Texture-based segmentation; Evolutionary algorithm

H.J. Tange, V.A.B. Dreessen, A. Hasman, H.H.L.M. Donkers, An experimental electronic medical-record system with multiple views on medical narratives, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 54, Issue 3, November 1997, Pages 157-172, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0169-2607(97)00022-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169260797000229)
Abstract: In this article we describe a prototype electronic medical-record system that has been developed specifically to facilitate searching through medical narratives, as part of a preparatory study to the development of a medical workstation. This system contains a searching structure in which several views on the medical data are combined. We describe the structure of the database and the user-interface. A second design goal was to prepare the system for conducting research with respect to the use of the medical record. We address the kind of test designs the system can support and describe the research module that was implemented. We also describe a study we conducted with the system and report part of its results. We discuss the significance of this medical-record system compared to systems in the literature, some technical and functional problems encountered, and our future plans with the system.
Keywords: Electronic medical-record system; Graphical user-interface; Medical narratives

Helmut Prendinger, Chunling Ma, Mitsuru Ishizuka, Eye movements as indices for the utility of life-like interface agents: A pilot study, Interacting with Computers, Volume 19, Issue 2, March 2007, Pages 281-292, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2006.10.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543806001408)
Abstract: We motivate an approach to evaluating the utility of life-like interface agents that is based on human eye movements rather than questionnaires. An eye tracker is employed to obtain quantitative evidence of a user’s focus of attention without distracting from the primary task. The salient feature of our evaluation strategy is that it allows us to measure important properties of a user’s interaction experience on a moment-by-moment basis in addition to a cumulative (spatial) analysis of the user’s areas of interest. We describe a pilot study in which we compare attending behavior of subjects watching the presentation of a computer-generated apartment layout and visualization augmented by three types of media: an animated agent, a text box, and speech only. The investigation of eye movements revealed that deictic gestures performed by the agent are more effective in directing the attentional focus of subjects to relevant interface objects than the media used in the two control conditions, at a slight cost of distracting the user from visual inspection of the object of reference. The results also demonstrate that the presence of an interface agent seemingly triggers natural and social interaction protocols of human users.
Keywords: Animated interface agents; Evaluation; Eye movements; Focus/shift of attention; Web based presentation

M. Leinonen, J. Juuti, H. Jantunen, Interface circuit for resistive sensors utilizing digital potentiometers, Sensors and Actuators A: Physical, Volume 138, Issue 1, 20 July 2007, Pages 97-104, ISSN 0924-4247, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.sna.2007.04.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0924424707003196)
Abstract: In this paper an interface for resistive sensors in a bridge configuration is investigated. The interface utilizes digital potentiometers in order to implement an automatic calibration procedure for the bridge circuit offset. Such an approach facilitates the use of digital signal processing with high flexibility; advantageous in modern instrumentation systems. Commercial digital potentiometers have a very limited resistance range and therefore this method to overcome the discrete nominal resistance values was developed. The system was simulated mathematically and automatic calibration of the offset voltage was demonstrated with a prototype. An important additional advantage was an increase in resolution compared to a simple potentiometer circuit.
Keywords: Sensor; Interface; Bridge; Potentiometer

Faiz Sayyid, Sara Kalvala, On the importance of modelling the internal spatial dynamics of biological cells, Biosystems, Volume 145, July 2016, Pages 53-66, ISSN 0303-2647, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.biosystems.2016.05.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0303264716300752)
Abstract: Abstract
Spatial effects such as cell shape have very often been considered negligible in models of cellular pathways, and many existing simulation infrastructures do not take such effects into consideration. Recent experimental results are reversing this judgement by showing that very small spatial variations can make a big difference in the fate of a cell. This is particularly the case when considering eukaryotic cells, which have a complex physical structure and many subtle control mechanisms, but bacteria are also interesting for the huge variation in shape both between species and in different phases of their lifecycle.

In this work we perform simulations that measure the effect of three common bacterial shapes on the behaviour of model cellular pathways. To perform these experiments we develop ReDi-Cell, a highly scalable GPGPU cell simulation infrastructure for the modelling of cellular pathways in spatially detailed environments. ReDi-Cell is validated against known-good simulations, prior to its use in new work. We then use ReDi-Cell to conduct novel experiments that demonstrate the effect that three common bacterial shapes (Cocci, Bacilli and Spirilli) have on the behaviour of model cellular pathways. Pathway wavefront shape, pathway concentration gradients, and chemical species distribution are measured in the three different shapes. We also quantify the impact of internal cellular clutter on the same pathways. Through this work we show that variations in the shape or configuration of these common cell shapes alter model cell behaviour.
Keywords: Whole-cell simulation; Reaction–diffusion; GPGPU; Single-cell dynamics

Richard W. Lee, The development of a user-oriented plasma spectroscopy application, Journal of Quantitative Spectroscopy and Radiative Transfer, Volume 111, Issue 11, July 2010, Page 1553, ISSN 0022-4073, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jqsrt.2010.01.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0022407310000294)
Abstract: This note provides a short historical perspective on our paper “SPECTRA—a model for K-shell spectroscopy” [1] (JQSRT 1984;32:91–101).
Keywords: Collisional-radiative modeling; Hydrogenic model; Non-LTE kinetics; Plasma spectroscopy

Thomas Tometzki, Tobias Neymann, Jochen Steimel, Subanatarajan Subbiah, Sebastian Engell, An efficient and user-friendly optimization framework for batch process scheduling, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 43, Issue 17, 2010, Pages 28-33, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20100908-3-PT-3007.00007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016308734)
Abstract: Abstract
This contribution reports on an optimization framework for the formulation and the solution of batch scheduling problems. The problems are graphically modeled as extended resource task networks (eRTN). The extended resource task networks are automatically translated to timed automata (TA) and are composed by parallel composition to form a global automaton that represents the complete scheduling problem. An efficient cost-optimal reachability analysis is performed on the global automaton to derive the schedules. The schedules are presented graphically as Gantt-charts to the user and can be revised when required. The main advantage of this approach over standard mathematical programming techniques is the intuitive graphical and modular modeling and the ability to compute solutions within reasonable periods of time. The proposed framework is tested on a scheduling problem in a pipeless plant to demonstrate a successful application.
Keywords: Scheduling support systems; scheduling algorithms; timed automata

Kai-Florian Richter, Ben Weber, Brett Bojduj, Sven Bertel, Supporting the designer’s and the user’s perspectives in computer-aided architectural design, Advanced Engineering Informatics, Volume 24, Issue 2, April 2010, Pages 180-187, ISSN 1474-0346, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.aei.2009.08.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S147403460900055X)
Abstract: At any given step in the architectural design process, a designer can usually only consider a small subset of the actions that can be applied to a design along with the consequences of those actions on the overall design process. Computer-based design tools can enable humans to operate more efficiently in this process. In the end, the design product (i.e., a built environment) is meant to be used by people other than the designer. Taking the users’ perspective into account while creating a layout is crucial to not only creating an environment that fulfills all design constraints but that is also usable in everyday life. We present CoSyCAD, a program that can be used to assist architects in the layout of a floor plan; it simultaneously analyzes the cognitive complexity of routes through an indoor environment, thereby enabling direct feedback on a layout’s usability. We provide a sample scenario that utilizes the program and discuss further possible enhancements.

Debbie Stone, Caroline Jarrett, Mark Woodroffe and Shailey Minocha, CHAPTER 11 - Analysis and Interpretation of User Observation Evaluation Data, In User Experience Re-Mastered, edited by Chauncey Wilson,, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2010, Pages 327-344, ISBN 9780123751140, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-375114-0.00014-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123751140000141)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter discusses best practices and suggestions for analyzing and interpreting user observation evaluation data. The process of analysis is concerned with turning the evaluation data collected into information from which one can make decisions. There are three steps in the analysis of evaluation: collating the data, summarizing the data, and reviewing the data to identify any usability problems. Quantitative data are more eye-catching for the readers of evaluation report and are often regarded as more objective than qualitative data. Reporting is relatively simple if usability metrics are clearly defined. There are three groups of methods for summarizing quantitative data including tabulations, charts, and rankings, descriptive statistics, and inferential statistics such as tests of statistical significance that give the probability that a claim arising from the data can be applied to user population as a whole. On the other hand, quantitative data can reveal the existence of a defect, and perhaps the extent of its impact.

Dagmar Krefting, Julian Bart, Kamen Beronov, Olga Dzhimova, Jürgen Falkner, Michael Hartung, Andreas Hoheisel, Tobias A. Knoch, Thomas Lingner, Yassene Mohammed, Kathrin Peter, Erhard Rahm, Ulrich Sax, Dietmar Sommerfeld, Thomas Steinke, Thomas Tolxdorff, Michal Vossberg, Fred Viezens, Anette Weisbecker, MediGRID: Towards a user friendly secured grid infrastructure, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 25, Issue 3, March 2009, Pages 326-336, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2008.05.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X08000642)
Abstract: Many scenarios in medical research are predestined for grid computing. Large amounts of data in complex medical image, biosignal and genome processing demand large computing power and data storage. Integration of distributed, heterogeneous data, e.g. correlation between phenotype and genotype data are playing an essential part in life sciences. Sharing of specialized software, data and processing results for collaborative work are further tasks which would strongly benefit from the use of grid infrastructures. However, two major barriers are identified in existing grid environments that prevent extensive use within the life sciences community: Extended security requirements and appropriate usability. To meet these requirements, the MediGRID project is enhancing the basic D-Grid infrastructure along with the implementation of prototype applications from different fields of biomedical research. In this paper, we focus on the developments for ease-of-use under consideration of different aspects of security. They encompass not only security within the grid infrastructure, but also the boundary conditions of network security on the site of the research institutions. For medical grids, we propose a strictly web-portal-based access to grid resources for end-users, with user-guiding, application specific, graphical interfaces. Different levels of authorization are implemented, from fully authorized users to guests without certificate authentication in order to allow hands-on experience for potential grid users.
Keywords: Grid computing; Usability; Security; Healthgrids

Saffet Ayasun, Robert Fischl, Sean Vallieu, Jack Braun, Dilek Çadırlı, Modeling and stability analysis of a simulation–stimulation interface for hardware-in-the-loop applications, Simulation Modelling Practice and Theory, Volume 15, Issue 6, July 2007, Pages 734-746, ISSN 1569-190X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.simpat.2007.03.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1569190X0700041X)
Abstract: This paper presents the stability evaluation of a Simulation–Stimulation (Sim–Stim) interface that integrates hardware to software to perform Hardware-In-the-Loop (HIL) studies for testing and developing electrical equipment. Modeling issues of such an interface are discussed and a practical Sim–Stim interface model whose parameters are sampling rate and time delay is developed for the theoretical evaluation of the stability. The developed Sim–Stim interface model is applied to a low power DC system and closed-loop stability of the resulting HIL system is studied analytically in terms of time delay and sampling rate. A prototype of Sim–Stim interface is designed and realized to validate theoretical stability results using HIL simulation.
Keywords: Hardware-in-the-loop simulation; Simulation–stimulation interface; Power supply emulator; Load emulator; Modeling; Time delay; Stability

Alexander Serenko, The use of interface agents for email notification in critical incidents, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 64, Issue 11, November 2006, Pages 1084-1098, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2006.06.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581906000875)
Abstract: This study reports on several typical scenarios of the use of email notification interface agents under the influence of critical incidents. An interface agent is a reactive, collaborative, and autonomous visual computational system, which communicates directly with a person offering assistance and advice in performing computer-related tasks. The critical incident technique was employed to survey the actual users of an interface agent-based email notification application. Respondents were asked to provide the last most significant either positive or negative incident of the usage of interface agents in their email application. They were also asked to offer recommendations for designers and marketers of this technology. Sixty critical incidents were obtained and analysed. With regards to positive-outcome situations, one representative scenario was constructed. With respect to the negative-outcome events, three distinct scenarios were identified. Based on the critical incident technique, it is concluded that users acknowledge the quality of an agent when it acts reliably, an agent's intrusive behaviour results in an immediate agent usage termination, operability issues sometimes force people to reject the technology, and users attempt to preserve the employment of an agent under the negative impacts of external factors. A number of other practical recommendations for manufacturers and marketers are also outlined.
Keywords: Interface agents; Human–agent interaction; Email notification; Critical incident technique

Daniel Bazin, Tuner: A tool for designing and optimizing ion optical systems, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 664, Issue 1, 1 February 2012, Pages 186-192, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nima.2011.09.050.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168900211018456)
Abstract: Designing and optimizing ion optical systems is often a complex and difficult task, which requires the use of computational tools to iterate and converge towards the desired characteristics and performances of the system. Very often these tools are not well adapted for exploring the numerous degrees of freedom, rendering the process long and tedious, as well as somewhat random due to the very large number of local minima typically found when looking for a particular optical solution. This paper presents a novel approach to finding the desired solution of an optical system, by providing the user with an instant feedback of the effects of changing parameters. The process of finding an approximate solution by manually adjusting parameters is greatly facilitated, at which point the final tune can be calculated by minimization according to a number of constraints.
Keywords: Ion optics; Beam line design; Numerical optimization; Graphical interface

L. Brualla, M. Rodriguez, J. Sempau, SP-0619 PRIMO: A GRAPHICAL ENVIRONMENT FOR THE AUTOMATIC SIMULATION OF VARIAN AND ELEKTA LINACS WITH PENELOPE, Radiotherapy and Oncology, Volume 103, Supplement 1, May 2012, Pages S242-S243, ISSN 0167-8140, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-8140(12)70952-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167814012709520)

Juergen Sauer, Andreas Sonderegger, The influence of prototype fidelity and aesthetics of design in usability tests: Effects on user behaviour, subjective evaluation and emotion, Applied Ergonomics, Volume 40, Issue 4, July 2009, Pages 670-677, ISSN 0003-6870, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apergo.2008.06.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0003687008001129)
Abstract: An empirical study examined the impact of prototype fidelity on user behaviour, subjective user evaluation and emotion. The independent factors of prototype fidelity (paper prototype, computer prototype, fully operational appliance) and aesthetics of design (high vs. moderate) were varied in a between-subjects design. The 60 participants of the experiment were asked to complete two typical tasks of mobile phone usage: sending a text message and suppressing a phone number. Both performance data and a number of subjective measures were recorded. The results suggested that task completion time may be overestimated when a computer prototype is being used. Furthermore, users appeared to compensate for deficiencies in aesthetic design by overrating the aesthetic qualities of reduced fidelity prototypes. Finally, user emotions were more positively affected by the operation of the more attractive mobile phone than by the less appealing one.
Keywords: Usability test; Prototype fidelity; Aesthetics; Mobile phone

Andrew Hay, Peter Giannoulis, Keli Hay and Warren Verbanec, Chapter 3 - Initial IPSO Configuration, In Nokia Firewall, VPN, and IPSO Configuration Guide, Syngress, Boston, 2009, Pages 65-91, ISBN 9781597492867, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-59749-286-7.00003-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597492867000036)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
To prepare for the initial configuration of the Nokia appliance, one needs a workstation, laptop, or VT100-capable terminal that one can directly connect to the Nokia using a console cable or perhaps indirectly through a standard Ethernet connection. If one is configuring the Nokia appliance using the DHCP method, one will only need a standard Ethernet connection. Nokia supplies a DB-9 serial cable with all its devices. This cable allows for console connections from properly configured clients. If one does not have one of the Nokia cables, one can always use a standard null-modem cable for the serial connection. One can directly connect a crossover cable from the workstation to any Ethernet port on the Nokia device, or can indirectly connect a straight-through cable from the workstation to a hub or switch and from there to the appliance over another straight-through cable. The standard installation procedure is a five-step process. One must power on the appliance and enter the boot manager, initiate the installation process, answer the configuration questions, reboot the appliance, and then continue with the initial configuration steps.

D.W. Heermann, A. Linke, C. Münkel, A tool for materials exploration, Simulation Practice and Theory, Volume 5, Issue 4, 15 May 1997, Pages 377-385, ISSN 0928-4869, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0928-4869(96)00023-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0928486996000237)
Abstract: We present a tool for the simulation and analysis of materials properties. This tool comprises simulation methods for models of materials (metal and polymer materials) as well as sophisticated visualization techniques to explore materials. In this paper we describe the basic design principles.
Keywords: Computer simulation; Graphical user interface; Visualization; Materials science

Daniel Aarno and Jakob Engblom, Chapter 2 - Simics fundamentals, In Full-System Simulation with Simics, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2015, Pages 21-59, ISBN 9780128007259, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-800725-9.00002-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780128007259000020)
Abstract: Chapter 2 defines the basic terminology used throughout the book and introduces the reader to the Simics architecture, design, interface, and execution model. It describes how Simics works and why it works the way it does.
Keywords: Simics architecture; user interface; transaction-level modeling; full-system simulation; fast simulation

Febo Cincotti, Donatella Mattia, Fabio Aloise, Simona Bufalari, Laura Astolfi, Fabrizio De Vico Fallani, Andrea Tocci, Luigi Bianchi, Maria Grazia Marciani, Shangkai Gao, Jose Millan, Fabio Babiloni, High-resolution EEG techniques for brain–computer interface applications, Journal of Neuroscience Methods, Volume 167, Issue 1, 15 January 2008, Pages 31-42, ISSN 0165-0270, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jneumeth.2007.06.031.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0165027007003378)
Abstract: High-resolution electroencephalographic (HREEG) techniques allow estimation of cortical activity based on non-invasive scalp potential measurements, using appropriate models of volume conduction and of neuroelectrical sources. In this study we propose an application of this body of technologies, originally developed to obtain functional images of the brain's electrical activity, in the context of brain–computer interfaces (BCI).

Our working hypothesis predicted that, since HREEG pre-processing removes spatial correlation introduced by current conduction in the head structures, by providing the BCI with waveforms that are mostly due to the unmixed activity of a small cortical region, a more reliable classification would be obtained, at least when the activity to detect has a limited generator, which is the case in motor related tasks.

HREEG techniques employed in this study rely on (i) individual head models derived from anatomical magnetic resonance images, (ii) distributed source model, composed of a layer of current dipoles, geometrically constrained to the cortical mantle, (iii) depth-weighted minimum L2-norm constraint and Tikhonov regularization for linear inverse problem solution and (iv) estimation of electrical activity in cortical regions of interest corresponding to relevant Brodmann areas.

Six subjects were trained to learn self modulation of sensorimotor EEG rhythms, related to the imagination of limb movements. Off-line EEG data was used to estimate waveforms of cortical activity (cortical current density, CCD) on selected regions of interest. CCD waveforms were fed into the BCI computational pipeline as an alternative to raw EEG signals; spectral features are evaluated through statistical tests (r2 analysis), to quantify their reliability for BCI control. These results are compared, within subjects, to analogous results obtained without HREEG techniques. The processing procedure was designed in such a way that computations could be split into a setup phase (which includes most of the computational burden) and the actual EEG processing phase, which was limited to a single matrix multiplication. This separation allowed to make the procedure suitable for on-line utilization, and a pilot experiment was performed.

Results show that lateralization of electrical activity, which is expected to be contralateral to the imagined movement, is more evident on the estimated CCDs than in the scalp potentials. CCDs produce a pattern of relevant spectral features that is more spatially focused, and has a higher statistical significance (EEG: 0.20 ± 0.114 S.D.; CCD: 0.55 ± 0.16 S.D.; p = 10−5). A pilot experiment showed that a trained subject could utilize voluntary modulation of estimated CCDs for accurate (eight targets) on-line control of a cursor.

This study showed that it is practically feasible to utilize HREEG techniques for on-line operation of a BCI system; off-line analysis suggests that accuracy of BCI control is enhanced by the proposed method.
Keywords: High-resolution electroencephalography; EEG-based brain–computer interfaces; Assistive technologies; Neuroimaging; Motor cortex

Albert M. Cook and Janice M. Polgar, Chapter 7 - Control Interfaces for Assistive Technologies, In Assistive Technologies (Fourth Edition), Mosby, St. Louis (MO), 2015, Pages 139-170, ISBN 9780323096317, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-323-09631-7.00007-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780323096317000077)

Pasquale De Meo, Giovanni Quattrone, Domenico Ursino, Exploitation of semantic relationships and hierarchical data structures to support a user in his annotation and browsing activities in folksonomies, Information Systems, Volume 34, Issue 6, September 2009, Pages 511-535, ISSN 0306-4379, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.is.2009.02.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S030643790900009X)
Abstract: In this paper we present a new approach to supporting users to annotate and browse resources referred by a folksonomy. Our approach is characterized by the following novelties: (i) it proposes a probabilistic technique to quickly and accurately determine the similarity and the generalization degrees of two tags; (ii) it proposes two hierarchical structures and two related algorithms to arrange groups of semantically related tags in a hierarchy; this allows users to visualize tags of their interests according to desired semantic granularities and, then, helps them to find those tags best expressing their information needs. In this paper we first illustrate the technical characteristics of our approach; then we describe various experiments allowing its performance to be tested; finally, we compare it with other related approaches already proposed in the literature.
Keywords: Folksonomies; Social tagging; Tag similarity; Social annotation

Christopher J. Vincent, Ann Blandford, Usability standards meet scenario-based design: Challenges and opportunities, Journal of Biomedical Informatics, Volume 53, February 2015, Pages 243-250, ISSN 1532-0464, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jbi.2014.11.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S153204641400238X)
Abstract: Abstract
The focus of this paper is on the challenges and opportunities presented by developing scenarios of use for interactive medical devices. Scenarios are integral to the international standard for usability engineering of medical devices (IEC 62366:2007), and are also applied to the development of health software (draft standard IEC 82304-1). The 62366 standard lays out a process for mitigating risk during normal use (i.e. use as per the instructions, or accepted medical practice). However, this begs the question of whether “real use” (that which occurs in practice) matches “normal use”. In this paper, we present an overview of the product lifecycle and how it impacts on the type of scenario that can be practically applied. We report on the development and testing of a set of scenarios intended to inform the design of infusion pumps based on “real use”. The scenarios were validated by researchers and practitioners experienced in clinical practice, and their utility was assessed by developers and practitioners representing different stages of the product lifecycle.

These evaluations highlighted previously unreported challenges and opportunities for the use of scenarios in this context. Challenges include: integrating scenario-based design with usability engineering practice; covering the breadth of uses of infusion devices; and managing contradictory evidence. Opportunities included scenario use beyond design to guide marketing, to inform purchasing and as resources for training staff. This study exemplifies one empirically grounded approach to communicating and negotiating the realities of practice.
Keywords: User-Computer interface; Multidisciplinary communication; Medical device design; Software design

M. Soemers, F. Alsmeyer, ALANDA for configuration-free analysis of process data, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 42, Issue 10, 2009, Pages 504-509, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20090706-3-FR-2004.00083.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016386979)
Abstract: Abstract
For the long-term storage of measured data from production processes, process information management systems (PIMS) have been established in the last years. The use of these measurement data offers optimization potential if the relevant process information can be extracted. This contribution gives an overview of the innovative algorithms the software platform ALANDA provides for online and offline analysis of process data. On the basis of configuration-free algorithms, the effort for data analysis and model building can be reduced significantly. An introduction to the methods for PIMS configuration, basic preprocessing, and trend detection is given. These methods, which are predominantly based on wavelet analysis are used for the identification of a soft sensor in an industrial application. Finally, we present a tutorial demonstration of ALANDA in terms of a trend detection in a separation process.
Keywords: Data compression; Preprocessing; Trends; Detection algorithms; Modelling

Frank Thornton, Chapter 6 - Kismet Client Configuration File, In Kismet Hacking, Syngress, Burlington, 2008, Pages 149-170, ISBN 9781597491174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-59749-117-4.00006-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978159749117400006X)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The Kismet client is controlled from a single configuration file. The client configuration file is usually in /usr/local/etc and is named kismet_ui.conf. The Kismet Client Config File is not as large as the server configuration file, but offers the same amount of flexibility and options. The kismet.conf config file can be edited directly with UNIX text editor (such as vi, pico, and emacs). The config file is parsed at runtime by the server and expects a UNIX text file. Comments in the kismet_ui.conf file are lines starting with a “#” symbol. These are often comments or example configurations and can usually guide to what options are needed to be set. Lines that do not start with a comment are the actual parameter variables acted upon by the server. The Kismet client configuration has its own version number, separate from the package release number and other config files. By default, Kismet shows an intro screen with some instructions on accessing help menus and other information. Changing the showintro= line to false prevents this intro message from showing up every time the client is started. Depending on one's system's capabilities, one's options for the type of Graphical User Interface (GUI) to use may need to change. By default, Kismet uses panels for its display. Other parameters of client such as where the server connects, traffic decay, columns (such as SSID, channel, and number of packets seen), sound, and probe networks can be customized. Just as the server, one can specify command-line switches for the Kismet client. Proper configuration of Kismet client can give the information one wants, where and when one needs it.

Rajesh Boddu, Uday Kumar Marupakula, Benjamin Summers, Pradip Majumdar, Development of bipolar plates with different flow channel configurations for fuel cells, Journal of Power Sources, Volume 189, Issue 2, 15 April 2009, Pages 1083-1092, ISSN 0378-7753, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jpowsour.2008.12.156.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S037877530900010X)
Abstract: Bipolar plates include separate gas flow channels for anode and cathode electrodes of a fuel cell. These gases flow channels supply reactant gasses as well as remove products from the cathode side of the fuel cell. Fluid flow, heat and mass transport processes in these channels have significant effect on fuel cell performance, particularly to the mass transport losses. The design of the bipolar plates should minimize plate thickness for low volume and mass. Additionally, contact faces should provide a high degree of surface uniformity for low thermal and electrical contact resistances. Finally, the flow fields should provide for efficient heat and mass transport processes with reduced pressure drops. In this study, bipolar plates with different serpentine flow channel configurations are analyzed using computational fluid dynamics modeling. Flow characteristics including variation of pressure in the flow channel across the bipolar plate are presented. Pressure drop characteristics for different flow channel designs are compared. Results show that with increased number of parallel channels and smaller sizes, a more effective contact surface area along with decreased pressured drop can be achieved. Correlations of such entrance region coefficients will be useful for the PEM fuel cell simulation model to evaluate the affects of the bipolar plate design on mass transfer loss and hence on the total current and power density of the fuel cell.
Keywords: Bipolar plates; Fuel cell

Daniele De Pedis, TASS—Trigger and Acquisition System Simulator. An interactive graphical tool for DAQ and trigger design, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 518, Issues 1–2, 1 February 2004, Pages 557-559, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nima.2003.11.084.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168900203029516)
Abstract: Trigger and Acquisition System Simulator is a simulation program with graphical and interactive interface. It reproduces in a realistic way the commercial Nim, Camac and Vme modules: both the front panel appearance and the electrical and logical behaviors are simulated.
Keywords: Trigger; Simulation; Data acquisition

Raphael Siebenmann, Hai-Tien Yu, Robert Bachus, UCIMS: Advances in geotechnical construction and performance monitoring, Journal of Rock Mechanics and Geotechnical Engineering, Volume 7, Issue 2, April 2015, Pages 207-212, ISSN 1674-7755, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jrmge.2015.03.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1674775515000281)
Abstract: Abstract
The Crossrail project currently under construction in Central London has been described as “The Big Dig on Steroids”, obviously referencing the Central Artery/Tunnel project in Boston completed in 2007. To address the multiple demands for timely construction performance monitoring, Crossrail envisioned the underground construction information management system (UCIMS) to monitor construction progress and structural health along the entire route, with a network of geotechnical instruments (i.e. slope inclinometers, extensometers, piezometers, etc.) and tunnel boring machine (TBM) position information. The UCIMS is a geospatially referenced relational database that was developed using an open source geographic information system (GIS) that allowed all stakeholders near immediate feedback of construction performance. The purpose of this article is to provide a brief history of geotechnical and structural monitoring software, to describe the structure and operation of the UCIMS, and to demonstrate how the functionality afforded by this system provided the requisite feedback to the stakeholders. Examples will be given regarding how the data management and visualization concepts incorporated into the UCIMS advanced the geotechnical construction industry.
Keywords: Tunneling; Geotechnical data management; Geographic information system (GIS); Web-based user interface

J. Hugo, 7 - Human–system interfaces (HSIs) in small modular reactors (SMRs), In Woodhead Publishing Series in Energy, Woodhead Publishing, 2015, Pages 149-190, Handbook of Small Modular Nuclear Reactors, ISBN 9780857098511, http://dx.doi.org/10.1533/9780857098535.2.149.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780857098511500078)

Fernando López-Colino, José Colás, Synthesizing mood-affected signed messages: Modifications to the parametric synthesis, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 70, Issue 4, April 2012, Pages 271-286, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2011.11.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581911001558)
Abstract: This paper describes the first approach in synthesizing mood-affected signed contents. The research focuses on the modifications applied to a parametric sign language synthesizer (based on phonetic descriptions of the signs). We propose some modifications that will allow for the synthesis of different perceived frames of mind within synthetic signed messages. Three of these proposals focus on modifications to three different signs' phonologic parameters (the hand shape, the movement and the non-hand parameter). The other two proposals focus on the temporal aspect of the synthesis (sign speed and transition duration) and the representation of muscular tension through inverse kinematics procedures. These resulting variations have been evaluated by Spanish deaf signers, who have concluded that our system can generate the same signed message with three different frames of mind, which are correctly identified by Spanish Sign Language signers.
Keywords: Sign language synthesis; Frame of mind synthesis; Graphical interface; Deaf people

P. Bistak, M. Huba, I. Belai, Comparing Constrained Controllers for Nonlinear Hydraulic Plant Using Matlab Interface*, IFAC-PapersOnLine, Volume 48, Issue 29, 2015, Pages 283-288, ISSN 2405-8963, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ifacol.2015.11.249.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S2405896315025070)
Abstract: Abstract
Controller design for hydraulic plants represents a task carried out frequently to demonstrate and compare properties of different nonlinear control approaches. The developed application demonstrates by simulation impact of several degrees of freedom in design of nonlinear model based methods: performance achievable by the dynamical feedforward, influence of different control constraints, of the parameter uncertainty, and of the closed loop dead time. The application can run locally as a simulation tool designed in Matlab/Simulink but also through the Internet as a virtual laboratory. Both approaches are described in the paper.
Keywords: PID control; nonlinear control; feedback linearization; robustness; dead time compensation; Matlab/Simulink; interactive tool; Internet application

Gopal Sundaramoorthy, John D. Hoford, Eric A. Hoffman, William E. Higgins, Impromptu: a system for automatic 3D medical image-analysis, Computerized Medical Imaging and Graphics, Volume 19, Issue 1, 1995, Pages 131-143, ISSN 0895-6111, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0895-6111(94)00042-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0895611194000425)
Abstract: The utility of three-dimensional (3D) medical imaging is hampered by difficulties in extracting anatomical regions and making measurements in 3D images. Presently, a user is generally forced to use time-consuming, subjective, manual methods, such as slice tracing and region painting, to define regions of interest. Automatic image-analysis methods can ameliorate the difficulties of manual methods. This paper describes a graphical user interface (GUI) system for constructing automatic image-analysis processes for 3D medical-imaging applications. The system, referred to as IMPROMPTU, provides a user-friendly environment for prototyping, testing and executing complex image-analysis processes. IMPROMPTU can stand alone or it can interact with an existing graphics-based 3D medical image-analysis package (VIDA), giving a strong environment for 3D image-analysis, consisting of tools for visualization, manual interaction, and automatic processing. IMPROMPTU links to a large library of 1D, 2D, and 3D image-processing functions, referred to as VIPLIB, but a user can easily link in custom-made functions. 3D applications of the system are given for left-ventricular chamber, myocardial, and upper-airway extractions.
Keywords: Three-dimensional imaging; Three-dimensional image analysis and display; Medical image analysis; Cardiac imaging; Image segmentation; Graphical user interfaces

Anne Wegerich, Jeronimo Dzaack, Matthias Rötting, Optimizing Virtual Superimpositions: User–centered Design for a UAR Supported Smart Home System, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 43, Issue 13, 2010, Pages 71-76, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20100831-4-FR-2021.00014.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S147466701532509X)
Abstract: Abstract
To localize a rover on small planetary body, a method using round-trip propagation delay of radio waves is most promising. In order to improve the estimation accuracy, it is necessary to estimate rotational motion of the small planetary body. A method of localization has been expanded to estimate also the rotational parameters of the small planetary body. The expanded problem includes complex nonlinear and dynamical issues that it cannot be solved analytically. So, the estimation problem has been formulated as an optimization problem to minimize the loss function defined based on the estimation errors derived in comparison with actual measurement data. A solution for the optimization problem has been proposed, which uses Powell's conjugate direction method for local searches. Although this solution does not require calculation of derivatives, it requires a large amount of computation since several forward calculations of the state are required for each minimum search. In this paper, a method to select measurement data is described, which provides as accurate estimation as the original results with reducing the computational amount. The main idea of selection is to conserve the sensitivity of the measurement data. The proposed method to select data is compared with the results using the decimated data of equal interval. Simulation results and experimental results are shown to evaluate computational reduction and estimation accuracy.
Keywords: Optimization; Reduction of computation; Sensitivity analysis; Range measurement

Brien Posey, Chapter 18 - Working with GFI Network Server Monitor's Configuration Console, In GFI Network Security and PCI Compliance Power Tools, Syngress, Boston, 2009, Pages 419-441, ISBN 9781597492850, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-59749-285-0.00018-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597492850000182)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter discusses some aspects of using the Configuration console. Monitoring checks are performed at the folder level. If one selects a folder, one can see the monitoring checks that exist for that particular folder. GFI Network Server Monitor assigns the monitoring checks that make sense for servers associated with a given folder. Sometimes, one may have a server whose role changes or may want to modify or customize a folder's monitoring checks for other reasons. Fortunately, this is not hard to do. One has the ability to modify any of the monitoring checks. To do so, one needs to just right-click the monitoring check and choose the Properties command from the shortcut menu. When this is done, the console will display the monitoring check's properties sheet. Any of the properties associated with a monitoring check can be modified, but usually one will be most interested in the properties sheet's Check Parameters tab. This is the tab that specifies the monitoring check's threshold value or other monitoring parameters.

Nathaniel Dean, Monika Mevenkamp, Clyde L. Monma, NETPAD: An interactive graphics system for network modeling and optimization, Operations Research Letters, Volume 17, Issue 2, March 1995, Pages 89-101, ISSN 0167-6377, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-6377(95)00010-H.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016763779500010H)
Abstract: The practical and theoretical importance of network models and algorithms is clearly documented in the literature. This has resulted in several recent efforts to develop systems for network modeling, algorithms and/or visualization. The main goal of this paper is to describe NETPAD, an interactive graphics system for network modeling and optimization. There were several factors motivating us while developing this system. First, networks are inherently visual; so an interactive graphics interface was considered to be a vital component of the overall design. Second, data form a very important part of network modeling; therefore, we have integrated network attributes and tables into the system. Third, algorithmic needs change over time to meet users' needs for additional functionality or performance, and to meet the needs of specific applications; so we have designed the system to be customizable and expandable. Fourth, widespread use of sophisticated methods requires ease-of-use in addition to functionality; so the system includes a menu-driven user interface, standard file formats and algorithm animation. NETPAD is a portable system written in the C programming language for workstations with the UNIX operating system and the X Window System.
Keywords: Network optimization; Graphical user interface (GUI); Software; Algorithms

Torsten Klein, Friedrich Ackermann, Stefan Posch, viwish: A visualisation server for protein modelling and docking, Gene, Volume 183, Issues 1–2, 1996, Pages GC51-GC58, ISSN 0378-1119, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0378-1119(96)00439-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378111996004398)
Abstract: A visualisation tool viwish for proteins based on the Tcl command language has been developed. The system is completely menu driven and can display arbitrary many proteins in arbitrary many windows. It is instantly to use, even for non computer experts and provides possibilities to modify menus, configurations, and windows. It may be used as a stand-alone molecular graphics package or as a graphics server for external programs. Communication with these client applications is established even across different machines (through the send command of Tk, an extension of Tcl). In addition, a wide range of chemical data like molecular surfaces and 3D gridded samplings of chemical features can be displayed. Therefore the system is especially useful for the development of algorithms that need visual inspection and verification of externally computed results like docked conformations or molecular surface shapes.

The system is distributed freely, including the source code [1].
Keywords: Graphical user interface; Tcl/Tk; Molecular graphics; Protein modelling; Protein docking

D. García-Romeo, I. Pellejero, M.A. Urbiztondo, J. Sesé, M.P. Pina, P.A. Martínez, B. Calvo, N. Medrano, Portable low-power electronic interface for explosive detection using microcantilevers, Sensors and Actuators B: Chemical, Volume 200, September 2014, Pages 31-38, ISSN 0925-4005, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.snb.2014.04.038.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0925400514004390)
Abstract: Abstract
Microcantilevers have been recently revealed as a highly effective technique for gas detection at trace level when acting as chemical sensors. However, an important milestone still remains to achieve a full-scale development in commercial applications: the cumbersome systems traditionally used to read-out its responses. To accomplish this, a portable low-power electronic interface, based on an analog lock-in amplifier processing square signals, which is fully capable of creating the excitation signal as well as obtaining the response values from resonating microcantilevers functionalized with zeolite based coatings has been herein attempted. The so obtained read-out results are in good agreement with the commercial lock-in amplifier's measurements, demonstrating the accuracy and reliability of the electronic interface. Finally, its performance has been validated for 2-nitrotoluene (o-MNT) detection at ppm V level, as an example of an explosive-related molecule, with BEA zeolite coated microcantilevers. Theoretical limit of detection (LOD) values below 100 ppb have been obtained for Co exchanged BEA modified sensors.
Keywords: Microcantilevers; Gas sensing; Zeolites; Nanoporous coating; Explosives; Portable lock-in amplifier.

Paolo Conti, Fausto Marcantoni, Alberto Polzonetti, Alfredo Colosimo, GCG stacks: a friendly interface for the GCG programs, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 39, Issues 1–2, September–October 1992, Pages 95-102, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-2607(92)90062-C.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016926079290062C)
Abstract: A 'PLUSTM stack which provides a friendly user interface for the GCG suite of programs is presented. The interface takes advantage of the whole set of programming tools available in a graphical and object-oriented environment and its major features include: (i) an efficient management of the on-line help documents, and (ii) a flexible editor for macrocommands. The former facilitate findings specific information in the huge documentation bundled with the GCG suite, and the latter is useful whenever several GCG programs must be run in sequence with automatic piping of the intermediate results.
Keywords: Molecular biology; Hypermedia; Graphical shells

R.J. Davies, C.D. Nugent, M.P. Donnelly, M. Hettinga, F.J. Meiland, F. Moelaert, M.D. Mulvenna, J.E. Bengtsson, D. Craig, R.-M. Dröes, A user driven approach to develop a cognitive prosthetic to address the unmet needs of people with mild dementia, Pervasive and Mobile Computing, Volume 5, Issue 3, June 2009, Pages 253-267, ISSN 1574-1192, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pmcj.2008.07.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574119208000643)
Abstract: This paper aims to provide the details of the approach adopted in the development of a cognitive prosthetic aimed to help address the unmet needs of people with mild dementia. The approach adopted is based on a waterfall style approach consisting of a series of three phases each of which contributes to the progression and improvement of a cognitive prosthetic-based solution. Within each phase, distinct stages of design, development and evaluation of the cognitive solution are conducted. The current paper discusses the distinct stages conducted in the first phase of the project which resulted in the design and development of a user driven solution based on the needs of 17 patient/carer dyads across three trial sites.
Keywords: Mild dementia; Cognitive prosthetics; Ageing; Intelligent environments

K. Mueller, E.L. LaPresto, K.A. Powell, J.L. Hirsch, J.F. Cornhill, A medical workstation for the display and analysis of multi-frame digital cineradiographic data, Computers in Biology and Medicine, Volume 26, Issue 5, September 1996, Pages 385-400, ISSN 0010-4825, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0010-4825(96)00022-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0010482596000224)
Abstract: A medical workstation has been developed for the efficient display and analysis of large sets of digital cineradiographic images. Various features aid the clinician in quickly identifying and extracting the image information relevant for diagnosis; animated viewing of image frames, a digital magnifying glass for local image enlargement and enhancement, a special review queue for critical image frames, and task-oriented image processing. Double frame buffering and direct memory addressing ensure fast, artifact-free image display and transfer. Much freedom is provided for adapting the system to one's own preferences. A statistical analysis of extensive tests conducted by eight clinical expert reviewers is given.
Keywords: Graphical User Interface design; Medical workstation; Digital cineradiography; Digital cineangiography; Digital image management; PACS; Computer assisted radiology; Computer aided diagnosis; Human factors

Paul-Jean Letourneau, Robert Boyko, Brian D. Sykes, PJNMR: a platform-independent graphical simulation tool for NMR spectroscopy, Journal of Magnetic Resonance, Volume 161, Issue 2, April 2003, Pages 154-167, ISSN 1090-7807, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1090-7807(03)00008-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1090780703000089)
Abstract: A new simulation program for multinuclear NMR is introduced. PJNMR (Pure Java NMR) 2.0, written entirely in the Java programming language, simulates pulse sequences on systems of up to three weakly coupled spins-1/2 with a command-driven, spectrometer-like interface. Users may simulate the effects of pulses, precessions, and pulsed field gradients on the spin system, with a graphical display showing the state of the density matrix (in a novel polar-coordinate representation) as well as the magnetization vectors for each nucleus. Relevant computations and optimizations as implemented in the code are detailed, along with the object-oriented structures used. A description of the simulation environment is given, illustrated with a series of example pulse sequences highlighting the insights gained in the graphical presentation.

R Castello, R Mili, Visualizing graphical and textual formalisms, Information Systems, Volume 28, Issue 7, October 2003, Pages 753-768, ISSN 0306-4379, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0306-4379(02)00081-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0306437902000819)
Abstract: ViSta is a tool suite designed to support the requirements specification of reactive systems. It guides the user through the steps necessary for the visualization of statechart diagrams from an informal document. The user first extracts information from a textual document and stores into a set of interactive templates. The information is used by the tool to automatically generate statechart layouts. In this paper we describe how ViSta is augmented with a tool that automatically translates statecharts into Z specifications. The template, statechart and Z representations are inter-related. This ensures consistency between the different representations, and therefore facilitates the verification and validation effort.

Yizhan Sun and Alva Couch, 5.3 - Complexity of System Configuration Management, In Handbook of Network and System Administration, edited by Jan Bergstra and Mark Burgess, Elsevier, Amsterdam, 2008, Pages 623-651, ISBN 9780444521989, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-044452198-9.50025-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444521989500252)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter develops a theoretical framework to study and examine the complexity of configuration management, constructing two kinds of automatons. One is based upon the actual configuration and the other is based upon observed behavior. By reducing the problem to considering what can be observed, complexity is limited and the behavior of human administrators performing tasks is approached; they are as well limited by what they can observe. This limitation allows one to quantify just how difficult the problem can become, and to discuss ways in which it can be simplified. The nondeterminism of operations on observed states is one of the most challenging problems of configuration management. In the discussion of reproducibility of configuration operations, it has been shown that for one host in isolation and for some configuration processes, reproducibility of observed effect for a configuration process is a statically verifiable property of the process. By the contextualization of the configuration process and review of current configuration strategies, how configuration management is made tractable in practice is summarized. These mechanisms include the use of experience and documentation, reduction of state space, abstraction, rebaselining, the use of orthogonality, and the use of closures. For each mechanism, its drawbacks have been discussed. The system administrator uses knowledge of past experience, as well as detailed understanding of the internals of systems, to achieve a result.

C. Werner-Westphal, W. Heinze, P. Horst, Structural sizing for an unconventional, environment-friendly aircraft configuration within integrated conceptual design, Aerospace Science and Technology, Volume 12, Issue 2, March 2008, Pages 184-194, ISSN 1270-9638, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ast.2007.05.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S127096380700079X)
Abstract: This paper discusses the application of an integrated multidisciplinary design process to an unconventional Low Noise Aircraft (LNA) configuration, with a focus on the topic of structural sizing. Through the use of higher fidelity numerical methods, structural sizing can be performed and analysed at a much higher level than in classic conceptual design processes. The effects governing structural sizing for this specific configuration are illustrated and discussed. It is shown that considerable differences exist between the LNA and a conventional reference configuration. This analysis provides a basic understanding of how an unconventional geometry can impact the global parameters of an aircraft design.
Keywords: Multidisciplinary integrated conceptual design; Low Noise Aircraft; Structural weight prediction

Pierre Duez, Kim J. Vicente, Ecological interface design and computer network management: The effects of network size and fault frequency, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 63, Issue 6, December 2005, Pages 565-586, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2005.05.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581905001084)
Abstract: This article describes an experiment investigating the impact of ecological interface design (EID) on human performance in computer network management. This work domain is more dynamic than those previously studied under EID because there is a constant potential for the addition and removal of devices, as well as changing configurations, making it important to study the generalizability of the framework. Two interfaces were created for the University of Toronto campus network consisting of 220 nodes: a P interface based on existing design practices which presented primarily physical information and a P+F interface based on EID which presented both physical and functional information identified by an abstraction hierarchy analysis. Participants used one of the two interfaces to detect and diagnose faults or disturbances in the simulated network in real-time. Network size and fault frequency were both manipulated as within-participants variables. The P+F interface led to faster detection times overall, as well as improved fault detection rate and more accurate fault diagnosis under higher fault loads. These results suggest that the EID framework may lead to more robust monitoring performance in computer network management compared to existing interfaces.
Keywords: Ecological interface design; Network management; Abstraction hierarchy; Fault diagnosis

A. Bradley, P.D. Noakes, M. Fleury, Design of an ultrasonic interface for a graphics tablet, Microprocessors and Microsystems, Volume 30, Issue 8, 1 December 2006, Pages 480-496, ISSN 0141-9331, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.micpro.2005.12.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0141933105000979)
Abstract: A cost-effective design of an ultrasonic interface to a graphics tablet is accomplished by means of PIC microcontrollers. This paper analyses the design and implementation from requirements capture through high-level design to circuitry. Ultrasonic transducers enable direct placement of the tablet mechanism above an LCD so that the image is viewed as it is created. Results show that the prototype tablet has up to 0.8 mm resolution.
Keywords: Graphics tablet; Ultrasonic; Artists’ interface

Pedro Celso Nogueira Teixeira, Cristina Alves Magalhães de Souza, Mônica Santos de Freitas, Débora Foguel, Ernesto Raul Caffarena, Luiz Anastacio Alves, Predictions Suggesting a Participation of β-Sheet Configuration in the M2 Domain of the P2X7 Receptor: A Novel Conformation?, Biophysical Journal, Volume 96, Issue 3, 4 February 2009, Pages 951-963, ISSN 0006-3495, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.bpj.2008.10.043.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S000634950800129X)
Abstract: Scanning experiments have shown that the putative TM2 domain of the P2X7 receptor (P2X7R) lines the ionic pore. However, none has identified an α-helix structure, the paradigmatic secondary structure of ion channels in mammalian cells. In addition, some researchers have suggested a β-sheet conformation in the TM2 domain of P2X2. These data led us to investigate a new architecture within the P2X receptor family. P2X7R is considered an intriguing receptor because its activation induces nonselective large pore formation, in contrast to the majority of other ionic channel proteins in mammals. This receptor has two states: a low-conductance channel (∼10 pS) and a large pore (&gt;400 pS). To our knowledge, one fundamental question remains unanswered: Are the P2X7R channel and the pore itself the same entity or are they different structures? There are no structural data to help solve this question. Thus, we investigated the hydrophobic M2 domain with the aim of predicting the fitted position and the secondary structure of the TM2 segment from human P2X7R (hP2X7R). We provide evidence for a β-sheet conformation, using bioinformatics algorithms and molecular-dynamics simulation in conjunction with circular dichroism in different environments and Fourier transform infrared spectroscopy. In summary, our study suggests the possibility that a segment composed of residues from part of the M2 domain and part of the putative TM2 segment of P2X7R is partially folded in a β-sheet conformation, and may play an important role in channel/pore formation associated with P2X7R activation. It is important to note that most nonselective large pores have a transmembrane β-sheet conformation. Thus, this study may lead to a paradigmatic change in the P2X7R field and/or raise new questions about this issue.

Jan Hettenhausen, Andrew Lewis, Timoleon Kipouros, A Web-based System for Visualisation-driven Interactive Multi-objective Optimisation, Procedia Computer Science, Volume 29, 2014, Pages 1915-1925, ISSN 1877-0509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.procs.2014.05.176.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877050914003536)
Abstract: Abstract
Interactive Multi-Objective Optimisation is an increasing field of evolutionary and swarm intelligence-based algorithms. By involving a human decision, a set of relevant non-dominated points can often be acquired at significantly lower computational costs than with a posteriori algorithms. A rarely addressed issue in interactive optimisation is the design of efficient user interfaces and the application of interactive optimisation as a design tool in engineering applications. This paper presents advances in the design of user interaction and and user interfaces in combination with interactive multi-objective particle swarm optimisation algorithm. The case study used for this research is an actively investigated aeronautics engineering problem.
Keywords: Interactive optimisation; user interface design; multi-objective optimisation; engineering design

Esther Guerra, Juan de Lara, Alessio Malizia, Paloma Díaz, Supporting user-oriented analysis for multi-view domain-specific visual languages, Information and Software Technology, Volume 51, Issue 4, April 2009, Pages 769-784, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2008.09.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950584908001304)
Abstract: The integration of usable and flexible analysis support in modelling environments is a key success factor in Model-Driven Development. In this paradigm, models are the core asset from which code is automatically generated, and thus ensuring model correctness is a fundamental quality control activity. For this purpose, a common approach is to transform the system models into formal semantic domains for verification. However, if the analysis results are not shown in a proper way to the end-user (e.g. in terms of the original language) they may become useless.

In this paper we present a novel DSVL called BaVeL that facilitates the flexible annotation of verification results obtained in semantic domains to different formats, including the context of the original language. BaVeL is used in combination with a consistency framework, providing support for all steps in a verification process: acquisition of additional input data, transformation of the system models into semantic domains, verification, and flexible annotation of analysis results.

The approach has been validated analytically by the cognitive dimensions framework, and empirically by its implementation and application to several DSVLs. Here we present a case study of a notation in the area of Digital Libraries, where the analysis is performed by transformations into Petri nets and a process algebra.
Keywords: Domain-specific visual languages; Consistency; Back-annotation; Formal methods; Model transformation; Modelling environments

José Matías Rivero, Julián Grigera, Gustavo Rossi, Esteban Robles Luna, Francisco Montero, Martin Gaedke, Mockup-Driven Development: Providing agile support for Model-Driven Web Engineering, Information and Software Technology, Volume 56, Issue 6, June 2014, Pages 670-687, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2014.01.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950584914000226)
Abstract: AbstractContext
Agile software development approaches are currently becoming the industry standard for Web Application development. On the other hand, Model-Driven Web Engineering (MDWE) methodologies are known to improve productivity when building this kind of applications. However, current MDWE methodologies tend to ignore important aspects of Web Applications development supported by agile processes, such as constant customer feedback or early design of user interfaces.
Objective
In this paper we analyze the difficulties of supporting agile features in MDWE methodologies. Then, we propose an approach that eases the incorporation of well-known agile practices to MDWE.
Method
We propose using User Interface prototypes (usually known as mockups) as a way to start the modeling process in the context of a mixed agile-MDWE process. To assist this process, we defined a lightweight metamodel that allows modeling features over mockups, interacting with end-users and generating MDWE models. Then, we conducted a statistical evaluation of both approaches (traditional vs. mockup-based modeling).
Results
First we comment on how agile features can be added to MDWE processes using mockups. Then, we show by means of a quantitative study that the proposed approach is faster, less error-prone and still as complete as traditional MDWE processes.
Conclusion
The use of mockups to guide the MDWE process helps in the reduction of the development cycle as well as in the incorporation of agile practices in the model-driven workflow. Complete MDWE models can be built and generated by using lightweight modeling over User Interface mockups, and this process suggests being more efficient, in terms of errors and effort, than traditional modeling in MDWE.
Keywords: Mockups; User-Interface; Agile; Web Engineering; MDD

Poika Isokoski, Roope Raisamo, Benoît Martin, Grigori Evreinov, User performance with trackball-mice, Interacting with Computers, Volume 19, Issue 3, May 2007, Pages 407-427, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2006.10.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543806001391)
Abstract: Trackball-mice are devices that include both a trackball and a mouse. In this paper we discuss our experiences in building and testing trackball-mouse prototypes. We report four experiments on user performance with the prototypes used as trackball-mice, conventional mice, and in two-handed configuration with a separate trackball for the non-dominant hand. The results show that user performance with the two-handed configuration was better than in one-handed operation of a trackball-mouse and in one-handed operation of a mouse. Trackball-mouse use and conventional mouse use were more evenly matched. However, Trackball-mouse operation involves a skill that most users do not have whereas mouse operation is familiar to most. Therefore, widespread introduction of trackball-mice does not appear to be justified on performance grounds alone. However, trackball-mice can be used as regular mice by ignoring the ball. This makes them compatible with traditional graphical user interfaces while offering two extra degrees of freedom in tasks where they are beneficial.
Keywords: Trackmouse; Optical mouse; Trackball; Fitts’ Law; Pointing device; Two-cursor; Two-handed interaction; Dual-stream input

Murat Draman, İ Kuban Altinel, Nijaz Bajgoric, Ali Tamer Ünal, Burak Birgören, A clone-based graphical modeler and mathematical model generator for optimal production planning in process industries, European Journal of Operational Research, Volume 137, Issue 3, 16 March 2002, Pages 483-496, ISSN 0377-2217, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0377-2217(01)00066-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0377221701000662)
Abstract: This paper outlines a visually interactive graphical modeling approach for process type production systems, with hidden generation of complex optimization models for production planning. The proposed system lets the users build a graphical model of the production system with one-to-one clones of its production units through its interactive visual interface, accepts production-specific data for its components, and finally, internally generates and solves its mathematical programming model without any interaction from the user. This “clone-based” modeling approach allows the continued use of optimization models with minimal mathematical programming understanding, as generation of mathematical model by clones is hidden and automatic, therefore maintenance-free: Updating graphical production system models is enough for renewing internal optimization models. The concept is demonstrated in this paper with a linear programming prototype developed for a petroleum refinery.
Keywords: Visual interactive modelling; Mathematical programming; Decision support systems; Object-oriented design; Production planning

Steven A. Guccione, Chapter 19 - Configuration Bitstream Generation, In Systems on Silicon, Morgan Kaufmann, Burlington, 2008, Pages 401-409, ISSN 18759661, Reconfigurable Computing, ISBN 9780123705228, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-012370522-8.50026-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123705228500261)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The bitstream spatially represents the configuration data of a large collection of small, relatively simple hardware components. This chapter identifies these components and discusses the ways in which the bitstream is used to produce a working digital circuit in a reconfigurable logic device. Although there is really no limit to the types of units possible in a reconfigurable logic device, two basic structures make up the microarchitecture of most modern field-programmable gate arrays (FPGAs). These are the lookup table (LUT) and the switch box. While the generation of bitstream data to configure an FPGA device is a very common activity, there is very little information available on the details of either the configuration bitstream or the underlying FPGA architecture. Thus, the FPGA can best be viewed as a collection of microarchitecture components, chiefly LUTs and switch boxes. These components are configured by writing data to the LUT values and to control memories associated with the switch boxes. Setting these bits to various values results in custom digital circuits. A variety of tools and techniques are used to program reconfigurable logic devices, but all must eventually produce the relatively small configuration “bitstream” data the devices require. This data is in as rigid a format as any binary execution data for a microprocessor, but this format is typically proprietary and unpublished. While direct examination of actual commercial bitstream data is largely impossible, the general structure and the microarchitecture components configured by this data can be examined, at least in the abstract.

John Sammons and Michael Cross, Chapter 2 - Before connecting to the Internet, In The Basics of Cyber Safety, Syngress, Boston, 2017, Pages 29-52, ISBN 9780124166509, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-416650-9.00002-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124166509000024)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter instructs the user on common elements that should be configured properly prior to connecting to the Internet. This includes systems they would have in their home, business, and/or may come in contact with when mobile.
Keywords: Cyber safety; setup; configuration

Lei Li, John Grundy, John Hosking, A visual language and environment for enterprise system modelling and automation, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 25, Issue 4, August 2014, Pages 253-277, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jvlc.2014.03.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1045926X14000433)
Abstract: AbstractObjective
We want to support enterprise service modelling and generation using a more end user-friendly metaphor than current approaches, which fail to scale to large organisations with key issues of “cobweb” and “labyrinth” problems and large numbers of hidden dependencies.
Method
We present and evaluate an integrated visual approach for business process modelling using a novel tree-based overlay structure that effectively mitigate complexity problems. A tree-overlay based visual notation (EML) and its integrated support environment (MaramaEML) supplement and integrate with existing solutions. Complex business architectures are represented as service trees and business processes are modelled as process overlay sequences on the service trees.
Results
MaramaEML integrates EML and BPMN to provide complementary, high-level business service modelling and supports automatic BPEL code generation from the graphical representations to realise web services implementing the specified processes. It facilitates generated service validation using an integrated LTSA checker and provides a distortion-based fisheye and zooming function to enhance complex diagram navigation. Evaluations of EML show its effectiveness.
Conclusions
We have successfully developed and evaluated a novel tree-based metaphor for business process modelling and enterprise service generation. Practice implications: a more user-friendly modelling approach and support tool for business end users.
Keywords: Business process modelling; Web service generation; Process enactment; Zoomable user interfaces; Domain-specific visual languages; Business process modelling notation; Business process execution language

Jan Roseli, Luis Basañez, Ivan Díaz, GRAPHICAL TASK-LEVEL ROBOT PROGRAMMING FOR POLISHING AND GRINDING, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 35, Issue 1, 2002, Pages 235-240, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20020721-6-ES-1901.00851.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015392727)
Abstract: Abstract
The automation of polishing and grinding tasks by robots is advisable, since they are repetitive tasks generally done in unhealthy conditions. Nevertheless, robot programming is difficult, tedious and time-consuming. Moreover, batch sizes are usually not very large, which requires an often reprogramming of the cell. To cope with this problem, this paper presents a tool to automatically program a robot from a graphical high level description of the task. First, a graphical user interface allows to easily specify the polishing curves over a CAD model of the part. The type of abrasive bands used and the force to be exerted is also specified by the user. Second, given the location of the polishing bands where each operation must be performed and a description of the cell, a robot program is generated to perform the polishing trajectories in the optimum sequence, the paths between trajectories being collision-free.
Keywords: Robotics; CAD/CAM; Robot programming

Fu-Shiung Hsieh, Jim-Bon Lin, Development of context-aware workflow systems based on Petri Net Markup Language, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 36, Issue 3, March 2014, Pages 672-685, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2013.08.014.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548913000937)
Abstract: Abstract
The Petri Net Markup Language (PNML) is originally an XML-based interchange format for Petri nets. Individual companies may specify their process models in Petri nets and exchange the Petri nets with other companies in PNML. This paper aims to demonstrate the capabilities of PNML in the development of applications instead of an industrial interchange format only. In this paper, we apply PNML to develop context-aware workflow systems. In existing literature, different methodologies for the design of context-aware systems have been proposed. However, workflow models have not been considered in these methodologies. Our interests in this paper are to propose a methodology to automatically generate context-aware action lists for users and effectively control resource allocation based on the state of the workflow systems. To achieve these objectives, we first propose Petri net models to describe the workflows. Next, we propose models to capture resource activities. Finally, the interactions between workflows and resources are combined to obtain a model for the whole processes. Based on the combined model, we propose architecture to automatically generate context-aware graphical user interface to guide the users and control resource allocation in workflow systems. We demonstrate our design methodology using a health care example.
Keywords: PNML; Context-aware; Workflow; Petri net; User interface; Resource allocation

António C.L. Conceição, M.M. Correia dos Santos, M.L.S. Simões Gonçalves, Adaptation of a commercial ion selective fluoride electrode to a tubular configuration for analysis by flow methodologies, Talanta, Volume 76, Issue 1, 30 June 2008, Pages 107-110, ISSN 0039-9140, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.talanta.2008.02.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0039914008001161)
Abstract: The determination of fluoride ions in water samples is accomplished by using a tubular flow through detector constructed by drilling a channel through a commercially available LaF3 crystal electrode in such a way that the original contacts of the non-modified unit are maintained. Its performance when incorporated in both FIA and SIA systems was evaluated and the results show that the tubular unit retains the characteristics of the non-modified electrode. In SIA conditions an extended linear range of response and lower detection limit were achieved when compared with the electrode performance in FIA conditions. These aspects together with the additional advantage of low sample and reagent consumptions in SIA when compared to FIA, makes the incorporation of the proposed tubular ISE in a SIA system the preferred approach for on line determination and monitoring of fluoride content in natural water samples.
Keywords: Fluoride tubular electrode; FIA; SIA; Water analysis

Masoud Jabbari, Jon Spangenberg, Jesper Hattel, Modeling of the interface behavior in tape casting of functionally graded ceramics for magnetic refrigeration parts, International Journal of Refrigeration, Volume 36, Issue 8, December 2013, Pages 2403-2409, ISSN 0140-7007, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijrefrig.2013.05.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140700713001138)
Abstract: Abstract
The main goal of this work is to study the multiple material flows in side-by-side (SBS) tape casting and analyze the influence of the different material properties, i.e. the density and the viscosity, on the interface between the fluids, since this is highly important for the efficiency of a graded configuration of the magnetocaloric materials. The Newtonian flow behavior with relatively high viscosity is assumed for each fluid and used in the simulation with a commercial CFD code (ANSYS FLUENT). The results show that the density difference does not affect the interface between the adjacent fluids, whereas the viscosity of the fluids plays the most important role in the behavior of the interface. Moreover, increasing the viscosity difference of the adjacent fluids, Δμ, leads to increasing the diffusive region between them. However, this can be counteracted by decreasing the velocity by the substrate.
Keywords: Magnetic refrigeration; Functionally graded ceramics; Tape casting; Fluid flowés; froid magnétique; céramiques calibrées sur le plan fonctionnel; coulage en bande; écoulement du fluide

Alicia Jacquemet, Nolwenn Terme, Thierry Benvegnu, Véronique Vié, Loïc Lemiègre, Collapsed bipolar glycolipids at the air/water interface: Effect of the stereochemistry on the stretched/bent conformations, Journal of Colloid and Interface Science, Volume 412, 15 December 2013, Pages 72-81, ISSN 0021-9797, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jcis.2013.09.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0021979713008242)
Abstract: Abstract
This article describes a comparative study of several bipolar lipids derived from tetraether structures. The sole structural difference between the main two glycolipids is a unique stereochemical variation on a cyclopentyl ring placed in the middle of the lipids. We discuss the comparative results obtained at the air/water interface on the basis of tensiometry and ellipsometry. Langmuir–Blodgett depositions during lipid film compressions and decompressions were also analyzed by AFM. The lactosylated tetraether (bipolar) lipid structures involved the formation of highly stable multilayers, which are still present at 10 mN m−1 during decompression. This study suggests also that the stereochemistry of a central cyclopentyl ring dramatically drives the conformation of the corresponding bipolar lipids. Both isomers (trans and cis) adopt a U-shaped (bent) conformation at the air/water interface but the trans cyclopentyl ring induces a much more frustration within this type of conformation. Consequently, this bipolar lipid (trans-tetraether) undergoes a flip of one polar head-group (lactosyl) leading to a stretched conformation during collapse.
Keywords: Bipolar lipid; Bolaamphiphile; Glycolipid; Cyclopentyl ring; Stereochemistry; Langmuir film; AFM

Rodrigo Ibañez, Álvaro Soria, Alfredo Teyseyre, Marcelo Campo, Easy gesture recognition for Kinect, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 76, October 2014, Pages 171-180, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2014.07.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997814001161)
Abstract: Abstract
Recent progress in entertainment and gaming systems has brought more natural and intuitive human–computer interfaces to our lives. Innovative technologies, such as Xbox Kinect, enable the recognition of body gestures, which are a direct and expressive way of human communication. Although current development toolkits provide support to identify the position of several joints of the human body and to process the movements of the body parts, they actually lack a flexible and robust mechanism to perform high-level gesture recognition. In consequence, developers are still left with the time-consuming and tedious task of recognizing gestures by explicitly defining a set of conditions on the joint positions and movements of the body parts. This paper presents EasyGR (Easy Gesture Recognition), a tool based on machine learning algorithms that help to reduce the effort involved in gesture recognition. We evaluated EasyGR in the development of 7 gestures, involving 10 developers. We compared time consumed, code size, and the achieved quality of the developed gesture recognizers, with and without the support of EasyGR. The results have shown that our approach is practical and reduces the effort involved in implementing gesture recognizers with Kinect.
Keywords: Natural user interfaces; Gesture recognition; Machine learning; Kinect; Human-computer interaction; Gesture-recognition framework

V. Amati, C. Bruno, D. Simone, E. Sciubba, Exergy analysis of hypersonic propulsion systems: Performance comparison of two different scramjet configurations at cruise conditions, Energy, Volume 33, Issue 2, February 2008, Pages 116-129, ISSN 0360-5442, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.energy.2007.08.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0360544207001570)
Abstract: An exergy analysis of an advanced hypersonic vehicle, a scramjet, is presented and discussed with a twofold scope. First, to perfect the exergy approach to the design and optimization of aerospace propulsion systems: the exergy flow diagram can provide aircraft engineers and system designers with additional insight on the avoidable and unavoidable systemic losses, thus allowing for effective design improvements. Second, to explore limits and merits of two different fuelling solutions for a scramjet-powered aircraft. Two configurations are critically compared: one with a direct H2 injection and one with an on-board kerosene reformer. The present study treats the scramjet-propelled plane as a Large Complex Energy System (“LCES”), and applies system balances (mass, energy, exergy) to calculate the relevant losses. The exergy analysis confirms that the introduction of an on-board reformer is advantageous from the point of view of the thrust efficiency (with a gain of 3 percentage points with respect to the H2-fuelled engine) and, more importantly, from the point of view of a more correct use of the available resources (the fuel in the tanks). Another advantage of the on-board reforming is that the higher value of the volumetric-specific impulse allows for reducing the fuel tank size. All calculations have been performed with CAMEL®, a modular simulator for energy conversion processes conceived and developed in the last decade by the Authors’ group at the Mechanical and Aeronautical Engineering Department of the University of Roma 1 “La Sapienza”. Some additional component models have been studied and implemented, and a specific tool dedicated to the analysis of propulsion systems has been created and integrated in the simulation package.
Keywords: Exergy analysis; Large Complex Energy System; Scramjet; Thrust efficiency

Aaron M. Tagliaboschi, Jeremy B. Maddox, POTLIB2Math: A Mathematica interface to the potential energy surface library for chemical systems, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 185, Issue 1, January 2014, Pages 294-301, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2013.08.011.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465513002725)
Abstract: Abstract
The theoretical description of molecular dynamics proceeds from the specification of an appropriate Born–Oppenheimer potential energy surface (PES) or surfaces. For many chemical systems, such surfaces are incorporated within a repository of standardized FORTRAN codes known as POTLIB. The present work describes a Mathematica package that uses a MathLink interface to interactively call POTLIB subroutines from within a Mathematica session. This allows for rapid prototyping and deployment of new algorithms and is useful for both pedagogical and research applications in chemical physics. We present basic usage of the package functions and several simple applications for illustration.
Program summary
Program title: POTLIB2Math

Catalogue identifier: AEQJ_v1_0

Program summary URL:http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AEQJ_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen’s University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: Standard CPC licence, http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/licence/licence.html

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 63859

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 1481706

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: C, FORTRAN, and Mathematica.

Computer: Developed and tested on GNU/Linux PC, Macintosh, and Windows PC platforms running Mathematica version 8 or higher.

Operating system: Tested on MacOSX, SUSE Linux, and WindowsXP/7/8.

RAM: Varies depending on user-defined applications.

Classification: 16.8.

External routines: GNU make, gcc, gfortran, Mathematica, and MathLink DeveloperKit

Subprograms used: Cat Id Title Reference ADPJ_v1_0 POTLIB 2001 CPC 144(2002)169 

Nature of problem:

POTLIB [1, 2] is a collection of FORTRAN subprograms that calculate potential energy surfaces and gradients for various chemical systems as a function of molecular geometry. The objective of this work is to develop an interface that allows users to interactively execute POTLIB subprograms from within a Mathematica session.

Solution method:

POTLIB2Math is a fully-documented Mathematica package that uses a MathLink interface for passing data between Mathematica and POTLIB subprograms. GNU make and C/FORTRAN compilers are used to automate building the executables on various platforms.

Running time:

The examples included in the distribution file take just a few minutes to run.

References:[1]
R.J. Duchovic, Y.L. Volobuev, G.C. Lynch, A.W. Jasper, D.G. Truhlar, T.C. Allison, A.F. Wagner, B.C. Garrett, J. Espinosa-García, and J.C. Corchado, POTLIB, http://comp.chem.umn.edu/potlib.
[2]
R.J. Duchovic, Y.L. Volobuev, G.C. Lynch, D.G. Truhlar, T.C. Allison, A.F. Wagner, B.C. Garrett, and J.C. Corchado, Comput. Phys. Comm. 144, 169–187 (2002). Comput. Phys. Comm. 156, 319–322(E) (2004).
Keywords: Potential energy surface; Chemical reaction; POTLIB; Mathematica

Waqar Ahmed, Osman Hasan, Sofiène Tahar, Formalization of Reliability Block Diagrams in Higher-order Logic, Journal of Applied Logic, Volume 18, November 2016, Pages 19-41, ISSN 1570-8683, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jal.2016.05.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1570868316300301)
Abstract: Abstract
Reliability Block Diagrams (RBDs) allow us to model the failure relationships of complex systems and their sub-components and are extensively used for system reliability, availability and maintainability analyses. Traditionally, these RBD-based analyses are done using paper-and-pencil proofs or computer simulations, which cannot ascertain absolute correctness due to their inaccuracy limitations. As a complementary approach, we propose to use the higher-order logic theorem prover HOL to conduct RBD-based analysis. For this purpose, we present a higher-order logic formalization of commonly used RBD configurations, such as series, parallel, parallel-series and series-parallel, and the formal verification of their equivalent mathematical expressions. A distinguishing feature of the proposed RBD formalization is the ability to model nested RBD configurations, which are RBDs having blocks that also represent RBD configurations. This generality allows us to formally analyze the reliability of many real-world systems. For illustration purposes, we formally analyze the reliability of a generic Virtual Data Center (VDC) in a cloud computing infrastructure exhibiting the nested series-parallel RBD configuration.
Keywords: Reliability Block Diagrams (RBDs); Higher-order logic; Probability theory; Virtualization configuration; Virtual Data Centers

G Johannsen, E.A Averbukh, Human interaction for process supervision based on end-user knowledge and participation, Annual Review in Automatic Programming, Volume 19, 1994, Pages 255-260, ISSN 0066-4138, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0066-4138(94)90075-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0066413894900752)
Abstract: An approach for designing the artificial intelligence part into the human-machine interface is described. Two application domains, namely chemical and cement plants, are considered. Interactive techniques for a better involvement of the end-user in earlier design phases are described. They include task and knowledge analyses, participative rapid prototyping design and usability testing. The logical design of knowledge based functionalities of the human-machine interface is exemplified with tracking interaction and supervising dialogue. The support tools for participative design are also briefly mentioned.
Keywords: Human-machine interface; process supervision; task analysis; knowledge based support; participative design; usability testing; cement industry; destination column

John K. Dickinson, Zhisong Yu, Yong Zeng, Helder Antunes, Pen–tablet as a CAD interface alternative, Robotics and Computer-Integrated Manufacturing, Volume 21, Issues 4–5, August–October 2005, Pages 465-474, ISSN 0736-5845, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.rcim.2004.11.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736584504001280)
Abstract: Championed by major industry players, pen–tablet computing is an example of the trend towards ubiquitous computing and natural/intuitive human machine interfaces that offers engineers opportunities to change how they interact with and how useful computers can be for performing engineering tasks, in particular, design tasks. Recognising that engineers starting a new design reach first for pen and paper instead of CAD software, a broad survey on the state of the art relating to sketch driven design was done. This paper summarizes and analyses the survey's review of the roles new computer interaction devices can play in the initial stages of mechanical design where few applications exist to support the engineer. The paper starts by briefly reviewing the role of pen and paper in the design process and then discussing the potential of new interaction devices in mechanical CAD modelling, keeping most of the focus on the pen–tablet interface and the human machine interaction paradigms and modes that it makes possible. Context is provided using summaries of some of the survey findings and accompanied by comments regarding some areas worthy of future research. Comparisons between these new interaction paradigms and current windows, icons, menus and pointers-based (WIMP-based) CAD operation are also included.
Keywords: Cad interface; Pen–tablet interface

Ugo Braga Sangiorgi, Electronic sketching on a multi-platform context: A pilot study with developers, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 72, Issue 1, January 2014, Pages 45-52, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2013.08.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S107158191300116X)
Abstract: Abstract
During the past 45 years there has been a recurrence of interest on supporting sketching at electronic devices and interactive surfaces, and despite being sketching recognition fairly well addressed on the literature, the adoption of electronic sketching as a design tool is still a challenge.

The current popularization of touch screen devices allows designers to sketch using their device of preference, while the current multi-platform capabilities made possible by HTML5 allows sketching systems to run on many devices at the same time. Those two factors combined might pose new opportunities for researchers to explore how designers use sketching on flexible setups by combining heterogeneous sketching devices for design sessions.

This may arise new possibilities in the field of prototyping user interfaces since, by using such multi-platform systems, designers would now be able of designing interfaces for multiple devices by producing and testing them on the device itself.

This paper reports a pilot experiment conducted with 6 developers, grouped into pairs on design sessions using Gambit – a multi-platform sketching system that provides a lightweight approach for prototyping user interfaces for many devices at once. We performed a discourse analysis of the professionals based on recorded videos of interviews conducted during and after design sessions with the system and aggregated the data in order to investigate the main requirements for multi-platform sketching systems.
Keywords: Sketching; Multi-platform; User interface design; Discourse evaluation

Vic (J.R.) Winkler, Chapter 1 - Introduction to Cloud Computing and Security, In Securing the Cloud, Syngress, Boston, 2011, Pages 1-27, ISBN 9781597495929, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-59749-592-9.00001-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597495929000014)
Abstract: Cloud computing refers to applications and services, which data centers around the world make available to users who have an Internet connection. Cloud computing represents a paradigm shift for delivering resources and services. From how Information Technology (IT) systems are built and used to how IT resources are organized and structured, cloud computing is refactoring the IT landscape. Instead of uncrating computers and racking them in a server closet, the cloud allows users to virtually download hardware and associated infrastructure. As a result, a virtual data center can be built in minutes, with minimal technical background and at a fraction of the cost of buying a single server. This chapter introduces the qualities and characteristics of cloud computing. Besides surveying the technologies upon which cloud infrastructure is built, the chapter defines terms that will be used in the remainder of the book as well as introduces the topic of cloud computing security.
Keywords: Cloud; Cloud computing; Cloud elasticity; Cloud service; Configuration Management Database; End user; Tenant

S. Gourvénec, G. Tomasi, C. Durville, E. Di Crescenzo, C.A. Saby, D.L. Massart, R. Bro, G. Oppenheim, CuBatch, a MATLAB® interface for n-mode data analysis, Chemometrics and Intelligent Laboratory Systems, Volume 77, Issues 1–2, 28 May 2005, Pages 122-130, ISSN 0169-7439, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chemolab.2004.01.027.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169743904001972)
Abstract: This communication describes the CuBatch interface software developed within the framework of the “NwayQual European Project”. Built originally to deal solely with batch process data, CuBatch can be employed on the most disparate types of data. It includes various methods and algorithms for both multi-way and classical data analysis in different domains: curve resolution, exploratory analysis and regression. Moreover, it is intuitive and provides results as graphical outputs with numerous options and possibilities. CuBatch is not meant to be exhaustive with respect to the methods but implements an open architecture allowing custom extensions. Several reference data sets suitable for learning and familiarizing with this interface and an extensive help in html format are also part of the package.

CuBatch may be seen as a general tool, the use of which can be fruitful for both academic and industrial purposes. This communication has the sole aim to inform the readers of the existence and availability of this software and to describe its features.

CuBatch is available on request through Total France, KVL and VUB, after review by Total.
Keywords: CuBatch; MATLAB® interface; n-mode data analysis

C. Evangelinos, P.F.J. Lermusiaux, S.K. Geiger, R.C. Chang, N.M. Patrikalakis, Web-enabled configuration and control of legacy codes: An application to ocean modeling, Ocean Modelling, Volume 13, Issues 3–4, 2006, Pages 197-220, ISSN 1463-5003, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ocemod.2005.10.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1463500305000806)
Abstract: For modern interdisciplinary ocean prediction and assimilation systems, a significant part of the complexity facing users is the very large number of possible setups and parameters, both at build-time and at run-time, especially for the core physical, biological and acoustical ocean predictive models. The configuration of these modeling systems for both local as well as remote execution can be a daunting and error-prone task in the absence of a graphical user interface (GUI) and of software that automatically controls the adequacy and compatibility of options and parameters. We propose to encapsulate the configurability and requirements of ocean prediction codes using an eXtensible Markup Language (XML) based description, thereby creating new computer-readable manuals for the executable binaries. These manuals allow us to generate a GUI, check for correctness of compilation and input parameters, and finally drive execution of the prediction system components, all in an automated and transparent manner. This web-enabled configuration and automated control software has been developed (it is currently in “beta” form) and exemplified for components of the interdisciplinary Harvard ocean prediction system (HOPS) and for the uncertainty prediction components of the error subspace statistical estimation (ESSE) system. Importantly, the approach is general and applies to other existing ocean modeling applications and to other “legacy” codes.
Keywords: XML; Encapsulation; Metadata; GUI; Numerical ocean models; HOPS; ROMS; MITgcm; Primitive equation; Data assimilation; Ocean observing and prediction systems

Michel Pons, Peter Banks, Bertrand Braunschweig, A deliverable from CO-LaN to CAPE-OPEN developers and users: the CAPE-OPEN logging and testing tool (COLTT), In: Valentin Pleşu and Paul Şerban Agachi, Editor(s), Computer Aided Chemical Engineering, Elsevier, 2007, Volume 24, Pages 225-230, ISSN 1570-7946, ISBN 9780444531575, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1570-7946(07)80061-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1570794607800617)
Abstract: CAPE-OPEN is a set of standards that define interfaces to allow the integration of process modelling software components from diverse vendors. Since the delivery in 2002 of version 1.0 of the CAPE-OPEN standards [1], CAPE-OPEN interfaces have been widely implemented in commercial, academic and inhouse software tools [2]. Achieving interoperability between complex software components from different vendors has the potential to throw up errors at run-time that are difficult to track down. In the case of CAPE-OPEN interoperability, the CAPE-OPEN Laboratories Network (CO-LaN) has provided a tool, the CAPE-OPEN Logging and Testing Tool (COLTT), to assist developers and end-users with this problem. COLTT is freely available to the CO-LaN membership.
Keywords: CAPE-OPEN; component technology; interoperability

A.A. Verrijn-Stuart, K. Anzenhofer, Information systems user-designer communication problems, Information & Management, Volume 14, Issue 3, 1988, Pages 133-142, ISSN 0378-7206, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0378-7206(88)90004-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0378720688900043)
Abstract: Designing an information system of some complexity requires cooperation between three parties: the user, the designer, and the builder. To achieve efficient communication between these, a number of problems that stem from the differences in background of the persons involved must be overcome.

The following vehicles for communication (forms of specification language) are discussed: graphic diagrams, tables, natural language and formal languages. Although intended for investigating design options, prototyping also renders a communication- type service, which is particularly useful when requirements are incomplete. The various forms of expression are compared, and weakenesses and strengths are highlighted.
Keywords: Information systems design; Design languages; User-designer-builder communication; Prototyping

Olivier Baudouin, Stéphane Dechelotte, Philippe Guittard, Alain Vacher, Simulis® Thermodynamics: an open framework for users and developers, In: Bertrand Braunschweig and Xavier Joulia, Editor(s), Computer Aided Chemical Engineering, Elsevier, 2008, Volume 25, Pages 635-640, ISSN 1570-7946, ISBN 9780444532275, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1570-7946(08)80111-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1570794608801113)
Abstract: Simulis® is the name of ProSim's new software suite. The component-oriented approach of its architecture is based on the Microsoft®' s COM/DCOM middleware. Simulis® Thermodynamics, one of the first components, is a thermophysical calculation server that generates highly accurate pure component and mixture properties (thermodynamic, transport, compressibility…) and fluid phase equilibria (liquid-vapor, liquid-liquid and vapor-liquid-liquid). One main benefit of Simulis® Thermodynamics is its CAPE-OPEN compliance through its CAPE-OPEN thermodynamic plug and socket facilities. Another powerfull feature is the capability to use legacy codes either as a DLL (Dynamic Link Library) following a standard syntax, either as VBScript (Visual Basic Script) directly written from the Simulis® Thermodynamics' environment. The standard version of Simulis® Thermodynamics is provided as an add-in in Microsoft® Excel and as a toolbox in MATLAB® and enables the user to run complete thermodynamic calculations in these applications, but it can also be plugged in any legacy code using the SDK (Software Development Kit). This paper will introduce all these different features.
Keywords: Thermodynamic; CAPE-OPEN; Simulis; Microsoft Excel; Modeling

John Lehman, Jay Van Wetering, Doug Vogel, Mainframe and microcomputer-based business graphics: What satisfies users?, Information & Management, Volume 10, Issue 3, 1986, Pages 133-140, ISSN 0378-7206, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0378-7206(86)90022-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0378720686900224)
Abstract: This paper profiles users of computerized business graphics in 200 organizations. It identifies differences between mainframe-based and microcomputer-based users. It profiles organizational and technological environment, motivation for selection and use, functional area use, end users, organizational responsibility and support, application profiles, impediments to increased use, and forecasts for the future. It identifies determinants of user satisfaction for both hardware strategies. In so doing, it provides empirical evidence for differing strategies of MIS involvement in the development of business graphics.
Keywords: Computer graphics; business graphics; personal computers; personal computing; end-user computing; user-acceptance; success factors

S.M.C. Porto, C. Arcidiacono, A. Giummarra, U. Anguzza, G. Cascone, Localisation and identification performances of a real-time location system based on ultra wide band technology for monitoring and tracking dairy cow behaviour in a semi-open free-stall barn, Computers and Electronics in Agriculture, Volume 108, October 2014, Pages 221-229, ISSN 0168-1699, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compag.2014.08.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0168169914002002)
Abstract: Abstract
The objective of this study was to evaluate the localisation and identification performances of a Real-Time Location System (RTLS) based on Ultra Wide Band (UWB) technology within a semi-open free-stall barn since the conditions of the breeding environment were different from that of the ‘typical open environment’ used by the RTLS producer to test the system and the building characteristics were dissimilar to those of the indoor environments considered in other tests. Each dairy cow was equipped with an active tag applied to one ear and a reference tag was fixed to a pillar of the barn. A video-recording system was installed in the barn to perform the assessment of the RTLS. Top-view camera images of the area of the barn were rectified and synchronised with the RTLS. An operator validated each position of the cow computed by the RTLS by performing cow visual recognition on the camera images. To perform this validation a software specifically designed for the purpose was utilised. It is an automatic and interactive tool which includes selection and control tabs for data management, visualisation and labelling of the images with the aim of computing tag true positions.

RTLS localisation and identification performances were assessed by applying an outlier data cleaning technique to tag localisation errors and using precision and sensitivity indices. Trade-off between these performances was found through the computation of three performance metrics.

The combination between the outlier data cleaning technique and the trade-off analysis of RTLS performances yielded the localisation mean error that was computed by averaging the localisation errors of each tag. It was equal to about 0.11 m with an identification accuracy of nearly 100% for the reference tag, whereas for the tags applied to the cows the average localisation mean error, computed by averaging the localisation mean errors of the tags, was about 0.515 m with an identification accuracy of 98%. At the 90th percentile the average localisation mean error was about 0.967 m for the cows’ tags, whereas it was about 0.17 m for the reference tag. This RTLS could be used for studying some specific aspects of cow behaviour, since its performances would not affect the computation of some cow behavioural indices that do not require a high level of precision on the cow position.

In the considered barn environment the RTLS performances proved to be generally unrelated to cow behaviour, as it is observed for other systems.
Keywords: UWB tag; Animal behaviour; Animal tracking; Behavioural indices

V. Maingot, J.B. Ferron, R. Leveugle, V. Pouget, A. Douin, Configuration errors analysis in SRAM-based FPGAs: Software tool and practical results, Microelectronics Reliability, Volume 47, Issues 9–11, September–November 2007, Pages 1836-1840, ISSN 0026-2714, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.microrel.2007.07.074.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0026271407003101)
Abstract: The reconfigurability of SRAM-based FPGAs has also some drawbacks, especially when used in systems requiring a high level of safety and/or dependability. Dealing with single-event effects is an important issue in these systems. This paper presents a software tool to analyze a bit-stream and the functional effects of errors in it. Results of analyzes are presented, based on experiments using a laser platform to inject faults in the circuit.

L. Rodriguez-Pardo, J. Fariña, C. Gabrielli, H. Perrot, R. Brendel, Simulation of QCM sensors based on high stability classical oscillator configurations in damping media, Sensors and Actuators B: Chemical, Volume 123, Issue 1, 10 April 2007, Pages 560-567, ISSN 0925-4005, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.snb.2006.09.061.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0925400506006745)
Abstract: To design the oscillators based on high stability classical configurations used in quartz crystal microbalance sensor systems (QCM), the simulation is essential due to the high complexity of the mathematical algorithms to be implemented. The nonlinear behaviour of the circuit oscillator, together with the mathematical models that describe the behaviour of the quartz-media resonant system, as well as the complexity of the design algorithms when optimizing the oscillator so that the oscillation remains in damping media, make the simulation a mandatory phase in the QCM system design task.

In this paper, a simulation environment to aid designers in the development of quartz crystal microbalance sensors for damping media is presented. It helps to adapt the design to the application environment, so that the oscillation remains inspite of the large reduction of the quality factor that the quartz experiences in those media.
Keywords: Quartz crystal microbalance; High stability classical electronic oscillator; Simulation; Damping media

Folco Casadei, Serguei Potapov, Permanent fluid–structure interaction with non-conforming interfaces in fast transient dynamics, Computer Methods in Applied Mechanics and Engineering, Volume 193, Issues 39–41, 1 October 2004, Pages 4157-4194, ISSN 0045-7825, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cma.2003.06.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0045782504002178)
Abstract: This paper presents the extension to the case of non-conforming interfaces of a family of fluid–structure interaction (FSI) algorithms originally based upon the hypothesis of nodally conforming fluid and structure finite element (or finite volume) meshes along their interface. The algorithms are implemented in the EUROPLEXUS system for fast transient dynamics analysis and their efficiency is shown on various examples, including an industrial application dealing with rapid depressurisation of the HDR test facility under hypothetical LOCA conditions.
Keywords: Fast transient dynamics; Fluid–structure interaction; Non-conforming interfaces

Guangxiang Wu, R. Graham Cooks, Zheng Ouyang, Meng Yu, William J. Chappell, Wolfgang R. Plass, Ion Trajectory Simulation for Electrode Configurations with Arbitrary Geometries, Journal of the American Society for Mass Spectrometry, Volume 17, Issue 9, September 2006, Pages 1216-1228, ISSN 1044-0305, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jasms.2006.05.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1044030506004818)
Abstract: A multi-particle ion trajectory simulation program ITSIM 6.0 is described, which is capable of ion trajectory simulations for electrode configurations with arbitrary geometries. The electrode structures are input from a 3D drawing program AutoCAD and the electric field is calculated using a 3D field solver COMSOL. The program CreatePot acts as interface between the field solver and ITSIM 6.0. It converts the calculated electric field into a field array file readable by ITSIM 6.0 and ion trajectories are calculated by solving Newton’s equation using Runge-Kutta integration methods. The accuracy of the field calculation is discussed for the ideal quadrupole ion trap in terms of applied mesh density. Electric fields of several different types of devices with 3D geometry are simulated, including ion transport through an ion optical system as a function of pressure. Ion spatial distributions, including the storage of positively charged ions only and simultaneous storage of positively/negatively charged ions in commercial linear ion traps with various geometries, are investigated using different trapping modes. Inelastic collisions and collision induced dissociation modeled using RRKM theory are studied, with emphasis on the fragmentation of n-butylbenzene inside an ideal quadrupole ion trap. The mass spectrum of 1,3-dichlorobenzene is simulated for the rectilinear ion trap device and good agreement is observed between the simulated and the experimental mass spectra. Collisional cooling using helium at different pressures is found to affect mass resolution in the rectilinear ion trap.

Bryant Gipson, Xiangyan Zeng, Zi Yan Zhang, Henning Stahlberg, 2dx—User-friendly image processing for 2D crystals, Journal of Structural Biology, Volume 157, Issue 1, January 2007, Pages 64-72, ISSN 1047-8477, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jsb.2006.07.020.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1047847706002334)
Abstract: Electron crystallography determines the structure of two-dimensional (2D) membrane protein crystals and other 2D crystal systems. Cryo-transmission electron microscopy records high-resolution electron micrographs, which require computer processing for three-dimensional structure reconstruction. We present a new software system 2dx, which is designed as a user-friendly, platform-independent software package for electron crystallography. 2dx assists in the management of an image-processing project, guides the user through the processing of 2D crystal images, and provides transparence for processing tasks and results. Algorithms are implemented in the form of script templates reminiscent of c-shell scripts. These templates can be easily modified or replaced by the user and can also execute modular stand-alone programs from the MRC software or from other image processing software packages. 2dx is available under the GNU General Public License at 2dx.org.
Keywords: 2dx Software; Electron crystallography; 2D crystals; Membrane protein; Structure determination; Computer image processing; MRC software

Loris Barbieri, Agostino Angilica, Fabio Bruno, Maurizio Muzzupappa, Mixed prototyping with configurable physical archetype for usability evaluation of product interfaces, Computers in Industry, Volume 64, Issue 3, April 2013, Pages 310-323, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2012.11.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361512002035)
Abstract: Mixed prototyping (MP) is an emerging approach for usability testing, thanks to its multimodal environment, which is able to involve sight, hearing and touch thus improving the ability to analyze the inter-relationships between the physical form and the behavior of the industrial products.

This paper presents a method to perform usability tests in a mixed reality (MR) environment for analyzing human performance in target acquisition tasks while interacting with household appliances. The proposed method is based on the use of different kinds of digital and physical prototypes and, moreover, it introduces an experimental physical archetype for mixed prototyping that contributes to increase the efficiency of the usability evaluation process. Through this archetype the design of a user interface can be easily changed by the adoption of plug-and-play moving components (knobs and buttons) that allow to model in a few seconds any kind of control panel for washing machines, thus reducing the prototyping costs and enlarging the variety of MR interfaces that can be evaluated.

The paper proposes also a validation of the use of the physical archetype through a case study in which three different control panel alternatives have been evaluated in a competitive usability study. The competitive testing allows to gather user behaviors with a broad range of design options before the development of a new control panel refined through iterative design.

Experimental results show that the proposed method based on the physical archetype can be an effective support to improve the usability of the product interface.
Keywords: Design review; Interaction design; Usability test; Mixed prototyping

Juan Boubeta-Puig, Guadalupe Ortiz, Inmaculada Medina-Bulo, MEdit4CEP: A model-driven solution for real-time decision making in SOA 2.0, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 89, November 2015, Pages 97-112, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.knosys.2015.06.021.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950705115002397)
Abstract: Abstract
Organizations all around the world need to manage huge amounts of data from heterogeneous sources every day in order to conduct decision making processes. This requires them to infer what the value of such data is for the business in question through data analysis as well as acting promptly for critical or relevant situations. Complex Event Processing (CEP) is a technology that helps tackle this issue by detecting event patterns in real time. However, this technology forces domain experts to define these patterns indicating such situations and the appropriate actions to be executed in their information systems, generally based on Service-Oriented Architectures (SOAs). In particular, these users face the incommodity of implementing these patterns manually or by using editors which are not user-friendly enough. To deal with this problem, a model-driven solution for real-time decision making in event-driven SOAs is proposed and conducted in this paper. This approach allows the integration of CEP with this architecture type as well as defining CEP domain and event pattern through a graphical and intuitive editor, which also permits automatic code generation. Moreover, the solution is evaluated and its benefits are discussed. As a result, we can assert this is a novel solution for bringing CEP technology closer to any user, positively impacting on business decision making processes.
Keywords: Decision making; Complex event processing; Model-driven development; Graphical modeling editor; SOA 2.0

Chao Li, User preferences, information transactions and location-based services: A study of urban pedestrian wayfinding, Computers, Environment and Urban Systems, Volume 30, Issue 6, November 2006, Pages 726-740, ISSN 0198-9715, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compenvurbsys.2006.02.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0198971506000172)
Abstract: Though research into location-based services (LBS) is being carried out across a number of disciplines, user aspects of LBS remains a cross-cutting theme. In this paper, the research focuses on investigating the user information requirements from LBS at individual level, with emphasis on the interactive nature of information transactions between environments, individuals and mobile devices. Based on a proposed conceptual model, urban pedestrian wayfinding experiments have been implemented in an immersive virtual reality test environment. Automated and semi-automated methods of data collection have allowed an integrated picture of participant behaviour and information preferences to be constructed and analysed. The results of this study show that there are clear user preferences in information requirements in completing wayfinding tasks. However, changes in user preferences during the wayfinding tasks do occur in response to levels of confidence, different spatial layouts and the wayfinding situations individuals encounter. The outcomes indicate that the proposed conceptual interaction model and adopted implementation approach assist in understanding user behaviour and information preferences for LBS.
Keywords: Location-based services; Pedestrian wayfinding; Interaction; Virtual environment

Benjamin B. Bederson, Mary P. Czerwinski and George G. Robertson, A Fisheye Calendar Interface for PDAs: Providing Overviews for Small Displays, In Interactive Technologies, Morgan Kaufmann, San Francisco, 2003, Pages 324-333, The Craft of Information Visualization, ISBN 9781558609150, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155860915-0/50041-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978155860915050041X)
Abstract: ABSTRACT
Calendar applications for small handheld devices such as PDAs are growing in popularity. This led us to develop FishCal, a novel calendar interface for PDAs. It supports users in performing planning and analysis tasks by using a fisheye representation of dates coupled with compact overviews, user control over the visible time period, and integrated search. This enables users to see overviews and to easily navigate the calendar structure, and to discover patterns and outliers.

FishCal was evaluated in a benchmark usability study comparing it to Microsoft's Pocket PC 2002™ calendar. Eleven users performed complex tasks significantly faster and completed them more often with FishCal. Task by task user satisfaction data showed a significant advantage for FishCal as well. A number of usability issues were identified to aid in the iterative refinement of FishCal.
Keywords: Fisheye Views; Information Visualization; Calendar Interfaces; PDAs; Animation; Graphics

Brad Woodberg, Mohan Krishnamurthy Madwachar, Mike Swarm, Neil R. Wyler, Matthew Albers and Ralph Bonnell, Chapter 5 - Advanced Policy Configuration, In Configuring Juniper Networks NetScreen & SSG Firewalls, Syngress, Burlington, 2007, Pages 191-232, ISBN 9781597491181, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-159749118-1/50007-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597491181500071)

Ming-Chen Hsu, Chenglong Wang, Austin J. Herrema, Dominik Schillinger, Anindya Ghoshal, Yuri Bazilevs, An interactive geometry modeling and parametric design platform for isogeometric analysis, Computers & Mathematics with Applications, Volume 70, Issue 7, October 2015, Pages 1481-1500, ISSN 0898-1221, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.camwa.2015.04.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0898122115001716)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper an interactive parametric design-through-analysis platform is proposed to help design engineers and analysts make more effective use of Isogeometric Analysis (IGA) to improve their product design and performance. We develop several Rhinoceros (Rhino) plug-ins to take input design parameters through a user-friendly interface, generate appropriate surface and/or volumetric models, perform mechanical analysis, and visualize the solution fields, all within the same Computer-Aided Design (CAD) program. As part of this effort we propose and implement graphical generative algorithms for IGA model creation and visualization based on Grasshopper, a visual programming interface to Rhino. The developed platform is demonstrated on two structural mechanics examples—an actual wind turbine blade and a model of an integrally bladed rotor (IBR). In the latter example we demonstrate how the Rhino functionality may be utilized to create conforming volumetric models for IGA.
Keywords: Isogeometric analysis; NURBS and T-splines; Parametric design; Rhino and Grasshopper; Visual programming; Graphical generative algorithms

LIAM E. GUMLEY, 8 - Creating Graphical Output, In Practical IDL Programming, Morgan Kaufmann, San Francisco, 2002, Pages 341-390, ISBN 9781558607002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155860700-2.50009-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781558607002500094)

Harsha Kumar, Catherine Plaisant, Marko Teittinen and Ben Shneiderman, Visual Information Management for Network Configuration, In Interactive Technologies, Morgan Kaufmann, San Francisco, 2003, Pages 239-256, The Craft of Information Visualization, ISBN 9781558609150, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155860915-0/50032-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781558609150500329)
Abstract: Abstract
Current network management systems rely heavily on forms in their user interfaces. The interfaces reflect the intricacies of the network hardware components but provide little support for guiding users through tasks. There is a scarcity of useful graphical visualizations and decision-support tools.

Bruno R. De Araújo, Géry Casiez, Joaquim A. Jorge, Martin Hachet, Mockup Builder: 3D modeling on and above the surface, Computers & Graphics, Volume 37, Issue 3, May 2013, Pages 165-178, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2012.12.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849312001811)
Abstract: We present Mockup Builder, a semi-immersive environment for conceptual design which allows virtual mockups to be created using gestures. Our goal is to provide familiar ways for people to conceive, create and manipulate three-dimensional shapes. To this end, we developed on-and-above-the-surface interaction techniques based on asymmetric bimanual interaction for creating and editing 3D models in a stereoscopic environment. Our approach combines both hand and finger tracking in the space on and above a multi-touch surface. This combination brings forth an alternative design environment where users can seamlessly switch between interacting on the surface or above it to leverage the benefit of both interaction spaces. A formal user evaluation conducted with experienced users shows very promising avenues for further work towards providing an alternative to current user interfaces for modeling.
Keywords: 3D modeling; 3D user interface

Dominique Michelucci, Sebti Foufou, Geometric constraint solving: The witness configuration method, Computer-Aided Design, Volume 38, Issue 4, April 2006, Pages 284-299, ISSN 0010-4485, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cad.2006.01.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S001044850600025X)
Abstract: Geometric constraint solving is a key issue in CAD, CAM and PLM. The systems of geometric constraints are today studied and decomposed with graph-based methods, before their numerical resolution. However, graph-based methods can detect only the simplest (called structural) dependences between constraints; they cannot detect subtle dependences due to theorems. To overcome these limitations, this paper proposes a new method: the system is studied (with linear algebra tools) at a witness configuration, which is intuitively similar to the unknown one, and easy to compute.
Keywords: Geometric constraints; Constraints dependences; Decomposition and solving; The numerical probabilistic method; Rigidity theory

Brian Baskin, Tony Bradley, Jeremy Faircloth, Craig A. Schiller, Ken Caruso, Paul Piccard, Lance James and Tony Piltzecker, Chapter 5 - Solutions for the End User, In Combating Spyware in the Enterprise, Syngress, Burlington, 2006, Pages 143-199, ISBN 9781597490641, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-159749064-1/50007-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597490641500070)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
A number of solutions are intended for end-user spyware mitigation, ranging from freeware scanners and pop-up blockers to toolbars and keystroke detectors. This chapter highlights some of the more popular freeware packages and toolbars as well as a select number of pay-to-play software packages. In the field of spyware protection one can take multiple routes to ensure the integrity of computer and its data. Commercial products include easy-to-use interfaces, user manuals, and free 24/7 technical support for users in trouble. Unlike in many other software markets, purchasing the “cream of the crop” in spyware-protection software does not require a credit-card swipe. The chapter discusses the most popular free spyware scanners and highlights their usage. The chapter further discusses the use of Spybot: Search &amp; Destroy, one of the first spyware scanners made. Available in dozens of languages for worldwide use, Spybot is one of the few free spyware scanners that include tools to continually monitor for the signs of spyware before such items can infest a computer system. Although it features a slightly more difficult user interface than its competitors, it remains a very powerful antispyware application.

Alexander Serenko, The development of an instrument to measure the degree of animation predisposition of agent users, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 23, Issue 1, January 2007, Pages 478-495, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2004.10.042.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563204001797)
Abstract: The study reports on the development and operationalization of a construct that captures an individual’s degree of predisposition towards watching animated films. It is believed that this construct may potentially explicate a person’s perceptions and usage behavior towards animated agents in Microsoft Office applications. Animation predisposition is defined as an individual specific trait that reflects a person’s predisposition towards watching animated films. It is operationalized in form of a four-item Likert type scale, which was found highly reliable and valid. This construct does not correlate with two other individual specific traits: computer playfulness and personal innovativeness in the domain of information technology. As such, it is suggested that animation predisposition is a distinct and independent research construct exhibiting desirable psychometric properties. The analysis demonstrates that the degree of people’s animation predisposition is positively associated with their perceptions of enjoyment with an animated agent in MS Office. The computer users who have a higher degree of animation predisposition attempt to explore an agent’s personalization settings more frequently than those with a lower degree of animation predisposition. Overall, this study offers a new approach to the investigation of an untapped area aiming to improve the quality of the contemporary research on the usefulness and user acceptance of animated agents.
Keywords: Animated agents; Animation predisposition; Instrument development

Linda Newman Lior, Chapter 1 - Introducing the Information Experience, In Writing for Interaction, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2013, Pages 3-20, ISBN 9780123948137, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-394813-7.00001-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123948137000018)
Abstract: This chapter introduces the concept of the information experience and how the flow of information provided within the user interface impacts the overall user experience.

The chapter describes the information ecosystem, and how the integration between the components of the information ecosystem and the user experience form the information experience. The information ecosystem consists of all the information supporting, provided with, and integrated into that application. This information includes print materials such as documentation, online help systems, Internet materials, and content within the user interface.

The chapter also discusses the difference between writing for web sites and writing for web applications.
Keywords: User interface; Information experience; Information ecosystem; Documentation; Information workflow; User experience

Karen Renaud, Antonella De Angeli, My password is here! An investigation into visuo-spatial authentication mechanisms, Interacting with Computers, Volume 16, Issue 6, December 2004, Pages 1017-1041, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2004.06.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543804000700)
Abstract: Passwords are the almost universal authentication mechanism, even though they are basically flawed and cause problems for users due to poor memorability. Graphical methods of authentication have recently excited some interest but little is known about their actual efficacy. There are basically two types of graphical authentication mechanisms: recognition-based and location-based—also called visuo-spatial mechanisms. Whereas some kinds of recognition-based graphical authentication mechanisms have been evaluated by various researchers, there is still a need to investigate location-based graphical authentication mechanisms in a more rigorous fashion to determine whether they could be a viable alternative to traditional passwords for web usage. This paper discusses graphical authentication mechanisms in general and reports on the evaluation of one particular visuo-spatial mechanism, aimed at augmenting the password paradigm by providing a way to record passwords securely. Results and findings are presented, and conclusions drawn, some of which can also be applied to other types of visuo-spatial mechanisms. We also propose a set of metrics which can be used to measure the quality of web authentication mechanisms and apply these to a range of existing authentication mechanisms.
Keywords: User authentication; Graphical mechanisms; Visuo-spatial memory; Evaluation; Web authentication; Metrics

R. Brzoza-Woch, A. Ruta, K. Zieliński, Remotely reconfigurable hardware–software platform with web service interface for automated video surveillance, Journal of Systems Architecture, Volume 59, Issue 7, August 2013, Pages 376-388, ISSN 1383-7621, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.sysarc.2013.05.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S138376211300074X)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents a reconfigurable hardware platform for general-purpose video processing. The proposed design is a step towards portable, web-enabled devices which, unlike most existing smart cameras, are to a large degree autonomous and have substantial intelligence embedded. The device is based on programmable logic, microcontrollers, and dedicated communication modules. It is able to acquire an input frame using a built-in camera, process the image in a massively parallel manner, and expose its functionality as a web service compliant with the Service Oriented Architecture (SOA) paradigm. Thanks to the FPGA technology used for main functionality implementation, the system’s hardware can be locally or remotely reconfigured in order to optimize it on a very low level for user-defined tasks. Moreover, the image processing core is implemented using a C-to-HDL compiler to reduce time to market when deploying new functionalities. We demonstrate the capabilities of our device on two example applications: moving object detection and face recognition.
Keywords: FPGA; Web service; Video surveillance; Image processing; SOA

Jesús Gallardo, Ana I. Molina, Crescencio Bravo, Miguel A. Redondo, A model-driven and task-oriented method for the development of collaborative systems, Journal of Network and Computer Applications, Volume 36, Issue 6, November 2013, Pages 1551-1565, ISSN 1084-8045, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jnca.2013.03.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1084804513001033)
Abstract: Abstract
Groupware systems are usually difficult to design when following traditional methodologies and approaches for single user systems. In this regard, model-driven approaches have been gaining attention in recent years. In accordance with this paradigm, we developed the SpacEclipse method in a previous work, which is a method for developing collaborative modeling groupware based on the plug-ins in the Eclipse Modeling Project. However, this method presents some deficiencies that we have tried to overcome in this work. In order to achieve this goal, we have chosen the CIAM methodology, which allows the modeling of collaboration, users, tasks, sessions and interactive issues and which is also supported by Eclipse-based tools. In this paper, we explain how the integration of CIAM elements in the SpacEclipse method has been carried out and resulted in a new method with its own methodological, conceptual and technological frameworks. To prove the validity of the method, we have applied it to a re-engineering process in the development of an existing tool.
Keywords: Model-driven software development; Groupware development; Model-based user interface development

Catherine M Burns, Johnson Kuo, Sylvia Ng, Ecological interface design: a new approach for visualizing network management, Computer Networks, Volume 43, Issue 3, 22 October 2003, Pages 369-388, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1389-1286(03)00287-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128603002871)
Abstract: Effective network management is a key to maximizing the performance of today’s networks. Active monitoring of networks is still largely the domain of human network managers and yet, the support tools provided to these operators are typically not integrated and dated in their interface design. Ecological interface design (EID) is a systematic approach, drawn from nuclear power plant control, for designing visualizations that uses a multi-level analysis to develop graphics designed to support problem solving and management activities. We demonstrate the adaptation of this approach to network management and show how visualization tools can be designed. Finally we evaluated the EID tool against an industry tool, HPOpenView Network Node Manager in a series of detection and diagnosis tasks. While we observed slightly faster detection times with Network Node Manager, the EID tool generated faster diagnosis times and more accurate diagnoses. Finally we took our tool to professional network managers for a qualitative evaluation.
Keywords: Network management; Interface design; Visualization; Problem solving

Xudong Luo, Nicholas R. Jennings, Nigel Shadbolt, Acquiring user tradeoff strategies and preferences for negotiating agents: A default-then-adjust method, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 64, Issue 4, April 2006, Pages 304-321, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2005.08.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581905001515)
Abstract: A wide range of algorithms have been developed for various types of negotiating agents. In developing such algorithms the main focus has been on their efficiency and their effectiveness. However, this is only a part of the picture. Typically, agents negotiate on behalf of their owners and for this to be effective the agents must be able to adequately represent their owners’ strategies and preferences for negotiation. However, the process by which such knowledge is acquired is typically left unspecified. To address this problem, we undertook a study of how user information about negotiation tradeoff strategies and preferences can be captured. Specifically, we devised a novel default-then-adjust acquisition technique. In this, the system firstly does a structured interview with the user to suggest the attributes that the tradeoff could be made between, then it asks the user to adjust the suggested default tradeoff strategy by improving some attribute to see how much worse the attribute being traded off can be made while still being acceptable, and, finally, it asks the user to adjust the default preference on the tradeoff alternatives. This method is consistent with the principles of standard negotiation theory and to demonstrate its effectiveness we implemented a prototype system and performed an empirical evaluation in an accommodation renting scenario. The result of this evaluation indicates the proposed technique is helpful and efficient in accurately acquiring the users’ tradeoff strategies and preferences.
Keywords: Tradeoff strategy and preference; Knowledge acquisition; Preference acquisition; Automated negotiation; Software agents

Rob Cameron, Christopher Cantrell, Dave Killion, Kevin Russell and Kenneth Tam, Chapter 5 - Advanced Policy Configuration, In Configuring NetScreen Firewalls, Syngress, Burlington, 2005, Pages 213-253, ISBN 9781932266399, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193226639-9/50009-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781932266399500098)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter deals with advanced policy options. To successfully implement traffic shaping to the exact requirements, each policy implemented must be researched. A poor configuration with traffic shaping can be as bad in some cases as not using traffic shaping at all. This chapter takes a look at the use of guaranteed bandwidth, traffic prioritization, and maximum bandwidth restrictions. These three components of traffic management allow ensuring that the available bandwidth is allocated to the policies that need it. Using counting can help to identify traffic patterns on a per policy basis. This can help identify which policies require more bandwidth and which use less bandwidth. Policies are typically in one of two states, enabled or disabled. When using scheduling it can be used to create schedule objects to specify which times the policies will be enforced and for how long policies are effective. Policy-based authentication forces a user to authenticate before using network resources. Using authentication on a policy not only authenticates the system by requiring the source Internet protocol (IP) address to match the policy, but also forces the user to authenticate to the firewall to ensure the right user is accessing the resources.

R. Michalski, J. Grobelny, The role of colour preattentive processing in human–computer interaction task efficiency: A preliminary study, International Journal of Industrial Ergonomics, Volume 38, Issues 3–4, March–April 2008, Pages 321-332, ISSN 0169-8141, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ergon.2007.11.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169814107002211)
Abstract: In this paper, results of experimental research on the preattentive mechanism in the human–computer interaction (HCI) were presented. Fifty-four subjects were asked to find interface elements from various panel structures. The arrangements were differentiated by their orientation (vertical, horizontal), colour pattern (ordered, unordered) and object background colours (green–blue, green–red, blue–red). The main finding of the study generally confirms the profits provided by the visual preattentive processing of the colour feature in graphical panel operation efficiency. However, the vertical way of arranging the items in search layouts resulted in decreasing the preattentive effect related to the item background colour. In regular, chessboard-like patterns of different coloured items, the effect of the early vision was less salient than in the case of structures with randomly dispersed colours. The reported results can help in designing efficient graphical user–computer interfaces in many interactive information systems.
Keywords: Visual preattentive processing; Human–computer interface design; Graphical objects; Dialogue windows; Search task efficiency

, Chapter 9 - Securing User Access, In How to Cheat, edited by Jan Kanclirz,, Syngress, Burlington, 2007, Pages 321-354, How to Cheat at Microsoft Vista Administration, ISBN 9781597491747, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-159749174-7.50010-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597491747500100)

A. Papageorgiou and J. Würtz, Chapter 12 - Interaction with the User, In Environmental Data Exchange Network for Inland Water, edited by Palle Haastrup and Jørgen Würtz, Elsevier, Amsterdam, 2007, Pages 193-212, ISBN 9780444529732, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-044452973-2/50015-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444529732500154)

Chi Dung Tran, Houcine Ezzedine, Christophe Kolski, EISEval, a generic reconfigurable environment for evaluating agent-based interactive systems, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 71, Issue 6, June 2013, Pages 725-761, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2013.02.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581913000098)
Abstract: The evaluation of interactive systems has been an active subject of research for many years. Many methods have been proposed, but most of them do not take the architectural specificities of an agent-based interactive system into account, nor do they focus on the link between architecture and evaluation. In this paper, we present an agent-based architecture model for interactive systems. Then, based on this architecture, we propose a generic, reconfigurable evaluation environment, called EISEval, designed and developed to help evaluators analyze and evaluate certain aspects of interactive systems in general and of agent-based architecture interactive systems in particular: User Interface (UI), non-functional properties (e.g., response time, complexity) and user characteristics (e.g., abilities, preferences, progress). System designers can draw useful conclusions from the evaluation results to improve the system. This environment was applied to evaluate an agent-based interactive system used to supervise an urban transport network in a study organized in laboratory.
Keywords: Evaluation; User interface; Electronic informer; Ergonomic criteria; Agent-based architecture; Interactive systems; Human-computer interaction (HCI)

Wenjie Zuo, An object-oriented graphics interface design and optimization software for cross-sectional shape of automobile body, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 64, October 2013, Pages 1-10, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2013.04.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997813000367)
Abstract: Abstract
At the conceptual design stage, automobile body is evaluated by simplified frame structure, consisting of thin-walled beams (TWBs). In the automobile practice, design engineers mostly rely on their experience and intuition when making decisions on cross-sectional shape of TWBs. So this paper presents a cross-sectional shape optimization method in order to achieve a high stiffness and lightweight TWB. Firstly, cross-sectional property formulations is summarized and reviewed. Secondly, we build up a shape optimization model to minimize the cross-sectional area and satisfy the stiffness and manufacturing demands. The objective and constraints are nonlinear polynomial functions of the point coordinates defining the cross-sectional shape. Genetic algorithm is introduced to solve this nonlinear optimization problem. Thirdly, object-oriented programming and design patterns are adopted to design and implement the software framework. Lastly, numerical example is used to verify the presented method. This software, “SuperBeam” for short, is released for free and does speed up the conceptual design of automobile body.
Keywords: Automobile body; Thin-walled beam; Cross section; Shape optimization; Genetic algorithm; Object-oriented programming

L. Mayaud, S. Filipe, L. Pétégnief, O. Rochecouste, M. Congedo, Robust Brain-computer Interface for virtual Keyboard (RoBIK): Project results, IRBM, Volume 34, Issue 2, April 2013, Pages 131-138, ISSN 1959-0318, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.irbm.2013.01.013.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1959031813000262)
Abstract: Brain-Computer Interface (BCI) is a technology that translates the brain electrical activity into a command for a device such as a robotic arm, a wheelchair or a spelling device. BCIs have long been described as an assistive technology for severely disabled patients because they completely bypass the need for muscular activity. The clinical reality is however dramatically different and most patients who use BCIs today are doing so as part of constraining clinical trials. To achieve the technological transfer from bench to bedside, BCI must gain ease of use and robustness of both measure (electroencephalography [EEG]) and interface (signal processing and applications). The Robust Brain-computer Interface for virtual Keyboard (RoBIK) project aimed at the development of a BCI system for communication that could be used on a daily basis by patients without the help of a trained team of researchers. To guide further developments clinicians first assessed patients’ needs. The prototype subsequently developed consisted in a 14 felt-pad electrodes EEG headset sampling at 256 Hz by an electronic component capable of transmitting signals wirelessly. The application was a virtual keyboard generating a novel stimulation paradigm to elicit P300 Evoked Related Potentials (ERPs) for communication. Raw EEG signals were treated with OpenViBE open-source software including novel signal processing and stimulation techniques.

Tomislav Stipancic, Bojan Jerbic, Petar Curkovic, A context-aware approach in realization of socially intelligent industrial robots, Robotics and Computer-Integrated Manufacturing, Volume 37, February 2016, Pages 79-89, ISSN 0736-5845, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.rcim.2015.07.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0736584515000812)
Abstract: Abstract
Contemporary industrial environments are usually constrained or limited in order to fit a fast, cheap and non-error prone production. Human-like system capabilities are not generally desirable there. But, recent trends in industrial robotics demand robust, flexible and efficient robots with a certain level of autonomy. Therefore, new and different approaches and perspectives in designing of industrial facilities are required.

This paper reveals how a context-based reasoning can be used to achieve an intelligent robot group behavior. In order to achieve adaptivity, self-recovery or scalability of the system, a COgnitive MOdel for the Robot group control (COMOR) is developed. COMOR can be understood as an interpreter used to transform high-level context to low-level data, allowing machines to make context-based decisions.

COMOR has three main parts and relies on a simulated Social Capital phenomenon as a feature of people. The first part is used to collect significant information from the environment. The second part is used to provide a set of possible solutions respecting the semantic domain description. The last part of COMOR is used to provide a behavioral component ensuring an optimal solution to given environmental conditions.
Keywords: Cognitive robotics; Context-awareness; Probabilistic graphical models; Ontology; Ubiquitous computing

Severin Bumbaru, Marian Viorel Crâciun, Viorel Mînzu, Daniel Neagu and Anna Maria Pezzotti, Appendix F - Software tool for toxicity prediction of pesticides, candidate pesticides, and their derivatives (user guide), In Quantitative Structure-Activity Relationships (QSAR) for Pesticide Regulatory Purposes, edited by EMILIO BENFENATI,, Elsevier, Amsterdam, 2007, Pages 493-503, ISBN 9780444527103, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-044452710-3/50017-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444527103500173)

, Chapter 3 - Microsoft Vista: Securing User Access, In Microsoft Vista for IT Security Professionals, edited by Anthony Piltzecker,, Syngress, Burlington, 2007, Pages 87-121, ISBN 9781597491396, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-159749139-6/50007-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597491396500078)

, Chapter 2 - Asterisk Configuration and Features, In Practical VoIP Security, edited by Thomas Porter, , Jan Kanclirz, , Andy Zmolek, , Antonio Rosela, , Michael Cross, , Larry Chaffin, , Brian Baskin, and Choon Shim, Syngress, Burlington, 2006, Pages 23-58, ISBN 9781597490603, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-159749060-3/50025-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781597490603500254)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter discusses how the Asterisk PBX (Private Branch Exchange) plays an important role in our day-to-day lives of communication. It reviews some key functionality of Asterisk PBX systems. . It studies some older PBX function technologies, such as analog and digital, as well as the new integrated Voice over Internet Protocol (VoIP)-enabled functions. It presents the benefits that IP-enabled PBX may have and its key differences from traditional voice technology. Asterisk is software running a PBX system that is freely available to anyone under the GNU General Public License (GPL).Asterisk provides all the functionality of VoIP and traditional telephony that any commercial PBX system would. Asterisk's features include conferencing, interactive voice response (IVR), voice mail, call parking, billing solutions, and much more. VoIP calls are transferred over packet-routed networks such as the Internet versus traditional circuit switched networks like the public switched telephone network (PSTN).

Ginger S. Stickney, Philipos C. Loizou, Lakshmi N. Mishra, Peter F. Assmann, Robert V. Shannon, Jane M. Opie, Effects of electrode design and configuration on channel interactions, Hearing Research, Volume 211, Issues 1–2, January 2006, Pages 33-45, ISSN 0378-5955, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.heares.2005.08.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378595505002959)
Abstract: A potential shortcoming of existing multichannel cochlear implants is electrical-field summation during simultaneous electrode stimulation. Electrical-field interactions can disrupt the stimulus waveform prior to neural activation. To test whether speech intelligibility can be degraded by electrical-field interaction, speech recognition performance and interaction were examined for three Clarion electrode arrays: the pre-curved, enhanced bipolar electrode array, the enhanced bipolar electrode with an electrode positioner, and the Hi-Focus electrode with a positioner. Channel interaction was measured by comparing stimulus detection thresholds for a probe signal in the presence of a sub-threshold perturbation signal as a function of the separation between the two simultaneously stimulated electrodes. Correct identification of vowels, consonants, and words in sentences was measured with two speech strategies: one which used simultaneous stimulation and another which used sequential stimulation. Speech recognition scores were correlated with measured electrical-field interaction for the strategy which used simultaneous stimulation but not the strategy which used sequential stimulation. Higher speech recognition scores with the simultaneous strategy were generally associated with lower levels of electrical-field interaction. Electrical-field interaction accounted for as much as 70% of the variance in speech recognition scores, suggesting that electrical-field interaction is a significant contributor to the variability found across patients who use simultaneous strategies.
Keywords: Cochlear implants; Channel interaction; Speech perception

Yuanchun Ding, Lizhong Yang, Ping Rao, Investigating the Merging Behavior at the Floor-stair Interface of High-rise Building Based on Computer Simulations, Procedia Engineering, Volume 62, 2013, Pages 463-469, ISSN 1877-7058, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.proeng.2013.08.088.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877705813012708)
Abstract: Abstract
The merging behavior at the floor-stair interface of high-rise building based on computer simulations is investigated in this paper. A landing with dogleg stairs is adopted in this research. Four different configurations show that the evacuation time is almost a linear function to the number of storeys. Furthermore, the door from the floor to landing, which is on the opposite side of the landing to the incoming stair, is the best situation to improve the upper floors’ evacuation effect, and restrain the lower floors’ evacuation. At the same time, the door from the floor, which is adjacent to the incoming stair, is the worst situation to improve the lower floors’ evacuation, and restrain the upper floors’ evacuation. Additionally, with these results obtained in this paper, the building designer can select a more suitable position to place the evacuation doors.
Keywords: Merging behavior; High-rise building; Evacuation; Computer simulations

Greg A Jamieson, Kim J Vicente, Ecological interface design for petrochemical applications: supporting operator adaptation, continuous learning, and distributed, collaborative work, Computers & Chemical Engineering, Volume 25, Issues 7–8, 15 August 2001, Pages 1055-1074, ISSN 0098-1354, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0098-1354(01)00678-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098135401006780)
Abstract: Future support systems for operators of petrochemical refineries will have to support operator adaptation to unanticipated events, foster continuous learning, and facilitate distributed, collaborative work. This paper describes Ecological Interface Design, a candidate framework for human–computer interface design that has the potential to fulfill these diverse demands. Support for adaptation and continuous learning is demonstrated though the design of a novel operator interface for a fluid catalytic cracking unit. While the framework forms a basis upon which a distributed, collaborative support system may be built, no such design is presented here. The process of the application of the framework is described in detail, including the domain modelling activity and a description of the resulting graphical user interface. Limitations to applying the design approach to operational plants are discussed.
Keywords: Ecological interface design; Cognitive engineering; Adaptation; Learning; Collaboration

A Zaatri, M Oussalah, Integration and design of multi-modal interfaces for supervisory control systems, Information Fusion, Volume 4, Issue 2, June 2003, Pages 135-150, ISSN 1566-2535, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1566-2535(03)00018-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1566253503000186)
Abstract: This paper presents a generic design and implementation of a multi-modal operator interface (MOI) which has been dedicated for supervisory control systems. A presentation followed by an evaluation of some interactions and control modes, that have been so far integrated to built our experimental system, are given. These control modes are namely tele-manipulation, speech-based control, vision-based control, and model-based control. More emphasis is stressed on the vision-based control and tele-manipulation we have originally developed. Next, the combination of these control modes, through this MOI, is used to achieve some complex robotics tasks.

Moreover, by incorporating some intelligent functions and fusing different sensors, the MOI enables a multi-modal interaction ranging from shared mode to superimposed mode, passing through traded mode. This entails a multi-level robot control and an adaptive automation. Robotics-oriented applications consisting of inserting a square (circular)-in-peg are described using tele-manipulation control mode and vision-based control. Importance of the multi-interaction mode versus unimodal mode is highlighted. Finally, improvement of the developed MOI system is investigated through incorporating an anticipatory system that protects against possible catastrophic errors of the operator.
Keywords: Multi-modal operator interface; Adaptive supervisory control; Intelligent interface; Human–machine co-operation; Human–machine interaction; Tele-robotics

J.S. Kong, K. Maute, D.M. Frangopol, L.-A. Liew, R.A. Saravanan, R. Raj, A real time human–machine interface for an ultrahigh temperature MEMS sensor–igniter, Sensors and Actuators A: Physical, Volume 105, Issue 1, 15 June 2003, Pages 23-30, ISSN 0924-4247, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0924-4247(03)00092-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S092442470300092X)
Abstract: The progress of numerous emerging technologies is currently hampered by a disconnect between material science and engineering applications. The potential of nano-scale engineering can not be fully exploited as long as basic material science and engineering are not integrated. This paper is concerned with the development of a novel computational methodology that unites fundamental materials science, mechanical design, reliability analysis, and system level performance assessment in an interactive environment called the human–machine interface (HMI). The HMI serves as a real time display of the performance and the status of the device, e.g. the remaining life, and provides a simulation platform for design and optimization. The architecture and performance of the HMI is demonstrated by the example of an ultrahigh temperature MEMS sensor–igniter. The device is fabricated from a novel polymer derived ceramic (PDC) called silicon carbonitride (SiCN). The HMI methodology is portable to health monitoring of other high temperature systems such as gas turbine engines, missile systems, and high temperature processing of advanced materials.
Keywords: Health monitoring; Real time human–machine interface; MEMS; Microigniter; PDC; Sensor

Kari Chopra, Robert Rush, David Mendonça and William A. Wallace, 10 - Acquiring and Assessing Knowledge from Multiple Experts Using Graphical Representations, In Knowledge-Based Systems, edited by Cornelius T. Leondes,, Academic Press, San Diego, 2000, Pages 293-326, ISBN 9780124438750, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-012443875-0/50011-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124438750500112)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The integrity of the process of eliciting and representing human expertise is fundamental to any knowledge-based system. This process is referred to as “knowledge acquisition.” Human expertise can be found in documents and databases that store records of past transactions as well as the guidelines and procedures used to process those transactions. An active area of current research involves “mining” these data to capture knowledge to develop rules for incorporation into knowledge-based systems. This chapter presents a thorough review of current practice in eliciting, representing, and amalgamating knowledge from multiple experts with a focus on the use of graphical representations to support the process. The important points of the discussion are illustrated by presenting a specific methodology for eliciting and combining knowledge from multiple experts. This methodology provides a statistically defensive summarization for assessment. The results of a pilot test of its implementation over the Internet are also presented in the chapter. This chapter concludes with a discussion on the need for knowledge acquisition techniques that permit the quality of the rules developed based on the acquired knowledge to be quantitatively assessed and subsequently embedded into decision support systems.

Chun Hai (Bernard) Cheah, Ken Schaefer and Chris Peiris, Chapter 5 - Advanced Web Server Security Configuration, In CYA Securing IIS 6.0, Syngress, Burlington, 2004, Pages 115-193, ISBN 9781931836258, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183625-8/50008-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836258500080)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter takes a look at the authentication mechanisms and the uses of Internet information services (IIS) accounts. The chapter also discusses the aspects of the IIS request processing cycle and describes how settings in IIS can be used to secure an application against all forms of attack. When IIS 6.0 attempts to read a resource from the server's disk, it impersonates a Windows user account. That user account's permissions are checked against the new technology file system (NTFS) access control list (ACL) for the file in question to determine whether the requested action is permitted. Regardless of which combination of authentication mechanisms is configured for the Website's resources, a browser making an initial request will not send user credentials. If anonymous authentication is configured for the requested resource, then IIS impersonates the configured anonymous user account. If anonymous authentication is not enabled, but one of the other authentication mechanisms is enabled, the server and browser negotiates to select the most secure authentication mechanism enabled on the server and supported by the browser—integrated windows authentication, then digest and advanced digest, and finally basic authentication. The chapter discusses all these types of authentications. The chapter also discusses the techniques for configuring delegation, IIS user accounts, uniform resource locators (URL) scan, URL authorization with the authorization manager, custom error messages, and configuring the server to use SSL. The chapter closes with a discussion on configuration of IP Address, TCP Port and Host-Header combinations.

Antonio Pantano, Ronald C. Averill, A penalty-based finite element interface technology, Computers & Structures, Volume 80, Issue 22, September 2002, Pages 1725-1748, ISSN 0045-7949, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0045-7949(02)00056-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0045794902000561)
Abstract: An effective and robust interface element technology able to connect independently modeled finite element subdomains is presented. This method has been developed using the penalty constraints and allows coupling of finite element models whose nodes do not coincide along their common interface. Additionally, the present formulation leads to a computational approach that is very efficient and completely compatible with existing commercial software. A significant effort has been directed toward identifying those model characteristics (element geometric properties, material properties and loads) that most strongly affect the required penalty parameter, and subsequently to developing simple “formulae” for automatically calculating the proper penalty parameter for each interface constraint. This task is especially critical in composite materials and structures, where adjacent subregions may be composed of significantly different materials or laminates. This approach has been validated by investigating a variety of two-dimensional problems, including composite laminates.
Keywords: Finite element; Interface element; Penalty method; Lagrange multiplier; Global/local analysis; Substructure

G. Gaigalas, O. Scharf, S. Fritzsche, Maple procedures for the coupling of angular momenta. VIII. Spin-angular coefficients for single-shell configurations, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 166, Issue 2, 1 March 2005, Pages 141-169, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2004.11.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465504005582)
Abstract: Matrix elements of physical operators are required when the accurate theoretical determination of atomic energy levels, orbitals and radiative transition data need to be obtained for open-shell atoms and ions. The spin-angular part for these matrix elements is typically based on standard quantities such as matrix elements of the unit tensor, the (reduced) coefficients of fractional parentage as well as a number of other reduced matrix elements concerning various products of electron creation and annihilation operators. Therefore, in order to facilitate the access to the matrix elements of one- and two-particle scalar operators, we present here an extension to the Racah program for the full set of standard quantities and the pure spin-angular coefficients in LS- and jj-couplings. A flexible notation is introduced for defining and manipulating the electron creation and the electron annihilation operators. This will allow us to solve successfully various angular momentum problems in atomic physics.
Program summary
Title of program: Racah

Catalogue number: ADUR

Program summary URL:http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/ADUR

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen's University of Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: None

Computers for which the program is designed: All computers with a valid license of the computer algebra package Maple [Maple is a registered trademark of Waterloo Maple Inc.]

Installations: University of Kassel (Germany)

Operating systems under which the program has been tested: Linux 8.1+

Program language used: Maple, Release 8 and 9

Memory required to execute with typical data: 30 MB

Number of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.:36 875

Number of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 1 104 604

Distribution format: tar.gz

Nature of the physical problem: The accurate computation of atomic properties and level structures requires a good understanding and implementation of the atomic shell model and, hence, a fast and reliable access to its standard quantities. Apart from various coefficients of fractional parentage and the reduced matrix elements of the unit tensors, these quantities include the so-called spin-angular coefficients, i.e. the spin-angular parts of the many-electron matrix elements of physical operators, taken in respect of a basis of symmetry-adapted subshell and configuration state functions.

Method of solution: The concepts of quasispin and second quantized (creation and annihilation) operators in a spherical tensorial form are used to evaluate and calculate the spin-angular coefficients of one- and two-particle physical operators [G. Gaigalas, Lithuanian J. Phys. 39 (1999) 79, http://arXiv.org/physics/0405078; G. Gaigalas, Z. Rudzikas, C. Froese Fischer, J. Phys. B: At. Mol. Phys. 30 (1997) 3747]. Moreover, the same concepts are applied to support the computation of the coefficients of fractional grandparentage, i.e. the simultaneous de-coupling of two electrons from a single-shell configuration. All these coefficients are now implemented consistently within the framework of the Racah program [S. Fritzsche, Comput. Phys. Comm. 103 (1997) 51; G. Gaigalas, S. Fritzsche, B. Fricke, Comput. Phys. Comm. 135 (2001) 219].

Restrictions on the complexity of the problem: In the present version of the Racah program, all spin-angular coefficients are restricted to the case of a single open shell. For the symmetry-adapted subshell states of such single-shell configurations, the spin-angular coefficients can be calculated for (tensorial coupled) one-particle operators of arbitrary rank as well as for scalar two-particle operators. As previously [S. Fritzsche, Comput. Phys. Comm. 103 (1997) 51; G. Gaigalas, S. Fritzsche, B. Fricke, Comput. Phys. Comm. 135 (2001) 219], the Racah program supports all atomic shells with l ⩽ 3 in LS-coupling (i.e. s-, p-, d- and f-shells) and all subshells with j ⩽ 9 / 2 in jj-coupling, respectively.

Unusual features of the program: From the very beginning, the Racah program has been designed as an interactive environment for the (symbolic) manipulation and computation of expressions from the theories of angular momentum and the atomic shell model. With the present extension of the program, we provide the user with a simple access to the coefficients of fractional grandparentage (CFGP) as well as to the spin-angular coefficients of one- and two-particle physical operators. To facilitate the specification of the tensorial form of the operators, a short but powerful notation has been introduced for the creation and annihilation operators as well as for the products of such operators as required for the development of many-body perturbation theory in a symmetry-adapted basis. All the coefficients and the matrix elements from above are equally supported for both LS- and jj-coupled operators and functions. The main procedures of the present extension are described below in Appendix B. In addition, a list of all available commands of the Racah program can be found in the file Racah-commands.ps which is distributed together with the code.

Typical running time: The program replies promptly on most requests. Even large tabulations of standard quantities and pure spin-angular coefficients for one- and two-particle scalar operators in LS- and jj-coupling can be carried out in a few (tens of) seconds.
Keywords: Angular momentum theory; Atomic shell model; Atomic structure theory; Coefficients of fractional parentage; Complex atom and spectra; Electron creation and annihilation operators; Coefficients of fractional grandparentage; Irreducible tensors; jj-coupling; LS-coupling; One- and two-particle operators; Racah algebra within three spaces (orbital, spin and quasispin space); Second quantization in a coupled tensorial form; Spin-angular integration; Subshell state; Symmetry-adapted function; Unit tensor

G Kühner, P Heimann, S Heinzel, Ch Hennig, H Kühntopf, H Kroiss, J Maier, J Reetz, M Zilker, Editor for system configuration and experiment program specification, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 71, Issues 1–4, June 2004, Pages 225-230, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2004.04.038.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S092037960400050X)
Abstract: An editor is to be developed to specify the system configuration of large and long-term physical experiments subject to permanent evolution. Based on this configuration, control programs are to be defined for long-duration experimental runs for the complete system as well as for subsystems if operated independently. The key model abstractions which have been developed for the description of such a system and serve as a basis for the data model used by the editor are presented.
Keywords: Large system; Complexity reduction; Analysis model; Abstraction; Reuse

Lara Schmitt, Stéphanie Buisine, Jonathan Chaboissier, Améziane Aoussat, Frédéric Vernier, Dynamic tabletop interfaces for increasing creativity, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 28, Issue 5, September 2012, Pages 1892-1901, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2012.05.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563212001355)
Abstract: We designed a tabletop brainwriting interface to examine the effects of time pressure and social pressure on the creative performance. After positioning this study with regard to creativity research and human activity in dynamic environments, we present our interface and experiment. Thirty-two participants collaborated (by groups of four) on the tabletop brainwriting task under four conditions of time pressure and two conditions of social pressure. The results show that time pressure increased the quantity of ideas produced and, to some extent, increased the originality of ideas. However, it also deteriorated user experience. Besides, social pressure increased quantity of ideas as well as motivation, but decreased collaboration. We discuss the implications for creativity research and Human–Computer Interaction. Anyhow, our results suggest that the Press factor, operationalized by Time- or Social-pressure, should be considered as a powerful lever to enhance the effectiveness of creative problem solving methods.
Keywords: Interactive tabletop; Creativity; Brainstorming; Time pressure; Social comparison

Simon F. Portegies Zwart, Stephen L.W. McMillan, Arjen van Elteren, F. Inti Pelupessy, Nathan de Vries, Multi-physics simulations using a hierarchical interchangeable software interface, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 184, Issue 3, March 2013, Pages 456-468, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2012.09.024.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465512003116)
Abstract: We introduce a general-purpose framework for interconnecting scientific simulation programs using a homogeneous, unified interface. Our framework is intrinsically parallel, and conveniently separates all component numerical modules in memory. This strict separation allows automatic unit conversion, distributed execution of modules on different cores within a cluster or grid, and orderly recovery from errors. The framework can be efficiently implemented and incurs an acceptable overhead. In practice, we measure the time spent in the framework to be less than 1% of the wall-clock time. Due to the unified structure of the interface, incorporating multiple modules addressing the same physics in different ways is relatively straightforward. Different modules may be advanced serially or in parallel. Despite initial concerns, we have encountered relatively few problems with this strict separation between modules, and the results of our simulations are consistent with earlier results using more traditional monolithic approaches. This framework provides a platform to combine existing simulation codes or develop new physical solver codes within a rich “ecosystem” of interchangeable modules.
Keywords: Computer applications; Physical sciences and engineering; Astronomy; Computing methodologies: simulation modeling, and visualization; Distributed computing

Mike Dobson, Information enforcement and learning with interactive graphical systems, Learning and Instruction, Volume 9, Issue 4, August 1999, Pages 365-390, ISSN 0959-4752, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0959-4752(98)00052-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0959475298000528)
Abstract: This article describes two studies which assess the benefit of using the specificity principle as a criterion for choosing between alternative graphical representations in teaching and learning. The specificity principle was interpreted as a metric called the information enforcement metric. This is simply a ratio between the total number of states a representational system can support and the number of states or referents in the material being presented. The value of the metric is tested by comparing ratios for several representational teaching systems, with the learning outcomes achieved by subjects using interactive software based on those systems. Counting the states in a representational system is complex, however it is made more simple for some systems by using an intermediate representation. Results show that while the specificity principle is able to predict learning outcomes at a course grain of analysis, that is between systems which are highly expressive and those which are far more specific, between systems of similar specificity the principle interpreted in this way is not validated. A second study shows that students' difficulties in understanding lexical conventions are more pronounced in the least specific of the systems evaluated. This casts further doubt on the value of the specificity principle as a guideline for designing interactive graphical systems for teaching and learning. Several suggestions are offered for developments of this work.
Keywords: Media selection; Graphics; Specificity logic; Reasoning; Multiple representations; Venn; Euler; Carroll

Kianoosh Ravaie, Alireza Haji-Valizadeh, Selecting human machine interface package in integrating a process automation system, ISA Transactions, Volume 41, Issue 1, January 2002, Pages 115-126, ISSN 0019-0578, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0019-0578(07)60206-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0019057807602067)
Abstract: In this paper we propose a framework for evaluating and selecting human machine interface (HMI) packages in integrating a process automation system. HMIs are among main subsystems of many integrated process automation systems. The main objective of this paper is to propose a selection process so that the integrated system could better satisfy strategic goals of the system users. In this paper we assume that strategic goals are expressed in terms of concepts like production flexibility, production reliability, product quality, operation cost, production time and the like.
Keywords: Process automation; System integration; Decision making; Analytic hierarchical process; Human machine interfaces (HMI)

Luis A. Pineda, Graphical and linguistic dialogue for intelligent multimodal systems, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 14, Issues 1–2, January–February 1998, Pages 149-157, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0957-4174(97)00056-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417497000560)
Abstract: In this paper a brief outline of the elements of a theory of multimodal representation and interpretation is presented. The theory is illustrated with the help of an interactive system called GRAFLOG which is able to support a multimodal graphical and linguistic dialogue. In this dialogue graphical symbols with their interpretation are introduced incrementally, and the system is able to assist the user in the solution of simple design problems. The theory has been used as a framework for the development of a number of master thesis and experimental systems addressing different aspects of representation and problem-solving in the context of multimodal dialogues. This line of work is also summarized. At the end of the paper the kind of dialogue that is currently being considered for the next version of the system is illustrated.

Tony Redmond, 10 - Managing Exchange: Users, In HP Technologies, Digital Press, Burlington, 2005, Pages 711-813, Tony Redmond's Microsoft Exchange Server 2003 with SP1, ISBN 9781555583309, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155558330-9/50012-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978155558330950012X)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter describes the managing of Exchange. The server needs continued care and maintenance to deliver a reliable messaging service to users and to interact with other servers in the organization. At a conceptual level, Exchange is not particularly difficult to manage. The server is reasonably straightforward and the management interface is mature and meets the majority of administrative needs. However, Exchange does not function in a vacuum, and complexity mounts through its interaction with and dependency on the operating system, third-party products, other Microsoft servers and services, and so on. In addition, complexity increases further as the number of servers grows in the organization. The chapter discusses the challenges involved in day-to-day Exchange operations, covering topics such as setting up and managing the user community and quotas.

Kevin P. Bishop, Steve Constable, Nabil F. Faruk, Pierre-Nicholas Roy, OpenMM accelerated MMTK, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 191, June 2015, Pages 203-208, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2015.01.025.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S001046551500048X)
Abstract: Abstract
In this work, we provide an interface developed to link the Molecular Modelling toolkit (MMTK) with OpenMM in order to take advantage of the fast evaluation techniques of OpenMM. This interface allows MMTK scripts using the Langevin dynamics integrator, for both classical and path integral simulations, to be executed on a variety of hardware including graphical processing units via OpenMM. The interface has been developed using Python and Cython to take advantage of the high level abstraction thanks to the MMTK and OpenMM software packages. We have tested the interface on a number of systems to observe which systems benefit most from the acceleration libraries of OpenMM.
Program summary
Program title: OpenMM accelerated MMTK

Catalogue identifier: AEVR_v1_0

Program summary URL:http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AEVR_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen’s University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: Standard CPC licence, http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/licence/licence.html

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 1141

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 101838

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: Python and Cython.

Computer: Not computer specific.

Operating system: Any.

RAM: On the order of hundreds of MBytes

Classification: 7.7.

External routines: MMTK [1], OpenMM 6.1 [2] and their dependencies

Nature of problem: The OpenMM accelerated MMTK interface provides MMTK users the full performance of OpenMM simulations while maintaining the flexibility of MMTK.

Solution method: The interface has been developed in a combination of Python and Cython to take advantage of the high level Python API’s of both OpenMM and MMTK. The interface provides OpenMM with the required information to perform simulations and MMTK stores the relevant information.

Unusual features: Provides MMTK users a performance gain with hardly any modifications to their current scripts.

Running time: Completely depends on system of interest. Running time is based on both the number of atoms in the simulation as well as the number of path integral beads used in simulation and ranges from a few seconds to months.

References:

[1] K. Hinsen, J. Comp. Chem. 21, 79, (2000).

[2] P. Eastman et al., J. Chem. Theory Comput. 9, 461 (2013).
Keywords: Path integral molecular dynamics; Graphical processing units

C. Stephanidis, R. Gogoulou, Tailoring non-visual interaction in a graphical environment, In: Yuichiro Anzai, Katsuhiko Ogawa and Hirohiko Mori, Editor(s), Advances in Human Factors/Ergonomics, Elsevier, 1995, Volume 20, Pages 39-44, ISSN 0921-2647, ISBN 9780444817952, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0921-2647(06)80192-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0921264706801929)
Abstract: The provision of alternative, non-visual interaction techniques is necessary in order to enhance non-visual interaction possibilities in a graphical environment, and fulfil the needs and preferences of blind users. This paper addresses issues related to the non-visual reproduction of a graphical environment and describes a dialogue configuration system (CONFIG) for tailoring non-visual interaction on the basis of individual blind user's needs and preferences, through ‘easy-to-use’ interactive facilities.

Hyerim Bae, Wonchang Hu, Woo Sik Yoo, Byeong Kwon Kwak, Yeongho Kim, Yong-Tae Park, Document configuration control processes captured in a workflow, Computers in Industry, Volume 53, Issue 2, February 2004, Pages 117-131, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compind.2003.07.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0166361503001829)
Abstract: This paper proposes a new method of document version management for workflow management systems (WfMSs). A WfMS is considered an essential element for automation of complex business processes involving many companies, particularly for those in an e-business environment. A core element of such business processes is the documents that flow through the processes. In fact, it can be thought that the execution of a business process is often tantamount to working out a set of formed documents. Therefore, it is very important to have a systematic management of document changes along with the process execution. We propose a version model that can take into account the structure of the underlying process over existing version management techniques. In this model, the components of a document and a process are associated with each other, and this becomes the basis for automatic creation of document versions and automatic configuration of relevant documents for a certain user at a certain stage of the process. A prototype system is implemented, and the potential advantages of the approach are discussed.
Keywords: Business process; Workflow; Version management; Electronic document management

Claus Pahl, Adaptive development and maintenance of user-centric software systems, Information and Software Technology, Volume 46, Issue 14, 1 November 2004, Pages 973-986, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.infsof.2004.04.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950584904000722)
Abstract: A software system cannot be developed without considering the various facets of its environment. Stakeholders—including the users that play a central role—have their needs, expectations, and perceptions of a system. Organisational and technical aspects of the environment are constantly changing. The ability to adapt a software system and its requirements to its environment throughout its full lifecycle is of paramount importance in a constantly changing environment. The continuous involvement of users is as important as the constant evaluation of the system and the observation of evolving environments. We present a methodology for adaptive software systems development and maintenance. We draw upon a diverse range of accepted methods including participatory design, software architecture, and evolutionary design. Our focus is on user-centred software systems.
Keywords: Adaptive development and maintenance; Requirements and software change; Participative design; Software architecture; Evolutionary design

Jason Lemay, Leila Notash, Configuration engine for architecture planning of modular parallel robots, Mechanism and Machine Theory, Volume 39, Issue 1, January 2004, Pages 101-117, ISSN 0094-114X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0094-114X(03)00107-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0094114X03001071)
Abstract: With the recent advances in research on parallel robots, the potential use of parallel manipulators has been expanding to both terrestrial and space applications including areas such as high speed manipulation, material handling, motion platforms, machine tools, medical fields, planetary exploration and so on. Therefore the need for methodologies for the systematic design of high performance parallel architecture manipulators increases. This article concentrates on the synthesis of parallel manipulators using a combination of genetic algorithm and simulated annealing optimization methods and a configuration engine capable of generating and designing different symmetric parallel manipulator architectures for a given task. Optimum parallel configurations are determined for a set of modular components, a specific task, and a set of criteria. The article also describes the application of the methodology as a design tool, and the results from a test case and a case study conducted with the program.

Susan Snedaker, Chapter 10 - Working with User, Group, and Computer Accounts, In The Best Damn Windows Server 2003 Book Period, Syngress, Burlington, 2004, Pages 375-429, ISBN 9781931836128, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183612-8/50013-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836128500131)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The chapter focuses on management of the network's users and computers. Managing user accounts is done through the properties of the object, which is accessible using Active Directory Users and Computers. Ones can access the properties of a user object by selecting the object and then clicking on Action I Properties. One can also right-click on the object and select Properties from the context menu. Upon opening the Properties of the user, one may see a number of tabs that allow setting various options and provide information dealing with the account, including general information, settings for Terminal Services, certificate information and group membership, among others. Individually, each of the tabs allows managing different settings related to the user account. However, a number of these tabs are related, in that they deal with particular aspects of user account management. By using them together, one can configure how the account can be used.

, Chapter 3 - Initial Configuration, In Nokia Network Security Solutions Handbook, edited by Doug Maxwell, and Cherie Amon, Syngress, Burlington, 2002, Pages 43-60, ISBN 9781931836708, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183670-8/50006-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836708500065)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter shows how to prepare for the initial configuration by setting up the required cabling and local network connections, and discusses initial configuration using dynamic host configuration protocol (DHCP). Automatic configuration via DHCP is a new feature in IPSO 3.5 and 3.6. Initial configuration of Nokia appliance is relatively straightforward and can be accomplished in a very short period of time. Nokia has designed its appliances in such a way that if one powers them on without an active configuration, they step through a very simple, console-based menu of options designed to get one up and running with Voyager access in a matter of minutes. From there, the Web-based Voyager interface makes it simple to continue the configuration or import a saved configuration from a previous install. Preparing for Nokia's initial configuration means selecting the proper cabling and knowing ahead of time what hostname, IP address, and administration password one uses for the device.

Wenhai Li, Shangbin Li, Lian Duan, Hanjie Chen, Liduo Wang, Guifang Dong, Zhengyuan Xu, Squarylium and rubrene based filterless narrowband photodetectors for an all-organic two-channel visible light communication system, Organic Electronics, Volume 37, October 2016, Pages 346-351, ISSN 1566-1199, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.orgel.2016.07.014.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1566119916303123)
Abstract: Abstract
In this paper, based on 1,3-bis[(3,3-dimethylindolin-2-ylidene)methyl]squaraine (ISQ), which has narrowband red-light absorption, and Rubrene, which possesses significant blue-light absorption, two color-selective organic photodetectors (OPDs) are developed. By quantum chemistry calculation, the mechanism of ISQ's sharp absorption spectrum is analyzed. Without input filtering, the two OPDs are well suited for two-channel visible light communications (VLC) system due to their good orthogonality of response spectrum and exceptional features, such as flexibility and ability to realize large-area thin-film manufacturing. With the two OPD as receivers and corresponding organic light emitting diodes (OLEDs) as data transmitters respectively, a two-channel VLC system delivering a bit-rate of 530 kb/s in the blue-light channel and 180 kb/s in the red-light channel was experimentally demonstrated. The two channels have good orthogonality when they operate together. This all-organic VLC system demonstrates the feasibility and benefit for the application of organic electronics in the communication field.
Keywords: Narrowband organic photodetector; Squarylium; Visible light communication system; Multi-user; All-organic VLC

Mario G.C.A. Cimino, Francesco Marcelloni, An efficient model-based methodology for developing device-independent mobile applications, Journal of Systems Architecture, Volume 58, Issue 8, September 2012, Pages 286-304, ISSN 1383-7621, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.sysarc.2012.06.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1383762112000550)
Abstract: Current methodologies for developing mobile applications are mostly based on the application programming interfaces (APIs) offered by the native platform. Hence, most solutions are characterized by a low portability and/or reusability. In this paper, we propose a novel methodology based on a declarative and device-independent approach for developing event-driven mobile applications. The methodology relies on: (i) an abstract mobile device based on the user interface markup language; (ii) a content adaptation mechanism based on user preferences; (iii) a context adaptation mechanism based on a standardized context of delivery; (iv) a uniform set of client-side APIs based on an interface object model; (v) an efficient transformational model.

More specifically, in the design phase, the application is modeled as platform-independent on the abstract mobile device. In the execution phase, the application is automatically tailored to the specific platform on the basis of the content and context adaptation mechanisms. We describe the analysis, design and implementation of a framework, called MODIF, which supports the proposed methodology, and show its application to the development of both business and consumer real-world applications on Apple iPhone™ and Google Android™ mobile devices. Finally, we discuss how the experience of using MODIF highlights the quality of the methodology in terms of automation of the lifecycle, expressiveness and readability of the representation, efficiency of the compilation/interpretation, fast learning curve and predictability.
Keywords: Mobile user-interface modeling; Delivery-context aware user interface; User interface markup language (UIML); Composite capabilities/preference profiles (CC/PP); Model driven architecture

Lars Været, Anton Leijnse, Fortunato Cuamba, Sylvi Haldorsen, Holocene dynamics of the salt–fresh groundwater interface under a sand island, Inhaca, Mozambique, Quaternary International, Volume 257, 20 April 2012, Pages 74-82, ISSN 1040-6182, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.quaint.2011.11.020.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1040618211006604)
Abstract: The configuration of coastal groundwater systems in southeast Africa was strongly controlled by the Holocene sea-level changes, with an Early Holocene transgression ∼15 m (10,000–5000 cal BP), and two assumed high-stand events in the Middle and Late Holocene with levels higher than the present. The fluctuation of the salt–fresh groundwater interface under Inhaca Island in Mozambique during the Holocene has been studied using an adapted version of the numerical code SUTRA (Saturated-Unsaturated Transport). In this study, small-scale variations such as tidal effects have not been considered. A number of transient simulations were run with constant boundary conditions until the steady state condition was reached in order to study the sensitivity of response time, salt–fresh interface position, and thickness of the transition zone to different parameters such as hydraulic conductivity, porosity, recharge, and dispersivity. A 50% increase in horizontal hydraulic conductivity yields a rise in the location of the interface of &gt;15 m, while an increase in recharge from 8% to 20% of mean annual precipitation (MAP) causes a downward shift in the interface position of &gt;40 m. A full transient simulation of the Holocene dynamics of the salt–fresh groundwater interface showed a response time of several hundred years, with a duration sensitive to porosity, hydraulic conductivity and recharge and a position determined by the recharge rate and the hydraulic conductivity. Dispersivity controls the thickness of the transition zone in this non-tidal model. Physical processes, such as changes in recharge and/or the sea level, may cause rapid shifts in the interface position and affect the thickness of the transition zone.

T. Delaitre, G.R. Ribeiro-Justo, F. Spies, S.C. Winter, A graphical toolset for simulation modelling of parallel systems, Parallel Computing, Volume 22, Issue 13, 28 February 1997, Pages 1823-1836, ISSN 0167-8191, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-8191(96)00079-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167819196000798)
Abstract: In this paper, a simulation model for incorporation within a performance-oriented parallel software development environment is presented. This development environment is composed of a graphical design tool, a simulation facility, and a visualisation tool. Simulation allows parallel program performance to be predicted and design alternatives to be compared. The target parallel system models a virtual machine composed of a cluster of workstations interconnected by a local area network. The simulation model architecture is modular and extensible which allows re-configuration of the platform. The model description and the validation experiments which have been conducted to assess the correctness and the accuracy of the model are also presented.
Keywords: Tools and environments; Parallel software engineering; Visual parallel programming, Parallel program modelling and simulation

Chris Tobkin and Daniel Kligerman, Chapter 12 - Advanced VPN Configurations, In Check Point NG / AI, Syngress, Burlington, 2004, Pages 515-548, ISBN 9781932266894, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193226689-4/50034-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781932266894500344)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter briefly discusses the Check Point High Availability (CPHA) and Check Point Load Sharing (CPLS) modules, as well as a few network configuration models in which Check Point allows virtual private networks (VPNs) to fail over. Even when not using or implementing a high availability (HA) solution within the network, it is a good idea to be aware of the capabilities that Check Point VPN-1/Firewall (FW)-1 offers. While most of the focus of the chapter is on the VPN aspects of HA solutions, it is important to note that HA is also a valuable solution for any mission-critical network boundary with clear text traffic as well. The chapter also gives some attention to third-party solutions for HA, such as the Virtual Router Redundancy Protocol (VRRP) and the hardware options for high availability.

Thomas W. Shinder, Debra Littlejohn Shinder and Martin Grasdal, Chapter 8 - Using the Security Configuration Tool Set, In Dr. Tom Shinder's ISA Server and Beyond, Syngress, Burlington, 2002, Pages 487-531, ISBN 9781931836661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183666-1/50012-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836661500125)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The security configuration tool set is a collection of security configuration and management programs included in Windows 2000. The primary goal of each of these components is to make it easier to manage enterprise-wide security parameters. The administrator can group the Tool Set components together into a single Microsoft management console (MMC) and manage security for the entire enterprise from a central location. This chapter introduces the functions and uses of Windows 2000 Security Configuration Tool Set. The tool set is a response to systems administrators' need for a central, easy-to-use program that allows the configuration of domain, organizational unit, and local security. It makes possible to configure and manage various security parameters from a single, centralized interface. In addition to conveniently bringing together widely disparate programs into a single interface, the Security Configuration and Analysis snap-in allows the administrator to analyze a local machine's current configuration. This analysis can be performed against security templates, so that the network manager can compare the present configuration to a proposed ideal configuration, which can, then be applied with a couple of simple clicks of the mouse.

, Chapter 5 - Security Configuration Tool Set, In Hack Proofing Windows 2000 Server, edited by Chad Todd and Norris L. Johnson, Syngress, Rockland, 2001, Pages 149-198, ISBN 9781931836494, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183649-4/50009-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836494500091)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter introduces the functions and uses of the Windows 2000 Security Configuration Tool Set. The Tool Set is a response to systems administrators' need for a central, easy-to-use program that will allow configuration of domain, organizational unit, and local security. In Windows NT 4.0, configuration of various security parameters required using multiple tools, such as User Manager, User Manager for Domains, Transmission control protocol (TCP)/ Internet protocol (IP) properties, direct registry edits, and the Remote Access Server (RAS) administrator. The Tool Set makes it possible to configure and manage these security services from a single, centralized interface. In addition to conveniently bringing together formerly widely disparate programs into a single interface, the Security Configuration and Analysis snap-in allows the administrator to analyze a local machine's current configuration. This analysis can be performed against security templates, so that the network manager can compare the present configuration to a proposed ideal configuration, which can then be applied with a couple of simple clicks of the mouse. The Tool Set allows the administrator to handle the configuration and management of the Windows 2000 security scheme.

Nur Maisurah Hassan Basri, Khairul Salleh Mohamed Sahari, Syed Sulaiman Kaja Mohideen, Mohd Zafri Baharuddin, Adzly Anuar, RS-485 Interface for Boiler Header Inspection Robot Prototype, Procedia Engineering, Volume 41, 2012, Pages 1490-1496, ISSN 1877-7058, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.proeng.2012.07.340.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1877705812027403)
Abstract: This paper discusses the design of an RS-485 interface for Boiler Header Inspection Robot (BHIR) prototype. BHIR is a robot developed for inspection of boiler headers in thermal power plants which are enclosed pipes and can range from 3 to 20 meters in length. They are horizontal in configuration and have boiler tubes inlets and outlets. The current prototype is tether based and requires cables up to 20 meters. RS-485 interface is presented in this paper which is used to develop a communication link between PC-based control (GUI interface) with the BHIR Prototype on-board controller. Since RS-485 is reliable and stable in monitoring and controlling system, BHIR Prototype can work effectively throughout the length of the boiler header.
Keywords: RS-485; mobile robot ;boiler header inspection

Marcus Brunner, Alberto Gonzalez, Paloma Martinez, From dynamic IP transport service ordering to DiffServ network configuration, Computer Networks, Volume 43, Issue 1, 16 September 2003, Pages 25-41, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1389-1286(03)00251-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128603002512)
Abstract: The Internet Engineering Task Force (IETF) proposes the Differentiated Services (DiffServ) architecture [IETF Request for Comments 2475, 1998] as a basic mechanism for providing QoS in the Internet. However, this is not enough. For a complete QoS solution, network and service management for DiffServ networks needs to be defined. In this paper, we describe the design, implementation, and evaluation of a QoS management system. The system allows a customer to dynamically order a guaranteed IP transport service from an Internet Service Provider over a Web-interface. The system then performs all the mappings and resource allocation steps needed. Finally, it configures IP DiffServ routers such that they provide the requested service. All levels and steps in the process are under policy-control, which allows for very flexible operation of the system. The system has been tested on a small lab internal test network. Finally, lessons learnt during the implementation and tests together with issues and problem with our approach on QoS management are described.
Keywords: Quality of service (QoS); Service management; Service level agreement (SLA); Service level specification (SLS); Differentiated services (DiffServ)

Viswanathan Swaminathan, Jeremy L. Gilbert, Fretting corrosion of CoCrMo and Ti6Al4V interfaces, Biomaterials, Volume 33, Issue 22, August 2012, Pages 5487-5503, ISSN 0142-9612, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.biomaterials.2012.04.015.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0142961212004127)
Abstract: Mechanically assisted corrosion (fretting corrosion, tribocorrosion etc.,) of metallic biomaterials is a primary concern for numerous implant applications, particularly in the performance of highly-loaded medical devices. While the basic underlying concepts of fretting corrosion or tribocorrosion and fretting crevice corrosion are well known, there remains a need to develop an integrated systematic method for the analysis of fretting corrosion involving metal-on-metal contacts. Such a method can provide detailed and quantitative information on the processes present and explore variations in surfaces, alloys, voltages, loadings, motion and solution conditions. This study reports on development of a fretting corrosion test system and presents elements of an in-depth theoretical fretting corrosion model that incorporates both the mechanical and the electrochemical aspects of fretting corrosion. To demonstrate the capabilities of the new system and validate the proposed model, experiments were performed to understand the effect of applied normal load on fretting corrosion performance of Ti6Al4V/Ti6Al4V, CoCrMo/Ti6Al4V, and CoCrMo/CoCrMo material couples under potentiostatic conditions with a fixed starting surface roughness. The results of this study show that fretting corrosion is affected by material couples, normal load and the motion conditions at the interface. In particular, fretting currents and coefficient of friction (COF) vary with load and are higher for Ti6Al4V/Ti6Al4V couple reaching 3 mA/cm2 and 0.63 at about 73 MPa nominal contact stress, respectively. Ti6Al4V coupled with CoCrMo displayed lower currents (0.6 mA/cm2) and COF (0.3), and the fretting corrosion behavior was comparable to CoCrMo/CoCrMo couple (1.2 mA/cm2 and 0.3, respectively). Information on the mechanical energy dissipated at the interface, the sticking behavior, and the load dependence of the inter-asperity distance calculated using the model elucidated the influence of mechanical factors on the experimental results. It was observed that the lowest amount of work was required to generate some of the highest fretting corrosion currents in Ti6Al4V/Ti6Al4V couples compared to the other combinations. The elements of the model presented here provide an excellent basis to explain many of the observed behaviors of these interfaces.
Keywords: Tribocorrosion; Metallic biomaterials; Metal-on-metal; Friction; Fretting corrosion model; Modularity

Trent Jaeger, Paul C. van Oorschot, Glenn Wurster, Countering unauthorized code execution on commodity kernels: A survey of common interfaces allowing kernel code modification, Computers & Security, Volume 30, Issue 8, November 2011, Pages 571-579, ISSN 0167-4048, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cose.2011.09.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167404811001143)
Abstract: Motivated by the goal of hardening operating system kernels against rootkits and related malware, we survey the common interfaces and methods which can be used to modify (either legitimately or maliciously) the kernel which is run on a commodity desktop computer. We also survey how these interfaces can be restricted or disabled. While we concentrate mainly on Linux, many of the methods for modifying kernel code also exist on other operating systems, some of which are discussed.
Keywords: Kernel; Rootkit; Swap; Kernel modules; Memory; Kernel protection; Survey

JAMES AHRENS, BERK GEVECI and CHARLES LAW, 36 - ParaView: An End-User Tool for Large-Data Visualization, In Visualization Handbook, Butterworth-Heinemann, Burlington, 2005, Pages 717-731, ISBN 9780123875822, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-012387582-2/50038-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123875822500381)

, Chapter 1 - Managing users, computers, and groups, In MCSA/MCSE (Exam 70-292) Study Guide, edited by Will Schmied, and Robert J. Shimonski, Syngress, Rockland, 2003, Pages 1-71, ISBN 9781932266566, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193226656-6/50007-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781932266566500078)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
In Windows, as with most operating systems, groups are used to simplify the administrative process of assigning permissions and rights to a large number of user and computer accounts at the same time, resulting in these groups' members having inherited (or implicit) permissions from the group. Windows Server 2003 provides network administrators with intuitive and easy-to-use tools that can be used to accomplish the task of managing groups and accounts within a graphical user interface. Windows Server 2003 also has the ability to perform these tasks from the command line using interactive commands or pre-written scripts and batch files. This chapter works extensively with users and groups and presents the information required for the “managing users, computers, and groups” objective of the 70-292 exam. The chapter also examines some common user authentication issues. A set of default groups known as local groups is created during the installation of Windows Server 2003. Computers that are part of an active directory domain environment also have a set of default groups. However, these default groups are objects that reside within the active directory database structure.

Deborah Littlejohn Shinder, Thomas W. Shinder, Laura E. Hunter and Will Schmied, Chapter 4 - MCSA/MCSE 70-290: Managing User, Group, and Computer Accounts, In MCSA/MCSE (Exam 70-290) Study Guide, Syngress, Rockland, 2003, Pages 255-407, ISBN 9781932266603, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193226660-3/50010-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781932266603500109)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
Windows Server 2003 Active Directory domain represents security object, users, groups, and computers as account objects that exist within the directory hierarchy and can be created, modified, moved, and removed. Managing these security objects is an important part of the network administrator's job. Microsoft includes many administrative tools, both graphical and command-line, with which these accounts can be manipulated and managed. This chapter explores how Windows Server 2003 treats users, groups, and computers in the Active Directory environment. It examines the process of using the common management tools, including Active Directory Users and Computers (ADUC) and other useful utilities. The chapter also explores how to create and modify user, group, and computer accounts with ADUC. It is noted that the groups are special objects that contain users. Security groups are essentially used to simplify management of multiple user accounts by applying permissions, user rights to an entire group of users in a single operation instead of having to apply them to individual user accounts.

Lorenz Schäfers, Christian Scheidler, Ottmar Krämer-Fuhrmann, Trapper: A graphical programming environment for parallel systems, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 11, Issues 4–5, August 1995, Pages 351-361, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-739X(95)00007-F.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0167739X9500007F)
Abstract: We present a graphical programming environment for parallel systems called TRAPPER™. TRAPPER supports the development of industrial applications which require high computing power. The programming environment is based on the programming model of communicating sequential processes. TRAPPER contains tools for the design, mapping, visualization and optimization of parallel systems. The Designtool supports a hybrid program development, where the parallel process structure is described using a graphical representation and the sequential behavior is described using textual representations. The configuration of the target hardware and the mapping of the application onto the configured hardware is supported by the Configtool. During run-time, the monitoring system records software events like interprocess communication and measures the computation and communication loads of the underlying hardware. The run-time behavior of the software is animated by the Vistool, the load behavior of the hardware is displayed by the Perftool. The first target systems are transputer-based systems as well as workstation clusters and parallel supercomputers with the standard interfaces PVM, PARMACS or MPI.
Keywords: Programming environments; Transputer; Cluster computing; Industrial applications; Monitoring; Performance optimization

Shaw C. Feng, Manufacturing planning and execution software interfaces, Journal of Manufacturing Systems, Volume 19, Issue 1, 2000, Pages 1-17, ISSN 0278-6125, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0278-6125(00)88886-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S027861250088886X)
Abstract: Process planning and manufacturing execution systems provide two major functions in a product development cycle. Industries require the systems that support these two functions to be able to integrate with other related manufacturing systems, such as design, resource planning, production scheduling, and equipment control. However, there are information barriers to the integration of commercial systems in these areas. This paper presents an activity model for manufacturing execution and a set of foundation interfaces, identified in an object model, that have been developed to cope with the problem. The interfaces are intended to be a base from which they evolve as the new technology and industrial practices emerge.
Keywords: Interface Specification; Manufacturing Activity Models; Manufacturing Execution; Manufacturing Systems Integration; Object Modeling; Process Planning

Xevi Biarnés, Fabio Pietrucci, Fabrizio Marinelli, Alessandro Laio, METAGUI. A VMD interface for analyzing metadynamics and molecular dynamics simulations, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 183, Issue 1, January 2012, Pages 203-211, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2011.08.020.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465511003079)
Abstract: We present a new computational tool, METAGUI, which extends the VMD program with a graphical user interface that allows constructing a thermodynamic and kinetic model of a given process simulated by large-scale molecular dynamics. The tool is specially designed for analyzing metadynamics based simulations. The huge amount of diverse structures generated during such a simulation is partitioned into a set of microstates (i.e. structures with similar values of the collective variables). Their relative free energies are then computed by a weighted-histogram procedure and the most relevant free energy wells are identified by diagonalization of the rate matrix followed by a commitor analysis. All this procedure leads to a convenient representation of the metastable states and long-time kinetics of the system which can be compared with experimental data. The tool allows to seamlessly switch between a collective variables space representation of microstates and their atomic structure representation, which greatly facilitates the set-up and analysis of molecular dynamics simulations. METAGUI is based on the output format of the PLUMED plugin, making it compatible with a number of different molecular dynamics packages like AMBER, NAMD, GROMACS and several others. The METAGUI source files can be downloaded from the PLUMED web site (http://www.plumed-code.org).
Program summary
Program title: METAGUI

Catalogue identifier: AEKH_v1_0

Program summary URL: http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AEKH_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queenʼs University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: GNU General Public License version 3

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 117 545

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 8 516 203

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: TK/TCL, Fortran

Computer: Any computer with a VMD installation and capable of running an executable produced by a gfortran compiler

Operating system: Linux, Unix OS-es

RAM: 1 073 741 824 bytes

Classification: 23

External routines: A VMD installation (http://www.ks.uiuc.edu/Research/vmd/)

Nature of problem: Extract thermodynamic data and build a kinetic model of a given process simulated by metadynamics or molecular dynamics simulations, and provide this information on a dual representation that allows navigating and exploring the molecular structures corresponding to each point along the multi-dimensional free energy hypersurface.

Solution method: Graphical-user interface linked to VMD that1.
clusterizes the simulation trajectories in the space of a set of collective variables and assigns each frame to a given microstate,
2.
determines the free energy of each microstate by a weighted histogram analysis method, and
3.
identifies the most relevant free energy wells (kinetic basins) by diagonalization of the rate matrix followed by a commitor analysis.


Restrictions: Input format files compatible with PLUMED and all the MD engines supported by PLUMED and VMD.

Running time: A few minutes.
Keywords: Metadynamics; Bias exchange; VMD; PLUMED; Molecular dynamics simulation; Thermodynamics; Kinetics

Jean-Pierre Poindessault, Christophe Beauquin, Frédéric Gaillard, Stimulation, data acquisition, spikes detection and time/rate analysis with a graphical programming system: an application to vision studies, Journal of Neuroscience Methods, Volume 59, Issue 2, July 1995, Pages 225-235, ISSN 0165-0270, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0165-0270(94)00208-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016502709400208X)
Abstract: A Macintosh-based system performs stimulus control and data acquisition, and an off-line analysis, in experiments on visually driven neurons in frog. The stimulus is a target moved on a modified XY recorder. The computer is cquipped with a multifunction input/output board to perform stimulus control and data acquisition. The graphical programming system LabVIEW 2 was used to develop the ‘Vision 93’ package made of 4 main ‘virtual instruments’ (VIs). By means of docs - Exp, the user controls the experiment via screen displays which look like front panels of electronic instruments. docs - preprot performs a user-controlled spike detection and computes mean impulse rate values. docs - sas displays the instantaneous frequency, mean impulse rate, spike counts or interspike time intervals as staircase histograms and/or spline smoothed curves. Finally, docs - x - functions computes and graphs quantitative stimulus/response relationships in terms of velocity, diameter, orientation and configuration of the target. The functionalities of these main VIs are presented and original software components are detailed. System operation is illustrated by using the successive VIs to process a sample signal record.
Keywords: Macintosh; LabVIEW; Data acquisition; Spike detection; Interspike interval distribution; Post-stimulus time histogram; Vision; (Frog)

Maria De Marsico, Stefano Levialdi, Evaluating web sites: exploiting user's expectations, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 60, Issue 3, March 2004, Pages 381-416, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2003.10.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581903001861)
Abstract: A new goal-based approach to measure usability of web sites is presented, strongly taking into account the customers’ expectations, which are often hardly foreseeable as a whole. After a general discussion on web site design issues, we present a short survey of evaluation methods currently used for web sites. We next introduce a new taxonomy of site categories in a three-dimensional space, derived from Aristotle's rhetorical triangle, including different aspects of the site designer's goals. In our approach, we use this taxonomy to identify a number of sites belonging to the same category, in order to carry out a comparative analysis of their features. This analysis is the basis for a two-shot generation of a form for the evaluation of that category of sites. In the first shot, the users fill a generic evaluation form, acquainting them with sites characteristics. They are next asked to perform specific tasks of their choice, according to what they expect from a site of the given category. They note their impressions and list those features they found useful; the analysis of their comments is exploited to formulate statements specific to the given category, to be added to the initial form (second shot). We found that the responses to the second, expanded form, provide more comprehensive criteria for site evaluation, and turn helpful to precisely locate flaws in site functionalities. After testing, our methodology has proved very promising and may be applied for the evaluation of any other site category, most of all those providing a set of special services.

N.S. Scott, A. McMinn, P.G. Burke, V.M. Burke, C.J. Noble, Graphical R-matrix atomic collision environment (GRACE): the problem specification stage, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 78, Issues 1–2, December 1993, Pages 67-76, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0010-4655(93)90143-Z.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/001046559390143Z)
Abstract: In this paper we introduce the concept of a graphical R-matrix atomic collision environment (GRACE). GRACE couples the graphical capability of powerful workstations with the processing power of supercomputers to provide an environment for the study of atomic collision properties and processes. At the core of GRACE is a new generation R-matrix program package, which is used to compute properties characterising electron atom and electron ion collisions. One of the motivations behind the project is to render this package simple to use by novice and experienced users alike, thereby significantly improving its usefulness to the physics community.

GRACE is composed of a problem specification stage, a computation stage, and an interpretation stage. The focus of this paper is a description of the X Window graphical user interface which constitutes the problem specification stage of GRACE.

Peng Zhang, CHAPTER 13 - Human–machine interfaces, In Advanced Industrial Control Technology, William Andrew Publishing, Oxford, 2010, Pages 527-555, ISBN 9781437778076, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-4377-7807-6.10013-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781437778076100130)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
In any industrial control system, the human–machine interface can be used to deliver information from machine to people, allowing them to control, monitor, record, and diagnose the machine system through devices such as image, keyboard, mouse, screen, video, radio, software, etc. Although many techniques and methods are used in industry, the human–machine interface always accomplishes two fundamental tasks: communicating information from the machine to the user, and communicating information from the user to the machine. Two types of user interface are currently the most common. Graphical user interfaces (GUI) accept input via input devices and provide an articulated graphical display on the output devices. Web user interfaces (WUI) accept input and provide output by generating web pages which are transmitted via the Internet and viewed by the user via a web browser. These types of user interfaces have become essential components in modern industrial systems, for example, human–robot communication interfaces, SCADA human–machine interfaces, road vehicle driver screens, aircraft and aerospace shuttle control panels, and medical instrument monitors.

Gordon Lowry, Modelling user acceptance of building management systems, Automation in Construction, Volume 11, Issue 6, October 2002, Pages 695-705, ISSN 0926-5805, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0926-5805(02)00010-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0926580502000109)
Abstract: This study examines user acceptance of building management systems (BMS) using a questionnaire survey. These systems are crucial for optimising building performance and yet it has been widely reported that users are not making full use of their systems' facilities. Established models of technology acceptance have been employed in this research, and the positive influence of user perceptions of ease of use and compatibility has been demonstrated. Previous research has indicated differing levels of importance of perceived ease of use relative to other factors. Here, perceived ease of use is shown generally to be more important, though the balance between this and compatibility is moderated by the user perceptions of voluntariness.
Keywords: Building management systems; Technology acceptance model; Innovation characteristics; Information systems

Marieke A Eleveld, Wolfram B.H Schrimpf, Ardy G Siegert, User requirements and information definition for a virtual coastal and marine data warehouse, Ocean & Coastal Management, Volume 46, Issues 6–7, 2003, Pages 487-505, ISSN 0964-5691, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0964-5691(03)00031-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0964569103000310)
Abstract: The European Commission supports the development of a European Virtual Coastal and Marine Data Warehouse called CoastBase that aims to improve data and information search and exchange. This paper discusses a study of user requirements and defines relevant and obtainable data and information within the CoastBase project. Thematic as well as technical considerations were taken into account in the study. CoastBase aims to satisfy a variety of users. Potential users interested in data and information on various aggregation levels are represented within the CoastBase consortium. They described their requirements, initially unguided but later guided by a few broad questions about their present work and about the potential role of CoastBase in facilitating it. The results were grouped and summarised. Institutional user groups were formed based on the focus of the organisations on European, regional, national, and local issues, respectively. Individual users were grouped according to their function as Decision &amp; policy maker, Policy advisor &amp; project manager, Researcher, or Database administrator &amp; programmer, respectively. The study has shown that the individual user groups in particular differed in their preferences for aggregation level of the data and information to be extracted from CoastBase. Implications, in the form of envisioned dissimilar use of the CoastBase system are discussed. Both institutional and individual users had different preferences for topic and geographical area to be covered in the CoastBase prototype. However, the study provided a useful synthesis for discussion in plenary, and led to identification of two thematic scenarios for development of the prototype, which are Eutrophication in the North Sea, and Planning in the North Sea and Mediterranean coastal zone. In addition, a comprehensive list of requirements and recommendations for the technical development and evaluation of the system had been compiled from the user requirements. This list, which was approved by the consortium, is included in the paper.

L Lamel, S Bennacef, J.L Gauvain, H Dartigues, J.N Temem, User evaluation of the Mask kiosk, Speech Communication, Volume 38, Issues 1–2, September 2002, Pages 131-139, ISSN 0167-6393, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-6393(01)00048-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167639301000486)
Abstract: In this paper we report on a series of user trials carried out to assess the performance and usability of the Multimodal Multimedia Service Kiosk (Mask) prototype. The aim of the Esprit Mask project was to pave the way for advanced public service applications with user interfaces employing multimodal, multimedia input and output. The prototype kiosk was developed after analyzing the technological requirements in the context of users performing travel enquiry tasks, in close collaboration with the French Railways (SNCF) and the Ergonomics group at the University College of London (UCL). The time to complete the transaction with the Mask kiosk is reduced by about 30% compared to that required for the standard kiosk, and the transaction success rate is 85% for novices and 94% once familiar with the system. In addition to meeting or exceeding the performance goals set at the project onset in terms of success rate, transaction time, and user satisfaction, the Mask kiosk was judged to be user-friendly and simple to use.
Keywords: Spoken language systems; Speech recognition; Speech understanding; Natural language understanding; Information retrieval dialog

Marianna Tracey, Moshe Dror, Interactive graphical computer application for large-scale cattle feed distribution management, Decision Support Systems, Volume 19, Issue 1, January 1997, Pages 61-72, ISSN 0167-9236, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-9236(96)00046-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167923696000462)
Abstract: In this paper we describe the development of a visual computer-based interactive management tool for feed distribution at a cattle ranch. In Operations Research terminology, the underlying problem is that of a split-delivery capacitated rural postman problem with time windows on arc. In terms of decision support, the scope of the paper is the description of a computer-based tool used to graphically present the feed distribution solution, and to facilitate the management of cattle feed related input and update operations. This system was site tested in a real cattle feed environment and received very high praise from the cattle professionals.
Keywords: Decision support system; Arc routing; Cattle feed distribution

J. Kaminsky, B. Kischnik, G. Graubner, A. Newe, J. Lotz, S. Hussein, H. Becker, M. Samii, Universal interface for exchange of medical images via magneto-optical discs, Computerized Medical Imaging and Graphics, Volume 24, Issue 2, April 2000, Pages 99-104, ISSN 0895-6111, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0895-6111(00)00003-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0895611100000033)
Abstract: Digital images are the ever-growing basis of modern medical imaging and treatment. Despite the advent of the DICOM 3.0 standard for medical image communication it still requires cumbersome efforts to export images from imaging modalities to other computer systems. This is true especially for smaller institutions, which often have limited resources for standardized image transfer. To gain access even to these data we developed an exchange interface on the basis of magneto-optical discs (MO-discs), as they are usually available in most of the imaging modalities in use today. Unfortunately images on MO-discs are usually stored in formats specific for each manufacturer. Therefore special routines to access the data on MO-discs had to be developed for each company or even each scanner. Over 10,000 CT and MRI images including their header information from different General Electric and Siemens scanners were extracted successfully from MO-discs. The interface proved to be reliable and easy to handle by technicians. Support of additional manufacturers and of the DICOM 3.0 standard are work in progress.
Keywords: Digital images; Magneto-Optical-discs; Removable media; DICOM; PACS; Interface

Wayne V. Citrin, Mark D. Gross, PDA-based graphical interchange for field service and repair workers, Computers & Graphics, Volume 20, Issue 5, September–October 1996, Pages 641-649, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0097-8493(96)00038-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849396000386)
Abstract: We present an ongoing project to develop a system to provide field service workers with timely and accurate service information. The system will allow workers to download diagrams or photographs from a host computer's central database onto a PDA. The workers will be able to annotate the diagrams to reflect work performed, and later upload the annotations to the host computer, where they will be integrated into an updated database. Diagram recognition functionality is distributed between the PDA (which performs low-level shape and handwriting recognition) and the host computer (which performs high-level domain-based diagram recognition). Distributing the functionality offers a number of advantages: it allows the relatively resource-poor PDA to be part of a powerful diagram recognition environment, it allows the use of standardized hardware-based recognition facilities in a domain-based recognition system, and it allows off-line drawing recognition and storage of diagrams, thereby avoiding excessive use of slow or expensive communications channels.

Dario Bonino, Emiliano Castellina, Fulvio Corno, Luigi De Russis, DOGeye: Controlling your home with eye interaction, Interacting with Computers, Volume 23, Issue 5, September 2011, Pages 484-498, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2011.06.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543811000701)
Abstract: Nowadays home automation, with its increased availability, reliability and with its ever reducing costs is gaining momentum and is starting to become a viable solution for enabling people with disabilities to autonomously interact with their homes and to better communicate with other people. However, especially for people with severe mobility impairments, there is still a lack of tools and interfaces for effective control and interaction with home automation systems, and general–purpose solutions are seldom applicable due to the complexity, asynchronicity, time dependent behavior, and safety concerns typical of the home environment. This paper focuses on user–environment interfaces based on the eye tracking technology, which often is the only viable interaction modality for users as such. We propose an eye-based interface tackling the specific requirements of smart environments, already outlined in a public Recommendation issued by the COGAIN European Network of Excellence. The proposed interface has been implemented as a software prototype based on the ETU universal driver, thus being potentially able to run on a variety of eye trackers, and it is compatible with a wide set of smart home technologies, handled by the Domotic OSGi Gateway. A first interface evaluation, with user testing sessions, has been carried and results show that the interface is quite effective and usable without discomfort by people with almost regular eye movement control.
Keywords: Human–home interaction; Smart homes; Domotics; Usability; User interface; User study

Yan Chen, Xiaoming Zhang, Zhoujun Li, Jun-Ping Ng, Search engine reinforced semi-supervised classification and graph-based summarization of microblogs, Neurocomputing, Volume 152, 25 March 2015, Pages 274-286, ISSN 0925-2312, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.neucom.2014.10.068.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0925231214014647)
Abstract: Abstract
There is an abundance of information found on microblog services due to their popularity. However the potential of this trove of information is limited by the lack of effective means for users to browse and interpret the numerous messages found on these services. We tackle this problem using a two-step process, first by slicing up the search results of current retrieval systems along multiple possible genres. Then, a summary is generated from the microblog messages attributed to each genre. We believe that this helps users to better understand the possible interpretations of the retrieved results and aid them in finding the information that they need. Our novel approach makes use of automatically acquired information from external search engines in each of these two steps. We first integrate this information with a semi-supervised probabilistic graphical model, and show that this helps us to achieve significantly better classification performance without the need for much training data. Next we incorporate the extra information into graph-based summarization, and demonstrate that superior summaries (up to 30% improvement in ROUGE-1) are obtained.
Keywords: Microblog; Topic classification; Summarization; Probabilistic graphical model; Semi-supervised; Pagerank

Jose M. Carmena, Leonardo G. Cohen, Chapter 27 - Brain–machine interfaces and transcranial stimulation: future implications for directing functional movement and improving function after spinal injury in humans, In: Joost Verhaagen and John W. McDonald, Editor(s), Handbook of Clinical Neurology, Elsevier, 2012, Volume 109, Pages 435-444, ISSN 0072-9752, ISBN 9780444521378, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-52137-8.00027-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444521378000279)
Abstract: Abstract
Since its origins, the primary goal of transforming thought into action and sensation into perception has been to improve the quality of life for the physically impaired. Brain–machine interfaces (BMI) aim to improve the quality of life for large numbers of neurological patients. In particular, this novel technology is meant to play a major role in the near future as a serious contribution to spinal cord rehabilitation. During the last decade we have witnessed a dramatic increase in BMI research with impressive demonstrations of rodents, nonhuman primates, and humans controlling robots, wheelchairs, and graphical cursors in real time through signals collected from the brain. In this chapter we first review the different techniques used in the field of BMI, including electroencephalography (EEG), electrocorticography (ECoG), magnetoencephalography (MEG), and chronic multielectrode recordings. In addition we review the use of transcranial magnetic stimulation (TMS) for noninvasive modulation of excitability in relatively focal cortical areas. The chapter concludes with a discussion on the future implications of BMIs for directing functional movement and improving function after spinal injury in humans.

Limin Li, Alice M. Wyrwicz, Design of an MR image processing module on an FPGA chip, Journal of Magnetic Resonance, Volume 255, June 2015, Pages 51-58, ISSN 1090-7807, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jmr.2015.03.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1090780715000695)
Abstract: Abstract
We describe the design and implementation of an image processing module on a single-chip Field-Programmable Gate Array (FPGA) for real-time image processing. We also demonstrate that through graphical coding the design work can be greatly simplified. The processing module is based on a 2D FFT core. Our design is distinguished from previously reported designs in two respects. No off-chip hardware resources are required, which increases portability of the core. Direct matrix transposition usually required for execution of 2D FFT is completely avoided using our newly-designed address generation unit, which saves considerable on-chip block RAMs and clock cycles. The image processing module was tested by reconstructing multi-slice MR images from both phantom and animal data. The tests on static data show that the processing module is capable of reconstructing 128 × 128 images at speed of 400 frames/second. The tests on simulated real-time streaming data demonstrate that the module works properly under the timing conditions necessary for MRI experiments.
Keywords: FPGA; Real time; Image processing; 2D FFT; Graphical coding

A. Kröger, Data flow oriented control law design with the graphical language HOSTESS, Microprocessors and Microsystems, Volume 19, Issue 10, December 1995, Pages 565-574, ISSN 0141-9331, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0141-9331(96)84157-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0141933196841573)
Abstract: HOSTESS is a workstation based specification and design tool for control laws in cyclic systems with fixed scheduling. The tool has been successfully applied to electronic flight control (fly by wire) and minor critical systems as centre of gravity control or a variety of development simulator modules. HOSTESS is a graphical data flow language with a restricted set of basic modules, simple control structures and extensive consistency checking avoiding coding errors, dead code or initialization problems. A special version with a reduced set of functions is compatible with tools used by suppliers or project partners.

M Schaible, The development of a comprehensive computer program for the study of solid–solid atomic interfaces, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 31, Issue 4, April 2000, Pages 287-294, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0965-9978(99)00027-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997899000277)
Abstract: This paper describes the construction of a comprehensive computer program to model the structure of the silicon–silicon dioxide (Si–SiO2) boundary layer of semiconductor devices by combining experimental data from an X-ray storage ring with graphical simulations on a multiprocessor distributed net (or a multiprocessor supercomputer). The term ‘comprehensive’ refers to the program's planned ability to incorporate all stages necessary to translate 2D X-ray spectra to the final 3D atomic image with little or no human intervention. If successful, our efforts will provide materials scientists, engineers, and manufacturers of integrated circuits with an additional tool for understanding interfacial chemistry and thereby suggest new ways to improve the chemical and electronic behavior of their devices.
Keywords: Atomic-interface; Chemical vapor deposition; Parallel virtual machine; Simulation

Deborah Littlejohn Shinder, Thomas W. Shinder, Chad Todd and Laura Hunter, Chapter 3 - MCSA/MCSE 70-291: The Dynamic Host Configuration Protocol, In MCSA/MCSE (Exam 70-291) Study Guide, Syngress, Rockland, 2003, Pages 161-277, ISBN 9781931836920, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183692-0/50009-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836920500093)

Deborah Littlejohn Shinder, Thomas W. Shinder, Chad Todd and Laura Hunter, Chapter 2 - MCSA/MCSE 70-291: Variable Length Subnet Masking and Client Configuration, In MCSA/MCSE (Exam 70-291) Study Guide, Syngress, Rockland, 2003, Pages 97-159, ISBN 9781931836920, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183692-0/50008-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836920500081)

Felipe Estrada-Solano, Armando Ordonez, Lisandro Zambenedetti Granville, Oscar Mauricio Caicedo Rendon, A framework for SDN integrated management based on a CIM model and a vertical management plane, Computer Communications, Available online 16 August 2016, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comcom.2016.08.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366416302924)
Abstract: Abstract
The Software-Defined Networking (SDN) paradigm establishes a typical three-plane architecture (i.e., Data, Control, and Application planes) that facilitates the deployment of network functions and simplifies traditional network management tasks. However, SDN lacks an integrated or standardized framework for managing its architecture. Some investigations have addressed such shortage by proposing different solutions that tackle specific management requirements for particular SDN technology instances. This isolated approach forces network administrators to use multiple frameworks to achieve a complete SDN management that is complex and time-consuming in heterogeneous environments. In this paper, we introduce an information model based on the common information model that establishes a technology-agnostic and consistent characterization of the SDN architecture. Such information model represents the core towards building a Management Plane aimed to facilitate the integrated SDN management in heterogeneous environments. To test our information model, we developed a prototype and conducted a performance evaluation in an SDN configuration scenario that deploys different managing technologies. The obtained results provide directions that corroborate the feasibility of our approach (in terms of time-response and network traffic) for configuring heterogeneous SDNs.
Keywords: Common information model; Software-defined networking; Heterogeneous environments; Resource characterization; Configuration management

Paul F. Schikora, Michael R. Godfrey, Efficacy of end-user neural network and data mining software for predicting complex system performance, International Journal of Production Economics, Volume 84, Issue 3, 11 June 2003, Pages 231-253, ISSN 0925-5273, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0925-5273(03)00003-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0925527303000033)
Abstract: The performance of a university's dial-up modem pool under various time limit policies and customer behavior patterns was studied. Because the system is very complex, simulation offered the only method to obtain a limited set of steady-state performance measure estimates. A more generalized predictive model must be built from the simulated output. Traditional methods available to practitioners for predicting system performance across a range of environmental and decision variables have typically been limited to linear regression models. However, when the system being studied is highly complex and its performance is nonlinear in nature, the effectiveness of linear models can be limited. While more advanced nonlinear methods, such as neural networks, have been shown to perform better than traditional regression analysis in these situations, the knowledge needed to implement them “from scratch” is beyond most practitioners. Fortunately, these advanced methods are now available in ready-to-use desktop software programs, making them more attainable for practitioner use. The efficacy of these end-user programs compared to more traditional methods in practice is of interest.

Multiple variable linear regression models were developed for predicting six output measures in a simulation study and were compared to nonlinear regression models developed using a data mining software package (PolyAnalyst 4.3 Evaluation Software from Megaputer Intelligence) and two commercial neural network software packages (Statistica Neural Networks from Statsoft, and Predict from NeuralWorks). Comparisons of the models’ predictive ability were made on both the data used to design the models and on a test set of data. Statistical analysis shows that predictive performance on the test data was usually best with one of the neural network models, but relative performance of the different models varied widely.
Keywords: Neural networks; Data mining; Regression analysis; Dial-up modem pools

David Maley, Ivor Spence, Peter Kilpatrick, Config: A GRACE tool for constructing configuration trees, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 114, Issues 1–3, November 1998, Pages 271-294, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0010-4655(98)00092-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465598000927)
Abstract: This paper details Config, a graphical tool to assist in determining which configurations contribute to a particular CI expansion. It shows the resultant symmetries and electron distributions, and provides a means of viewing which symmetries result from which electron configurations, and vice versa. This data can be exported to a file in a form acceptable to other programs in the GRACE suite. In the past the consistency of such data presented to GRACE has relied on the ability of the user accurately to follow through the simple but lengthy coupling calculations. Config now provides this service, and makes it available through a simple graphical interface. Config is written for UNIX workstations using C++, and utilises the MOTIF toolkit to provide graphics primitives for the interface. A precise specification of the functionality of the configuration generation software has been written in VDM-SL.
PACS: 34.5; 34.8; 89.8; GRACE; OSF/Motif; R-matrix; Object-orientation

Fiach Reid, 9 - Controlling User Access: Authentication and Authorization, In Network programming in .NET, Digital Press, Burlington, 2004, Pages 227-249, ISBN 9781555583156, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155558315-6/50010-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781555583156500104)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter provides an overview of the mechanisms for guaranteeing the identity of network clients over the Web and on Microsoft networks. The structure and use of digital certificates in a distributed environment are discussed. The topic is extended to real-world scenarios, looking at how banks use authentication to transfer billions of dollars safely across phone lines. Sample code is provided to demonstrate how to process a credit card payment securely over secure sockets layer connection, one of the most common security mechanisms for data delivered via Websites. Authentication systems must be able to validate supplied credentials securely against trusted sources and also to ensure that the message has not been tampered with in transit. This type of facility is commonplace in most e-commerce solutions, point-of-sale systems, and many other software products.

G. Chiola, G. Franceschinis, R. Gaeta, M. Ribaudo, GreatSPN 1.7: Graphical editor and analyzer for timed and stochastic Petri nets, Performance Evaluation, Volume 24, Issues 1–2, November 1995, Pages 47-68, ISSN 0166-5316, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0166-5316(95)00008-L.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016653169500008L)
Abstract: This paper describes the GreatSPN 1.7 package for the modeling, validation, and performance evaluation of distributed systems using Generalized Stochastic Petri Nets and their colored extension. The tool provides a friendly framework to experiment with timed Petri net based modeling techniques. It implements efficient analysis algorithms to allow its use on “real” applications, not only toy examples. Developed in a university for non-profit purposes, it is distributed free of charge to other universities for educational and research purposes. An overview of the complete architecture of the package is given together with examples of its application. Then the various analysis and simulation modules are described.
Keywords: Petri nets; Modeling tool; CTMC; Simulation

Byungseon S. Kim, Larry O. Degelman, An interface system for computerized energy analyses for building designers, Energy and Buildings, Volume 27, Issue 1, February 1998, Pages 97-107, ISSN 0378-7788, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0378-7788(97)00057-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378778897000571)
Abstract: This paper describes research on a computer model for building energy simulation. The main goal of this effort has been to provide building designers a better design tool for energy optimization in their building design processes. With the rapid development in computing technology, today's expectation for computer-aided building design (CABD) systems have matured to an advanced level—to the point where designers are open to the idea of computers helping them in the thought process and not just being used to manipulate and represent geometric shapes [J. Pohl et al., 1992. A Computer-Based Design Environment—Implemented and Planned Extensions of the ICADS Model. Design Institute Research Report, CADRU-06-92, California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo, CA.]; [J.A. Clarke, A.D. Irving, 1988. Building Energy Simulation: An Introduction, Energy and Buildings, 10 (1988), Elsevier, pp. 157–159.]. By its very nature, design is a multidisciplinary and creative activity which encompasses all the relevant areas to be considered during the design process. Thus, the CABD system of today is expected to be a general purpose integrated system, rather than a domain-dependent isolated graphics system [J. Pohl, L. Myers, A. Chapman, J. Cotton, 1989. ICADS: Working Model Version 1, Design Institute Research Report, CADRU-03-89, California Polytechnic State University, San Luis Obispo, CA.]. This research effort embodies a prototype interface system for a building energy simulation model (ENERife). This interface system is not a simple layer between user and simulation model, but rather, a general interface strategy to control simulation models and relevant databases to be integrated into CABD. The system includes a user interface module, system interface module, general database handling module, automated input processor, building matrix system, and a result analysis and recovery system.
Keywords: Energy simulation; Building design; Integrated CAD system; Interface system

Denis Javaux, A method for predicting errors when interacting with finite state systems. How implicit learning shapes the user's knowledge of a system, Reliability Engineering & System Safety, Volume 75, Issue 2, February 2002, Pages 147-165, ISSN 0951-8320, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0951-8320(01)00091-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0951832001000916)
Abstract: This paper describes a method for predicting the errors that may appear when human operators or users interact with systems behaving as finite state systems. The method is a generalization of a method used for predicting errors when interacting with autopilot modes on modern, highly computerized airliners [Proc 17th Digital Avionics Sys Conf (DASC) (1998); Proc 10th Int Symp Aviat Psychol (1999)]. A cognitive model based on spreading activation networks is used for predicting the user's model of the system and its impact on the production of errors. The model strongly posits the importance of implicit learning in user–system interaction and its possible detrimental influence on users' knowledge of the system. An experiment conducted with Airbus Industrie and a major European airline on pilots' knowledge of autopilot behavior on the A340-200/300 confirms the model predictions, and in particular the impact of the frequencies with which specific state transitions and contexts are experienced.
Keywords: Man–machine systems; Human error; Cognitive modeling; Predictive methods; Implicit learning

Francis Neelamkavil, Development of graphical software for CIM applications, Computer Integrated Manufacturing Systems, Volume 3, Issue 3, August 1990, Pages 157-162, ISSN 0951-5240, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0951-5240(90)90128-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0951524090901282)
Abstract: Flexibility, quality and cost advantages are three major factors motivating the introduction of CIM. However, lack of formalisms, tools, methodologies and organizational structures have slowed work in the CIM field. The development of application software capable of tailoring solutions to specific manufacturing problems from a set of existing and future CIM components, the automatic generation of friendly user interfaces to support individual user requirements, the design features that ensure the independence of application software, and the user interface software for accommodating changing manufacturing requirements are some of the key factors that determine the successful application of CIM. The Papillon prototype (developed under the ESPRIT research programme) presented here is based on sound software engineering principles, and has achieved an architecture which separates the application from the user interface, supports configurability of components and generates user interfaces without direct coding. Initially, pure application software with no graphics is built from a set of basic Papillon building blocks: graphical representations are then described by using the EASEL subsystem, and finally the user interface, which enables the user to ‘drive’ applications, is automatically generated. The EASEL subsystem is independent of the Papillon run-time system, and therefore different graphical user interfaces can be generated easily and evalauted at run-time with no need for recompilation. Fundamental concepts such as portability, configurability and reuse of methods and tools are major considerations in the overall design and implementation of the Papillon system. Although the primary emphasis is on CIM, the generic design of the Papillon system makes it an ideal environment for the development of graphical software for a wide range of applications in several fields.
Keywords: computer-integrated manufacturing; application software; Papillon prototype; EASEL subsystem

Chien-Hsiung Chen, Shu-Ying Chiang, The effects of panel arrangement on search performance, Displays, Volume 32, Issue 5, December 2011, Pages 254-260, ISSN 0141-9382, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.displa.2011.05.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0141938211000473)
Abstract: This study investigated the effects of panel arrangement on search performance. The three variables of this experiment were panel arrangement, movement distance, and icon size. Participants were asked to search for target items within a four stimulus array which included: round, horizontal, square, and vertical panel arrangements. Four movement distances were used: √1, √2, √4, and √5. Three icon sizes were examined: 20, 24, and 27 mm. Exposure duration was adopted as the dependent factor which was also treated as the within-subjects factor. Notably, this study is concerned with the user’s icon-clicking distance focusing on two distances, namely, the distance between the start position and the first icon on the panel (P1), and the distance between two icons (P2). Results showed that these three factors of panel arrangement, movement distance, and icon size have caused significant effects on the user’s search performance regarding the two distances mentioned above. Additionally, no difference with regard to search performance was found between the vertical and horizontal arrangements. The results obtained can form design guidelines which are applicable for future human–computer interface design.
Keywords: Panel arrangement; Movement distance; Icon size; User interface

Tom Auer, Alan M. MacEachren, Craig McCabe, Scott Pezanowski, Michael Stryker, HerbariaViz: A web-based client–server interface for mapping and exploring flora observation data, Ecological Informatics, Volume 6, Issue 2, March 2011, Pages 93-110, ISSN 1574-9541, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ecoinf.2010.09.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574954110000968)
Abstract: The potential for physical flora collections to support scientific research is being enhanced by rapid development of digital databases that represent characteristics of the physical specimens held in those collections and make this information available remotely. One example is the unified database of California flora observations from the Consortium of California Herbaria that was developed to support the exploration of plant diversity patterns, distribution ranges of species, and vegetation associations for specimens held in physical collections. Many of the records in the herbaria database, and in complementary databases elsewhere, are geo-referenced; but, current web tools for accessing the data do not take advantage of that georeferencing. In this paper, we report on development and implementation of a web-based client–server map interface to facilitate open mapping and exploration of the dataset. Three research objectives were addressed: (1) develop a method for efficient web-map client–server interaction involving large volumes of spatiotemporal point data, (2) develop a symbology and symbol scaling method for representing those spatial–temporal data in the client, and (3) develop an interface for client–server interactions and data exploration. With a focus on cartographically-sound visualization and user-friendly interaction, we introduce HerbariaViz, a web mapping application that provides space–time–species data query responses efficiently. Following a discussion of relevant literature, we present open-source methods for aggregating point data spatially and temporally, outline our approach to sound cartographic representations of those data, and detail the design of a client interface for making requests and mapping responses. A focus group session involving domain experts was performed to provide user evaluation of the application. In our discussion, we present potential avenues of future work, including: facilitating query response comparisons, handling incomplete and inaccurate data, and generalizing the method presented here.
Keywords: Web-mapping; Geovisualization; Client–server system; Open standards; Open source; Flora collections; California Herbaria

Noemi M. Paz, Peter McAlindon, Farnaz Ganjeizadeh, William Leigh, Graphical representation of help knowledge for intelligent tutoring systems, Computers & Industrial Engineering, Volume 23, Issues 1–4, November 1992, Pages 369-372, ISSN 0360-8352, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0360-8352(92)90138-A.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/036083529290138A)
Abstract: Today an expected facility of interactive computer systems and application programs is an extensive, well-designed, and well-written online help system. A help system frequently provides online tutorial text concerning the operation of the system or application. In the case of Intelligent Tutoring Systems (ITS), an embedded help system provides help with topics in the training domain. In this environment, the help system not only provides user initiated help, but also help text introduced by the embedded computer expert for the purpose of directing or correcting student actions.

Explanatory material contained in help systems is called help documentation, and is usually accessed through a “HELP” command. Identification of relevant help texts is difficult for a user, and is a special case of the general information retrieval problem.

This paper discusses methods for the retrieval of help knowledge items using graphical, on-screen, tree structures. The configuration of these “study trees” conforms to the hierarchical nature of the tutorial information being referenced. Selection of natural language terms affords initial entry to the trees. A user of the help system browses the trees directly on-screen and consults the subject help texts at will. The study tree presentation facilitates effective selection of pertinent help texts and relates the collection of help material into an integrated whole.

T. Bolognesi, E. Najm, P.A.J. Tilanus, G-LOTOS: a graphical language for concurrent systems, Computer Networks and ISDN Systems, Volume 26, Issue 9, May 1994, Pages 1101-1127, ISSN 0169-7552, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-7552(94)90014-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0169755294900140)
Abstract: This paper introduces G-LOTOS, a graphical language for the formal specification of concurrent systems. More precisely, G-LOTOS is a graphical syntax for the Formal Description Technique LOTOS, which is an ISO international standard. This paper requires no familiarity with LOTOS and can also be used as a first approach to the language. G-LOTOS is intended to provide a better readability and more intuitive understanding of formal specifications than textual LOTOS, and is itself being standardised in a joint ISO/CCITT effort. The introduction to the graphical syntax is supported by several short examples, by a complete G-LOTOS specification, and by a LOTOS/G-LOTOS conversion table.
Keywords: Formal description technique; Specification language; Visual language

Jan Dijkstra, Harry Timmermans, Towards a multi-agent model for visualizing simulated user behavior to support the assessment of design performance, Automation in Construction, Volume 11, Issue 2, February 2002, Pages 135-145, ISSN 0926-5805, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0926-5805(00)00093-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0926580500000935)
Abstract: We introduce the outline of a multi-agent model that can be used for visualizing simulated user behavior to support the assessment of design performance. We will consider various performance indicators of building environments, which are related to user reaction to design decisions. This system may serve as a media tool in the design process for a better understanding of what the design will look like, especially for those cases where design or planning decisions will affect the behavior of individuals. The system is based on cellular automata and multi-agent simulation technology. The system simulates how agents move around in a particular 3D (or 2D) environment, in which space is represented as a lattice of cells. Agents represent objects or people with their own behavior, moving over the network. Each agent will be located in a simulated space, based on the cellular automata grid. Each iteration of the simulation is based on a parallel update of the agents conforming local rules. Agents positioned within an environment will need sensors to perceive their local neighborhood and some means with which to affect the environment. In this way, autonomous individuals and the interaction between them can be simulated by the system. As a result, designers can use the system to assess the likely consequences of their design decisions on user behavior. We think that the system provides a potentially valuable tool to support design and decision-making processes, related to user behavior in architecture and urban planning.
Keywords: Multi-agent model; Design performance; Cellular automata grid

M.H.F. Wilkinson, B.C. Meijer, DATAPLOT: A graphical display package for bacterial morphometry and fluorimetry data, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 47, Issue 1, June 1995, Pages 35-49, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-2607(95)01628-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0169260795016287)
Abstract: A microbiological image processing system has been developed, which is used to determine both morphometry and fluorimetry data on (mainly faecal) bacteria. A special program for display of these data has been developed for this system. Besides probability density estimates of any one or two parameters and scatter plots of any two or three parameters in the distribution, it can generate scatter plots using the acutal bacterial shapes, rather than arbitrary symbols. A particularly powerful feature of the program is the possibility to overlay a contour plot of the probability density distribution of the bacteria in parameter space, with a scatter plot of the actual bacterial shapes involved. In this paper, the program's organization, options, and the algorithms used are discussed.
Keywords: Graphics display; Exploratory data analysis; Bacterial morphometry; Multivariate distributions

Robin Peek, Of special interest: Dialing into the graphical world wide web, The Journal of Academic Librarianship, Volume 21, Issue 3, 1995, Pages 203-205, ISSN 0099-1333, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0099-1333(95)90042-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/009913339590042X)

F Losavio, A Matteo, F Schlienger, Object-oriented methodologies of Coad and Yourdon and Booch: comparison of graphical notations, Information and Software Technology, Volume 36, Issue 8, August 1994, Pages 503-514, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(94)90028-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0950584994900280)
Abstract: The key aspects in a methodology are the concepts on which it is founded, a process or set of activities where the concepts are used and finally a notation. We are concerned here with the graphical notation aspects of the object-oriented methodologies of Coad and Yourdon and Booch. We try to establish an objective comparison of the notation semantics used by these two methodologies for expressing the Object Model. A simplified example of a real inventory problem has been selected as case study, in order to establish some of these comparisons. Coad and Yourdon methodology has been used to analyse the inventory problem, and then Booch method was used to design. The main points of the notation comparison obtained are presented in Table 1 at the end of this work.
Keywords: object-oriented methodologies; object-oriented analysis; object-oriented design; software development

Hai Hu, Mick Correll, Leonid Kvecher, Michelle Osmond, Jim Clark, Anthony Bekhash, Gwendolyn Schwab, De Gao, Jun Gao, Vladimir Kubatin, Craig D. Shriver, Jeffrey A. Hooke, Larry G. Maxwell, Albert J. Kovatich, Jonathan G. Sheldon, Michael N. Liebman, Richard J. Mural, DW4TR: A Data Warehouse for Translational Research, Journal of Biomedical Informatics, Volume 44, Issue 6, December 2011, Pages 1004-1019, ISSN 1532-0464, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jbi.2011.08.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1532046411001304)
Abstract: The linkage between the clinical and laboratory research domains is a key issue in translational research. Integration of clinicopathologic data alone is a major task given the number of data elements involved. For a translational research environment, it is critical to make these data usable at the point-of-need. Individual systems have been developed to meet the needs of particular projects though the need for a generalizable system has been recognized. Increased use of Electronic Medical Record data in translational research will demand generalizing the system for integrating clinical data to support the study of a broad range of human diseases. To ultimately satisfy these needs, we have developed a system to support multiple translational research projects. This system, the Data Warehouse for Translational Research (DW4TR), is based on a light-weight, patient-centric modularly-structured clinical data model and a specimen-centric molecular data model. The temporal relationships of the data are also part of the model. The data are accessed through an interface composed of an Aggregated Biomedical-Information Browser (ABB) and an Individual Subject Information Viewer (ISIV) which target general users. The system was developed to support a breast cancer translational research program and has been extended to support a gynecological disease program. Further extensions of the DW4TR are underway. We believe that the DW4TR will play an important role in translational research across multiple disease types.
Keywords: Data Warehouse; Translational research; Patient-centric data model; User interface; Ontology

Jose Stigliano and Marco Bruni, End-User Computing Tools, In Encyclopedia of Information Systems, edited by Hossein Bidgoli,, Elsevier, New York, 2003, Pages 127-139, ISBN 9780122272400, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B0-12-227240-4/00057-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B0122272404000575)

, Chapter 9 - Managing Users and Groups, In Mission Critical Windows 2000 Server Administration, edited by Robin Walshaw,, Syngress, Burlington, 2000, Pages 309-350, ISBN 9781928994169, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-192899416-9/50014-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978192899416950014X)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The user object is one of the fundamental building blocks of a domain and the Active Directory. Administrators use user objects to control access to resources and track activity in a domain. When building a domain with shared resources, the first step is developing and implementing a user management policy. Administrators should be prepared to develop a user management policy and have the skills needed to implement and manage it. An effective user management policy includes naming conventions, password control restrictions, and account settings. The next step in managing user accounts is to group users on the basis of common access requirements. User profiles allow Administrators to standardize the configuration of each user's account and include desktop settings, network connections, shortcuts, and the Start menu in an effort to increase user productivity and reduce administrative overhead. Home directories offer Administrators an option to replace the My Documents folder with a centralized network resource containing a home directory for every user.

Grace Au, Ray J. Paul, Graphical simulation model specification based on activity cycle diagrams, Computers & Industrial Engineering, Volume 26, Issue 2, April 1994, Pages 295-306, ISSN 0360-8352, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0360-8352(94)90063-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0360835294900639)
Abstract: Modern computers and their supporting environments enable the specification of discrete event simulation problems to be a mixture of graphics and text. Such specifications can be rapidly updated to match the changing problem understanding. This paper describes the development of a specification system that uses the graphical methods of activity cycle diagrams on an Apple Macintosh computer. This research system, MacACD, can be combined with other simulation tools to enable the automatic generation of a simulation program with a visual iconic display. A short description of how MacACD works demonstrates its strengths and weaknesses. The advantages the Macintosh approach provided for this research are given.

Michael Cross, Jeffery A. Martin, Todd A. Walls, Martin Grasdal, Debra Littlejohn Shinder and Thomas W. Shinder, Chapter 2 - MCSA/MCSE 70-294 Working with User, Group, and Computer Accounts, In MCSE (Exam 70-294) Study Guide, Syngress, Rockland, 2003, Pages 83-179, ISBN 9781931836944, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-193183694-4/50008-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781931836944500088)

Patrick Girard, Chapter 7 - Bringing Programming by Demonstration to CAD Users, In Interactive Technologies, edited by Henry Lieberman,, Morgan Kaufmann, San Francisco, 2001, Pages 135-162, VII, Your Wish is My Command, ISBN 9781558606883, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155860688-3/50008-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781558606883500087)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter presents a suite of systems that constitute a solution for bringing programming to end users in the field of computer aided design (CAD), by using programming by demonstration (PBD). This suite includes the LIKE system and the Example-Based Programming in Parametrics system (EBP), which is intended to enable CAD system users to generate every program that describes the geometric shapes of a collection of parts through the interactive graphic design. From a PBD point of view, this approach proves that, at least in some application areas where system users have particular skills, complete PBD environments may be developed. From a CAD systems point of view, this approach proves that parametric CAD systems, which are already very successful for sequential (or simple repetitive, pattern-based) parametric design, may be extended to support the parametric design of every conditional or repetitive shape aspect. From a user interface viewpoint, it also proves that very powerful macro-with-example recorders may be developed.

Nourdine Aliane, Data acquisition and real-time control using spreadsheets: Interfacing Excel with external hardware, ISA Transactions, Volume 49, Issue 3, July 2010, Pages 264-269, ISSN 0019-0578, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.isatra.2010.03.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0019057810000285)
Abstract: Spreadsheets have become a popular computational tool and a powerful platform for performing engineering calculations. Moreover, spreadsheets include a macro language, which permits the inclusion of standard computer code in worksheets, and thereby enable developers to greatly extend spreadsheets’ capabilities by designing specific add-ins. This paper describes how to use Excel spreadsheets in conjunction to Visual Basic for Application programming language to perform data acquisition and real-time control. Afterwards, the paper presents two Excel applications with interactive user interfaces developed for laboratory demonstrations and experiments in an introductory course in control.
Keywords: Data acquisition; Real-time control; PID controller; Spreadsheets; VBA

Gail-Joon Ahn, Ravi Sandhu, Decentralized user group assignment in Windows NT, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 56, Issue 1, 1 February 2001, Pages 39-49, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0164-1212(00)00084-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0164121200000844)
Abstract: The notion of groups in Windows NT is much like that in other operating systems. Rather than set user and file rights individually for each and every user, the administrator can give rights to various groups, then place users within those groups. Each user within a group inherits the rights associated with that group. In this paper, we describe an experiment to extend the Windows NT group mechanism in two significant ways that are useful in managing group-based access control in large-scale systems. The goal of our experiment is to demonstrate how group hierarchies (where groups include other groups) and decentralized user-group assignment (where administrators are selectively delegated authority to assign certain users to certain groups) can be implemented by means of Microsoft remote procedure call (RPC) programs. In both respects the experimental goal is to implement previously published models (RBAC96 for group hierarchies and URA97 for decentralized user-group assignment). Our results indicate that Windows NT has adequate flexibility to accommodate sophisticated access control models to some extent.
Keywords: Security; Role-based access control; Windows NT

Bing Wang, Yao Zheng, Wenjing Lou, Y. Thomas Hou, DDoS attack protection in the era of cloud computing and Software-Defined Networking, Computer Networks, Volume 81, 22 April 2015, Pages 308-319, ISSN 1389-1286, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.comnet.2015.02.026.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1389128615000742)
Abstract: Abstract
Cloud computing has become the real trend of enterprise IT service model that offers cost-effective and scalable processing. Meanwhile, Software-Defined Networking (SDN) is gaining popularity in enterprise networks for flexibility in network management service and reduced operational cost. There seems a trend for the two technologies to go hand-in-hand in providing an enterprise’s IT services. However, the new challenges brought by the marriage of cloud computing and SDN, particularly the implications on enterprise network security, have not been well understood. This paper sets to address this important problem.

We start by examining the security impact, in particular, the impact on DDoS attack defense mechanisms, in an enterprise network where both technologies are adopted. We find that SDN technology can actually help enterprises to defend against DDoS attacks if the defense architecture is designed properly. To that end, we propose a DDoS attack mitigation architecture that integrates a highly programmable network monitoring to enable attack detection and a flexible control structure to allow fast and specific attack reaction. To cope with the new architecture, we propose a graphic model based attack detection system that can deal with the dataset shift problem. The simulation results show that our architecture can effectively and efficiently address the security challenges brought by the new network paradigm and our attack detection system can effectively report various attacks using real-world network traffic.
Keywords: DDoS mitigation; Software-Defined Networking; Graphical model

Volker Haarslev, Ralf Möller, Visualization and graphical layout in object-oriented systems, Journal of Visual Languages & Computing, Volume 3, Issue 1, March 1992, Pages 1-23, ISSN 1045-926X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/1045-926X(92)90031-G.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/1045926X9290031G)
Abstract: This paper describes two aspects of visualizing program systems within the object-oriented paradigm: layout specifications for graphical objects and associations of visualization and application objects. The layout approach is based on a notation similar to the TEX text formatting language. It has been extended and generalized for specifying graphical layout of user interfaces and arbitrary objects. Our simplest scheme offers specifications similar to TEX's box-and-glue metaphor. Size and position of virtual boxes and glue can be specified by simple constraints. In the second part of the paper we show how the CLOS (Common Lisp Object System) meta-level architecture can be exploited to associate visualization and application objects. We show how several useful techniques such as indirect values, slot and method demons, and instance-specific meta-objects can be implemented using CLOS. These visualization techniques require no source code modifications of application systems. We demonstrate the feasibility of our approach using application domains such as CLOS debugging and constraint systems.

Mun K. Sitoh, Jen-Gwo Chen, Kuo Leng, Hwa S. Jung, A graphical computer system for modeling the manual lifting task via biomechanical and psychophysical-biomechanical optimization approaches, Computers in Industry, Volume 21, Issue 2, February 1993, Pages 149-165, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0166-3615(93)90133-L.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016636159390133L)
Abstract: An integrated graphical computer system was developed for modeling manual lifting tasks. The system consists of four modules: (1) biomechanical motion profile, (2) psychophysical-biomechanical optimization motion profile, (3) kinematic and kinetic analysis and (4) graphic user interface that provides animation capability. The model was a five-segment 2-D biomechanical model. The psychophysical-biomechanical optimization module was adapted from a recent optimization model. A psychophysical factor was added to each segment in the objective function to represent how much the subject “attempts to utilize” or “concentrates on” a segment relative to other segments.

The model was simulated with both time-invariant and time-variant psychophysical factors. Two test sets were used for the time-variant model. The first test predicted that if the subject were to concentrate on a single segment, putting a maximum usage of the shank would produce the least total torque in our simulated motion profile. The second test predicted that if the subject were to concentrate on two segments, putting maximized usage in both the shank and the thigh would produce the smallest total torque. Three sets of time-variant psychophysical factors were simulated. The simulations predicted that if the subject transferred concentration from shank to lower arm in the last quarter of the lift time, the total torque would be further reduced than when using a set of time-invariant psychophysical factors. In conclusion, this system demonstrated that the psychophysical factor could be integrated with the biomechanical factor to improve the lifting performance. The system should be a useful tool to aid training and job design for the lifting task.
Keywords: Manual materials handling; Psychophysical factor; Biomechanical model; Optimization; Industrial training; Factory training; Work cell simulation

Gilou Agbaglah, Sébastien Delaux, Daniel Fuster, Jérôme Hoepffner, Christophe Josserand, Stéphane Popinet, Pascal Ray, Ruben Scardovelli, Stéphane Zaleski, Parallel simulation of multiphase flows using octree adaptivity and the volume-of-fluid method, Comptes Rendus Mécanique, Volume 339, Issues 2–3, February–March 2011, Pages 194-207, ISSN 1631-0721, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.crme.2010.12.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1631072110002160)
Abstract: We describe computations performed using the Gerris code, an open-source software implementing finite volume solvers on an octree adaptive grid together with a piecewise linear volume of fluid interface tracking method. The parallelisation of Gerris is achieved by domain decomposition. We show examples of the capabilities of Gerris on several types of problems. The impact of a droplet on a layer of the same liquid results in the formation of a thin air layer trapped between the droplet and the liquid layer that the adaptive refinement allows to capture. It is followed by the jetting of a thin corolla emerging from below the impacting droplet. The jet atomisation problem is another extremely challenging computational problem, in which a large number of small scales are generated. Finally we show an example of a turbulent jet computation in an equivalent resolution of 6 × 1024 3 cells. The jet simulation is based on the configuration of the Deepwater Horizon oil leak.
Keywords: Computer science; Two-phase flow; Parallel computing; Octree; Volume-of-fluid; Droplet impact; Atomisation-clés; Informatique; Algorithmique; Écoulement diphasique; Calcul parallèle; Octree; Volume de fluid; Impact de goutte; Atomisation

Fan Dai, Centralized, application-oriented graphical interaction control using an example of planning robotic tasks, Computers & Graphics, Volume 17, Issue 2, March–April 1993, Pages 155-163, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(93)90099-U.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/009784939390099U)
Abstract: The program structure of large software systems is usually hierarchically modularized with each module having its own interaction functions. These interaction functions directly call functions of graphics systems. This has two disadvantages: First, the interaction functions totally depend on the graphics system. Additionally, the program flow is restricted by the program hierarchy. Therefore, it is suggested to use a centralized interaction unit, which offers application-oriented facilities. This separates the application functions from the graphics system and allows the user to access all interaction functions to control the program flow by himself. This paper presents a concept for centralizing the interaction control and discusses its realization using an example of integrated planning of robotic tasks.

Aaron J. Quigley and Florin Bodea, Chapter 1 - Face-to-Face Collaborative Interfaces, In Human-Centric Interfaces for Ambient Intelligence, edited by Hamid Aghajan, Ramón López-Cózar Delgado and Juan Carlos Augusto, Academic Press, Oxford, 2010, Pages 3-32, ISBN 9780123747082, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-374708-2.00001-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123747082000012)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter provides an introduction to research and developments in multitouch input technologies that can be used to realize large interactive tabletop or “surface user interfaces.” Such hardware systems, along with supporting software, allow for applications that can be controlled through direct touch or multitouch. Further, a review of gestural interactions and design guidelines for surface user interface design for collaboration is also provided. Multitouch surface user interfaces (SUIs) can be mounted vertically on walls or horizontally on tables. They are capable of sensing the location of finger(s) when contact with the surface is made. SUIs are used in public places (kiosks, ATMs) or in small personal devices (PDAs, iPhones) where a separate keyboard and mouse cannot or should not be used. Basic SUIs have been common for over 20 years in the form of interactive kiosks, ATMs, and point-of-sale systems, which rely on touch-screen technology with simple button interfaces. The current generation of SUIs suitable for face-to-face interaction are built on LCD displays or form-factored into walls or coffee tables. In their current form they cannot be considered a basic object. However, display technologies are now ubiquitous, and if SUI interaction styles can be woven into the environments and activities of everyday life and their industrial design improved, invisibility in action can be achieved. The ultimate goal of surface user interfaces in collaborative face-to-face activities is for people not to feel they are using a computer; instead, the visual elements should naturally support their actions. Ultimately, SUIs will become so commonplace in everyday life that no one will notice their presence. They will be aesthetic, powerful, and enhance our lives but so too will they be commonplace, obvious, and boring.

José Duarte, Luís Rato, Paulo Shirley, Manuel Rijo, Multi-Platform Controller Interface for SCADA Application, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 44, Issue 1, January 2011, Pages 7885-7890, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20110828-6-IT-1002.03032.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016448755)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper concerns the development of a SCADA-Controller Interface (SCI) application for an open-channel experimental facility. Water delivery canals are complex and spatially distributed systems. The proposed application is to be applied to test control algorithms developed by several research groups with different technical approaches. The proposed interface allows the development of controllers in different environments – C/C++, MATLAB/Simulink, and GNU Prolog – and may be easily extended to other environments. The experimental facilities with the used instrumented canal, the programmable logic controller (PLC) network and the SCADA system are also described in this paper. Finally, some software experimental results are presented.
Keywords: Multi-platform; Data acquisition; Control algorithms; Efficiency enhancement; Real-time communication; Supervisory control

Barbara Kordy, Ludovic Piètre-Cambacédès, Patrick Schweitzer, DAG-based attack and defense modeling: Don’t miss the forest for the attack trees, Computer Science Review, Volumes 13–14, November 2014, Pages 1-38, ISSN 1574-0137, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cosrev.2014.07.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574013714000100)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents the current state of the art on attack and defense modeling approaches that are based on directed acyclic graphs (DAGs). DAGs allow for a hierarchical decomposition of complex scenarios into simple, easily understandable and quantifiable actions. Methods based on threat trees and Bayesian networks are two well-known approaches to security modeling. However there exist more than 30 DAG-based methodologies, each having different features and goals.

The objective of this survey is to summarize the existing methodologies, compare their features, and propose a taxonomy of the described formalisms. This article also supports the selection of an adequate modeling technique depending on user requirements.
Keywords: Graphical models for security; Attack trees; Bayesian networks; Attack and defense modeling; Quantitative and qualitative security assessment; Security measures

Martin Molina, Victor Flores, Generating multimedia presentations that summarize the behavior of dynamic systems using a model-based approach, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 39, Issue 3, 15 February 2012, Pages 2759-2770, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.eswa.2011.08.135.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417411012668)
Abstract: This article describes a knowledge-based method for generating multimedia descriptions that summarize the behavior of dynamic systems. We designed this method for users who monitor the behavior of a dynamic system with the help of sensor networks and make decisions according to prefixed management goals. Our method generates presentations using different modes such as text in natural language, 2D graphics and 3D animations. The method uses a qualitative representation of the dynamic system based on hierarchies of components and causal influences. The method includes an abstraction generator that uses the system representation to find and aggregate relevant data at an appropriate level of abstraction. In addition, the method includes a hierarchical planner to generate a presentation using a model with discourse patterns. Our method provides an efficient and flexible solution to generate concise and adapted multimedia presentations that summarize thousands of time series. It is general to be adapted to different dynamic systems with acceptable knowledge acquisition effort by reusing and adapting intuitive representations. We validated our method and evaluated its practical utility by developing several models for an application that worked in continuous real time operation for more than 1 year, summarizing sensor data of a national hydrologic information system in Spain.
Keywords: Behavior summarization; Presentation model; Intelligent user interface; Data abstraction; Multimedia presentation; Text–graphic coordination; Data-to-text system

Tim Wilmshurst, CHAPTER 8 - The human and physical interfaces, In Designing Embedded Systems with PIC Microcontrollers, Newnes, Boston, 2010, Pages 213-255, ISBN 9781856177504, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-1-85617-750-4.10011-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781856177504100113)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter shows the embedded computer reading in signals, outputting control signals, interacting with a human user, and possibly interacting with an external system via a network. The important fact is that all of these activities fall under the broad arena of interfacing. This chapter shows a very large part of the hardware design of embedded systems. This discourse emphasizessome aspects of interfacing, including both the human and the physical interfaces. The chapter reveals that the human has to interface with any machine that he works with. This is almost certainly in some form of closed-loop contact. Diagrams of human and physical interfaces depict the domestic fridge, photocopier, and car dashboard. This chapter also shows that to interface with the physical world, the microcontroller must be able to interface with a range of transducers. It is necessary to create a mutual understanding between main sensors and actuators available and to keep abreast of current technology in the field. The chapter ends by disclosing that the interfacing with actuators requires a reasonable knowledge of power-switching techniques.

Manuel João Próspero, Paulo Jorge Pereira, On programming an interactive graphical application in logic, Computers & Graphics, Volume 14, Issue 1, 1990, Pages 7-16, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(90)90004-H.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/009784939090004H)
Abstract: A hierarchical graphical modelling system and a dialogue control mechanism were designed and implemented in first order predicate logic, since logic is no longer only a way to understand problems but also a helpful tool from present technologies to solve them. Some main concepts are introduced in this paper by analyzing a given application: a flat drawing design where the user is able to graphically specify the intended configuration and get important information about the existing restrictions.

Gonzalo Farias, Sebastián Dormido, Francisco Esquembre, Interactive Human Interfaces with Engineering Software, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 44, Issue 1, January 2011, Pages 8509-8514, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20110828-6-IT-1002.03398.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016449773)
Abstract: Abstract
Building interactive simulations with standard engineering software is normally a hard task for many non-programming instructors. Maybe the reason is that software for technical computing comes full of toolboxes for rapid-prototyping of engineering systems, but it frequently lacks tools to create interactive simulations. The paper introduces the interoperate approach, which aims to split the development of an interactive engineering simulation in two separate tasks. On the one hand, the interactive human interface is created by using specialized tools. On the other hand, the engineering simulation is built by using the preferred engineering software. The necessary API of the protocol to communicate both parts of the simulation is described in detail here, and some examples can be found at http://lab.dia.uned.es/rmatlab/lab.dia.uned.es/rmatlab/.
Keywords: Control Education; Virtual Labs; Simulations; MATLAB; EJS

Paul McIntosh, Aleksandar Subic, Ka Wai Lee, Patrick Clifton, Pavel Trivailo, Martin Leary, An adaptable virtual engineering platform for distributed design based on open source game technology, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 43, Issue 1, January 2012, Pages 71-86, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2011.08.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997811002250)
Abstract: This paper presents the RMIT Adaptable Platform for Interactive Distributed Design, Customisation and Optimisation (rapidDCO), a CAD/CAE research platform which is an extension of distributed component based gaming technology. rapidDCO is designed for use in multidisciplinary, collaborative and distributed engineering environments where conflicting design parameters have to be resolved by remote input from a range of disciplines and techniques. rapidDCO leverages the open source game engine Delta3D, which itself leverages existing open source technologies to provide features such as: cross-platform 3D rendering, physical simulation and networked interaction. Our approach enables the CAD/E platform to seamlessly adopt advances in the technology but leveraging work done through the broader open source community. Through these technologies and the access to the underlying source code rapidDCO is highly adaptable and can be applied to novel problems not readily supported by conventional CAD/CAE environments. Rather than building CAD/CAE capability from a “top down” tool perspective we take a model-centric approach, building capability from the model “up”. In rapidDCO individual models are defined as software components which are then shared as libraries that are used by the “component aware” environment. This component based approach means that development can be focused on defining specialised models to address a specific need and not on the infrastructure to realise and interact with those models. We present rapidDCO with a formal design customisation and optimisation example demonstrating the use of rapidDCO’s custom interface capability, distributed design and integration with the modeFrontier® design optimisation tool and Microsoft® Excel.
Keywords: Virtual engineering platform; Distributed design; Open source software; Gaming technology; Engineering product development; User interface

Kwanghee Jung and Yoshio Takane, Multidimensional Scaling I, In International Encyclopedia of the Social & Behavioral Sciences (Second Edition), edited by James D. Wright,, Elsevier, Oxford, 2015, Pages 34-39, ISBN 9780080970875, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-08-097086-8.42045-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780080970868420453)
Abstract: Abstract
Multidimensional scaling (MDS) is a set of data-analytic tools for deriving a graphical representation of objects in a multidimensional space based on proximity relations among them. By the graphical representation, we gain intuitive understanding of the regularity governing the relationships among the objects. In this article, we introduce the basic concept and models of MDS along with its essential ingredients such as distance models, proximity data, fitting criteria, dimensionality selection. To illustrate the use of MDS, three useful MDS procedures (simple MDS, individual differences MDS, and unfolding analysis) are presented with empirical examples.
Keywords: Euclidean distance model; Graphical representation; Ideal points; Individual differences; Multidimensional scaling; Preference data; Proximity data; Unfolding analysis

Janusz Baczyński, PC display system for real-time data graphical representation of spectroscopy measurement results, Nuclear Instruments and Methods in Physics Research Section A: Accelerators, Spectrometers, Detectors and Associated Equipment, Volume 325, Issue 3, 15 February 1993, Pages 523-528, ISSN 0168-9002, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0168-9002(93)90400-C.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016890029390400C)
Abstract: A simple data acquisition technique for real-time graphical representation of accumulated spectra and the design of the electronic module of a data display system have been developed for neutron slowing-down-time spectroscopy using a CAMAC analyzer. The data display system is composed of the personal computer and the described home-built CAMAC module. The module allows one to display data in real time without any increase of the dead-time of the measurement system. Moreover, the module can be useful for a significant increase (up to 1 MHz) of the throughput rate of CAMAC systems employed for multichannel spectroscopy analyses.

Sean Wallbridge, Chapter 16 - Administering User Accounts and Groups, In Windows 2000 Server System Administration Handbook, Syngress, Burlington, 2000, Pages 629-667, ISBN 9781928994091, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-192899409-1/50017-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781928994091500172)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter describes how to administer user accounts and groups using active directory, create multiple user accounts simultaneously, and migrate Novell directory system (NDS) or NT 4.0 user accounts into active directory. The chapter explores new ways to do old tasks (like adding a bunch of users all at once) and suggests some practices that will help reduce the amount of time spent preparing for a migration from NT 4.0 to Windows 2000. It discusses the improvements in Windows 2000 over its predecessors; the hierarchical namespace of active directory and the management capabilities added by group policy objects make Windows 2000 an attractive solution for large organizations that need segregated network administration. Users and the group administration are more flexible than ever before, even when the users number in the hundreds of thousands. Sophisticated new dial-up options allow one to maximize one's asynchronous bandwidth investments.

Lennart E. Nacke, Sophie Stellmach, Dennis Sasse, Joerg Niesenhaus, Raimund Dachselt, LAIF: A logging and interaction framework for gaze-based interfaces in virtual entertainment environments, Entertainment Computing, Volume 2, Issue 4, 2011, Pages 265-273, ISSN 1875-9521, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.entcom.2010.09.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1875952110000091)
Abstract: Eye tracking is starting to be used for evaluation and interaction in virtual environments. Especially digital games can benefit from an integrated approach, using eye tracking technology for analysis and interaction. One benefit is faster development of gaze interaction games, which can be automatically evaluated in iterative development cycles. For this purpose, we present a framework of programming libraries that enables rapid game development and gameplay analysis within an experimental research environment. The framework presented here is extensible for different kinds of logging (e.g., psychophysiological and in-game behavioral data) and facilitates studies using eye-tracking technology in digital entertainment environments. An experimental study using gaze-only interaction in a digital game is presented and highlights the framework’s capacity to create games and evaluate novel entertainment interfaces.
Keywords: Digital games; Eye tracking; Interactive techniques; Gameplay logging; Triangulation; Instrumentation

Christophe Ramstein, An architecture model for multimodal interfaces with force feedback, In: Yuichiro Anzai, Katsuhiko Ogawa and Hirohiko Mori, Editor(s), Advances in Human Factors/Ergonomics, Elsevier, 1995, Volume 20, Pages 455-460, ISSN 0921-2647, ISBN 9780444817952, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0921-2647(06)80074-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0921264706800742)
Abstract: Multimodal interfaces with force feedback pose new problems both in terms of their design and for hardware and software implementation. The first problem is to design and build force-feedback pointing devices that permit users both to select and manipulate interface objects (windows, menus and icons) and at the same time feel these objects with force and precision through their tactile and kinesthetic senses. The next problem is to model the interface such that it can be returned to the user via force-feedback devices: the task is to define the fields of force corresponding to interface objects and events, and to design algorithms to synthesize these forces in such a way as to provide optimum real-time operation. The final problem concerns the hardware and software architecture to be used to facilitate the integration of this technology with contemporary graphic interfaces. An architecture model for a multimodal interface is presented: it is based on the notion of a multiagent model and breaks down inputs and outputs according to multiple modalities (visual, auditory and haptic). These modalities are represented by independent software components that communicate with one another via a higher-level control agent.
Keywords: Multimodal interface; software architecture model; force feedback; haptic device; physical model

A. Heinke Frigeri, C.E. Pereira, W.A. Halang, Real-time programming: extending PEARL with interfaces and active objects, Control Engineering Practice, Volume 6, Issue 3, 1 March 1998, Pages 431-440, ISSN 0967-0661, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0967-0661(98)00031-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0967066198000318)
Abstract: An object-oriented extension to the real-time programming language PEARL is presented in this paper. The new language preserves PEARL’s expressiveness for timeliness and industrial processes and, at the same time, improves the language’s readability and manageability through the adoption of a better encapsulation paradigm, derived from the object concept. Some extensions are also proposed, to enhance the language’s testability and safety. The proposed language is fully backward compatible with PEARL, while allowing powerful abstraction concepts.
Keywords: Object-oriented programming; real-time languages; object modeling techniques; distributed real-time systems; PEARL; interfaces

Yuhua Luo, Francisco J.Perales Lopez, Juan J.Villanueva Pipaon, An automatic rotoscopy system for human motion based on a biomechanic graphical model, Computers & Graphics, Volume 16, Issue 4, Winter 1992, Pages 355-362, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(92)90021-M.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/009784939290021M)
Abstract: A system for analysis and synthesis of human motion is presented. The whole system consists of an analysis part and a synthesis part. The analysis part includes the preprocessing phase, modeling phase, matching phase, and interpretation phase. The synthesis part reconstructs the same motion of the human body. A biomechanic graphical model is defined to represent the human body in 3D space which is matched with the real images to discover the motion. The synthesis part uses the result of the analysis part to reconstruct the same motion of the human body which can be viewed from any viewpoint and from any distance.

Jérémy Terrien, Catherine Marque, Jean Gondry, Thora Steingrimsdottir, Brynjar Karlsson, Uterine electromyogram database and processing function interface: An open standard analysis platform for electrohysterogram signals, Computers in Biology and Medicine, Volume 40, Issue 2, February 2010, Pages 223-230, ISSN 0010-4825, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.compbiomed.2009.11.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010482509002145)
Abstract: The uterine electromyogram or electrohysterogram (EHG) is one of the most promising biophysical markers of preterm labor. At this time no recording parameter standard exists for EHG recordings which can be a problem for the establishment of international multicentric trials. In this paper, we present a management and processing system dedicated to storing and processing EHG signals. This system can process EHG signals recorded in different experimental conditions i.e. different sampling frequencies. The signal management is performed using an easy to use graphical user interface. Other available functions include visualization, preprocessing and analysis of EHG signals. The proposed processing functions provide temporal, spectral and time-scale parameters obtained from the EHG bibliography. The obtained results from real signals recorded in two different hospitals in two different countries are in accordance with the literature and demonstrate the potential of the proposed system. The incorporation of new functions is easy, due to a standardization of the EHG data formats.
Keywords: Data management system; Uterine electromyogram; Preterm labor; Spectral analysis; Time-scale analysis

D. Akoumianakis, C. Stephanidis, Knowledge-based support for user adapted interaction design, Expert Systems with Applications, Volume 12, Issue 2, 1997, Pages 225-245, ISSN 0957-4174, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0957-4174(96)00097-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957417496000978)
Abstract: The design of high quality user interfaces is increasingly becoming a knowledge-intensive task. Designers of user interfaces require tools to: (i) provide ‘assistance’ towards optimal decision making in varying design situations, (ii) ‘critique’ the quality of tentative design alternatives, (iii) ‘propagate’ and ‘reuse’ the accumulated design wisdom resulting from past experience, best practice and existing knowledge and (iv) ‘automate’ the design of certain aspects of the user-computer interaction. This paper briefly reviews the architecture and scope of a knowledge-based user interface design aid, called USE-IT, and describes its knowledge base, the inference facilities and the data structures that are available for capturing and embedding design decisions into user interface implementation. USE-IT exhibits characteristic properties which cross the boundaries of the known categories of knowledge-based user interface design tools, such as user interface design assistants, user interface design critics or user interface design generators. The primary objective of USE-IT is to provide the user interface design team with a suit of tools allowing the consolidation of tentative designs, their re-use and incremental evolution, as well as the automatic generation of the lexical specification of a user interface. Such a specification can be subsequently consulted and interpreted by a user interface development toolkit to as to realize the specified lexical interactive behaviour on a target platform (e.g. MS-Windows).

Kai Zhan, Steven Faux, Fabio Ramos, Multi-scale Conditional Random Fields for first-person activity recognition on elders and disabled patients, Pervasive and Mobile Computing, Volume 16, Part B, January 2015, Pages 251-267, ISSN 1574-1192, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pmcj.2014.11.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574119214001850)
Abstract: Abstract
We propose a novel pervasive system to recognise human daily activities from a wearable device. The system is designed in a form of reading glasses, named ‘Smart Glasses’, integrating a 3-axis accelerometer and a first-person view camera. Our aim is to classify subject’s activities of daily living (ADLs) based on their vision and head motion data. This ego-activity recognition system not only allows caretakers to track on a specific person (such as disabled patient or elderly people), but also has the potential to remind/warn people with cognitive impairments of hazardous situations. We present the following contributions: a feature extraction method from accelerometer and video; a classification algorithm integrating both locomotive (body motions) and stationary activities (without or with small motions); a novel multi-scale dynamic graphical model for structured classification over time. In this paper, we collect, train and validate our system on two large datasets: 20 h of elder ADLs datasets and 40 h of patient ADLs datasets, containing 12 and 14 different activities separately. The results show that our method efficiently improves the system performance (F-Measure) over conventional classification approaches by an average of 20%–40% up to 84.45%, with an overall accuracy of 90.04% for elders. Furthermore, we also validate our method on 30 patients with different disabilities, achieving an overall accuracy up to 77.07%.
Keywords: Activity recognition; Feature classification; Graphical model; First-person; Feature extraction; Computer vision

P. Banksl, K. Irons, M.R. Woodman, B.J. Stenhouse, Chapter 2.1 - General User Needs for CAPE, In: Bertrand Braunschweig and Rafiqul Gani, Editor(s), Computer Aided Chemical Engineering, Elsevier, 2002, Volume 11, Pages 19-47, ISSN 1570-7946, ISBN 9780444508270, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1570-7946(02)80005-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1570794602800050)

Erik Dirkx, IMISSED: Interactive microprocessor instruction set simulation environment with graphical display, Microprocessing and Microprogramming, Volume 27, Issues 1–5, August 1989, Pages 619-621, ISSN 0165-6074, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0165-6074(89)90120-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0165607489901208)
Abstract: A new methodology for presenting and teaching instruction set level simulations is proposed. It has successfully been implemented as a simulation environment for microprocessor programs and is currently being used as a teaching aid. A standard programming language is used as a hardware description language and the system consists of a set of independent modules implementing the key system functions. Advanced user interface technology is used for augmenting the information transfer bandwidth to the user, without requiring excessive machine resources.

Amy Tracy Wells, Raven McCrory, Hypermedia and learning: Contrasting interfaces to hypermedia systems, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 27, Issue 1, January 2011, Pages 195-202, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2010.07.036.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0747563210002323)
Abstract: This study explores selected theoretical and design issues associated with the use of hypermedia learning environments to promote the recall, synthesis, integration and retention of information. The study contrasts two different hypermedia systems that contain resources on a complex historical domain. The experimental condition incorporates design features related to complexity, context-dependency and interconnectedness in order to highlight different aspects of its instructional content. The experimental condition was hypothesized to foster greater achievement on tests for synthesis, integration and retention of knowledge and to be more favorably rated by users. The control condition incorporates simple linear design features including several features that are antithetical to those of the experimental condition. The control condition presents the same instructional content in a more rigid and decontextualized manner and was hypothesized to foster greater mastery of factual recall but less synthesis, integration and retention of knowledge. Results however demonstrated that participants in the control condition were able to recall more facts, make more connections between themes in the test for synthesis and retain more facts than participants in the experimental condition. However, differences in overall performance for both hypermedia systems were not statistically significant: neither system had a different effect on learning.
Keywords: Hypermedia; Multimedia; Human–computer interaction; Comprehension; Learning; Memory

Ketan Patel, Misha Kapushesky and David Dean, 9 - Creating an in-house ’omics data portal using EBI Atlas software, In Woodhead Publishing Series in Biomedicine, Woodhead Publishing, 2012, Pages 221-238, Open Source Software in Life Science Research, ISBN 9781907568978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1533/9781908818249.221.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781907568978500096)
Abstract: Abstract:
The amount of public gene expression data has dramatically increased in recent years. This has resulted in several efforts to curate and make accessible this huge amount of public data in a useful and easy to use way. One such project, the European Bioinformatics Institute’s Gene Expression Atlas, led to the development of a portal that was intuitive to use and yet still incorporated sophisticated queries and statistical analysis results. The authors describe how the public Atlas project was adapted to become a standalone product, which can be installed anywhere. This Atlas allows both private companies and public institutes to develop in-house data portals.
Key words: gene expression; microarray; portal; ’omics; curation; MAGE-TAB; intuitive user interface

Jari Kätsyri, Niklas Ravaja, Mikko Salminen, Aesthetic images modulate emotional responses to reading news messages on a small screen: A psychophysiological investigation, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 70, Issue 1, January 2012, Pages 72-87, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2011.08.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581911001121)
Abstract: Abstract pictures, such as artistic drawings, may evoke subtle emotions in their observers via aesthetic experiences. We examined among 44 participants the emotional responses as measured by facial electromyography (EMG) to aesthetic background images that varied on the emotional valence (unpleasant to pleasant) and arousal (calming to exciting) dimensions and were presented both separately and as background images for news messages. Effects of image arousal on free recall of news messages were also examined. A priori pleasant compared to unpleasant images were associated with higher orbicularis oculi EMG responses, both when presented alone and when presented as news message backgrounds. Analyses based on the participants' subjective pleasantness ratings also showed greater corrugator supercilii EMG activity for unpleasant compared to pleasant images. High-arousal as compared to low-arousal images improved recall for the superimposed news messages. In contrast, recall was not affected by a priori image valence or subjective pleasantness ratings. The results demonstrate that abstract images can be used to evoke emotional responses in the viewers that persist even when unrelated messages are superimposed on them. Similarly, high-arousal images can be used to enhance memory for superimposed textual messages.
Keywords: Psychophysiology; Emotion; Media; Aesthetics; User interfaces

Davide Bacciu, Stefano Chessa, Claudio Gallicchio, Alessandro Lenzi, Alessio Micheli, Susanna Pelagatti, A General Purpose Distributed Learning Model for Robotic Ecologies, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 45, Issue 22, 2012, Pages 435-440, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20120905-3-HR-2030.00178.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016336497)
Abstract: Abstract
The design of a learning system for robotic ecologies need to account for some key aspects of the ecology model such as distributivity, heterogeneity of the computational, sensory and actuator capabilities, as well as self-configurability. The paper proposes general guiding principles for learning systems’ design that ensue from key ecology properties, and presents a distributed learning system for the Rubicon ecology that draws inspiration from such guidelines. The proposed learning system provides the Rubicon ecology with a set of generalpurpose learning services which can be used to learn generic computational tasks that involve predicting information of interest based on dynamic sensorial input streams.
Keywords: Robotic Ecologies; Learning Systems; Machine Learning; Wireless Sensor Networks; User Interfaces

Juan C. García, J. Javier Fernández, Raúl Marín Pedro J Sanz, Mario Prats, Towards specification, planning and sensor-based control of autonomous underwater intervention*, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 44, Issue 1, January 2011, Pages 10361-10366, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20110828-6-IT-1002.02456.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667016452778)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents our recent advances in specification, planning and control of autonomous manipulation actions in underwater environments. The user first specifies the task to perform on a target object found on a seabed image mosaic previously obtained. Then a suitable vehicle position and arm configuration is planned in order to guarantee a successful manipulation. After the vehicle reaches the planned destination, the actual view of the object is matched to the one used for the specification, and the grasp points are tracked, enabling visual servoing of the manipulator end-effector. This allows the arm to compensate for the vehicle motion, thus increasing the reliability of the reaching action. Preliminary experiments done in a simulated environment demonstrate the viability of this approach.
Keywords: Intervention Autonomous Underwater Vehicles; Marine systems; Underwater manipulation; User Interfaces; Visual Tracking

, Chapter 9 - Configuring the User Experience, In Configuring Citrix MetaFrame for Windows 2000 Terminal Services, Syngress, Burlington, 2000, Pages 319-360, ISBN 9781928994183, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-192899418-3/50011-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781928994183500116)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
Administrators can successfully create a positive user experience by configuring session parameters on the MetaFrame server. One measure of the success of a Citrix MetaFrame deployment is how satisfied the end users are with the ease of use of the applications deployed on it. If they are able to use applications in the same way that they expected, with fast performance and full functionality, then the deployment is considered successful from their point of view. The result, a reduced need for administrative support, makes the deployment a success from the administrators' point of view. Users are less concerned with “how” the application reaches their desktop than they are with whether it works the way they need it to. By using Group Policies, remote, noncorporate Internet users can be restricted to connecting to the MetaFrame server and to only seeing one or two applications provided to them by the corporation. The MetaFrame servers could then connect them to Web pages or read-only copies of internal databases housed in the public DMZ.

William Gropp, Ewing Lusk, Nathan Doss, Anthony Skjellum, A high-performance, portable implementation of the MPI message passing interface standard, Parallel Computing, Volume 22, Issue 6, September 1996, Pages 789-828, ISSN 0167-8191, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-8191(96)00024-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0167819196000245)
Abstract: MPI (Message Passing Interface) is a specification for a standard library for message passing that was defined by the MPI Forum, a broadly based group of parallel computer vendors, library writers, and applications specialists. Multiple implementations of MPI have been developed. In this paper, we describe MPICH, unique among existing implementations in its design goal of combining portability with high performance. We document its portability and performance and describe the architecture by which these features are simultaneously achieved. We also discuss the set of tools that accompany the free distribution of MPICH, which constitute the beginnings of a portable parallel programming environment. A project of this scope inevitably imparts lessons about parallel computing, the specification being followed, the current hardware and software environment for parallel computing, and project management; we describe those we have learned. Finally, we discuss future developments for MPICH, including those necessary to accommodate extensions to the MPI Standard now being contemplated by the MPI Forum.
Keywords: Message passing interface; Parallel programming environment; Benchmark; Performance; Portability; MPI-2

F. Michaud, P. Boissy, D. Labonté, S. Brière, K. Perreault, H. Corriveau, A. Grant, M. Lauria, R. Cloutier, M.-A. Roux, D. Iannuzzi, M.-P. Royer, F. Ferland, F. Pomerleau, D. Létourneau, Exploratory design and evaluation of a homecare teleassistive mobile robotic system, Mechatronics, Volume 20, Issue 7, October 2010, Pages 751-766, ISSN 0957-4158, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.mechatronics.2010.01.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0957415810000280)
Abstract: Telehealth assistive technologies for homes constitute a very promising avenue to decrease load on the health care system, to reduce hospitalization period and to improve quality of life. Teleoperated from a distant location, a mobile robot can become a beneficial tool in health applications. However, design issues related to such systems are broad and mostly unexplored (e.g., locomotion and navigation in-home settings, remote interaction and patient acceptability, evaluation of clinical needs and their integration into health care information systems). Designing a safe and effective robotic system for in-home teleassistance requires taking into consideration the complexities of having novice users remotely navigate a mobile robot in a home environment while they interact with patients. This paper presents the progress made by adopting an interdisciplinary and exploratory design methodology to develop a telepresence assistive mobile robot for homecare assistance of elderly people. Preliminary studies using robots, focus groups and interviews allowed us to derive preliminary specifications to design a new mobile robotic system named Telerobot. Telerobot’s locomotion mechanism provides improved mobility when moving on uneven surfaces, helping to provide stable video feed to the user. Its control system is implemented for safe teleoperation. A study involving 10 rehabilitation professionals confirms that the system is usable in-home environments. Analysis of teleoperation strategies used by novice teleoperators suggest that it is essential in a home environment that the teleoperation interface provides the user with a visual feedback of the objects surrounding the robot, their distances relative to the robot and the size of the robot in the environment. Enhanced user interfaces to augment the operator’s perception of the environment were elaborated and tested in controlled conditions. Based on the progress made so far, the paper outlines issues that will be addressed in future work with the objective of coming up with a complete, efficient and usable in-home teleassistance mobile robotic system.
Keywords: In-home teleassistance; Mobile telepresence; Locomotion; Teleoperation; User interface; Usability

Fabio Cenni, Jeremie Cazalbou, Salvador Mir, Libor Rufer, Design of a SAW-based chemical sensor with its microelectronics front-end interface, Microelectronics Journal, Volume 41, Issue 11, November 2010, Pages 723-732, ISSN 0026-2692, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.mejo.2010.06.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0026269210001102)
Abstract: A surface acoustic wave (SAW) device is used in this work as the sensing element for a chemical sensor that will be embedded in a wireless sensor node. The SAW device is intended to detect the concentration of gaseous mercury in the environment. The microelectronics front-end architecture has been designed at transistor level in a 0.35 μ m CMOS technology. The SAW device is embedded in a phase-locked loop (PLL) that converts the change of concentration of gaseous mercury into a shift of the loop frequency. Post-layout simulations of the overall sensor including the digital control and read-out blocks have been carried out considering a model of the SAW device described in the Hardware Description Language Verilog-A. Analog tests on the fabricated circuit have demonstrated the functionality of this microelectronics front-end interface.
Keywords: SAW sensor; Mason's model; PLL; VCRO

Daniel R. Frantz, The programming language standards scene, ten years on Paper 14: FIMS (Form Interface Management System), Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 16, Issues 5–6, September 1994, Pages 519-525, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0920-5489(94)90034-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0920548994900345)
Abstract: This paper, one of a simultaneously published set, describes the establishment in 1987 of the standards project for FIMS, and the progress of the project to the end of 1993. FIMS (the Form Interface Management System) specifies a User Interface Management System (UIMS) with several components, among which is the programming language IFDL (the Independent Form Description Language). This paper gives the history of its development and an overview of its capabilities. The paper finishes with an assessment of the likelihood of acceptance of FIMS and a list of future enhancements.
Keywords: Programming languages; Standardization; Form Interface Management System; FIMS

Jian Wang, Fritz Reitz, Tom Donaldson, Len Pagliaro, A computer-interfaced falling ball viscometer, Journal of Biochemical and Biophysical Methods, Volume 28, Issue 4, June 1994, Pages 251-261, ISSN 0165-022X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0165-022X(94)90001-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0165022X94900019)
Abstract: We have developed a system that greatly facilitates viscosity measurement under low-shear conditions, based upon a falling ball viscometer interfaced to a personal computer. Three optical sensors indicate the rate of passage of a steel ball falling through a micro-capillary tube, and a potentiometer detects the angle of the tube. The resulting data are passed from a custom program with a graphical user interface to a spreadsheet. The spreadsheet then calculates and stores a value for the viscosity of the sample, using the data passed to it from the viscometer, and a look-up table of stored slope and intercept values calculated from precision viscosity standards. We used the viscometer to determine the kinetics of actin polymerization, and to measure the viscosity of F-actin-aldolase gels. This system provides significantly greater reproducibility and speed in data acquisition than does the traditional ‘eyeball and stopwatch’ method, and data reduction is virtually instantaneous.
Keywords: Viscometry; Computer interfacing; Actin; Biopolymer; Gelation; Falling ball viscometer

E.H. Baalbergen, H. van der Ven, SPINEware – a framework for user-oriented and tailorable metacomputers, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 15, Issues 5–6, October 1999, Pages 549-558, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-739X(99)00008-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X99000084)
Abstract: Computing networks in enterprises are rapidly growing not only in capacity but also in complexity. The users usually get faced with networking details and with a variety of heterogeneous computing systems. In the present paper, we present SPINEware as a facility for reducing the complexity of computer network usage. SPINEware is a facility that supports the development of working environments on top of existing computer networks. Such working environment reveals itself to the user as a powerful and easy-to-use single application environment – a metacomputer – providing uniform and network-transparent access to the resources and applications available from the computer network. To further reduce the complexity, SPINEware-based metacomputers may be tailored for particular end users and application areas.
Keywords: Metacomputing; Globally distributed computing; Network computing

Ridha Mabrouki, Ryan T. Kelly, David C. Prior, Alexandre A. Shvartsburg, Keqi Tang, Richard D. Smith, Improving FAIMS Sensitivity Using a Planar Geometry with Slit Interfaces, Journal of the American Society for Mass Spectrometry, Volume 20, Issue 9, September 2009, Pages 1768-1774, ISSN 1044-0305, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jasms.2009.05.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1044030509004310)
Abstract: Differential mobility spectrometry or field asymmetric waveform ion mobility spectrometry (FAIMS) is gaining broad acceptance for analyses of gas-phase ions, especially in conjunction with largely orthogonal separation methods such as mass spectrometry (MS) and/or conventional (drift tube) ion mobility spectrometry. In FAIMS, ions are filtered while passing through a gap between two electrodes that may have planar or curved (in particular, cylindrical) geometry. Despite substantial inherent advantages of the planar configuration and its near-universal adoption in current stand-alone FAIMS devices, commercial FAIMS/MS systems have employed curved FAIMS geometries that can be more effectively interfaced to MS. Here we report a new planar (p-) FAIMS design with slit-shaped entrance and exit apertures that substantially increase ion transmission in and out of the analyzer. The entrance slit interface effectively couples p-FAIMS to multi-emitter electrospray ionization (ESI) sources, improving greatly the ion current introduced to the device and allowing liquid flow rates up to ∼50 μL/min. The exit slit interface increases the transmission of ribbon-shaped ion beams output by the p-FAIMS to downstream stages such as a MS. Overall, the ion signal in ESI/FAIMS/MS analyses increases by over an order of magnitude without affecting FAIMS resolution.

Sinisa Dj. Mesarovic, Jeffrey W. Kysar, Continuum aspects of directionally dependent cracking of an interface between copper and alumina crystals, Mechanics of Materials, Volume 23, Issue 4, August 1996, Pages 271-286, ISSN 0167-6636, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-6636(96)00028-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0167663696000282)
Abstract: Directionally dependent cracking along the interface of a Cu/Al2O3 bicrystal has been analyzed using continuum mechanics. This work extends previous analyses by considering the elastic anisotropy and plastic deformation of copper. The goals of the analysis are: (1) To provide a possible continuum explanation of the experimentally observed directionally dependent cracking, and (2) to understand the effect of continuum deformation on the competition between dislocation nucleation at a crack tip (i.e., tip blunting and alleviation of the stress concentration) and cleavage. First, the mode mixity of the elastic fields at the crack tip is calculated by considering the traction vector on the interface as derived from anisotropic elasticity. This is compared to the results from isotropic elasticity. The effects of anisotropy, as pertaining to dislocation nucleation and cleavage, are discussed. Elastic-plastic FEM analyses within both the `small strain' and finite deformation formulations have been performed for the two crack directions in. Furthermore, a variety of hardening laws, including ideal plasticity, were used to investigate the robustness of the solutions. Comparisons between the FEM analyses show that the general sectorial nature of the crack tip stress fields isthe same for all hardening laws chosen. The effects of geometrical hardening and softening are pronounced in a finite deformation, ideal plasticity analysis. However, even moderate hardening greatly diminishes these effects. If the hardening law saturates, the resulting near tip fields are similar to those of an ideally plastic material. The two crack tip orientations affect the nature of the localization of the plastic deformation. These effects are discussed in the context of different hardening laws. In addition, the interface traction phase angle is changed significantly by the plastic deformation with consequences regarding dislocation nucleation and cleavage. Overall, no clear continuum-based explanation of directionally dependent fracture was found, but it is clear that elastic anisotropy and plastic deformation should, in general, be taken into account. Finally, critical problems encountered in this type of analysis are identified and some directions for future research are suggested.
Keywords: Metal-ceramic interface; Crack tip plasticity; Anisotropy; Dislocation nucleation; Crystals; Directional dependence

M Ajmone Marsan, F Neri, C Scarpati Cioffari, A Vasco, GSPN models of bridged LAN configurations1, Journal of Systems Architecture, Volume 46, Issue 2, 15 January 2000, Pages 105-130, ISSN 1383-7621, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S1383-7621(98)00064-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1383762198000642)
Abstract: Communication systems comprising several local area networks (LANs) interconnected by bridges are modeled with Generalized Stochastic Petri Nets (GSPNs). GSPN models are developed at different levels of detail, progressively abstracting from the detailed behavior of real systems, and exploiting symmetries present in simple interconnected LAN topologies by “folding” the detailed GSPN models. The numerical results obtained from the solution of GSPN models are validated against results of very detailed simulation experiments, and found in good agreement, even for the most abstract GSPN models. Advantages and drawbacks of the GSPN modeling approach are discussed at the end of the paper.
Keywords: LAN; Bridge; Interconnection; Petri net; Performance analysis; Folding

G. Beer, G. Lang, A graphical post-processor for computer-aided design of mine excavations, International Journal of Rock Mechanics and Mining Sciences & Geomechanics Abstracts, Volume 29, Issue 3, May 1992, Pages 307-322, ISSN 0148-9062, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0148-9062(92)93663-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0148906292936635)

Senthil Murugan Balakrishnan, Arun Kumar Sangaiah, MIFIM—Middleware solution for service centric anomaly in future internet models, Future Generation Computer Systems, Available online 27 August 2016, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2016.08.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X16302564)
Abstract: Abstract
Internet is shifting at a rapid pace and evolving into a trend called as “Future Internet (FI)”. It can be defined as the union and cooperation of paradigms such as Internet of Things (IoT), Internet of Services (IoS) and Internet of Content (IoC). In these paradigms, the role of Service oriented Computing (SoC) deserves special attention. FI can be defined as an association of web services encompassing innovative services such as converged services, intelligent services and related smart services for overcoming the structural limitations of the current internet. Among many key concerns in the services environment, service discovery and optimal service selection are considered to be vital. Service discovery enables the client to get access to the right service at the right time to complete the requested tasks while service selection determines the feasible service composition that fulfils a set of conditions while maintaining a rich Quality of User Experience (QoUE) and good Quality of Service (QoS). This paper proposes the FI middleware named MIFIM (MIddleware for Future Internet Models) incorporated with Aspect Oriented Module (AOM) for addressing the challenges in particular related to the unknown topology and missing data estimation present in IoT service discovery and optimal service selection routine named Composite Service Selection Module (CSSM) for deriving the best service composition in IoS paradigm. The AOM is evaluated in accordance with MUSIC pervasive computing middleware while CSSM is compared with the other optimality approaches. Experimental results were found encouraging and the proposed components were performing reasonably well when compared to the similar solutions.
Keywords: Future Internet (FI); Middleware; Internet of Things (IoT); QoS (Quality of Service); QoUE (Quality of User Experience); PSO (Particle Swarm Optimization)

Ulrik Brandes, Social Network Algorithms and Software, In International Encyclopedia of the Social & Behavioral Sciences (Second Edition), edited by James D. Wright,, Elsevier, Oxford, 2015, Pages 454-460, ISBN 9780080970875, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-08-097086-8.43121-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780080970868431211)
Abstract: Abstract
Graph-theoretic concepts feature prominently in network analysis because they facilitate the exploration and assessment of structural properties in intuitive terms. However, they also pose algorithmic challenges not normally encountered in population statistics and attribute-based data analysis. We review efficient combinatorial algorithms for core problems of social network analysis and discuss important aspects of software for these tasks.
Keywords: Algorithms; Centrality; Cliques; Clustering; Complexity; Cores; Density; Equivalence; Graphical representations; Social networks

Mark Umberger, Iztok Humar, Andrej Kos, Jože Guna, Andrej Žemva, Janez Bešter, The integration of home-automation and IPTV system and services, Computer Standards & Interfaces, Volume 31, Issue 4, June 2009, Pages 675-684, ISSN 0920-5489, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.csi.2008.09.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920548908001086)
Abstract: In this paper we propose the integration of a home-automation system and its services (HASS) with an IPTV system and its services (IPTVSS) to enable convergence at the network-technology and user-interface levels. The convergence at the network-technology level was achieved by using the Internet protocol (IP), and therefore both integrated systems have to provide IP connectivity. To enable communication between the HASS and the IP-based services, we have implemented the WebService/Konnex gateway. The IPTVSS are IP based; therefore, an easy convergence at the network-technology level is possible. The convergence at the user-interface level was achieved by a hardware and software user-interface implementation.
Keywords: Home automation; IPTV; Gateway; IP network; User interface

Ron Hirschprung, Eran Toch, Frank Bolton, Oded Maimon, A methodology for estimating the value of privacy in information disclosure systems, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 61, August 2016, Pages 443-453, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.chb.2016.03.033.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S074756321630200X)
Abstract: Abstract
In many types of information systems, users face an implicit tradeoff between disclosing personal information and receiving benefits, such as discounts by an electronic commerce service that requires users to divulge some personal information. While these benefits are relatively measurable, the value of privacy involved in disclosing the information is much less tangible, making it hard to design and evaluate information systems that manage personal information. Meanwhile, existing methods to assess and measure the value of privacy, such as self-reported questionnaires, are notoriously unrelated of real–world behavior. To overcome this obstacle, we propose a methodology called VOPE (Value of Privacy Estimator), which relies on behavioral economics' Prospect Theory (Kahneman &amp; Tversky, 1979) and valuates people's privacy preferences in information disclosure scenarios. VOPE is based on an iterative and responsive methodology in which users take or leave a transaction that includes a component of information disclosure. To evaluate the method, we conduct an empirical experiment (n = 195), estimating people's privacy valuations in electronic commerce transactions. We report on the convergence of estimations and validate our results by comparing the values to theoretical projections of existing results (Tsai, Egelman, Cranor, &amp; Acquisti, 2011), and to another independent experiment that required participants to rank the sensitivity of information disclosure transactions. Finally, we discuss how information systems designers and regulators can use VOPE to create and to oversee systems that balance privacy and utility.
Keywords: Online privacy; Value of privacy; Utility and privacy; Information disclosure; User study; Privacy in electronic commerce

Ian H. Witten, Eibe Frank and Mark A. Hall, Chapter 12 - The Knowledge Flow Interface, In The Morgan Kaufmann Series in Data Management Systems, Morgan Kaufmann, Boston, 2011, Pages 495-503, Data Mining: Practical Machine Learning Tools and Techniques (Third Edition), ISBN 9780123748560, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-374856-0.00012-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123748560000122)

Sina S. Jamali, Douglas J. Mills, A critical review of electrochemical noise measurement as a tool for evaluation of organic coatings, Progress in Organic Coatings, Volume 95, June 2016, Pages 26-37, ISSN 0300-9440, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.porgcoat.2016.02.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0300944016301631)
Abstract: Abstract
The simplicity of measuring equipment and versatility of data analysis makes electrochemical noise measurement an ideal technique for acquiring electrochemical information about the corrosion behavior of a painted metal relatively quickly. Hence the method has great potential for use in the laboratory as well as in field situations. However, special care must be taken in choosing data acquisition parameters, reference electrodes and symmetry of electrodes in order to achieve reproducible measurements. These areas have been discussed in this review along with methods of data analysis, alternative electrode configurations for on-site measurements and novel applications of the technique.
Keywords: Electrochemical noise measurement; Cell configurations; Organic coatings; Reference electrode; Electrode asymmetry; Field measurement

B. Denby, T. Schultz, K. Honda, T. Hueber, J.M. Gilbert, J.S. Brumberg, Silent speech interfaces, Speech Communication, Volume 52, Issue 4, April 2010, Pages 270-287, ISSN 0167-6393, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.specom.2009.08.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167639309001307)
Abstract: The possibility of speech processing in the absence of an intelligible acoustic signal has given rise to the idea of a ‘silent speech’ interface, to be used as an aid for the speech-handicapped, or as part of a communications system operating in silence-required or high-background-noise environments. The article first outlines the emergence of the silent speech interface from the fields of speech production, automatic speech processing, speech pathology research, and telecommunications privacy issues, and then follows with a presentation of demonstrator systems based on seven different types of technologies. A concluding section underlining some of the common challenges faced by silent speech interface researchers, and ideas for possible future directions, is also provided.
Keywords: Silent speech; Speech pathologies; Cellular telephones; Speech recognition; Speech synthesis

Guillaume Lemaitre, Olivier Houix, Yon Visell, Karmen Franinović, Nicolas Misdariis, Patrick Susini, Toward the design and evaluation of continuous sound in tangible interfaces: The Spinotron, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 67, Issue 11, November 2009, Pages 976-993, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2009.07.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581909000901)
Abstract: This paper reports on an approach to the design of continuous sonic feedback in tangible interfaces, and on quantitative evaluation methods intended to guide such design tasks. The issues it addresses may be of central relevance to areas of the emerging discipline of sonic interaction design that have begun to address the unique problems of designing sound for highly interactive contexts. Three experiments were conducted to assess two key aspects of the sound design developed for an abstract object designed for these experiments, which we refer to as the Spinotron. First, a comparison of sound source identification was made between three cases: passive listening to temporally static sounds; passive listening to dynamically evolving sounds; and listening to sounds generated through active manipulation of the artifact. The results show that control over the sound production process influences the material of the objects in interaction identified as the source of the sounds. Second, in a learning experiment, users’ performance with the Spinotron device was compared between a group of participants that were provided only with passive proprioceptive information, and for another group who were also presented with synthetic sound produced by the artifact. The results indicated that the sound, when present, aided users in learning to control the device, whereas without the sound no learning was observed. Together, these results hold promise toward creating a foundation for the design of continuous sound that is intended to accompany control actions on the part of users, and toward establishing a basis for experimental/quantitative evaluation methods and gathering basic knowledge about sensory-motor activity engaged in tangible sonic interactions.
Keywords: Sonic interaction design; Auditory perception; Sound identification

Herre van Oostendorp, Benjamin J. Walbeehm, Towards modelling exploratory learning in the context of direct manipulation interfaces, Interacting with Computers, Volume 7, Issue 1, March 1995, Pages 3-24, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0953-5438(95)90817-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0953543895908175)
Abstract: The characteristics of direct manipulation interfaces (DMIs) are examined. The main purpose of this examination is to provide ideas for future research on modelling exploratory learning in the context of using DMIs.

Four topics are discussed: the perceptual characteristics of DMIs, exploratory learning and display-based problem-solving in general, modelling human-computer interaction in the context of DMIs, and the consequences of DMIs for modelling the interaction by means of a production system.

Specifically, the questions that are discussed are: first, how do DMIs afford, encourage and support exploratory learning, and how can typical DMI characteristics such as the objects on the screen be included in models of user behaviour? Second, what are the characteristics of problem-solving and exploratory learning in the context of visual displays? Third, how is novice behaviour and, more generally, problem-solving modelled in the context of human-computer interaction?

In the final section, suggestions are made based on the topics discussed, with the aim of presenting some steps towards developing a model consisting of production rules that can simulate human interaction with DMIs more adequately than has been the case thus far. Two important consequences of DMIs for modelling human interaction are discussed. First, the external display of DMIs allows recognition instead of recall. Consequently, production rules can be more recognition-based. Second, with regard to the structure of production systems, the mechanism of partial matching is proposed to account for errors during performance. Constraints and affordances can be accounted for by proposing production rules to fire contextdependently, and by assuming that production rules can be meaningfully grouped and actively scanned for a match.
Keywords: human-computer interaction; exploratory learning; direct manipulation interface

Winston F. Erevelles, Sooryanarayana K. Aithal, Development of an interface between a supervisory shop controller and MRP system in a CIM environment, Journal of Materials Processing Technology, Volume 61, Issues 1–2, August 1996, Pages 120-123, ISSN 0924-0136, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0924-0136(96)02475-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0924013696024752)
Abstract: This paper addresses the integration of an MRP-based manufacturing system software with supervisory control software. The Bill of Materials (BOM) for the parts of this assembly, Product Costs, Master Production Schedule (MPS), Forecasts, and Inventories are generated using the MRP software. Pertinent information required for coordination and control of the assembly process is exported using a data exported module in the software. This information is then used to retrieve components of this product from an AS/RS, transport them to an assembly cell using an AGV, and assemble them using a SCARA robot. The MRP database is periodically updated using a resident data import module.
Keywords: CIM; MRP; interface; supervisory control

Nicolas Coudray, Gilles Hermann, Daniel Caujolle-Bert, Argyro Karathanou, Françoise Erne-Brand, Jean-Luc Buessler, Pamela Daum, Juergen M. Plitzko, Mohamed Chami, Urs Mueller, Hubert Kihl, Jean-Philippe Urban, Andreas Engel, Hervé-W. Rémigy, Automated screening of 2D crystallization trials using transmission electron microscopy: A high-throughput tool-chain for sample preparation and microscopic analysis, Journal of Structural Biology, Volume 173, Issue 2, February 2011, Pages 365-374, ISSN 1047-8477, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jsb.2010.09.019.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1047847710002881)
Abstract: We have built and extensively tested a tool-chain to prepare and screen two-dimensional crystals of membrane proteins by transmission electron microscopy (TEM) at room temperature. This automated process is an extension of a new procedure described recently that allows membrane protein 2D crystallization in parallel (Iacovache et al., 2010). The system includes a gantry robot that transfers and prepares the crystalline solutions on grids suitable for TEM analysis and an entirely automated microscope that can analyze 96 grids at once without human interference. The operation of the system at the user level is solely controlled within the MATLAB environment: the commands to perform sample handling (loading/unloading in the microscope), microscope steering (magnification, focus, image acquisition, etc.) as well as automatic crystal detection have been implemented. Different types of thin samples can efficiently be screened provided that the particular detection algorithm is adapted to the specific task. Hence, operating time can be shared between multiple users. This is a major step towards the integration of transmission electron microscopy into a high throughput work-flow.
Keywords: Automation; 2D crystallization; Electron crystallography; Grid preparation; High throughput; Image processing; Membrane protein; Negative staining

J. Brandon Keith, Jacob R. Fennick, Chad E. Junkermeier, Daniel R. Nelson, James P. Lewis, A web-deployed interface for performing ab initio molecular dynamics, optimization, and electronic structure in Fireball, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 180, Issue 3, March 2009, Pages 418-426, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cpc.2008.10.007.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0010465508003354)
Abstract: Fireball is an ab initio technique for fast local orbital simulations of nanotechnological, solid state, and biological systems. We have implemented a convenient interface for new users and software architects in the platform-independent Java language to access Fireball's unique and powerful capabilities. The graphical user interface can be run directly from a web server or from within a larger framework such as the Computational Science and Engineering Online (CSE-Online) environment or the Distributed Analysis of Neutron Scattering Experiments (DANSE) framework. We demonstrate its use for high-throughput electronic structure calculations and a multi-100 atom quantum molecular dynamics (MD) simulation.
Program summary
Program title: FireballUI

Catalogue identifier: AECF_v1_0

Program summary URL: http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/summaries/AECF_v1_0.html

Program obtainable from: CPC Program Library, Queen's University, Belfast, N. Ireland

Licensing provisions: Standard CPC licence, http://cpc.cs.qub.ac.uk/licence/licence.html

No. of lines in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 279 784

No. of bytes in distributed program, including test data, etc.: 12 836 145

Distribution format: tar.gz

Programming language: Java

Computer: PC and workstation

Operating system: The GUI will run under Windows, Mac and Linux. Executables for Mac and Linux are included in the package.

RAM: 512 MB

Word size: 32 or 64 bits

Classification: 4.14

Nature of problem: The set up and running of many simulations (all of the same type), from the command line, is a slow process. But most research quality codes, including the ab initio tight-binding code FIREBALL, are designed to run from the command line. The desire is to have a method for quickly and efficiently setting up and running a host of simulations.

Solution method: We have created a graphical user interface for use with the FIREBALL code. Once the user has created the files containing the atomic coordinates for each system that they are going to run a simulation on, the user can set up and start the computations of up to hundreds of simulations.

Running time: 3 to 5 minutes on a 2 GHz Pentium IV processor.
Keywords: Fireball; Ab initio tight-binding; GUI

M. May, CAS APPROACH TO GRAPHICAL PROGRAMMING AND DOCUMENTATION OF PROGRAMMABLE CONTROLLERS, In IFAC Symposia Series, edited by CHEN ZHEN-YU,, Pergamon, Oxford, 1989, Pages 201-207, Computer Aided Design in Control Systems 1988, ISBN 9780080357386, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-08-035738-6.50035-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780080357386500355)
Abstract: Keywords

Computer aided design; programmable controllers; computer graphics; computer aided schematics; graphical documentation; optimization; layout; graph theory.

Tomas Axling, Seif Haridi, A tool for developing interactive configuration applications, The Journal of Logic Programming, Volume 26, Issue 2, February 1996, Pages 147-168, ISSN 0743-1066, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0743-1066(95)00097-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0743106695000976)
Abstract: Knowledge-based techniques have been proven to be well suited for configuration tasks and several, often successful, systems have been developed. The goal of these knowledge-based techniques has in general been to produce “black box” configuration systems, i.e., batch-mode systems that take a set of requirements as input and produce configurations as output. This has resulted in rather complex systems that have been time-consuming to develop and in which the choices of components, which are often subjective, are hidden from the user. In this paper we present a less complex and more interactive approach to configuration that we label interactive configuration by selection (ICS). The idea is that a configuration system could be more of a tool, assisting in the task of configuration, than a “black box” automatically producing configurations directly from requirements. To support the approach we have developed OBELICS. OBELICS is a prototype of a tool, implemented in SICStus Objects, that integrates both a problem-solving method for ICS and a tool for domain knowledge modeling. With OBELICS we hope to demonstrate that such a tool can make it feasible and profitable to develop configuration applications, even for small scale applications.

H. Berger, J. Altenbach, Graphical representation of models and results in the finite element system COSAR, Computers & Graphics, Volume 14, Issues 3–4, 1990, Pages 395-404, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(90)90060-B.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/009784939090060B)
Abstract: The finite element method has become one of the most-used calculation procedures in various fields of engineering in recent years. Due to progress in hardware architecture and computer graphics, the efficiency of its application could increase decisively. Notably, the solution of complex problems would be unthinkable today without the availability of powerful graphic processors.

In connection with the development of the finite element system COSAR at the Technical University Magdeburg, various graphic processors were created. In this paper, these processors are introduced. Information is given about interactive techniques for the generation of finite element models, about checking procedures for complex 3D structures by graphical means, and about possibilities for result presentation with colored pictures. Requirements for hardware architecture and software tools in the field of graphical input and output are discussed.

Richard Kennard, John Leaney, Towards a general purpose architecture for UI generation, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 83, Issue 10, October 2010, Pages 1896-1906, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jss.2010.05.079.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0164121210001597)
Abstract: Many software projects spend a significant proportion of their time developing the User Interface (UI), therefore any degree of automation in this area has clear benefits. Such automation is difficult due principally to the diversity of architectures, platforms and development environments. Attempts to automate UI generation to date have contained restrictions which did not accommodate this diversity, leading to a lack of wide industry adoption or standardisation. The authors set out to understand and address these restrictions. We studied the issues of UI generation (especially duplication) in practice, using action research cycles guided by interviews, adoption studies and close collaboration with industry practitioners. In addressing the issues raised in our investigation, we identified five key characteristics any UI generation technique would need before it should expect wide adoption or standardisation. These can be summarised as: inspecting existing, heterogeneous back-end architectures; appreciating different practices in applying inspection results; recognising multiple, and mixtures of, UI widget libraries; supporting multiple, and mixtures of, UI adornments; applying multiple, and mixtures of, UI layouts. Many of these characteristics seem ignored by current approaches. In addition, we discovered an emergent feature of these characteristics that opens the possibility of a previously unattempted goal – namely, retrofitting UI generation to an existing application.
Keywords: User Interface generation; Software mining; Retrofitting; Action research; Interviews; Adoption studies

Dong-Seok Lee, The effect of visualizing the flow of multimedia content among and inside devices, Applied Ergonomics, Volume 40, Issue 3, May 2009, Pages 440-447, ISSN 0003-6870, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.apergo.2008.10.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0003687008001580)
Abstract: This study introduces a user interface, referred to as the flow interface, which provides a graphical representation of the movement of content among and inside audio/video devices. The proposed interface provides a different frame of reference with content-oriented visualization of the generation, manipulation, storage, and display of content as well as input and output. The flow interface was applied to a VCR/DVD recorder combo, one of the most complicated consumer products. A between-group experiment was performed to determine whether the flow interface helps users to perform various tasks and to examine the learning effect of the flow interface, particularly in regard to hooking up and recording tasks. The results showed that participants with access to the flow interface performed better in terms of success rate and elapsed time. In addition, the participants indicated that they could easily understand the flow interface. The potential of the flow interface for application to other audio video devices, and design issues requiring further consideration, are discussed.
Keywords: Flow interface; User interface design; Interaction design; Home audio video systems; Visualizing content flow

Tania Di Mascio, Daniele Frigioni, Laura Tarantino, VISTO: A new CBIR system for vector images, Information Systems, Volume 35, Issue 7, November 2010, Pages 709-734, ISSN 0306-4379, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.is.2009.10.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S030643790900101X)
Abstract: In this paper, we present the main features of VISTO (Vector Image Search TOol), a new content-based image retrieval (CBIR) system for vector images. Though unsuitable for photo-realistic imagery, vector graphics are continually becoming more advanced and diffused. Vector images are fully scalable, resolution independent, not restricted to rectangular shape, allowing layering and editable/searchable text. Notwithstanding this increasing interest, the research area concerning CBIR systems for vectorial images is quite new, and our research on a vector based CBIR system actually derives from a precise request of vector based application experts that did not find appropriate solutions to their retrieval problems in customary shape-based CBIR system. To the best of our knowledge, VISTO is the first CBIR system for vector images proposed in the literature, and it supports the retrieval of images in SVG (scalable vector graphics) format.

We discuss VISTO from both the engine and the interface points of view, and then evaluate its engine from an experimental point of view within an advanced high quality 2D animation environment supporting cartoon episodes management. To satisfy the requirements of stroke-based applications, in VISTO vector images are modelled as inertial systems and then associated with descriptors representing visual features invariant to translation, rotation, and scaling transformations. Furthermore, to efficiently serve different application domains, the engine offers a variety of moment sets as well as different distance functions for similarity computation. The graphical interface offers tools that help in the selection of criteria and parameters necessary to tune the system to a specific application domain.
Keywords: Content-based image retrieval; Vector images; Feature extraction; User interface; Experimental evaluation

G. Noguere, J.-Ch. Sublet, A nuclear data oriented interface code for processing applications, Annals of Nuclear Energy, Volume 35, Issue 12, December 2008, Pages 2259-2269, ISSN 0306-4549, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.anucene.2008.09.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S030645490800248X)
Abstract: A new user interface code developed to facilitate the processing of evaluated nuclear data is presented. The CadTui package proposes an easy-to-use interface with the widely use processing and nuclear data codes. It was especially designed to simplify the complex relationships between an evaluation and its processing. In response to requests from users involved in reactor development programs, intuitive Unix commands relying on Monte Carlo techniques were implemented to propagate the uncertainty of the model parameters to integral calculations at a given dilution cross section.

Thomas Hiller, Process programming using graphical objects, Microprocessing and Microprogramming, Volume 27, Issues 1–5, August 1989, Pages 633-638, ISSN 0165-6074, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0165-6074(89)90124-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0165607489901245)
Abstract: An new approach in the field of process control programming is the usage of graphical objects. This new conception tries to concentrate on the process itself and not on special languages used by different PCU's. The main idea is that pictures nowadays used only for process supervision are used at programming time. The problem itself is solved by dividing it in small function units. Every unit has a graphical equivalent associated to it. These objects are now used for programming. A synthesis phase delivers the final control program in the desired PCU language.

H. Lipson, M. Shpitalni, A New Interface for Conceptual Design Based on Object Reconstruction from a Single Freehand Sketch, CIRP Annals - Manufacturing Technology, Volume 44, Issue 1, 1995, Pages 133-136, ISSN 0007-8506, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0007-8506(07)62291-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0007850607622914)
Abstract: A new system has been developed for improving user interaction with CAD systems, particularly in the conceptual design stage. The system is based on interactive, part-by-part formation of a geometrical model using freehand sketching. A single 2D inaccurate projection is entered in the form of a line drawing. The system analyzes and interprets the input and then reconstructs a 3D model of the object most likely to be represented by the sketch. This 3D model can be further manipulated or modified, and more parts can be sketched. This approach provides a fluent and intuitive tool for conceptual design. In the paper, the proposed system is presented and the basic ideas are discussed and exemplified.
Key Words: CAD; Conceptual Design; Interface

E. Nygren, M. Johnson, P. Henriksson, Reading the medical record. II. Design of a human-computer interface for basic reading of computerized medical records, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 39, Issues 1–2, September–October 1992, Pages 13-25, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-2607(92)90054-B.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/016926079290054B)
Abstract: A user interface for reading the medical record was designed and implemented on a workstation with a 19-inch colour screen. The text is presented on imitations of paper-pages. The pages are organized in bundles which are dynamically connected to scrollable index lists. The turning of pages on the screen is the fundamental concept of the interface. A page can be turned by a mouse-click or by a circular mouse-movement. Elaborated feedback is given to the user in order to provide effortless orientation and navigation. The interface supports the basic ways of use identified in our analyses of reading habits. It also enables human perceptual and cognitive skills to be used. It seems very easy to learn and efficient in use.
Keywords: Medical record; Human-computer interface

Newton S. Lee, Graphical knowledge programming with KNAPS, International Journal of Man-Machine Studies, Volume 31, Issue 6, December 1989, Pages 611-641, ISSN 0020-7373, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0020-7373(89)90019-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0020737389900199)
Abstract: This paper introduces KNAPS, a graphical expert system tool for domain experts to program problem-solving strategies, to incrementally test and debug the encoded knowledge, and to generate C programs for maximum efficiency and delivery on small computers. KNAPS provides domain experts who are not trained in computer science the capability to add, update, test, and debug knowledge graphically. The graphical approach forces an explicit representation of knowledge that is highly understandable, easily modifiable, and visually tractable. Moreover, KNAPS has the ability to generate C programs directly from the graphically represented knowledge. The graphs-to-C translation process is 100% automated. In essence, KNAPS offers a practical solution to alleviate the expertise transfer bottleneck in knowledge engineering, to eliminate programming errors resulted from hand-coding knowledge, and to facilitate the deployment of laboratory prototypes into real-world computing environments. KNAPS was developed using KEE and Common Lisp on a Symbolics 3650 workstation.

Nicoletta Dessì, Barbara Pes, Smart Spaces for Adaptive Information Integration in Bioinformatics, Future Generation Computer Systems, Available online 21 July 2016, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2016.07.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X16302345)
Abstract: Abstract
Bioinformatics is reaping the benefits of advances in Semantic Web technology thanks to the growing number of available biomedical web resources and portals. Although positive in general, this abundance poses practical challenges to researchers who must be skilled in techniques for retrieving and integrating sparse and complex contents, and thereof calls for more “intelligent” and user friendly ways of interaction to easily get information. With the aim of making available the intelligent functionality of smart systems, this paper presents SSAIIB (Smart Spaces for Adaptive Information Integration in Bioinformatics), a reference framework for designing bioinformatics smart applications that support discovering, aggregating and delivering contents from web resources according to user’s goals, tasks and concerns. The “Smart Spaces” are software environments whose smartness lies in their ability to adaptively accomplish specific user’s activities such as the exploiting content from biomedical resources, integrating data captured from different sources, supporting data analytics, etc. SSAIIB is structured around two main technologies: service oriented architectures and software agents. In particular, it relies on mechanisms for dynamically assembling suitable services and the use of agents as a natural metaphor for both modelling user’s activities and accessing web resources. A case study is presented that shows the application of SSAIIB to the design and the implementation of a smart space for annotating biomedical texts.
Keywords: Smart applications; Software agents; Adaptive user interaction; Biomedical ontologies; Text annotation

Dennis R. Moreau, Wayne D. Dominick, Object-oriented graphical information systems: Research plan and evaluation metrics, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 10, Issue 1, July 1989, Pages 23-28, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0164-1212(89)90059-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0164121289900599)
Abstract: The object-oriented design strategy, as both a problem decomposition and a system-implementation methodology, holds significant potential benefits for software design and implementation in scientific computing environments. Additionally, certain characteristics of object-oriented systems are particularly suited to supporting graphics-application development. This paper presents the initial direction and organization of research and development activities in the area of object-oriented graphical information systems at the University of Southwestern Louisiana. These activities, structured as a four-phase research plan, are intended to provide significant and extensible results in the evaluation of the impact of object-oriented methodologies on graphical-information system design and implementation. The long-term goals of this research include the formulation of complexity models for object-oriented development of software and the formulation and validation of software-development metrics appropriate to object-oriented systems.

D.D. Woods, Price of flexibility in intelligent interfaces, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 6, Issue 4, December 1993, Pages 189-195, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-7051(93)90011-H.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095070519390011H)
Abstract: Flexibility and customizability are central to the perceived advantages of the growth in technological powers. However, these and other vectors of technological change, when used clumsily, create new burdens and complexities for beleaguered human practitioners responsible for achieving goals within some field of activity. ‘Intelligent interfaces’ are sometimes seen as solutions to the growing demands of highly technological and highly automated fields of activity. However, data from a variety of sources indicates that an exclusively technology-driven approach to the development of intelligent interfaces is likely to provide the illusion of assistance while creating a new layer of burdens and complexities. It is necessary to understand the difference between two types of flexibility in cognitive artifacts: (a) flexibilities that increase practitioners' ranges of adaptive responses to the variability in the field of activity, and (b) flexibilities that simply create new burdens on practitioners, especially at high tempos or high criticality periods.
Keywords: adaptive interfaces; human-computer interaction; intelligent systems

C. Kolski, E. Le Strugeon, M. Tendjaoui, Implementation of AI techniques for “intelligent” interface development, Engineering Applications of Artificial Intelligence, Volume 6, Issue 4, August 1993, Pages 295-305, ISSN 0952-1976, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0952-1976(93)90014-O.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095219769390014O)
Abstract: This paper presents the implementation of AI techniques for the development of an original approach to “intelligent” interfacing. This intelligent interface is called: the Decisional Module of Imagery (D.M.I.). The “heart” of the D.M.I. is an expert system that manipulates three main objects (the WHAT, WHEN and HOW objects) described in the paper. Knowledge specification and representation for the expert system are then explained. Finally, a first technical validation is presented and discussed.
Keywords: Process control; man-machine systems; expert systems; knowledge engineering; inference processes; “intelligent” interface

Jeongyun Heo, Dong-Han Ham, Sanghyun Park, Chiwon Song, Wan Chul Yoon, A framework for evaluating the usability of mobile phones based on multi-level, hierarchical model of usability factors, Interacting with Computers, Volume 21, Issue 4, August 2009, Pages 263-275, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2009.05.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543809000393)
Abstract: As a mobile phone has various advanced functionalities or features, usability issues are increasingly challenging. Due to the particular characteristics of a mobile phone, typical usability evaluation methods and heuristics, most of which are relevant to a software system, might not effectively be applied to a mobile phone. Another point to consider is that usability evaluation activities should help designers find usability problems easily and produce better design solutions. To support usability practitioners of the mobile phone industry, we propose a framework for evaluating the usability of a mobile phone, based on a multi-level, hierarchical model of usability factors, in an analytic way. The model was developed on the basis of a set of collected usability problems and our previous study on a conceptual framework for identifying usability impact factors. It has multi-abstraction levels, each of which considers the usability of a mobile phone from a particular perspective. As there are goal-means relationships between adjacent levels, a range of usability issues can be interpreted in a holistic as well as diagnostic way. Another advantage is that it supports two different types of evaluation approaches: task-based and interface-based. To support both evaluation approaches, we developed four sets of checklists, each of which is concerned, respectively, with task-based evaluation and three different interface types: Logical User Interface (LUI), Physical User Interface (PUI) and Graphical User Interface (GUI). The proposed framework specifies an approach to quantifying usability so that several usability aspects are collectively measured to give a single score with the use of the checklists. A small case study was conducted in order to examine the applicability of the framework and to identify the aspects of the framework to be improved. It showed that it could be a useful tool for evaluating the usability of a mobile phone. Based on the case study, we improved the framework in order that usability practitioners can use it more easily and consistently.
Keywords: Mobile usability; User interfaces; Usability evaluation; Evaluation framework

László Kruppa, Graphical display for tactile perception, Journal of Microcomputer Applications, Volume 13, Issue 2, April 1990, Pages 165-176, ISSN 0745-7138, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0745-7138(90)90019-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0745713890900194)

Deepesh Gandhi, Sekhar K. Chakrabarti, Prabir C. Basu, A study on the local behaviour of steel–concrete interfaces at and around large openings in the PSC inner containment dome, Nuclear Engineering and Design, Volume 239, Issue 3, March 2009, Pages 442-454, ISSN 0029-5493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nucengdes.2008.11.018.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S002954930800616X)
Abstract: A finite element (FEM) study has been made to know the overall structural behaviour of a PSC inner containment (IC) dome having large steam generator (SG) openings with emphasis on the local behaviour of the steel–concrete interfaces near SG openings, under initial prestress transfer. The primary thrust of the work has been in the objective of predicting the possibilities of separation at the steel–concrete interface zones adjacent to the embedded plates of the SG openings. For the FEM analysis, the interface zone has been modeled using gap elements, the properties of which are derived from the results of the past experiments conducted on steel plate–concrete interface specimens. Important observations have been made regarding dome deformation and the stresses with special emphasis on the local behaviour of steel–concrete interfaces at and around SG openings.

S Treu, DP Sanderson, R Rozin, R Sharma, High-level, three-pronged design methodology for N-CHIME interface system software, Information and Software Technology, Volume 33, Issue 5, June 1991, Pages 306-320, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(91)90099-W.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095058499190099W)
Abstract: To enable users of the Hierarchical Simulation Language (HSL) to take full advantage of that software and its supportive tools, an interface system, called N-CHIME, was designed and implemented. It takes into account the capabilities and constraints of the user, the interface software/hardware, and the applications software. The paper provides a guided tour through the software design methodology that was developed. It represents a study of techniques for tailoring interface software for industrial use. Methodological steps are illustrated through the N-CHIME case study. Design principles and factors applicable to each of the three major system prongs are outlined. A high-level graph of user-visible states encapsulates the functionality available to the user at each point of a session. The object-oriented software architecture that accommodates those user states is an extension of the user interface management system model. The paper emphasizes the importance of defining a well structured, comprehensive design process and of ensuring designer accountability through recordings of the rationale behind each design decision.
Keywords: human—computer interaction; interface software; design methodology; design process; design rationale; simulation software; interactive modelling environment; UIMS; C++

Denis Klimov, Yuval Shahar, Meirav Taieb-Maimon, Intelligent visualization and exploration of time-oriented data of multiple patients, Artificial Intelligence in Medicine, Volume 49, Issue 1, May 2010, Pages 11-31, ISSN 0933-3657, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.artmed.2010.02.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0933365710000229)
Abstract: Objective
Clinicians and medical researchers alike require useful, intuitive, and intelligent tools to process large amounts of time-oriented multiple-patient data from multiple sources. For analyzing the results of clinical trials or for quality assessment purposes, an aggregated view of a group of patients is often required. To meet this need, we designed and developed the VISualizatIon of Time-Oriented RecordS (VISITORS) system, which combines intelligent temporal analysis and information visualization techniques. The VISITORS system includes tools for intelligent retrieval, visualization, exploration, and analysis of raw time-oriented data and derived (abstracted) concepts for multiple patient records. To derive meaningful interpretations from raw time-oriented data (known as temporal abstractions), we used the knowledge-based temporal-abstraction method.
Methods
The main module of the VISITORS system is an interactive, ontology-based exploration module, which enables the user to visualize raw data and abstract (derived) concepts for multiple patient records, at several levels of temporal granularity; to explore these concepts; and to display associations among raw and abstract concepts. A knowledge-based delegate function is used to convert multiple data points into one delegate value representing each temporal granule. To select the population of patients to explore, the VISITORS system includes an ontology-based temporal-aggregation specification language and a graphical expression-specification module. The expressions, applied by an external temporal mediator, retrieve a list of patients, a list of relevant time intervals, and a list of time-oriented patients’ data sets, by using an expressive set of time and value constraints.
Results
Functionality and usability evaluation of the interactive exploration module was performed on a database of more than 1000 oncology patients by a group of 10 users—five clinicians and five medical informaticians. Both types of users were able in a short time (mean of 2.5 ± 0.2 min per question) to answer a set of clinical questions, including questions that require the use of specialized operators for finding associations among derived temporal abstractions, with high accuracy (mean of 98.7 ± 2.4 on a predefined scale from 0 to 100). There were no significant differences between the response times and between accuracy levels of the exploration of the data using different time lines, i.e., absolute (i.e., calendrical) versus relative (referring to some clinical key event). A system usability scale (SUS) questionnaire filled out by the users demonstrated the VISITORS system to be usable (mean score for the overall group: 69.3), but the clinicians’ usability assessment was significantly lower than that of the medical informaticians.
Conclusions
We conclude that intelligent visualization and exploration of longitudinal data of multiple patients with the VISITORS system is feasible, functional, and usable.
Keywords: Multiple patients; Intelligent user interfaces; Temporal databases; Temporal abstraction; Knowledge-based systems; Information visualization; Interactive data mining; Oncology

S Jha, M Hassan, Building agents for rule-based intrusion detection system, Computer Communications, Volume 25, Issue 15, 15 September 2002, Pages 1366-1373, ISSN 0140-3664, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0140-3664(02)00038-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0140366402000385)
Abstract: In this paper we describe the development and testing of an agent-based intrusion detection system for Linux platform. We take a dual-approach to intrusion detection: pre-emptory and reactionary. With the pre-emptory approach, a network-based agent is implemented to monitor all packets entering the network and detect a known attack-based on a pre-defined rule. The reactionary approach is realized through a separate host-based agent to routinely check specific log files in order to detect system anomalies caused by successful attacks. Once a possible intrusion attempt has been detected by either one of the agents, it attempts to block the attack, records the attack details in a system log file, E-mails the system administrator, displays a warning through a graphical warning window. The agents operate in the background of user applications and system software without any noticeable performance effect on them.
Keywords: Intrusion detection system; Linux platform; Graphical warning interface

Thomas A. DeFanti, Jason Leigh, Luc Renambot, Byungil Jeong, Alan Verlo, Lance Long, Maxine Brown, Daniel J. Sandin, Venkatram Vishwanath, Qian Liu, Mason J. Katz, Philip Papadopoulos, Joseph P. Keefe, Gregory R. Hidley, Gregory L. Dawe, Ian Kaufman, Bryan Glogowski, Kai-Uwe Doerr, Rajvikram Singh, Javier Girado, Jurgen P. Schulze, Falko Kuester, Larry Smarr, The OptIPortal, a scalable visualization, storage, and computing interface device for the OptiPuter, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 25, Issue 2, February 2009, Pages 114-123, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2008.06.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X08001040)
Abstract: The OptIPortal is a tiled display that is the visual interface to the OptIPuter, a global-scale computing system tied together by tens of gigabits of networking. The main point of the OptIPuter project is to examine a “future” in which networking is not a bottleneck to local, regional, national and international computing. OptIPortals are designed to allow collaborative sharing over 1-10 gigabit/second networks of extremely high-resolution graphic output, as well as video streams. OptIPortals typically consist of an array of 4 to 70 LCD display panels (either 2-megapixel or 4-megapixel each), driven by an appropriately sized cluster of PCs, with optimized graphics processors and network interface cards. Rather than exist as one-of-a-kind laboratory prototypes, OptIPortals are designed to be openly and widely replicated, balancing the state of the art of PCs, graphic processing, networks, servers, software, middleware, and user interfaces, and installed in the context of a laboratory or office conference room. Discussed in detail are the design decisions made to achieve a replicable tiled display that can be built by computational science researchers in various disciplines.

M.J.M. Pires, Micromagnetic simulations for the magnetization reversal in ultrathin Fe/Rh/FeCo films, Computational Materials Science, Volume 115, 1 April 2016, Pages 77-84, ISSN 0927-0256, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.commatsci.2016.01.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0927025616000161)
Abstract: Abstract
Micromagnetic simulations have been used to investigate the magnetization reversal in ultrathin Fe/Rh/FeCo trilayer. The influence of parameters like interlayer magnetic couplings, density of spin-current, and applied magnetic fields was studied. The technological interest on this system comes from the possibilities of stabilization of a nonorthogonal configuration of the magnetizations of the Fe and FeCo layers, recently achieved experimentally. The calculations presented in this work show that this particular magnetization configuration reduces the switching time as compared to the case where both layers have perpendicular magnetic anisotropy. The reversal promoted by pure electrical current (via spin-transfer torque), pure static magnetic field, and a combination of field and current were simulated. It has been found the configurations providing the shortest switching time are the ones with the Fe layer easy direction along [1 1 1] or [1 0 1] and with the FeCo layer presenting perpendicular magnetic anisotropy.
Keywords: Numerical micromagnetics; Magnetization switching; Nonorthogonal configuration for the magnetizations in trilayer systems

Vittorio Castelli, Lawrence Bergman, Tessa Lau, Daniel Oblinger, Sheepdog, parallel collaborative programming-by-demonstration, Knowledge-Based Systems, Volume 23, Issue 2, March 2010, Pages 94-109, ISSN 0950-7051, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.knosys.2009.06.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0950705109000926)
Abstract: We introduce parallel collaborative programming-by-demonstration (PBD) as a principled approach to capturing knowledge on how to perform computer-based procedures by independently recording multiple experts executing these tasks and combining the recordings via a learning algorithm. Traditional PBD has focused on end-user programming for a single user, and does not support parallel collaborative procedure model construction from examples provided by multiple experts. In this paper we discuss how to extend the main aspects of PBD (instrumentation, abstraction, learning, and execution), and we describe the implementation of these extensions in a system called Sheepdog.
Keywords: Programming-by-demonstration; Intelligent user interfaces; Artificial intelligence; Parallel collaborative programming-by-demonstration; Architecture for programing-by-demonstration

Lesley Ann Carpenter, Portable graphical software — Its design, implementation and use, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 50, Issues 1–2, July 1988, Pages 159-168, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0010-4655(88)90123-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0010465588901233)
Abstract: An animal unable to adapt to changes in its environment is surely destined to follow in the footsteps of the dinosaur; the same could be said of computer software developed without due consideration of its target environment. This paper aims to illustrate that, given suitable direction, software can be developed which adds significant weight to the odds on its own survival; particular attention is paid to the development of graphical software.

Annelise Mark Pejtersen and Jens Rasmussen, Chapter 13 - Ecological Information Systems and Support of Learning: Coupling Work Domain Information to User Characteristics, In Handbook of Human-Computer Interaction (Second Edition), edited by Marting G. Helander, Thomas K. Landauer and Prasad V. Prabhu, North-Holland, Amsterdam, 1997, Pages 315-346, ISBN 9780444818621, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-044481862-1.50079-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444818621500790)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter presents a framework for design of work support systems for a modern, dynamic work environment in which stable work procedures are replaced with discretionary tasks and the request of continuous learning and adaptation to change. In this situation, classic task analysis is less effective and a framework is therefore presented in the chapter for work analysis, separating a representation of the work domain, its means and ends, its relational structure, and the effective task strategies among that the user may choose, from a representation of the users' general background, resources, cognitive style, and subjective preferences. The aim is to design work support systems that leave the freedom open to a user to choose a work strategy that suites the user in the particular situation. An important feature of this ecological approach to system design for support of effective learning under changes in a dynamic environment is therefore a human-work interface directed toward a transparent presentation of the action possibilities and functional/intentional boundaries and constraints of the work domain relevant for typical task situations and user categories.

Kalyan S. Perumalla, Richard M. Fujimoto, Interactive parallel simulations with the Jane framework, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 17, Issue 5, March 2001, Pages 525-537, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0167-739X(99)00086-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X99000862)
Abstract: Three important practical issues in fostering the widespread use of parallel simulation technology are the availability of graphical user interfaces, accessibility to parallel computing resources, and facilities for collaborating in the execution of simulations. The availability of sophisticated graphical interface development languages and environments, coupled with the advent of universal accessibility via the Internet, makes it easier to address these issues. As part of our projects in high-performance telecommunication network simulation and in distributed federated simulations, we are developing a simulator-neutral interactive simulation framework called Jane. Jane is intended to help users to remotely and collaboratively interact with parallel simulations over the Internet, and to help them view their own model-specific run-time animations. We document the architectural details of the Jane framework along with the issues and challenges that we faced in designing and implementing interactivity features in the framework, specifically in the context of our optimistic parallel simulator, GTW (Georgia Tech Time Warp), and the telecommunication modeling language, TeD.
Keywords: Interactive parallel simulation; Web-based simulation; Collaboration; Graphical interface; Client–server

Ralph V. Rogers, An interactive graphical aided scheduling system, Computers & Industrial Engineering, Volume 17, Issues 1–4, 1989, Pages 113-118, ISSN 0360-8352, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0360-8352(89)90046-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0360835289900466)
Abstract: Job-shop master scheduling is typically a time consuming, manual iterative design process were the shop scheduler must resolve resource allocation conflicts against multiple, noncommensurate objective. Further, such resolutions must be achieved in a highly dynamic, time constraint environment. The most common and widely employed aids for planning, generating and maintaining schedules are paper, pencil, and the gantt chart. The author proposes a computer based interactive graphical aid which can provide data of computational analysis in forms more compatible with the needs and environment of the production scheduler.

Deborah S. Gross, Robert Atlas, Jeffrey Rzeszotarski, Emma Turetsky, Janara Christensen, Sami Benzaid, Jamie Olson, Thomas Smith, Leah Steinberg, Jon Sulman, Anna Ritz, Benjamin Anderson, Catherine Nelson, David R. Musicant, Lei Chen, David C. Snyder, James J. Schauer, Environmental chemistry through intelligent atmospheric data analysis, Environmental Modelling & Software, Volume 25, Issue 6, June 2010, Pages 760-769, ISSN 1364-8152, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.envsoft.2009.12.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1364815209003041)
Abstract: Here we present a new open-source software package designed to facilitate the analysis of atmospheric data, with emphasis on data mining applications applied to single-particle mass spectrometry data from aerosol particles. The software package, Enchilada (Environmental Chemistry through Intelligent Atmospheric Data Analysis), is designed to seamlessly handle large datasets, to allow for temporal aggregation of data from many instruments, and to integrate techniques such as clustering (K-means, K-medians, and Art-2a), labeling of peaks in mass spectra, and temporal correlations of multiple datasets from multiple instrument types. The software, which continues to be developed and improved, provides users with a single package to integrate data from multiple mass spectrometer systems (ATOFMS, PALMS, SPASS, Q-AMS) as well as any time-based data stream. A detailed description of the software and examples of analysis methods that are incorporated into it are described here.
Keywords: Mass spectrometry; Clustering; Aerosol particle; Data mining; Database design; Data and knowledge visualization; User interfaces

Mary A. Keeler, Susan M. Denning, The challenge of interface design for communication theory: from interaction metaphor to contexts of discovery, Interacting with Computers, Volume 3, Issue 3, December 1991, Pages 283-301, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0953-5438(91)90018-W.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095354389190018W)
Abstract: Those who study interface design still have not resolved the issue of whether the computer is a passive medium or a communicative participant with which we can hope to ‘engage in conversation’. The authors think that this controversy reflects an inadequate philosophy of interface design, which cannot account for what purpose a medium serves in a human communication. In a short history of humancomputer interface research, we trace the development of this philosophy through three generations of computer interface technology and find that its failure lies in the conceptual limitations of its driving concept of interaction.

Just as the concept of interaction provided the transition from the past (command-line interface) to the present (desktop metaphor interface), perhaps, the concept of engagement can provide the transition from our present understanding of the ‘interactive desktop’ interface to multimedia's ‘contexts of discovery’.

The development of multimedia gives interface designers the ultimate challenge to develop interface technology that will simulate human-to-human communication. Should human communication theory be able to treat the conceptual deficiencies of interface design philosophy? The authors find fundamental challenges here and briefly indicate what Charles S. Peirce's semiotic might offer as an age-old remedy.
Keywords: human-computer interaction; interface design; multimedia

Brian Sharratt, Intelligent interfaces: The IMPACT survey, Artificial Intelligence in Engineering, Volume 6, Issue 1, January 1991, Pages 5-16, ISSN 0954-1810, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0954-1810(91)90010-L.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095418109190010L)
Abstract: The present study was commissioned by the IMPACT programme of the CEC (DG XIII B/2) with the aims of providing: (i) an overview of current research and development activity on intelligent interfaces; and (ii) support for the formulation of the IMPACT II programme in the area of intelligent interfaces. The study consisted of a short review of intelligent interface research and a survey of current R&amp;D projects in this area. The survey was conducted by phone and email and used a short questionnaire that addressed a project's experiences of developing an intelligent interface and general issues concerning the market for intelligent interfaces. The survey covered 43 R&amp;D projects in Europe and the United States.
Keywords: intelligent interfaces; intelligent assistant/apprentice systems; power tools; intelligent help systems knowledge-based systems

Marcia K. O'Malley and Abhishek Gupta, Chapter 2 - Haptic Interfaces, In Interactive Technologies, edited by Philip Kortum,, Morgan Kaufmann, San Francisco, 2008, Pages 25-73, HCI Beyond the GUI, ISBN 9780123740175, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-374017-5.00002-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978012374017500002X)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
The word “haptic” refers to the sense of touch. This sense is essentially twofold, including both cutaneous touch and kinesthetic touch. Cutaneous touch refers to the sensation of surface features and tactile perception and is usually conveyed through the skin. Kinesthetic touch sensations, which arise within the muscles and tendons, allow one to interpret where one's limbs are in space and in relation to him or her. The sense of touch is one of the most informative senses that humans possess. Mechanical interaction with a given environment is vital when a sense of presence is desired, or when a user wishes to manipulate objects within a remote or virtual environment with manual dexterity. The haptic display, or force-reflecting interface, is the robotic device that allows the user to interact with a virtual environment or teleoperated remote system. The haptic interface consists of a real-time display of a virtual or remote environment and a manipulator, which serves as the interface between the human operator and the simulation. The application of haptic interfaces in areas such as computer-aided design (CAD) and manufacturing (CAD/CAM), design prototyping, and allowing users to manipulate virtual objects before manufacturing them enhances production evaluation. Along the same lines, the users of simulators for training in surgical procedures, control panel operations, and hostile work environments benefit from such a capability. Haptic interfaces can also be employed to provide force feedback during execution of remote tasks such as telesurgery or hazardous waste removal. With such a wide range of applications, the benefits of haptic feedback are easily recognizable.

P. Heimann, T. Bluhm, Ch. Hennig, H. Kroiss, G. Kühner, J. Maier, H. Riemann, M. Zilker, Database structures and interfaces for W7-X, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 83, Issues 2–3, April 2008, Pages 393-396, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2007.08.008.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379607004140)
Abstract: The W7-X experiment of the IPP, under construction in Greifswald Germany, is designed to operate in a quasi-steady-state scenario. The database structures and interfaces used for discharge description and execution have to reflect this continuous mode of operation.

In close collaboration between the control group of W7-X and the data acquisition group a combined design of the data structures used for describing the configuration and the operation of the experiment was developed.

To guarantee access to this information from all participating stations a TCP/IP portal and a proxy server were developed. This portal enables especially the VxWorks real-time operating systems of the control stations to access the information in the object-oriented database.

The database schema includes now a more functional description of the experiment and gives the physicists a more simplified view of the necessary definitions of operational parameters. The scheduling of the long discharges of W7-X will be done by predefining operational parameters in segments and scenarios, where a scenario is a fixed sequence of segments with a common physical background. To hide the specialized information contained in the basic parameters from the experiment leader or physicist an abstraction layer was introduced that only shows physically interesting information. An executable segment will be generated after verifying the consistency of the high-level parameters by using a transformation function for every basic parameter needed.

Since the database contains all configurations and discharge definitions necessary to operate the experiment, it is very important to give the user a tool to manipulate this information in an intuitive way. A special editor (ConfiX) was designed and implemented for this task. At the moment the basic functionality for dealing with all kind of objects in the database is available. Future releases will extend the functionality to defining and editing configurations, segments and scenarios with task-specific versions.
Keywords: Database; Fusion experiment; Steady-state operation

Avi Bar Massada, Volker C. Radeloff, Susan I. Stewart, Todd J. Hawbaker, Wildfire risk in the wildland–urban interface: A simulation study in northwestern Wisconsin, Forest Ecology and Management, Volume 258, Issue 9, 10 October 2009, Pages 1990-1999, ISSN 0378-1127, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.foreco.2009.07.051.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0378112709005210)
Abstract: The rapid growth of housing in and near the wildland–urban interface (WUI) increases wildfire risk to lives and structures. To reduce fire risk, it is necessary to identify WUI housing areas that are more susceptible to wildfire. This is challenging, because wildfire patterns depend on fire behavior and spread, which in turn depend on ignition locations, weather conditions, the spatial arrangement of fuels, and topography. The goal of our study was to assess wildfire risk to a 60,000 ha WUI area in northwestern Wisconsin while accounting for all of these factors. We conducted 6000 simulations with two dynamic fire models: Fire Area Simulator (FARSITE) and Minimum Travel Time (MTT) in order to map the spatial pattern of burn probabilities. Simulations were run under normal and extreme weather conditions to assess the effect of weather on fire spread, burn probability, and risk to structures. The resulting burn probability maps were intersected with maps of structure locations and land cover types. The simulations revealed clear hotspots of wildfire activity and a large range of wildfire risk to structures in the study area. As expected, the extreme weather conditions yielded higher burn probabilities over the entire landscape, as well as to different land cover classes and individual structures. Moreover, the spatial pattern of risk was significantly different between extreme and normal weather conditions. The results highlight the fact that extreme weather conditions not only produce higher fire risk than normal weather conditions, but also change the fine-scale locations of high risk areas in the landscape, which is of great importance for fire management in WUI areas. In addition, the choice of weather data may limit the potential for comparisons of risk maps for different areas and for extrapolating risk maps to future scenarios where weather conditions are unknown. Our approach to modeling wildfire risk to structures can aid fire risk reduction management activities by identifying areas with elevated wildfire risk and those most vulnerable under extreme weather conditions.
Keywords: Fire risk; Fire spread; FARSITE; MTT; Simulation modeling; WUI

Albert Elmer, Michael A. Brook, Draw 2D, draw 3D: MOPAC 2- and 3-dimensional graphical output written using the PHIGS graphics standard, Tetrahedron Computer Methodology, Volume 2, Issue 4, 1989, Pages 223-232, ISSN 0898-5529, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0898-5529(89)90017-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0898552989900171)
Abstract: Programs, written in graPHIGS, to display 2- and 3-dimensional contour plots of orbital density of molecular orbitals are described and included on disk. The 3D image is created by “stack plotting” 2-dimensional slices of the molecular orbital density. Features including zoom, xyz-rotation, writing pixel images to a file and superposition of stick plots of the molecule on the orbital contours.
Keywords: MNDO; MOPAC; AMPAC; Molecular Orbitals; Orbital Density; Graphics; PHIGS

Giuseppe Tuveri, Paolo Meloni, Francesca Palumbo, Giovanni Pietro Seu, Igor Loi, Francesco Conti, Luigi Raffo, On-the-fly adaptivity for process networks over shared-memory platforms, Microprocessors and Microsystems, Available online 18 June 2016, ISSN 0141-9331, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.micpro.2016.06.010.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0141933116300758)
Abstract: Abstract
Modern MPSoC architectures incorporate tens of processing elements on a single die. This trend poses the need of expressing the parallelism of the applications in order to effectively exploit the available resources. Several models of computation have been proposed, that specify an application as a network of independent computational elements. Such models represent a suitable solution for systematic mapping of parallel applications onto multiprocessor architectures. However, the workload of a given application can abruptly vary, as well as the amount of computing resources available, depending on the overall workload of the system and on the input data dependency. Traditional worst-case designs may overestimate workloads, leading to resource wasting and unnecessary power consumption. To overcome such limitation, in this work we devise a fast, run-time and automatic approach able to quickly re-configure the core-to-task mapping and the degree of parallelism of the application when the available resources or the application workload change, targeting shared-memory platforms. Experiments, carried out using an FPGA implementation, demonstrate the effectiveness of the proposed approach, in terms of achievable speed-up, power saving and introduced overhead.
Keywords: Mapping re-configuration; Adaptive MP-SoCs; Shared memory platforms; Re-configurable kahn process networks

Roland Hess, Chapter 2 - Understanding Blender's Interface, In Blender Foundations, Focal Press, Boston, 2010, Pages 13-29, ISBN 9780240814308, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-240-81430-8.00002-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780240814308000020)

R.H. Weston, Model-Driven Configuration and Information Sharing in Concurrent Engineering, CIRP Annals - Manufacturing Technology, Volume 45, Issue 1, 1996, Pages 449-454, ISSN 0007-8506, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0007-8506(07)63100-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S000785060763100X)
Abstract: Interim research findings are described concerned with:
				•
consolidating and developing modelling methods and tools, which support the design and implementation of integrated systems.
•
identifying requirements for modelling ‘resources’, to support the engineering of manufacturing enterprises.


The research is funded jointly by the COP committee of EPSRC and UK industry and is being advanced in conjunction with a consortium of manufacturing user organisations and their software and system suppliers.
Keywords: Modelling; Co-ordination; Integrated computer aided manufacturing

William G. Harter, Computer graphical and semiclassical approaches to molecular rotations and vibrations, Computer Physics Reports, Volume 8, Issue 6, October 1988, Pages 319-394, ISSN 0167-7977, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0167-7977(88)90011-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0167797788900111)

Giuseppe Ghiani, Fabio Paternò, Carmen Santoro, Lucio Davide Spano, UbiCicero: A location-aware, multi-device museum guide, Interacting with Computers, Volume 21, Issue 4, August 2009, Pages 288-303, ISSN 0953-5438, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.intcom.2009.06.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0953543809000411)
Abstract: In this paper, we propose UbiCicero, a multi-device, location-aware museum guide able to opportunistically exploit large screens when users are nearby. Various types of games are included in addition to the museum and artwork descriptions. The mobile guide is equipped with an RFID reader, which detects nearby tagged artworks. By taking into account context-dependent information, including the current user position and behaviour history, as well as the type of device available, more personalised and relevant information is provided to the user, enabling a richer overall experience. We also present example applications of this solution and then discuss the results of first empirical tests performed to evaluate the usefulness and usability of the enhanced multi-device guide.
Keywords: Mobile guides; Multi-device adaptation; Location-awareness; Interactive games in museums; User interface software and technology

Huu-Tai Thai, Seung-Eock Kim, Practical advanced analysis software for nonlinear inelastic analysis of space steel structures, Advances in Engineering Software, Volume 40, Issue 9, September 2009, Pages 786-797, ISSN 0965-9978, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.advengsoft.2009.02.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0965997809000167)
Abstract: This paper presents a practical advanced analysis software which can be used for nonlinear inelastic analysis of space steel structures. The software employs the stability functions and the refined plastic hinge model to minimize modeling and computational time. The generalized displacement control method is adopted to solve the nonlinear equilibrium equations. This algorithm can accurately trace the equilibrium path of the nonlinear problem with multiple limit points and snap-back points. A user-friendly graphic interface of the software is developed to facilitate the modeling process and result interpretation of the problem. Several numerical examples are presented to verify the accuracy and computational efficiency of the proposed software by comparing the results predicted by the present software with those given by the ABAQUS and other available results.
Keywords: Stability function; Plastic hinge; Nonlinear analysis; Graphic user interface; Generalized displacement control method

Leta (Li) Hunt, Lucy S. Wegner, Project ISLA: A space/time/full-text/format search and retrieval system designed by end users, The Journal of Academic Librarianship, Volume 22, Issue 6, November 1996, Pages 440-449, ISSN 0099-1333, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0099-1333(96)90005-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0099133396900051)
Abstract: This article discusses the role of end users in the design of a multi-format digital library project (ISLA) being developed at the University of Southern California Library for the study of the Los Angeles region. ISLA focuses on the specific needs of cross-disciplinary research involving large urban regions.

Jörn Loviscach, Chapter 3 Playing with All Senses: Human–Computer Interface Devices for Games, Advances in Computers, Elsevier, 2009, Volume 77, Pages 79-115, ISSN 0065-2458, ISBN 9780123748126, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0065-2458(09)01203-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0065245809012030)
Abstract: Abstract
For a long time, computer games were limited to input and output devices such as mouse, joystick, typewriter keyboard, and TV screen. This has changed dramatically with the advent of inexpensive and versatile sensors, actuators, and visual and acoustic output devices. Modern games employ a wide variety of interface technology, which is bound to broaden even further. This creates a new task for game designers. They have to choose the right option, possibly combining several technologies to let one technology compensate for the deficiencies of the other or to achieve more immersion through new modes of interaction. To facilitate this endeavor, this chapter gives an overview on current and upcoming human–computer interface technologies, describes their inner workings, highlights applications in commercial games and game research, and points out promising new directions.

Michele Meroni, Roberto Colombo, 3S: A novel program for field spectroscopy, Computers & Geosciences, Volume 35, Issue 7, July 2009, Pages 1491-1496, ISSN 0098-3004, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cageo.2009.01.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0098300409000922)
Abstract: The graphic user interface software package spectroscopy at subnanometer spectral resolution is presented in this manuscript. The software permits efficient acquisition of field spectroscopy data and is specifically designed to facilitate the operations to compute the reflectance factor of a given object or surface from standard field spectroscopy measurements (so-called field remote sensing): incident and reflected solar radiance measurements. The developed computer code runs with widely diffused commercial low-cost visible/near-infrared Ocean Optics spectrometers. Its development was originally intended for plant studies using field spectroscopy at leaf and canopy level, but 3S can be employed in other applications such as ocean and water quality studies, geological exploration, mineral identification, precision farming and other environmental applications.
Keywords: Field spectroscopy; Reflectance factor; Graphic user interface; Data acquisition

Christer Carlsson, Olof Hagsand, DIVE—A platform for multi-user virtual environments, Computers & Graphics, Volume 17, Issue 6, November–December 1993, Pages 663-669, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(93)90115-P.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/009784939390115P)
Abstract: The Distributed Interactive Virtual Environment (DIVE) is an experimental software platform for the development of multi-user virtual reality applications. DIVE uses active replication and reliable multicast protocols to distribute data between participants. The distribution model enables a large number of users and applications to participate and interact in the same virtual environment. The DIVE platform offers a wide range of interaction support and user-related abstractions to ease the task of application and user interface construction.

J.F. Trigg, J.A.P. Smith, Y. Lerat, Do end-users meet the LIMS requirements?, Chemometrics and Intelligent Laboratory Systems, Volume 26, Issue 3, December 1994, Pages 181-187, ISSN 0169-7439, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0169-7439(94)90008-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0169743994900086)
Abstract: Emphasis on meeting end-user requirements is a key component of all laboratory information management system (LIMS) projects. This is often interpreted as providing the necessary functionality for end-users to undertake their laboratory management tasks. However, this approach can overlook a number of issues related to user capability or user interest. This paper is a case study of user reaction in the LIMS implementation in the Kodak European Analytical Laboratories and identifies a number of user concerns and describes the initiatives which have been taken in order to address those concerns.

Michael Nielsen, Thomas B. Moeslund, Moritz Störring and Erik Granum, Chapter 3 - Gesture Interfaces, In Interactive Technologies, edited by Philip Kortum,, Morgan Kaufmann, San Francisco, 2008, Pages 75-106, HCI Beyond the GUI, ISBN 9780123740175, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-374017-5.00003-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780123740175000031)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter begins with the foundation of gesture interfaces and how and where they are commonly used, followed by basic theory that will help to select and design a gesture interface and related advice and warnings. Gestures originate from natural interaction between people. They consist of movements of the body and face as nonverbal communication that complements verbal communication. This is the inspiration behind using gesture interfaces between man and machine. A gesture interface can be seen as an alternative or complement to existing interface techniques, such as the old desktop paradigm. Gesture interfaces can navigate a Windows interface just as well or better than the mouse cursor, while they may be more or less useless when it comes to fast computer games, such as three-dimensional (3D) shooters and airplane simulators. When developing a gesture interface, the objective should not be “to make a gesture interface.” It is not universally the best interface for any particular application. The objective is “to develop a more efficient interface” to a given application.

Bruce Goplen, Larry Ludeking, David Smith, Gary Warren, User-configurable MAGIC for electromagnetic PIC calculations, Computer Physics Communications, Volume 87, Issues 1–2, 2 May 1995, Pages 54-86, ISSN 0010-4655, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0010-4655(95)00010-D.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/001046559500010D)
Abstract: MAGIC is a user-configurable code that solves Maxwell's equations together with Lorentz particle motion. A variety of 2D, finite-difference electromagnetic algorithms and 3D particle-in-cell algorithms may be combined in problem-specific ways to provide fast, accurate, steady-state and transient calculations for many research and design needs. Default configurations provide good speed and accuracy for most applications, and a library of templates offers optimized algorithm configurations for specific devices. A programmable processor named POSTER provides advanced post-analysis of the field and particle solutions. Coordinate systems, boundary conditions, geometry, and materials are specified by the user, and grid generation can be manual, user-assisted, or fully automatic. MAGIC has a fully 3D counterpart called SOS. Programs exist to connect these analysis tools to parametric and CAD input from an integrated design environment.

Ray Rayburn, Chapter 39 - Digital Audio Interfacing and Networking, In Handbook for Sound Engineers (Fourth Edition), edited by Glen M. Ballou,, Focal Press, Oxford, 2008, Pages 1457-1459, 1461-1511, ISBN 9780240809694, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-240-80969-4.50043-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780240809694500432)
Abstract: In most cases it is preferred to interface digital audio devices in the digital domain, instead of using analog interconnections. This is because every time audio is transformed from analog to digital, or digital to analog, there are inevitable quality losses. While analog interfacing is simple and well understood, there are few cases in which it would be desirable to interface two digital audio devices in the analog domain. If the digital audio devices are not provided with digital audio interfaces, for example, analog interfacing will be required. Such an analog interface, however, will result in subtle changes in the digital audio from one side of the interface to the other. The exact sequence of numbers that make up the digital audio will not be reproduced at the far side of an analog interface.

Edward Mascarenhas, Vernon Rego, An architecture for visualization and user interaction in parallel environments, Computers & Graphics, Volume 19, Issue 5, September–October 1995, Pages 739-753, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(95)00056-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0097849395000569)
Abstract: An application-independent visualization interaction system is proposed, with potential for application-binding at any stage of the modeling process. Advantages of this approach include ease of use, flexibility, code reuse, and modularity. Our design ideas are manifest in the DISplay system, a graphical user interaction and display library which can be used with any parallel software. We outline its use in the dynamic display of results from computations in queueing simulations, exemplifying synchronization of multiple remote display requests, and the potential for enhanced parallel simulations. We also describe how it may be used to define customized user interaction dialogs for input from an application, and bidirectional interaction between a user and an application.

Ronald J. Leach, Graphical control systems and multiple displays, Computers & Graphics, Volume 9, Issue 4, 1985, Pages 415-422, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(85)90036-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0097849385900366)
Abstract: Control systems are considered which require updating of a large number of graphics displays of system and subsystem configurations. All of the displays are to be updated and to be shown on a CRT screen upon user demand, within a limited time period. Many models for evaluating system performance are given for different hardware combinations. The problem was initially studied at the Goddard Space Flight Center of the National Aeronautics and Space Administration in Greenbelt, Maryland with regard to ground control systems for spacecraft.

M. Vinnikov, R.S. Allison, S. Fernandes, Impact of depth of field simulation on visual fatigue: Who are impacted? and how?, International Journal of Human-Computer Studies, Volume 91, July 2016, Pages 37-51, ISSN 1071-5819, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.ijhcs.2016.03.001.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1071581916000331)
Abstract: Abstract
While stereoscopic content can be compelling, it is not always comfortable for users to interact with on a regular basis. This is because the stereoscopic content on displays viewed at a short distance has been associated with different symptoms such as eye-strain, visual discomfort, and even nausea. Many of these symptoms have been attributed to cue conflict, for example between vergence and accommodation. To resolve those conflicts, volumetric and other displays have been proposed to improve the user's experience. However, these displays are expensive, unduly restrict viewing position, or provide poor image quality. As a result, commercial solutions are not readily available. We hypothesized that some of the discomfort and fatigue symptoms exhibited from viewing in stereoscopic displays may result from a mismatch between stereopsis and blur, rather than between sensed accommodation and vergence. To find factors that may support or disprove this claim, we built a real-time gaze-contingent system that simulates depth of field (DOF) that is associated with accommodation at the virtual depth of the point of regard (POR). Subsequently, a series of experiments evaluated the impact of DOF on people of different age groups (younger versus older adults). The difference between short duration discomfort and fatigue due to prolonged viewing was also examined. Results indicated that age may be a determining factor for a user's experience of DOF. There was also a major difference in a user's perception of viewing comfort during short-term exposure and prolonged viewing. Primarily, people did not find that the presence of DOF enhanced short-term viewing comfort, while DOF alleviated some symptoms of visual fatigue but not all.
Keywords: Depth-of-field; Gaze-contingent displays; User experience; Depth perception; Visual-fatigue

Zhiqiang Zhang, Daniel A. Griffith, Developing user-friendly spatial statistical analysis modules for GIS: An example using ArcView, Computers, Environment and Urban Systems, Volume 21, Issue 1, January 1997, Pages 5-29, ISSN 0198-9715, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0198-9715(97)00011-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0198971597000112)
Abstract: Although it is generally agreed that geographic information systems (GIS) should include more statistical analysis functionalities, the issues of which functionalities should be included and how to integrate statistical analysis with GIS are still widely debated. This paper, based on a brief review of what has been done in this area, points out that it is necessary and worthwhile to develop a user-friendly statistical module in GIS directly, provides an example to illustrate how this can be implemented in ArcView using Avenue, and indicates how GIS and spatial statistical analysis can mutually benefit from such a module.

Z. Wa̧s, TAUOLA, TAUOLA universal interface PHOTOS and MC-TESTER: Status Report, Nuclear Physics B - Proceedings Supplements, Volume 189, April 2009, Pages 43-48, ISSN 0920-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.nuclphysbps.2009.03.009.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S092056320900200X)
Abstract: The status of Monte Carlo programs for the simulation of τ-lepton production and decay in high-energy accelerator experiments is reviewed. No basic changes in the organization of the programs were necessary since the previous τ-lepton conference in 2006. Minor in size, but practical, extensions for the use of the programs in high precision mixed languages enviromens are being introduced: (i) For the TAUOLA Monte Carlo generator of τ-lepton decays, automated and simultaneous use of many versions of form-factors for the calculation of optional weights for fits was discussed. A pilot example of its use was presented. (ii) New tests for PHOTOS Monte Carlo for QED bremsstrahlung in W decays were shown. (iii) Prototype version of the TAUOLA universal interface based on HepMC (the C++ event record) was mentioned. Its tests with the help of MC-TESTER were discussed.

Presented results illustrate the status of the projects performed in collaboration with Vladimir Cherepanov, Nadia Davidson, Piotr Golonka, Gizo Nanava, Tomasz Przedziński, Elżbieta Richter-Wa̧s and others.

Ahmed Seffah, Taleb Mohamed, Halima Habieb-Mammar, Alain Abran, Reconciling usability and interactive system architecture using patterns, Journal of Systems and Software, Volume 81, Issue 11, November 2008, Pages 1845-1852, ISSN 0164-1212, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jss.2008.04.037.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S016412120800085X)
Abstract: Traditional interactive system architectures such as MVC [Goldberg, A., 1984. Smaltalk-80: The Interactive Programming Environment, Addison-Wesley Publ.] and PAC [Coutaz, J., 1987. PAC, an implementation model for dialog design. In: Interact’87, Sttutgart, September 1987, pp. 431–436; Coutaz, J., 1990. Architecture models for interactive software: faillures and trends. In: Cockton, G. (Ed.), Engineering for Human–Computer Interaction, Elsevier Science Publ., pp. 137–153.] decompose the system into subsystems that are relatively independent, thereby allowing the design work to be partitioned between the user interfaces and underlying functionalities. Such architectures extend the independence assumption to usability, approaching the design of the user interface as a subsystem that can designed and tested independently from the underlying functionality. This Cartesian dichotomy can be fallacious, as functionalities buried in the application’s logic can sometimes affect the usability of the system. Our investigations model the relationships between internal software attributes and externally visible usability factors. We propose a pattern-based approach for dealing with these relationships. We conclude by discussing how these patterns can lead to a methodological framework for improving interactive system architectures, and how these patterns can support the integration of usability in the software design process.
Keywords: Usability; User interface design patterns; Software architecture; Usability factors; Software quality metrics; HCI design principles

Rana Ghosh, Tapio Nordbo, Nick Musmeci, David Egelston, Process automation configuration tool for Little Gypsy Unit No. 1 automated start-up/shut-down, Electric Power Systems Research, Volume 30, Issue 3, September 1994, Pages 183-190, ISSN 0378-7796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0378-7796(94)00853-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0378779694008531)
Abstract: In 1989, Louisiana Power &amp; Light (LP&amp;L) modernized all major control systems and computer functions at Little Gypsy Unit No. 1 (LGP-1) using the Westinghouse WDPF™ distributed control system (DSC). The new DSC had provisions for implementing a new fully automated power plant start-up and shut down capability. A process automation configuration tool (PACT) has been developed to enhance and expedite the development of the automatic start-up/shut-down procedures for Little Gypsy. This computer-aided software engineering (CASE) package was used in developing automation logic for LGP-1, which led to significant savings of manpower and time, as well as in minimizing software debugging efforts. This paper describes the philosophy and a detailed methodology adapted in the development of the automation configuration tool, and its application in the automation logic generation for LGP-1.
Keywords: Automation technology

F.J.A.M. van Houten, Manufacturing Interfaces, CIRP Annals - Manufacturing Technology, Volume 41, Issue 2, 1992, Pages 699-710, ISSN 0007-8506, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0007-8506(07)63256-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0007850607632569)
Abstract: The paper identifies the changing needs and requirements with respect to the interfacing of manufacturing functions. It considers the manufacturing system, its components and their relationships from the technological and logistic point of view, against the background of concurrent engineering. Design- and manufacturing features are considered to become the basic elements for both internal and external communication between manufacturing functions. The increasing level of automation on the shop floor requires a much more formal communication at a high level of detail. Together with the increasing need for flexibility and the resulting decrease of batch sizes, this demands a much closer integration of production planning, process planning and shop floor control. Improvement of communication in combination with the use of feed-back data from the shop floor can substantially increase the effectiveness of the planning and consequently reduce the time pressure on the manufacturing system and its operators. Planning and control of auxiliary tasks and resources like tool and fixture preparation, machine set-up, material preparation, etc. increases due date reliability and quality and lowers production cost.
Keywords: Interfaces; CAD/CAM; automation; optimization; production control; CIM

, Graphical output for manufacturing, Information and Software Technology, Volume 29, Issue 2, March–April 1987, Page 109, ISSN 0950-5849, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0950-5849(87)90337-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0950584987903375)

J. Floch, Integrating SDL and a configuration language, In SDL '95 with MSC in Case, edited by Rolv BRÆK and Amardeo SARMA, Elsevier, Amsterdam, 1995, Pages 259-268, ISBN 9780444822697, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-444-82269-7.50026-5.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780444822697500265)
Abstract: Most methodologies deal with the design and the implementation of an individual system. Traditionally SDL is used to describe the functional properties of one system; from the SDL description a concrete system is derived which implements the defined functionality. In the ESPRIT project PROTEUS, we wanted to support evolving systems i.e. a family of systems from which various instances can be adapted. The PROTEUS Configuration Language, PCL, is a notation for describing and controlling variability. Using PCL, it is also possible to describe files and tools which are used to build executable systems. PCL tools and a flexible SDL code generator support automate system building. This paper presents how we use PCL together with SDL to model variability and automated system building.

Kazimierz Bałos, Marcin Jarząb, Damian Wieczorek, Krzysztof Zieliński, Open interface for autonomic management of virtualized resources in complex systems — construction methodology, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 24, Issue 5, May 2008, Pages 390-401, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2007.08.005.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X07001379)
Abstract: This paper is a practical report presenting the methodology for constructing an open interface for the autonomic management of virtual resources in complex systems. The described methodology supports most of the autonomic computing system requirements. The presented approach is general and can be applied to different levels of distributed computing systems, ranging from physical resources, through virtualized subsystems, up to application servers and software components. The proposed solution, illustrated by the JIMS framework, fully exploits the potential of the contemporary virtualization, SOA and Java technologies for open system implementation and management, such as JMX and Web Services. As a case study, an open interface construction for the management of Solaris 10 resources has been described in detail. Many practical remarks have been made, including conclusions drawn from system implementation. The discussion of the presented solution forms a background for more general reflections about technologies that could be exploited to build autonomic computing systems.
Keywords: Management; Measurement; Design; Performance

B. Sterk, P. Carberry, C. Leeuwis, M.K. van Ittersum, M. Howden, H. Meinke, H. van Keulen, W.A.H. Rossing, The interface between land use systems research and policy: Multiple arrangements and leverages, Land Use Policy, Volume 26, Issue 2, April 2009, Pages 434-442, ISSN 0264-8377, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.landusepol.2008.05.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0264837708000689)
Abstract: In recent years, interest in the policy-informing role of research organisations has grown considerably. It has been argued from within the science domain that the management of land, whether at the field, farm or regional scale, can benefit from computer-based systems analysis. This proposition was examined through 26 semi-structured interviews, by conducting a workshop on modelling support in policy decision-making and investigating 11 European-based cases of policy-oriented modelling research. On basis of these materials, we assess approaches towards policy-oriented modelling within the domain of agricultural production and other environmental services of land. First, we define the boundary arrangements for our field of interest, i.e. computer-based systems analysis of agricultural production and ecosystems services. Such ideotypical classification of boundary arrangements makes explicit the institutional space in which system scientists function. This space enables certain activities, and at the same time constrains other initiatives, dependent on who is perceived to initiate and/or control research activities and to formulate objectives, and whether it is considered appropriate to integrate scientific knowledge development with policy work. Five ideotypical boundary arrangements are proposed: ‘Civil mandate’; ‘Trickle out’; ‘Janus face’; ‘Critical participant’; and ‘Knowledge broker’. In a second step, a number of critical leverage points are identified based on the 11 cases and these are addressed in relation to the five boundary arrangements. The term ‘leverage point’ covers means, conditions and methods that foster use of modelling work that can be changed, and thus may be part of a strategy to increase the chances that a model is used. The leverage points were: reputation of research institute and/or scientists; raising and balancing expectations; communication about and investment in the scientific basis of the modelling work; participation in model development; heterogeneous and extensive social network in policy domain; institute mandate that secures availability of ‘stepping stones’. We conceive of two applications of our research for modellers who are interested in the use of their work in the policy sphere. First, the boundary arrangement classification helps to interpret the experiences of others and to assess the relevance of lessons and suggestions for their own context. Secondly, the combination of the boundary arrangement perspective and critical leverage points presents a basis to design an institutional pathway for enhancing impact of modelling research in the policy sphere. For those researchers functioning in a science-domain-oriented environment, the analysis in this paper suggests that there are more options than the frequently proposed ‘more participation’ for increasing the likelihood that their policy-oriented work is used. These include establishing contacts with research groups or institutes that are in a position to function as ‘stepping stones’, or engaging with others to develop a social network in the policy sphere.
Keywords: Policy-oriented research; Land use; Production ecology; Model use; Boundary arrangements; Model development

Peter Huthwaite, Accelerated finite element elastodynamic simulations using the GPU, Journal of Computational Physics, Volume 257, Part A, 15 January 2014, Pages 687-707, ISSN 0021-9991, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jcp.2013.10.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0021999113006931)
Abstract: Abstract
An approach is developed to perform explicit time domain finite element simulations of elastodynamic problems on the graphical processing unit, using Nvidiaʼs CUDA. Of critical importance for this problem is the arrangement of nodes in memory, allowing data to be loaded efficiently and minimising communication between the independently executed blocks of threads. The initial stage of memory arrangement is partitioning the mesh; both a well established ‘greedy’ partitioner and a new, more efficient ‘aligned’ partitioner are investigated. A method is then developed to efficiently arrange the memory within each partition. The software is applied to three models from the fields of non-destructive testing, vibrations and geophysics, demonstrating a memory bandwidth of very close to the cardʼs maximum, reflecting the bandwidth-limited nature of the algorithm. Comparison with Abaqus, a widely used commercial CPU equivalent, validated the accuracy of the results and demonstrated a speed improvement of around two orders of magnitude. A software package, Pogo, incorporating these developments, is released open source, downloadable from http://www.pogo-fea.com/ to benefit the community.
Keywords: Finite element; Ultrasound; Elastodynamic; Graphical processing unit; GPU

Sarbast Rasheed, Daniel Stashuk, Mohamed Kamel, A software package for interactive motor unit potential classification using fuzzy k-NN classifier, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 89, Issue 1, January 2008, Pages 56-71, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cmpb.2007.10.006.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169260707002362)
Abstract: We present an interactive software package for implementing the supervised classification task during electromyographic (EMG) signal decomposition process using a fuzzy k-NN classifier and utilizing the MATLAB high-level programming language and its interactive environment. The method employs an assertion-based classification that takes into account a combination of motor unit potential (MUP) shapes and two modes of use of motor unit firing pattern information: the passive and the active modes. The developed package consists of several graphical user interfaces used to detect individual MUP waveforms from a raw EMG signal, extract relevant features, and classify the MUPs into motor unit potential trains (MUPTs) using assertion-based classifiers.
Keywords: Assertion-based classifiers; Computer interaction; Features extraction; Fuzzy k-NN; Motor unit potential classification; User interfaces

André Schappo, Ernest A. Edmonds, Support for tentative design: incorporating the screen image, as a graphical object, into PROLOG, International Journal of Man-Machine Studies, Volume 24, Issue 6, June 1986, Pages 601-609, ISSN 0020-7373, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0020-7373(86)80011-6.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0020737386800116)
Abstract: The design process is a prime exemplar of a creative task in which humans often change their minds. The design process considered is that of creating pictures. It is argued that in order to accommodate tentative design of pictures it is necessary to develop tools that maintain and have access to a complete description of the picture being created. Extensions to PROLOG are proposed that would serve as a basis for the development of such a tool. The functioning of these extensions, which include human-computer interaction rules, is shown to relate to the functioning of the design process.

Mehdi Elahi, Francesco Ricci, Neil Rubens, A survey of active learning in collaborative filtering recommender systems, Computer Science Review, Volume 20, May 2016, Pages 29-50, ISSN 1574-0137, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cosrev.2016.05.002.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1574013715300150)
Abstract: Abstract
In collaborative filtering recommender systems user’s preferences are expressed as ratings for items, and each additional rating extends the knowledge of the system and affects the system’s recommendation accuracy. In general, the more ratings are elicited from the users, the more effective the recommendations are. However, the usefulness of each rating may vary significantly, i.e., different ratings may bring a different amount and type of information about the user’s tastes. Hence, specific techniques, which are defined as “active learning strategies”, can be used to selectively choose the items to be presented to the user for rating. In fact, an active learning strategy identifies and adopts criteria for obtaining data that better reflects users’ preferences and enables to generate better recommendations.

So far, a variety of active learning strategies have been proposed in the literature. In this article, we survey recent strategies by grouping them with respect to two distinct dimensions: personalization, i.e., whether the system selected items are different for different users or not, and, hybridization, i.e., whether active learning is guided by a single criterion (heuristic) or by multiple criteria. In addition, we present a comprehensive overview of the evaluation methods and metrics that have been employed by the research community in order to test active learning strategies for collaborative filtering. Finally, we compare the surveyed strategies and provide guidelines for their usage in recommender systems.
Keywords: Recommender systems; Collaborative filtering; Active learning; Rating elicitation; Preference elicitation; Cold start; New user; New item

Martin Henze, Lars Hermerschmidt, Daniel Kerpen, Roger Häußling, Bernhard Rumpe, Klaus Wehrle, A comprehensive approach to privacy in the cloud-based Internet of Things, Future Generation Computer Systems, Volume 56, March 2016, Pages 701-718, ISSN 0167-739X, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.future.2015.09.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0167739X15002964)
Abstract: Abstract
In the near future, the Internet of Things is expected to penetrate all aspects of the physical world, including homes and urban spaces. In order to handle the massive amount of data that becomes collectible and to offer services on top of this data, the most convincing solution is the federation of the Internet of Things and cloud computing. Yet, the wide adoption of this promising vision, especially for application areas such as pervasive health care, assisted living, and smart cities, is hindered by severe privacy concerns of the individual users. Hence, user acceptance is a critical factor to turn this vision into reality.

To address this critical factor and thus realize the cloud-based Internet of Things for a variety of different application areas, we present our comprehensive approach to privacy in this envisioned setting. We allow an individual user to enforce all her privacy requirements before any sensitive data is uploaded to the cloud, enable developers of cloud services to integrate privacy functionality already into the development process of cloud services, and offer users a transparent and adaptable interface for configuring their privacy requirements.
Keywords: Privacy; Cloud computing; Internet of Things; Model-driven development; User acceptance

Mathias Brousset, Emmanuelle Darles, Daniel Meneveaux, Pierre Poulin, Benoît Crespin, Simulation and control of breaking waves using an external force model, Computers & Graphics, Volume 57, June 2016, Pages 102-111, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cag.2016.03.003.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0097849316300164)
Abstract: Abstract
This paper presents an extension of a paper initially presented at the conference VRIPHYS 2015 [1]. It describes a new method for intuitively managing swells and breaking waves within fluid solvers, based on an external force controlled with only a few parameters. Generating waves with conventional approaches requires pushing particles with oscillating planes. As the resulting waves are only handled by the fluid simulator, they cannot be controlled easily; breaking waves are also difficult to produce in practice. Instead, we propose to use a new wave model that physically describes the behavior of “wave forces” with parameters that explicitly affect wave speed, height, and width. We also propose to map each parameter with user-defined curves. As shown in the results, these forces applied to a smoothed-particle hydrodynamics (SPH) system provide a wide range of effects, such as swells with varying speed and height, breaking waves, curved wave fronts, overtaking waves, and curved wave paths. We show how it is possible to handle crossing waves with our model. Each effect demonstrated in our results only requires a few easy-to-implement operations.
Keywords: Physics-based animation; Fluids; SPH; User control

Marika Iwane, Jolie Palensky, Kathryn Plante, A user's review of commercial sample size software for design of biomedical studies using survival data, Controlled Clinical Trials, Volume 18, Issue 1, February 1997, Pages 65-83, ISSN 0197-2456, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0197-2456(96)00139-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0197245696001390)

Neil W. Polhemus, Statistical graphics in APL: Structuring a graphical support system for interactive data analysis, Computers & Graphics, Volume 7, Issue 1, 1983, Pages 73-80, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(83)90046-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0097849383900468)
Abstract: The design of an interactive statistical graphics system in APL is described. Called STATGRAPHICS, the system is structured to create an environment in which statistical and graphics functions are integrated under flexible user control. An optional menu control scheme allows inexperienced users to execute functions under system control, while experienced users can access program functions directly. Procedure control functions, which generate fullscreen control pages and execute operations through defined program function keys, enable graphics to become an integral part of the statistical modeling process.

M.J. Próspero, Evaluation of a graphical interaction technique using GKS, Computers & Graphics, Volume 9, Issue 3, 1985, Pages 319-321, ISSN 0097-8493, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0097-8493(85)90059-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0097849385900597)
Abstract: This paper shortly presents an interactive application with graphics in the field of computer-aided education that has been designed and implemented by using a window-oriented style of interaction. The main idea was to separate the dialogue from the application functions. Thus the basic building blocks of the dialogue have been based on a conceptual model called the interaction event model that also provides both “help” and “abort” facilities. GKS (level 1b) has been used for the production and manipulation of graphical entities, as well as for providing high portability.

Pawan Kumar Verma, Rajesh Verma, Arun Prakash, Ashish Agrawal, Kshirasagar Naik, Rajeev Tripathi, Maazen Alsabaan, Tarek Khalifa, Tamer Abdelkader, Abdulhakim Abogharaf, Machine-to-Machine (M2M) communications: A survey, Journal of Network and Computer Applications, Volume 66, May 2016, Pages 83-105, ISSN 1084-8045, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.jnca.2016.02.016.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1084804516000990)
Abstract: Abstract
Machine-to-Machine (M2M) communication is a promising technology for next generation communication systems. This communication paradigm facilitates ubiquitous communications with full mechanical automation, where a large number of intelligent devices connected by wired/wireless links, interact with each other without direct human intervention. As a result, M2M communication finds applications in wide areas such as smart grids, e-healthcare, home area networks, intelligent transportation systems, environmental monitoring, smart cities, and industrial automation. However, distinctive features in M2M communications form different challenges from those in human-to-human communications. These challenges need to be addressed, or otherwise it is not easy for this paradigm to gain trust of people. To understand M2M communications deeply, this paper presents a comprehensive review of M2M communication technology in terms of its system model architecture proposed by different standards developing organizations. This mainly includes 3GPP, ETSI, and oneM2M. Further, we have investigated distinctive features of various M2M applications and their supporting attributes, the M2M data traffic and their characterization, various M2M standardization bodies and their unique tasks, and potential M2M communication challenges and their proposed state-of-the-art solutions, followed by future research directions.
Keywords: Machine-to-Machine communication; Ubiquitous; Automation; Self-orientation; Self-configuration; Quality of Service

Samson W Tu, Henrik Eriksson, John H Gennari, Yuval Shahar, Mark A Musen, Ontology-based configuration of problem-solving methods and generation of knowledge-acquisition tools: application of PROTÉGÉ-II to protocol-based decision support, Artificial Intelligence in Medicine, Volume 7, Issue 3, June 1995, Pages 257-289, ISSN 0933-3657, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0933-3657(95)00006-R.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/093336579500006R)
Abstract: PROTÉGÉ-II is a suite of tools and a methodology for building knowledge-based systems and domain-specific knowledge-acquisition tools. In this paper, we show how PROTÉGÉ-II can be applied to the task of providing protocol-based decision support in the domain of treating HIV-infected patients. To apply PROTÉGÉ-II, (1) we construct a decomposable problem-solving method called episodic skeletal-plan refinement, (2) we build an application ontology that consists of the terms and relations in the domain, and of method-specific distinctions not already captured in the domain terms, and (3) we specify mapping relations that link terms from the application ontology to the domain-independent terms used in the problem-solving method. From the application ontology, we automatically generate a domain-specific knowledge-acquisition tool that is custom-tailored for the application. The knowledge-acquisition tool is used for the creation and maintenance of domain knowledge used by the problem-solving method. The general goal of the PROTÉGÉ-II approach is to produce systems and components that are reusable and easily maintained. This is the rationale for constructing ontologies and problem-solving methods that can be composed from a set of smaller-grained methods and mechanisms. This is also why we tightly couple the knowledge-acquisition tools to the application ontology that specifies the domain terms used in the problem-solving systems. Although our evaluation is still preliminary, for the application task of providing protocol-based decision support, we show that these goals of reusability and easy maintenance can be achieved. We discuss design decisions and the tradeoffs that have to be made in the development of the system.
Keywords: Decision support; Expert systems; Knowledge acquisition

Henry H. Emurian, Cheryl Gonce-Winder, Effects of format complexity on user performance and facial electromyographic activity: I, Computers in Human Behavior, Volume 10, Issue 3, Autumn 1994, Pages 261-280, ISSN 0747-5632, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0747-5632(94)90055-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0747563294900558)
Abstract: Twenty males and females reporting experience with either a word processing or editing package were paid as volunteers to evaluate a 16-row database record that was presented 256 times successively on a video display terminal (VDT) screen. Each evaluation required a decision about whether the datum adjacent to a designated label field was identical to or different from a separately displayed “target” data item. The database record had four configurations (i.e., formats), which differed in terms of bit-level complexity, Decision times (i.e., latencies) were assessed in a repeated-measures experimental design, and concurrently, electromyographic (EMG) activity was recorded for the masseter (jaw) and corrugator supercilii (eyebrow) muscles. The results showed that decision times differed among the four formats, but bit-level complexity was found to be unrelated to decision times. Local density of information, however, was highest for the format showing the slowest decision time. Masseter EMG activity did not change reliably over a resting baseline, and it was not differentially affected by format complexity. Corrugator supercilii EMG activity was reliably greater during task performance than during a resting baseline, but it was not differentially affected by format complexity. Although different configurations of information have been known to affect user response time and task performance can evoke facial EMG activity, the available data do not support the conclusion that bit-level complexity of a database record displayed on a VDT screen is related to user performance or facial EMG activity.

, Graphical robot applications simulation package, Advances in Engineering Software (1978), Volume 7, Issue 3, July 1985, Page 162, ISSN 0141-1195, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0141-1195(85)90182-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0141119585901822)

J.G. Rowland, L.C. Jain, Knowledge-based systems for instrumentation diagnosis, system configuration and circuit and system design, Engineering Applications of Artificial Intelligence, Volume 6, Issue 5, October 1993, Pages 437-446, ISSN 0952-1976, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0952-1976(93)90004-H.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/095219769390004H)
Abstract: A number of knowledge-based systems in the electronic engineering field have been developed in the past decade. These include those that use knowledge-based techniques to diagnose instrumentation, determine system configurations and to aid circuit and system design. This paper reviews the literature on knowledge-based systems for electronic engineering applications in these areas and reports progress made in the development of a basis for realising electronic systems.
Keywords: Knowledge-based systems; design; diagnosis

James A. Carter, Jo-Anne M. Lukey, Michael F. Schweighardt, The Action-Modifier-Object-Attribute (AMOA) classification of user-oriented functions, International Journal of Man-Machine Studies, Volume 34, Issue 1, January 1991, Pages 1-22, ISSN 0020-7373, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0020-7373(91)90048-C.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/002073739190048C)
Abstract: This paper discusses the rationale for and the development of the Action-Modifier-Object-Attribute classification of user-oriented functions. The AMOA classification combines the benefits of an open, expandable theoretical organization of functions with the benefits of an existing taxonomy based on extensive empirical research findings. The resulting AMOA hierarchy can be used to design highly (functionally) integrated user-oriented systems as well as common user interfaces (and user interface management systems) for a variety of different types of applications.

A. Leich, H. Leich, V. Prikhodko, M. Rudalics, A microprogrammed bit-slice arithmetics processor for fast transformation of graphical items, Microprocessing and Microprogramming, Volume 14, Issues 3–4, October–November 1984, Pages 215-221, ISSN 0165-6074, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0165-6074(84)90023-1.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0165607484900231)
Abstract: The arithmetics processor of an intelligent graphics terminal is introduced. The processor has been built up from microprogrammable bit-slices. Various graphics transformations like coordinate transformation, clipping, and attribute transformation have been implemented on microprogram level. The input data format of the arithmetics processor has been defined in accordance with the requirements of the Graphical Kernel System. The format of output data fits the requirements of the graphics processor of the intelligent graphics terminal. The implications of these requirements on the internal data formats and the set of functions to be realized by the microprogram are discussed in this paper.

Francesco Sambo, Fulvia Ferrazzi and Riccardo Bellazzi, 12 - Probabilistic Modelling with Bayesian Networks, In Modelling Methodology for Physiology and Medicine (Second Edition), edited by Ewart Carson and Claudio Cobelli, Elsevier, Oxford, 2014, Pages 257-280, ISBN 9780124115576, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-0-12-411557-6.00012-4.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780124115576000124)
Abstract: Abstract
This chapter introduces a probabilistic approach to modelling in physiology and medicine: the quantities of interest are modeled as random variables and the focus is on the probabilistic dependencies between these variables. As primary tool in this modelling framework, we present Bayesian networks (BNs), which map the dependencies between a set of random variables to a directed acyclic graph, both increasing human readability and simplifying the representation of the joint probability distribution of the set of variables. The chapter first describes the theoretical foundations of BNs, including a brief review of probability and graph theory, a formal definition of BNs and details on discrete, continuous, and dynamic BNs. Then, a selection of algorithms for inference, conditional probability learning, and structure learning is presented. Finally, several examples of BN applications in biomedicine are reviewed.
Keywords: Graphical models; Bayesian networks; probabilistic inference; conditional probability estimation; structure learning; probabilistic modelling

Gerard Boran, Rory O'Moore, William Grimson, Margaret Peters, Arie Hasman, Torgny Groth, Frits Van Merode, A new clinical laboratory information system architecture from the OpenLabs project offering advanced services for laboratory staff and users, Clinica Chimica Acta, Volume 248, Issue 1, 15 April 1996, Pages 19-30, ISSN 0009-8981, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0009-8981(95)06263-7.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0009898195062637)
Abstract: The OpenLabs project aims to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of clinical laboratory services by integrating decision support systems with laboratory information systems and equipment. Standards for electronic data interchange between laboratories and other medical systems using the EUCLIDES/OpenLabs coding scheme and an open architecture for clinical laboratory information systems have been specified. This article gives an account of the proposed architecture and outlines new software applications being developed using the architecture which provide advanced services for ordering and reporting of laboratory tests, advanced instrument workstation and laboratory management services, including an OpenLabs Service Manager application which co-ordinates the available services.
Keywords: OpenLabs project; Laboratory information systems; Electronic data interchange; Clinical laboratory services

S.J. Hogeveen, The Astronomical Information Infrastructure from the end-user perspective, Vistas in Astronomy, Volume 39, Issue 1, 1995, Pages 13-20, ISSN 0083-6656, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0083-6656(95)00039-P.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/008366569500039P)
Abstract: Information Technology (IT) today has found so many applications in astronomy, that we may speak of an electronic ‘Astronomical Information Infrastructure’ (AII). At this moment, the AII really is nothing but a collection of disparate services. Over the last few years the collection has grown so large that it leaves the end-user in a rather desperate state. This paper provides an inventory of end-user problems, regarding network information systems, astronomical software packages, and electronic publishing. Solutions to the problems may be found through the coordination of efforts, and the definition of standards and principles. Examples of what may be achieved are the AstroWeb project, which provides a directory of astronomical IT services, the Starlink project in the United Kingdom, concerning astronomical software packages, and the initiatives of the American Astronomical Society with respect to electronic publishing. The paper also discusses the concepts of a modular client-server system, which may serve as the basic ingredient for a transparent and integrated Astronomical Information Infrastructure.

Mike Barker, Jawahar Rawtani and Steve Mackay, 9 - Operator and supervisor interface, In Practical Batch Process Management, Newnes, Oxford, 2005, Pages 86-92, ISBN 9780750662772, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-075066277-2/50009-8.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9780750662772500098)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter explains the operator and supervisor interface. User interface is the mechanism by which the operators and supervisors interact with the systems. The interaction may be active—such as controlling the process—or may be passive—such as simply monitoring the system. The user interface consists of devices that help operators and supervisor to monitor, control, and supervise a process and annunciate alarms. The user interface provides information in the form of text, pictures, audible alarms, and color changes. Most systems provide tools to the users for building user interfaces. The operator interface provides the operator with a user-friendly interface through which she/he can get information about the status of the plant and interact with the plant. The operator interface consists of graphic displays that give real-time status of plant equipment, drives, and process parameters. The chapter provides guidelines for building user interfaces. The task of a human-machine interface (HMI) is to make the function of a technology obvious. The operator's and system user's experience with the man-machine interface (MMI) is more important than the architecture of the internal workings of the system.

Tim Wilmshurst, 8 - The human and physical interfaces, In Designing Embedded Systems with PIC Microcontrollers, Newnes, Oxford, 2007, Pages 184-224, ISBN 9780750667555, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-075066755-5/50009-X.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B978075066755550009X)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter focuses on different aspects of interfacing, including both the human and the physical interfaces. To design the interface one need to know about the sensors and actuators that can be used. These lie between the wider system and the electronic domain of the microcontroller circuit. There are input devices, sensors for measurement or data entry devices for human interaction. There are also output devices, displays or alarms for the human being, and motors or other actuators for the physical system. The chapter begins by discussing the needs of human interfacing and some simple means for meeting these needs. Whether or not the embedded microcontroller has a human interface, it certainly interfaces with the physical world. To do this it must be able to detect the state of physical variables and it must be able to control those variables. This interaction with the physical world is done by means of transducers. Input transducers, also called sensors, detect and convert physical variables into electrical variables. Output transducers convert electrical variables to physical.

Gavin Powell, 24 - The Wait Event Interface, In Oracle Performance Tuning for 10gR2 (Second Edition), Digital Press, Burlington, 2007, Pages 739-770, ISBN 9781555583453, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/B978-155558345-3/50025-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/B9781555583453500252)
Abstract: Publisher Summary
This chapter discusses some of the tools that can be used to aid in physical and configuration tuning; including what each tool can be used for. A bottleneck is quite literally a small part of installation, where too much processing is being funnelled through a specific area. This chapter covers what is often called the Oracle Database Wait Event Interface, or, quite simply, a bunch of performance views that enable drilling into wait events and all sorts of statistics, allowing for detection of potential bottlenecks. The objective is to tune by removing performance bottlenecks. Using the Oracle Database Wait Event Interface is simply another tuning method or tool. It can often provide database administrators with enough ammunition to convince developers where SQL code can be altered to drastically improve performance. There are numerous steps database administrators can take to improve performance without involving or having to persuade developers to alter application code.

T. Bluhm, P. Heimann, Ch. Hennig, H. Kroiss, G. Kühner, J. Maier, H. Riemann, M. Zilker, Data access and its implementation at Wendelstein 7-X, Fusion Engineering and Design, Volume 83, Issues 2–3, April 2008, Pages 387-392, ISSN 0920-3796, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.fusengdes.2007.11.017.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0920379607005339)
Abstract: The increasing number of data acquisition stations and setups in laboratory environments at Wendelstein 7-X does already produce a considerable amount of data by now. Diagnosticians want to view the acquired data in a comfortable way and use them for calculations in their own test and analysis algorithms. To prepare for full operation of W7-X, a reasonable approach is to provide data access methods that stay as close as possible to the final data access concept. This requires taking care of the special needs of W7-X regarding continuously acquired data, segment based parameter switching and synchronization of data from different diagnostics. Therefore, a data access interface has been designed and implemented considering continuous data acquisition as well as usability and performance issues. The interface and its usage in different software environments (e.g. high level scientific programming languages) will be explained. Also, the integration of user defined off line analysis algorithms will be described. Additionally, the DataBrowser will be presented. The DataBrowser is a Java application that can browse continuously acquired data of different kind, provides several types of plots including zooming functions to display the data and the corresponding parameters and offers export functions to save selected data locally.
Keywords: Data access; Data viewing; User interface; Continuous acquisition; Wendelstein 7-X

L. Bissi, P. Placidi, A. Scorzoni, I. Elmi, S. Zampolli, Environmental monitoring system compliant with the IEEE 1451 standard and featuring a simplified transducer interface, Sensors and Actuators A: Physical, Volume 137, Issue 1, 12 June 2007, Pages 175-184, ISSN 0924-4247, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.sna.2007.02.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S092442470700057X)
Abstract: In this paper, we describe the structure of a multiprocessor control system for a gas sensing array, complying with the IEEE 1451 standard. The system (Smart Transducer Interface Module, STIM) features a simplified Transducer Independent Interface (TII) based on a 3-wire RS232 asynchronous communication and is conceived as a cluster between identical monosensor subsystems and a central Controller. After a brief illustration of the gas sensor array, an overview on the modular system architecture, of the basic monosensor modules and of the simplified TII will be given. Finally, we will illustrate the characterization of the system performances and the experimental results obtained with the proposed gas sensing array.
Keywords: Smart sensors; Environmental monitoring; Metal-oxide sensors; IEEE 1451 standard; STIM

L. Gross, L. Bourgouin, A.J. Hale, H.-B. Mühlhaus, Interface modeling in incompressible media using level sets in Escript, Physics of the Earth and Planetary Interiors, Volume 163, Issues 1–4, 15 August 2007, Pages 23-34, ISSN 0031-9201, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.pepi.2007.04.004.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0031920107000647)
Abstract: We use a finite element (FEM) formulation of the level set method to model geological fluid flow problems involving interface propagation. Interface problems are ubiquitous in geophysics. Here we focus on a Rayleigh-Taylor instability, namely mantel plumes evolution, and the growth of lava domes. Both problems require the accurate description of the propagation of an interface between heavy and light materials (plume) or between high viscous lava and low viscous air (lava dome), respectively. The implementation of the models is based on Escript which is a Python module for the solution of partial differential equations (PDEs) using spatial discretization techniques such as FEM. It is designed to describe numerical models in the language of PDEs while using computational components implemented in C and C++ to achieve high performance for time-intensive, numerical calculations. A critical step in the solution geological flow problems is the solution of the velocity–pressure problem. We describe how the Escript module can be used for a high-level implementation of an efficient variant of the well-known Uzawa scheme. We begin with a brief outline of the Escript modules and then present illustrations of its usage for the numerical solutions of the problems mentioned above.
Keywords: Partial differential equations; Numerical software; Level set method; Uzawa scheme; Rayleigh-Taylor instability; Mantle plumes; Lava dome modeling

Markus Sauer, Frauke Driewer, Manuel Göllnitz, Klaus Schilling, POTENTIAL AND CHALLENGES OF STEREO AUGMENTED REALITY FOR MOBILE ROBOT TELEOPERATION, IFAC Proceedings Volumes, Volume 40, Issue 16, 2007, Pages 183-188, ISSN 1474-6670, http://dx.doi.org/10.3182/20070904-3-KR-2922.00032.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S1474667015327816)
Abstract: Abstract
In many mobile robot applications a human operator is still required to control the robot. The design of the user interface is the major element affecting the performance and efficiency of the task execution in the teleoperation scenario. This work investigates an approach to visualize all information gathered by the mobile robot in an integrated fashion by applying stereo augmented reality. Initial experiences and results with this type of interface for navigation tasks are presented.
Keywords: human-machine interface; user interfaces; robot navigation; mobile robots; remote control; man/machine interaction; telerobotics; teleoperation

, LATEX: A document preparation system user's guide and reference manual: By Leslie Lamport. Addison-Wesley Publishing Company, Reading, MA. (1994). 272 pages. $32.95, Computers & Mathematics with Applications, Volume 29, Issue 11, June 1995, Page 108, ISSN 0898-1221, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0898-1221(95)90261-9.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0898122195902619)

Peter F. McGoldrick, Lin Zhi-Yu, John L Green, Richard J. Barson, A.E. de Barr, NECTAR — A Graphical Technique to Represent the Component Produced from the Cutter Path of a Numerically Controlled Milling Machine, CIRP Annals - Manufacturing Technology, Volume 33, Issue 1, 1984, Pages 225-228, ISSN 0007-8506, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/S0007-8506(07)61414-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0007850607614140)
Abstract: Summary
NECTAR (NumErically Controlled Tool pAth Representation) Is a computer graphics program which given the tool path of a cutter will produce a pictorial representation of the component which will be produced by that cutter in a billet of specified dimensions. This technique has potential use in two areas:- firstly it will enable machine control tapes to be proved away from the machine tool; the pictures produced as part of the current tape proving techniques are essentially only a plot of the cutter centre line path and as such they can be very misleading. Secondly this technique opens up the possibility of eliminating much of the role of the part-programmer, since a CAD designer has the ability to see directly how the component described in his data base will look as a finished workpiece once the part has been processed and post-processed automatically.

Paul L. Tuan, The application of microcomputer and on-line graphical display technology to demand-responsive transportation services, Computers, Environment and Urban Systems, Volume 9, Issue 1, 1984, Pages 93-109, ISSN 0198-9715, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0198-9715(84)90007-3.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0198971584900073)
Abstract: Scheduling and dispatching a fleet of vehicles to respond to ongoing requests for transportation to and from various points in an urban area can be a complex proposition. Human controllers face an unmanageable number of scheduling possibilities. A strictly mainframe computer-based system would require elaborate computer algorithms, and high investment cost. This paper discusses the development of a low-cost interactive microcomputer color graphics system that displays vehicle and demand information and performs routine tasks while freeing the human dispatcher for creative decision-making. The system is designed for dispatching demand-responsive vehicles for pickup and delivery of passenger and express packages.

Sanghun Park, Wontae Kim, Insung Ihm, Mobile collaborative medical display system, Computer Methods and Programs in Biomedicine, Volume 89, Issue 3, March 2008, Pages 248-260, ISSN 0169-2607, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/j.cmpb.2007.11.012.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/S0169260707002738)
Abstract: Because of recent advances in wireless communication technologies, the world of mobile computing is flourishing with a variety of applications. In this study, we present an integrated architecture for a personal digital assistant (PDA)-based mobile medical display system that supports collaborative work between remote users. We aim to develop a system that enables users in different regions to share a working environment for collaborative visualization with the potential for exploring huge medical datasets. Our system consists of three major components: mobile client, gateway, and parallel rendering server. The mobile client serves as a front end and enables users to choose the visualization and control parameters interactively and cooperatively. The gateway handles requests and responses between mobile clients and the rendering server for efficient communication. Through the gateway, it is possible to share working environments between users, allowing them to work together in computer supported cooperative work (CSCW) mode. Finally, the parallel rendering server is responsible for performing heavy visualization tasks. Our experience indicates that some features currently available to our mobile clients for collaborative scientific visualization are limited due to the poor performance of mobile devices and the low bandwidth of wireless connections. However, as mobile devices and wireless network systems are experiencing considerable elevation in their capabilities, we believe that our methodology will be utilized effectively in building quite responsive, useful mobile collaborative medical systems in the very near future.
Keywords: Medical informatics applications; Mobile computing; Personal digital assistants; Computer supported cooperative work; Distributed user interfaces; Ubiquitous computing

Marie E. Gomes, Daniel E. Snyder, Integrating user needs by computer-supported interpretation of concept maps, Computers & Industrial Engineering, Volume 25, Issues 1–4, September 1993, Pages 577-579, ISSN 0360-8352, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0360-8352(93)90348-2.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0360835293903482)
Abstract: Tools for Automated Knowledge Engineering (TAKE) was created to support the design and development of human-system interfaces. TAKE consists of concept mapping and computer supported data analysis tools. Concept mapping is used to elicit information from experts. A computer then converts the maps into a database that can be manipulated and refined to enhance the analysis process. The true beauty of utilizing this process is that it provides an easy method to document multiple perspectives of a problem domain and produces a single document that captures all input.

TAKE can be used by industrial engineers to perform more efficient requirements documentation and job/task analysis, to design more effective workstation layouts, and to determine optimal process flow. TAKE provides the industrial engineer with a tool that creates a database of that information to allow traceability in the system design process.

Denis Vandorpe, Michel Rueher, A scheme for the realization of graphical computer aided design systems, Computers in Industry, Volume 4, Issue 1, March 1983, Pages 47-58, ISSN 0166-3615, http://dx.doi.org/10.1016/0166-3615(83)90052-0.
(http://www.sciencedirect.com/science/article/pii/0166361583900520)
Abstract: We present some of the problems encountered in the study of CAD systems in an electro-mechanical company, and propose a methodology based entirely on a detailed object study. In the first part of this paper we analyse the traditional design process in the company and define the most important functions of a CAD system. In the second part, we show how a functional hierarchical decomposition of the product helps us to realize the CAD system, and then we describe the practical application.
Keywords: Computer-aided design; electro-mechanical; methodology; data consistency; graphics; Technical documentation; documentation; CAD


